================================================================================
QUERY #1:  name="StarbucKS"  state=""  zip_code=""

RESULTS:  "Starbucks"  (188 locations)

LOCATION #1:  address="39504 N Daisy Mountain Dr Ste 118"  city="Anthem"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85086"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (213 chars)
I like this Starbucks the best in Anthem. The Batista's are quick with good quality. And this Starbucks generally has the nicest workers ! My friend and i come here quite often and haven't been disappointed yet !


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (74 chars)
Great friendly service very quick. Way batter than the one on Anthem way!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (54 chars)
Everybody is helpful and friendly.  Great atmosphere.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (33 chars)
Great service and they expedite!


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (14 chars)
Great service


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (1161 chars)
Wow, I found a Starbucks that hasn't been reviewed yet, and I bet that loads of Yelp-er peeps have been here.  Coffee at Starbucks is Coffee at Starbucks; the flavor doesn't change much... ...  ... This Starbucks location gets a "fan" rating not because of the coffee, but the fantabulous service! This Starbucks is a well oiled machine when you need a cup of Joe and your in a rush. ...  ... In the many times I've ordered here, it seems they have a good system in place to deal with the heavy traffic that happens sporadically throughout the day.  Don't be deceived by the long lines at this location.  The baristas that run this Starbucks know how to handle the fluctuations in traffic. ...  ... On top of the speedy service, the baristas here are also very friendly and pleasant. They're nice without being too sugary, if you know what I mean. ...  ... I would not recommend going here if you plan on staying a while to study. Finding an empty table is very hit and miss and there's just a lot of traffic. It can get distracting. ...  ... Overall, a great experience. Props to this Starbucks for knowing how to serve coffee efficiently with friendly faces!


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (991 chars)
I love Starbucks and have high expectations for my experience.  The register partner was great, I give him a 5.  He was friendly and nice even though a bunch of people just walked in.  The Redhead that seemed to be in charge was a little tense.  She told the barista 5 times that the Java Chip Frappuccino gets drizzle.  She seemed a little irritated with her for forgetting.  The barista asked if the customer wanted the drizzle and they were adamant that they did.  She put the drizzle on the drink.  The redhead continued to tell her that the drinks with chips get drizzle.  I tried to be nice to the redhead and asked about her store.  She was irritated and bitchy.  I know it is frustrating to train people  when your store is a little busy but you are in the people business serving coffee.  Try to remember that, mean redhead lady.  Starbucks may need to remind her of the core purpose, "To create an uplifting experience that enriches people's daily lives".  Enter at your own risk!


................................................................................
LOCATION #2:  address="1485 E Florence Blvd Ste 106"  city="Casa Grande"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85122"  (5 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (250 chars)
The baristas is here are awesome and the store is very clean.  The bathrooms were extremely clean when I went in there.  The baked goods were good to go and the drinks came out in a hurry.  I like this location and the people.  Would come back again


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (902 chars)
We stopped here after here surviving a terrifying dust storm on I-10.  We were lucky.  The people on our side of the freeway managed to stop safely and skillfully.  The people on the other side weren't as lucky:  http://www.sfgate.com/news/us/article/3-dead-after-dust-causes-crashes-on-I-10-in-Ariz-4936646.php  After we continued on our way we saw many highway patrol vehicles heading for what we inferred was a pileup on the southbound side.   ...  ... We got off the freeway and after driving a while saw this Starbucks.  We made a U-turn and went back to it.  I had a cup of Earl Grey tea and Alan had an iced coffee.  Jazz played overhead and it was a comfortable place to relax and unwind.  The bathrooms were clean and comfortable.  I'm neither a partisan nor a hater of Starbucks.  This was a hospitable place to regroup before getting back on the road.  The barista was helpful and friendly.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (116 chars)
This my local Starbucks and probably my favorite.  Great staff and generally fast service even on the busiest days.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (267 chars)
I stopped here at 2:15 for an iced coffee.  There are only 3 people in store and I can't see how many card are in the drive-thru but they seem to only be concerned about their customers in the cars because it took 5 minutes to pour a simple black iced grande coffee!


REVIEW #5:  2 stars  (494 chars)
Terrible service. First, they charged me for a venti when I ordered a grande. Then, I had to wait for more than 15 minutes for my drink because they made a few drinks in a row wrong. At one point there were more drinks waiting on the counter than people in the store, and yet somehow none of them were mine.  ...  ... At least they made me the larger size that I didn't order.  ...  ... Tip: go to the other Starbucks down the street. I'm convinced the workers at the one don't listen or care.


................................................................................
LOCATION #3:  address="1085 W Queen Creek Rd"  city="Chandler"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85248"  (9 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (174 chars)
Love this Starbuck's.  Reminds me of the European coffee shops.  And, best of all, I feel safe since Starbucks doesn't welcome concealed carry guns anymore.  Yay, Starbucks!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (157 chars)
My business  Audio Video Editor is right next door to this Starbucks. What a great staff of talented baristas. Great service, clean store and smiling faces.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (135 chars)
Just picked up a box of coffee this morning, called it in last night, everything went great. Someone needs to add store info... not me


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (111 chars)
Amazing store! Great baristas, my drink is always perfect, and the new remodel makes for a 5 star location! :)


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (1041 chars)
This is my local Starbucks.  It's a bit on the small side but that's ok, it feels homey.  All the locals are here getting their morning cup....guys starting their days and having a chat, women either on their way to drop the kids off or just dropped them off and are on the way to work in need of a java jolt.  The folks behind the counter are friendly and they remember people and their orders.  I've only been in twice but I'm sure the more I frequent, they will remember my order.  This time of year I change it up a lot though......I just can't make up my mind.  Do I get a Gingerbread Latte, a Peppermint Mocha or a they have started something called a Caramel Brulee.  They are all yummy and just what is needed to wake up in the morning!   The only reason it's not 5 stars is because I think they have gotten a little pricey over the years.  One of the first things I cut out on a budget is coffee.  At over $4 for a Grande anything, it's now a treat from time to time instead of a daily thing.  It's still a darn good coffee though.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (988 chars)
This location is super convenient and the parking and strip-mall is always easy to get in and get out.. and if you feel like sitting down, there's sufficient (a bit cozy) room inside or if the weather is nice, there are plenty of tables/chairs outside.   ...  ... The staff is quick and friendly and since my drink is simple, they've rarely "screwed" it up (unless you count too much foam on a macchiato).  The longest line I've ever had to endure was a whole line of 3 people in front of me (yes, even at peak coffee hour).. so really, no complaints there. ...  ... You'll notice a lot of local people do their coffee here as there really is no local coffee joint nearby to give this place any competition (yeah, that's hard to do when it's a SB, but I'd give a local coffee joint my business)... a lot of morning cyclists, or morning ppl enjoying their coffee with a paper. ...  ... This is a good Starbucks.. the same faces and consistently well made drinks.. no hassle.. feels local.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (48 chars)
Vanilla Iced Latte, how great can my midday be?


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (344 chars)
I would generally give all Starbucks 5 stars....yes sometimes your drink taste like poop, but most of the times they nail it.....well except if you go to one in a grocery store.  ...  ... This one is great...minus the lady with the black curly hair. Fire her already. Why is she so rude %99 of the time? I avoid this one solely because of her.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (336 chars)
Small sized Starbucks shop.  Service is fast even when really busy and servers are polite.  We like to go walk over from our house on weekends and enjoy a coffee.   ...  ... Three stars because the tables were all dirty in the shop and on the patio the chairs were covered in bird poop and obviously hadn't been cleaned in a long time.


................................................................................
LOCATION #4:  address="1395 S Arizona Ave"  city="Chandler"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85248"  (12 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (784 chars)
This Starbucks always gets my order right.  ...  ... This Starbucks location is between my home and work (which both have other Starbucks nearby) however I like this location best. ...  ... The drive thru line always flows very quickly, and the staff is always friendly. There is a young man named John who works there and he always has the biggest smile on his face.  ...  ... When you give a tip at this location, the employees are always genuinely grateful for it. (More than I can say for the Starbucks by my house, who gets tipped when they don't even get my drink right and don't seem grateful at all.)  ...  ... I just love this location. Everyone is friendly, service is fast, my order is always correct. I've never had a bad experience. Keep up the good work, John and crew!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (156 chars)
Consistent  ...  ... Never really a bad drink and generally has all food in stock.  ...  ... Not super friendly...but hey...just give my my jo and shut up.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (113 chars)
Although it can be very busy during peak periods, the baristas are always friendly and create good conversation.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (52 chars)
Love It! Try the Salted Caramel Mocha! Sooo good :)


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (49 chars)
Nice drinks, but...Wow, long wait at drive-thru.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (796 chars)
This is one of the closest Starbucks to my house, so if I'm sitting at home and have a sudden craving for an iced tea, hot chocolate, or apple cider, this will be my first choice.  Drive-through can get clogged up pretty quick in the morning, but avoiding peak hours helps keep it smooth.  They do tend to run out of their baked goods rather quickly, though I don't normally indulge in them, so not really an issue for me.  I will note that about 1/6 times I visit this location, they get my order wrong (I ask for soy milk in hot drinks and no sweetener in tea), which is fine, because getting a free drink 1/6 of the time makes me feel better about frequenting a corporate chain. ...  ... Note:  Parking can get cramped, especially with the drive-through exiting through the middle of the lot.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (595 chars)
If I can give them 2.5 stars I would. Its sad how this is the ONLY Starbucks off the freeway over here and the drive-thru is backed up in ways you couldn't imagine. I frequent SB everyday (DEFINITELY not this one) and this is, by far, the slowest establishment I have EVER been to. Its ridiculous, mind you it's 12 pm on a Sat. I only stop here when times are desperate, this is one of those times. There should be a time limit on the drive-thru..seriously. I had a 10 FaceTime convo with my bestie while waiting to get up to place an order, I still haven't gotten my drink.  ...  ... Holy cow!


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (1530 chars)
I really don't want to rank a 2, but I have just had it. I love this location and especially with the drive through. Peak times are HORRIBLE at this place with the layout of the parking lot and drive through (not their fault through), but other times its okay. I have noticed this location is starting to have a LOT of quick turn over. We came here for so long and got to know everyone but each time I go in while is 4 or more times a month, always different people. always friendly though! I do give a 4 star for customer service.  ...  ... But I am rating 2 stars for the drinks. I went in today (drive through) and got my usual today, a tall Mocha frap with whip. It tasted horrible. It seems like that EVERY TIME I come to this one, they make my drink differently. They never follow the same process or didn't wash out the blender container. I was a good mile or more away this morning running to another errand before I REALLY got into my drink to notice and I was NOT turning back around. I shouldn't have to turn around and walk in just to get a common drink re-made. It is just so frustrating. I have had to go back multiple times to get drinks remade at this location. I am just over it. I respect Starbucks as a company and commend their efforts and service, but I am starting to get the feeling that they are loosing their values because they are such a huge name and staple in our modern day and society. I really hope they get back on track. I am to the point of wanting to find local shops and support them instead.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (290 chars)
Slow drive thru...order wrong.....speaker at drive through order board terrible.....parking lot configuration sucks. Wife's coffee not made very well. I appreciate the staff trying to make up for all of the short comings of this location. If not for them this would be a one star for sure.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (126 chars)
I was going to give them a "1" star, but they did get half of my order right, and what they gave me by mistake was delicious.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (392 chars)
Both times I have been in this location I have asked simple questions and two different employees have rolled their eyes and made me feel like asking a simple question about merchandise would completely put them out. As a fellow Starbucks employee, I would be written up if we ever treated a customer like that. I recommend going to any other Starbucks in the area. This one literally sucks.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (95 chars)
Funny, there were more flys than customers in the Starbucks, just a tad bit uncomfortable.....


................................................................................
LOCATION #5:  address="2050 N Dobson Rd"  city="Chandler"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85224"  (4 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (119 chars)
Great location by my gym. Constantly full of customers. Very efficient staff. Have never had a bad cup of coffee here.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (155 chars)
I do love Starbucks and this one is no different! Make sure to work towards your gold card if you're a coffee addict because who doesn't love free drinks!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (116 chars)
Friendly and prompt customer service. On the small side for a Starbucks with more outside seating area than inside.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (342 chars)
Starbucks is Starbucks. Can't say I can review the coffee because it is pretty much the same across the company. If you like coffee at one Starbucks, you'll like it at this one too. Staff was friendly enough and got my coffee (vanilla latte) out quick. I prefer local coffee spots if I can find them, which get my four and five star ratings.


................................................................................
LOCATION #6:  address="2885 W Ray Rd"  city="Chandler"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85224"  (17 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (367 chars)
I really enjoy this Starbucks and wish it was closer to my home. Most Starbucks are created equal as far as product goes but this location offers superb customer service. The employee working the drive-thru is always incredibly friendly and makes small talk..a nice gesture that doesn't happen very often anymore. Will return whenever I can for my caramel macchiato!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (311 chars)
This is my Sbux on the way to work, and I'm so glad that it is. I love the staff, and they always make my mornings fun. I don't use the drive-through in the AM as I find it usually takes longer, and then I don't get the full experience. Amber & Kelly are the best. Thanks for starting my days off with a smile!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (77 chars)
The best coffee i ever had!!! They also have great pastries and sandwhiches.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1145 chars)
Oh no, not another Starbucks review. But, read on. ...  ... I come here two to four times a week, mostly to relax and have some quiet time. If you come here often, you might find that statement funny, since there's always a steady stream of folks coming and going.  But the line is never longer than three, go figure. ...  ... This is an above average location for Starbucks, in so far that you have the space to linger, sip your beverage, snack and read a paper. The wall spaces have a few 110 outlets, so you know who sits there.  But the beauty here are the spaces that come away from the wall, which are always free.  ...  ... As others have noted, the drive-thru is a mess. So I've never understood why more patrons haven't decided to come inside and see how friendly and inviting this store really is.  All the employees are great btw.  Fortunately most have decided to stay in their cars. Fortunate for me. LOL ...  ... I've found 6:30 to 7:30 am and 2:00 to 4:00 are good times to linger.  If you do, I'll be sitting at the big table near the door. Stop by and say "hi"!  ...  ... So, three and seven-eighths Stars, and yes, I am a fan.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (587 chars)
I don't know what everyone is talking about. If you come in the early morning rush hour, it will be busy and drinks will take longer. People want the baristas to be very quick yet welcome the customer and chit chat-- just can't be that way people. Anytime I have gone in, the staff has been friendly. If I am in the drive through, they try to get me out of there quick and complete my order. You can't blame the staff for indecisive and snobby customers. Only problem I have here is that it's usually a little dark and unwelcoming inside so I feel sleepy when trying to do homework lol.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (422 chars)
I'm a starbucks fan! I really like going to a starbucks where the employees are friendly, knowledgable and they remember you and your drink!  The only reason why this location doesn't get 5 stars is because their drive-thru is slow.  I'm not sure if they may be understaffed for the drive-thru, but it takes awhile to move through and get your beverage.  The location is perfect, close to the freeway and in a nice plaza.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (390 chars)
Small, out of the way, but still really convenient when you need a pick-me-up.  I usually stop here on my way home after grocery shopping at Whole Foods, get a shaken iced black tea lemonade - no sweetener, and the rest of my evening is calm and relaxing.  The staff are always really pleasant to talk to and offer cheerful greetings whether it's through the drive-through or in the store.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (134 chars)
Great Starbucks for you early birds opens at 4:30am. If you are waiting in the drive-thru they will even open a little early for you.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (126 chars)
Small location and kind of hidden but still your standard Starbucks. The employees are friendly so that is a huge difference!


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (503 chars)
Location is a bit too small for how busy it is. The seating area probably needs some rearranging to be more efficient. There is some wasted space for retail that could probably be better if it was used for seating. In the winter when the weather is nice, the outdoor seating helps to solve the issue. One other thing I noticed is the WIFI isnt' very reliable. I stop by between meetings to get a drink and use WIFI and often have a hard time staying connected or using it for anything business related.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (218 chars)
They have the slowest drive-thru ever, regardless the time of day. I would expect an establishment close to the freeway to be a little more hasty with their service times, but I suppose that's in my own perfect world.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (132 chars)
Please for the love of God, put some more electric outlets for us laptop warriors! Good location but not very biz, meeting friendly


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (348 chars)
Seems like this particular Starbucks is always understaffed. The wait is always forever and they often make the drinks wrong! A couple times they handed me someone else's black coffee when I ordered a hazelnut macchiato, and of course its after I left the drive-thru that's when I found out. How inconvenient it is to go back to get the right one.


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (343 chars)
Starbucks is supposed to be my escape from the office, so splurging for an over priced drink is easily justified. Not this time though, the cashier and manager seemed annoyed by my presence at 10:30am on a Friday morning. I guess they were enjoying not having any customers. Bad attitudes with my over priced coffee is a hard pill tk swallow.


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (877 chars)
Worst Starbucks I have ever been to!! FLAT OUT HORRIBLE SERVICE!  Took me probably ... 5-7 just to get a Carmel Frap. One person working while the rest were standing around shooting the bull.And on top of it all, I continue to try this place out to see if maybe just one trip here will be quick. NOPE.  ... The drive thru line is even worse. For some reason the customers who go to this particular Starbucks feel like they are special because on top the horrible customer service I have spent countless minutes sitting behind a person who either has the mental capacity of a toddler or who doesn't understand the magical voice contraption to their left...(because they take forever to order)... THEN these geniuses get up the window they forget to order their favorite little side with their coffee... wow... SOME OF US DON'T DRIVE A PRIUS. Thanks for wasting my gas and time.


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (122 chars)
Slow service!! Every time I come here my drinks take for ever. A drink shouldn't take 15min specially when it's not busy.


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (10 chars)
Horrible.


................................................................................
LOCATION #7:  address="3161 W Chandler Blvd"  city="Chandler"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85226"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  3 stars  (202 chars)
Nice mall location. Indoor and outside seating. Very clean indoor seating area. Drinks were very good  and the service was fast. The Starbucks is located just outside the food court near Valet parking.


REVIEW #2:  2 stars  (1260 chars)
This location of Starbucks let me down yesterday. It was 11am. I had met my sister here before we headed out on the town for the day. I was hungry for a breakfast sandwich or hot sandwich from the fridge that they will heat in the over for you. They were out of almost all flavors of sandwiches, they had only 3 left. They were also out of all breakfast sandwiches including the turkey bacon with egg, I understand that it was 11am but still, most Starbucks have these sandwiches well into the afternoon hours.  ...  ... I decided to try the faijita chicken sandwich with pepper jack from the refrigerated section at the counter. The cashier was very rude about the lack of sandwiches in the first place. She got irritated that I asked if they had a ham and swiss sandwich when it wasn't out. Anyhow, she heated up the sandwich and wrapped it up for me. The chicken was disgusting and I pulled a couple of pieces out and they had black spots on them. I am not sure how long that particular sandwich had been sitting out but eww. ...  ... I did also have a passion tea and it was delicious as usual. Rule of thumb, come here only for drinks, avoid the food at this location. I would only come back for coffee or tea. Customer service was also not the greatest.


REVIEW #3:  2 stars  (426 chars)
Wedge shaped inside and very cramped. There's about 15 people crammed around the pickup counter, the condiment stand is not accessible at all. Then when it cleared,  there are other cream carafes.  ... Starbucks deliberately keeps the stores small like this so their sales per square foot metric comes in high. There's one store I've been in that's. It cramped and this is not it. Boise ID on State St. should be their model.


................................................................................
LOCATION #8:  address="3731 S Arizona Ave"  city="Chandler"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85248"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (708 chars)
It's a Starbucks! Franchised food chain that offers exceptional coffee and service. Located on the northeast corner in the target shopping area but not the Starbucks inside the target.  ...  ... Every time I've stopped into this location I have received excellent customer service! They have a drive through which is very convenient and a large lounge area which is nice for doing whatever it is you're going to do at Starbucks while soaking up their free Internet. I recently got turned on to the Starbucks card/app for my iPhone so this has been a pleasurable experience. Now I get all these benefits so why not come enjoy them. This franchise really has their stuff together! Five-star reviews all around


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (296 chars)
I always go to Starbucks but never write reviews for them because they are everywhere, however, this particular Starbucks location was so professional and friendly that I wanted to yelp about it.  It seems rare these days to find great customer service and my vanilla skinny latte was delicious.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (646 chars)
This Starbucks recently opened and it has been quite the pleasure. Prior to this opening I was always having to wait in the long lines at the Starbucks at Arizona Ave and 202. Now that is one is open, no more long lines! The best thing about this coffee shop is that the inside is HUGE! There is a lot of room for seating and there is a patio if one wishes to enjoy this beautiful March weather.  ...  ... The staff is quite friendly (in fact, they gave me a free coffee the other day) and are always attentive to your needs. There is a drive-thru if you don't wish to use your legs and I've yet to wait more than 5 minutes to get my beverage :)


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (457 chars)
The layout and design of this Starbucks is great.  Lots of space.  Unfortunately, on our visit the team wasn't doing a very good job keeping that space clean.  The trash can is overflowing and the tables need to be wiped down.  They were friendly though and that means a lot in my book so I'm giving them 4 stars for this visit but hope they would focus on the environment a bit more and ensure food items are stocked appropriately.  That'll get them to 5.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (365 chars)
I am not a Starbucks fan due to its high price. But this location thrive on its friendly staff, always. I take my daughter there everyday after her swimming lesson. The service was great each time we were there. And of course you can stay there in the well decorated room. Due to its west exposure, I would say sitting there in the afternoon was not that pleasant.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (325 chars)
Nicest starbucks in the area in my opinion.  Shop is clean, and lots of space to find a quiet place to study.  Decor is cozy. ...  ... Staff was kind and helpful.  Coffee was great!  Store is open until 9pm on the weekdays.  Drive thru available too. ...  ... Located in front of Target next to Game Stop and Firehouse Subs.


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (1324 chars)
Im not impressed with this new location at all, I guess disappointed would be the right word. Its in a nice area of Chandler with many new buildings going up so I had high hopes entering this store. Its beautiful inside. Spacious with "newer" more modern decor. Although the wait staff is nothing short of unskilled and unprofessional. THREE out of the four times i came the drive through was closed. Whats the point of a drive through if you never use it. I came in at 2pm on a Tuesday. There was one barista ringing in orders and a line of about four people ahead of me. She was one of the slowest cashiers ever, the woman being serviced demanded a gift card for next time due to poor service. When it finally was my turn, I ordered a mocha light frappacino with added whip cream. Thats not being too difficult is it? Apparently to the barista it was. As I waited for my drink the man ahead of me told here she forgot the cream in his coffee and he stood there for about five minutes because she had to "get more half and half" . Ugh. He was visually upset too. Then when my drink was served, it was a coffee frappacino! I told her my order once again and she made me a mocha light frappacino and for got the added whip. Whatever, I give up and leave. Even though this location is convenient...its not worth the headache.


................................................................................
LOCATION #9:  address="4030 W Ray Road"  city="Chandler"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85226"  (5 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (661 chars)
I have a Starbucks closer to my house right on Ray and 101. BUT always go to this location on Ray & McClintock. The staff here is great. I especially love the drive thru lady who works Mon to Fri (she isn't there weekends). Being a Starbucks addict, having the same friendly barista is something I prefer. My drink is always made correctly. Which when I walk in and order from someone I don't know, it seems to be a 50/50 on if it is made correct. Only thing I request extra is chocolate drizzle inside cup. Lots of Starbucks mess that part up. So I use drive thru every time now, knowing my drink will come out correct. Service is quick too. Never long lines.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (436 chars)
I love this location!  The morning crew remember my very complicated drink and greet me by name when I walk in (They do this a for a LOT of am regulars...that's impressive!).  Chris is awesome and friendly perfect for my non morning person attitude.  Puts a smile on my face!  Keep it up- ...  ... Love: Starbucks Venti Double shot +/- add shot.  6 pumps white mocha and 4 Sugar Free Hazlenut, nonfat with cinammon dulce powder on top.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (476 chars)
Ok....generally I would not review a Starbucks....BUT I go to this one fairly often considering it is in the parking lot where I park my car on thurs during my internship....long story, whatever. So it's generally pretty good, but today I was in line behind this van for like a bazillion years (15 min).... I got up to the window and the girl had my drink ready AND gave it to me for free! WooHoo! That was super awesome. So for that reason, this location is cool in my book.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (589 chars)
I like this location because they have a drive-thru. Even though there is almost always a long line, they get you on your way fast. The staff is friendly and competent. Also, they rarely run out of anything (other locations seem to go through their entire inventory of breakfast sandwiches and scones by 9am). ...  ... If you are the type that does not drink your morning coffee inside a moving vehicle, they also have comfy chairs inside and decent patio seating.  The patio faces the parking lot and drive-thru but it does have shade umbrellas so it can be very pleasant in the morning.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (295 chars)
There are 3 drive thru Starbucks on Ray/Rural, Ray/McClintock, Ray/101N. I come here the most, in-store and drive thru. Honestly, the staffs here seem a bit indifferent or at least they made me feel like they are better than me. However, the drive thru here seem to be the quickest out off all.


................................................................................
LOCATION #10:  address="4970 S Gilbert Rd"  city="Chandler"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85249"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (511 chars)
So I think its a given that Starbucks has great coffee...so what I would like to say most about this location is the customer service ROCKS!  Everyone is always extremely friendly, the service is super duper fast and they usually have my husbands order ready to go the second they see him walk in the door...yes he goes nearly every day.  That is what I call good customer service.  Service with a smile and employees that remember you, it makes you feel appreciated, even if you are only buying a cup o' joe.!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (351 chars)
I have been to this Starbucks quite a few times. The inside is super comfortable and the bathroom is super clean. I mainly use the Drivethru which is super convenient and out of the way of the parking lot. All of the people I have dealt with have been super friendly and the drinks have been tastey. I definitely recommend this to people in the area.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (209 chars)
Great customer service, beverage, and atmosphere! The music is background music so you can talk with company, the store layout is perfect, the place is very neat and clean too. It's in a perfect location too!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (25 chars)
quality drinks & service


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (618 chars)
This is the Starbucks I prefer above all others in my area!  Whenever I walk in, or drive thru, I feel like Norm from the old tv show, Cheers ... everybody knows by name, and greets me using it and a smile. :) More often than not, they know what my drink of choice is, too!  Trisha and Jen are two of the most bubbly, upbeat, customer service-oriented people I have ever encountered.  But honestly, I have yet to encounter anyone there who doesn't seem to love doing what they do, or fake it really well! Quality service with a smile ... not easy to find these days; this Starbucks location offers it in a big way! :)


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (522 chars)
I am a coffee addict but totally fine with that.  ...  ... This Starbucks location I frequent all the time. Great crew here.  ...  ... One positive and negative is their drive-through. While convenient at times, in the morning especially it get's insanely busy and the wait can be a bit much. The upside though is they often put their money where their wait is, if the wait is too long they often end up buying your coffee that morning. I've had it happen 3 times in on month. So I can't complain. ...  ... Robert Pfeifer


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (338 chars)
This is not the closest Starbucks to me, but it's the closest one with a drive-through... and sometimes I'm just that lazy!  The people working the window have always seemed really happy to see me? or to be working?  or what, I don't know, but it at least makes for a pleasant experience in the 2 minutes it takes to pay and grab my cup.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (1322 chars)
This is my friendly neighborhood Starbucks.  I am sad that I am finding myself here more frequently since the two closest independent coffee houses have gone under. ...  ... RIP the independent coffee house but alas I must still have my caffeine fix. ...  ... This location has a rather nice outdoor seating area.  They seem to be heavily staffed on most of my visits.  Given, they are pretty busy but I still find myself watching in amazement as 6-7 people scramble about. ...  ... I am always struck at how it takes 6-7 people to do roughly the same work that someplace like Coffee Rush does with 1 or 2 people. ...  ... Not infrequently my order is either wrong or has to be stated and restated 4-5 times.  I suspect this is a result of too many folks working on the outcome.  Like the game that is played in elementary schools where a statement is made at one side of the class and whispered from child to child until it reaches the other end of the room.  So child #1 whispers "Henry stubbed his toe at the pool." and the last kid is told, "Henry found human toes stuck in the pool filter." ...  ... Lost in translation.   ...  ... Too much noise in the system.   ...  ... That is why about 25% of the time I end up with a nonfat hot chocolate or something rather than a no whip, extra hot mocha.  Such is Starbucks.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (844 chars)
I don't generally patronize Starbucks.  For one thing, I'm not a coffee drinker.  However, wife and daughter are.  They both love the coffee here (in general).  So we popped in this morning on the way to dropping daughter at a friend's house, and on our way to work.   ...  ... They got, and seemed happy with, their pricey coffees.  They also bought me a pricey "old fashioned" donut.  The donut was really good.  I don't think it was $1.50 good, but it was vastly better than Dunkin or any grocery store donut (which isn't a very high hurdle to clear, I admit).  If they weren't so pricey I'd give them four stars for quality of food and beverages. ...  ... In summary:  very pricey, but pretty good.  If you want to splurge (or are rich enough you don't care about price), come to Starbucks.  This shop had friendly staff who moved quickly.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (167 chars)
Your typical Starbucks. The only negative is about half the time their wifi doesn't work, which can be frustrating. I often go to Starbucks to get a little work done.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (38 chars)
omg! the drive through is super slow!


................................................................................
LOCATION #11:  address="4985 W Ray Rd"  city="Chandler"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85226"  (15 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (305 chars)
Great location, quick drive thru and friendly service.  This store is BIG and has been renovated.  It's a great location to study, read, have a meeting or just enjoy a cup of coffee and relax.  It's on the corner, so the location is convenient to get to.  If you love starbucks stop by this one for sure!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (302 chars)
This particular store is big but not very quiet if you want to come and read. The service is great and the greeting over the intercom is always a pleasant, especially from male-baristas. They are always trying to move the drive-thru quickly enough, not taking their sweet time like the one on Ray/ 101


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (242 chars)
I went through the drive through this morning and had to wait to get inline but only for a second. They were fast, efficient and wasted no time getting all the customers through the line. I needed that this morning and I am extremely please.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (109 chars)
My fav.  The most consistant.  Bad parking and drive-thru congestion, but still my fav location for service.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (98 chars)
This is the best Starbucks in town. Great management! Service is always great! I always go there.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (1086 chars)
Brand new location right on my way to work!  It is on the SE corner of Rural and Ray in the Fry's shopping center.  Even though I drive thru this intersection frequently, it is not easily seen from northbound Rural since it is behind the Wells Fargo which I guess is why I never noticed it until today even though they have been open for two months.  I believe the building used to be a Pollo Loco which explains the somewhat bland structural design and awkward layout.  It is nice and big inside, though, with enough room for two full size leather couches.  A gaggle of teenagers was making good use of them on the evening we stopped by.  Other than that group the place was pretty empty and so there was plenty of tables open.  I noticed that they also had a big patio with plenty more seating outside.  Another nice thing is that they have a drive thru.  The easiest way to enter is from Ray but it wraps all the way around the building.  Hopefully that means it will be convenient and not too crazy during busy times.  I will write an update when I try it out on a weekday morning.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (1048 chars)
Well, I quit drinking coffee for a while trying to cut back on caffeine but now in 2014 I find that somehow that monkey is on my back again. Anyway, I mostly go to this Starbucks location since it is very close to my house right on my way to work. I usually use the drive thru and I will say that even when there is a long line it moves really fast. Everyone is very friendly and they always get my order right. I also love that they put in the little green plug that keeps your coffee from spilling even without me having to ask for it. ...  ... I still can't give them 5 stars because the reality is that Starbucks coffee is just not that good. But like most suburbanites, this is my most convenient option so I just go with it. I also think their food has gotten even worse after the recent menu changes; I am speaking specifically of their baked goods. I just can't stand it how they call those square shaped muffins of theirs scones. Go to a real bakery and find out what a scone is actually supposed to taste like and you'll see what I mean.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (646 chars)
I'll chime in and give this location a ratings boost.  The main thing they have going for them is their drive-thru.  They always seem to move people through really quickly.  The other location down on Chandler Ave always has a much longer line.  They have a nice patio and lots of places to sit inside. ...  ... I have never had a poorly made mocha here and the staff has always been very friendly.   I have never had an issue with service when going through the drive-thru and the few times I have gone in they were equally pleasant and efficient.  ...  ... Not sure what all the hate is for.  If you are on Ray this is a pretty great location.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (446 chars)
I like this location to others. nothing like the taste of the walmart of coffee. I dig the layout. ...  ... lots and lots and lots and lots and lots of first world problems in the reviews for this place. ...  ...  a whole lot of, " my milkshake, my milkshake".  ...  ... Cause if you put that much sugar and caramel and mocha in your coffee you are drinking a milkshake. ...  ... Meanwhile in the third world..... ...  ... Shame, Shame Chandler.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (425 chars)
Can you believe that an Espresso Coffee can not be shared with a Tocino del Cielo? It is an insult to the population of Chandler.  ... I made a line for more than 3 mins. I had an attendant behind the counter that spoke Italian, Spanish and English. The leather seats were comfortable and the benches were spacious.  ... The next time we come here I will bring my own Rajita de Crema to enjoy my Macchiato as it is expected.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (108 chars)
This location is actually very nice. Fast friendly service as expected from most Starbucks. Can't complain!


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (726 chars)
Came to this location for the first time on Sunday morning around 11:30am. It wasn't very busy in the drive-thru so I decided to go that route. I ordered a venti caramel macchiato with soy milk and extra caramel. It came out great. Perfect amount of caramel, sometimes when you ask for extra it's like a caramel boat but this Starbucks got it right. Three stars because I also ordered a gouda, egg and bacon ciabatta sandwich off of their new bakery menu. It was horrible. The egg tasted liked powdered egg and the gouda had no flavor.  I would not suggest breakfast sandwiches here. The croissants are much better. The service was good. The baristas at the window were friendly and smiling. I will visit this location again.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (576 chars)
Oh, Starbucks. ...  ... It's like that horrible ex you can't stop going back to.  ...  ... Except, they're much closer to your neighborhood.  ...  ... And in some cases, a lot faster! Hardy, har har. ...  ... Really, 9 times out of 10 I'll take a locally owned coffee shop. ...  ... Yet, sometimes, you're having one of those rough "need extra caffeine!" kind of mornings. You see a Starbucks pop up on your commute and roll on in.  ...  ... This location? Super fast and friendly drive through service at 5AM.  ...  ... Three stars simply because no Starbucks is five stars.


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (735 chars)
Okay, I get a starbucks pretty much every day. The same thing EVERYDAY. I had to go to chandler for a job and i needed my starbucks fix so i went into this one. everyone was nice and friendly and i think it is a pretty new starbucks. ...  They made my drink completely wrong so i politely went over and told them it didn't taste the same as my every day drink. She was nice to try and fix it but all she did was put it in the blender again and made it more watery. I tasted it again and then told her it just still wasnt the same. She got a little snippy and said that thats how its made and didnt care after that. So i went to a starbucks near by and asked if they could make a new one and it was exactly how its supposed to be made.


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (1888 chars)
This location is larger than most Starbucks and in a very good location. It's too bad the service here is horrible. I've been to this location several times and had an issue each time. First time I went through the drive thru and ordered a grande black coffee.  I received my coffee in the grande cup, but it was only filled a little more than half way. Second time I went in and there was one person on the store phone (personal call), one person with their back toward waiting customers texting, and a third person ignoring customers while standing at the empty drive thru window. When a customer tried to get the texting girls attention, she actually moved away from the counter and started heading toward the drive thru window to finish texting. She seemed annoyed at the customer trying to get her attention. One couple in line left the store. The guy on the store phone finally turned around and told the person on the phone, "OMG, there's a line. I gotta go. Call you later". This guy then called for the texting girl to take a register. She sighed really loud, slowly made her way to the register, and proceeded to take the next customer's order while rolling her eyes at the male employee. The third  time I went to this location they were out of the two house coffees and needed to make a fresh batch. There wasn't any customer's after me, and very few people in the store. I was told they would bring it out to me. I sat down and began reading my book. After 15 minutes I realized I didn't get my coffee. I went to the counter. The two female employees were standing there talking.  One girl giggled, apologized and said she'll bring it out to me. She forgot to make the coffee! Whoever manages this location needs to know that the poor customer service and attitude is going to get this location closed really quick. I've taken my business to the other two near by locations.


................................................................................
LOCATION #12:  address="6140 W Chandler Blvd Ste 8"  city="Chandler"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85226"  (6 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (891 chars)
Had to come back and update this review.  ...  ... I come by this Starbucks more often than I'd like to admit; it's by work. Will swing by once a week or so, and will have meetings here in the afternoon with my throws coach as it's close to the gym.  ...  ... Let's be honest: NO Starbucks is five stars. They're a dime a dozen, and you probably know what a "good experience" at a "good Starbucks" is like.  ...  ... Theresa, however, is what makes this place! And her team of awesome ladies!  ...  ... Always a huge smile on her face, even at 5:15/30 AM.  ...  ... Remembers me by name and follows up on previous conversations we've had. Knows my drink (Grande Pikes Place, no added sweetener), unless I go off into the deep end and order something crazy!  ...  ... The customer service here is the only why I'm upping the rating two stars. ...  ... Well done, Chandler and Kyrene team! :)


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (186 chars)
I come here to this location in the morning and on my lunch. The employee were very helpful.  Always consistent.  Noah and Theresa are the Best (and the rest of the staff is great too!)


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (79 chars)
Great coffee, great atmosphere and great staff! Very friendly and welcoming :)


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (418 chars)
Staff was very friendly! They always take a moment to chat me up while making my drink. And they always make my drink right. ...  ... The big windows get too much sun for the shades to compensate for, so half the seating of the store is too warm during our summers here in Phoenix. Sometimes its hard to find a seat on the cool-side during peak hours. ...  ... The net is always up and there is enough parking spaces.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (663 chars)
As much as I rag about "corporate coffee", I still come to Starbucks out of convenience from time to time. * cue gagging noises *  ...  ... This one happens to be on my drive to work! Sometimes you just need that extra caffeine hit after your morning wake-up cup or two at home. Don't judge!  ...  ... There's no drive thru; however, the place has a huge parking lot.  ...  ... The employees are always friendly and will either ask for your name or read it off your credit card. Me, usually in and out pretty quick - It's pretty hard to mess up  basic, non frou-frou iced coffee!  ...  ... Standard Starbucks quality; what did you expect?   ...  ... Recommended.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (94 chars)
This location does not have a drive-thru but they have ample parking and the service is fast.


................................................................................
LOCATION #13:  address="985 W Elliot Rd"  city="Chandler"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85225"  (16 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1349 chars)
Many will argue that a Starbucks is a Starbucks. I agree that, much like Denny's, Starbucks tend to be a pretty consistent experience. The Starbucks at the corner of Alma School and Elliot is more. ...  ... Is the coffee so much better? Not really. Is the building amazing? Not at all. What is it that is special at this Starbucks? The people. ...  ... The customer service is simply phenomenal. There is a personal touch that brings a stream of regulars coming back daily. They often remember your name, drink, and even personal quirks. I'm sure if any of the staff is reading this, all I have to say is "small cup with a splash of water", and they know exactly who this is.  The staff goes beyond friendly and offers a "small town" feel to a sometimes busy Starbucks, without sacrificing efficiency. ...  ... The only complaint I have is that the outdoor tables are extremely unstable.  I think the welding has broken down.  It's hard to work on a laptop when the table pitches at a 45 degree angle at random.  It seems this is relegated to the "smoker" tables, but a little time fixing these would add a lot to the experience.  I work here a lot and always find this adding an unneeded challenge. ...  ... I highly recommend making a stop at this Starbucks.  I drive past three other ones from my home each time because it's definitely worth it.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (464 chars)
After faithfully going to this specific Starbucks for years, then moving away 8 months ago... I really miss this store location!! ...  ... I have yet to encounter a Starbucks as great as you. It's just not the same. Thanks for always getting my drink right, not being stingy, putting up with my indecisiveness and particular orders, your friendly attitudes, chatting with me about randomness, being my never failing pick-me-up... my real neighborhood coffee shop.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (359 chars)
Good place to go and enjoy a latte or your favorite coffee. I like getting coming here to relax and use the WI Fi on my phone because with AT&T I don't get unlimited data. The service here has always been good and the staff is friendly. The parking lot is large because it is in a shopping center. I love Starbucks so this is one of my favorite places to go.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (346 chars)
All Starbucks are the same, right?  WRONG!  I work out of my car all over the valley, and yes there are other good locations, but everytime I walk into this store it is consistently top notch.  Many of the same baristas have been there for several years and they really make it seem like a good old fashioned neighborhood coffee shop.  Nice job!


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (324 chars)
Looking for a spot with wi-fi and friendly staff, this location is awesome. They recently did a redesign inside with more efficient seating and layout. There's plenty of spots with plug outlets to hook up the laptop and plenty of window spots with a view.  Location faces Alma School road, in the Alma Elliot Square center.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (255 chars)
This Starbucks is my favorite because of the great customer service.  After awhile they memorized my name and, due to my ordering habits, had my order rung up before I go to the register.  This is great for mornings when I'm in a rush.  For that 5 stars.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (225 chars)
This is one of the nicest Starbucks locations I have ever gone to. They have a great layout with plenty of room while in line or sitting (in and outdoor seating), and the store was spotless. I will definitely be coming back!


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (154 chars)
Never had a problem with this Starbucks. They are as friendly as can be and the drinks are made perfect every time. Keep up the awesome customer service!


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (150 chars)
Haven't had a bad experience. Everyone is always nice & friendly. Adam makes me laugh when I go in & makes a bomb caramel macchiato! Thanks everyone!


REVIEW #10:  5 stars  (101 chars)
oohhhh how I love me a icey cold americano from starbucks!! life would not be as full without her!!!


REVIEW #11:  5 stars  (84 chars)
Always fast service. Always interacting with the customers. Always the right order.


REVIEW #12:  5 stars  (83 chars)
friendly and fast baristas, this is one of my favorite starbucks in the valley :).


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (201 chars)
Making separate orders is a little to much for Elaine today!! She was rather rude and felt a need to hurry me along!! I guess she missed the customers service training this month!! Very disappointed!!


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (128 chars)
Starbucks, again I have to say no matter which location I wind up, I am always walking out the door with a great cup of coffee!


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (15 chars)
great service.


REVIEW #16:  3 stars  (222 chars)
It's a Starbucks.  The counter staff are typically helpful and perky.  Possibly that's the caffeine vapors at work.  Free wireless is available south of here at Coffee Rush etc.   I'm unclear why anyone pays hotspot fees.


................................................................................
LOCATION #14:  address="16425 E Palisades Blvd"  city="Fountain Hills"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85268"  (5 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (397 chars)
This location lives up to the best Starbucks tradition. Clean and comfortable surroundings, skilled engaging staff, and good hours. Early most mornings you will find a group of 6-8 older men discussing the world. Later in the day an artist sets up inside and creates. Weekends other small groups gather after biking or other event. There is a reason why this location does well. Find it yourself.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (201 chars)
The only downside is the occasional difficulty getting in and out of the parking lot when they are busy. Great customer service and exactly what you expect from one of the best Starbucks has to offer.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (164 chars)
Another popular coffee spot. Always busy, parking can be a problem since there are several business sharing the strip mall.  ... Friendly staff and prompt service.


REVIEW #4:  2 stars  (963 chars)
I'm not really a fan of this location and usually go to the one by Target. ...  ... I went in because it was on the way to my sister's house and I wasn't impressed with the staff. In fact, they were kinda rude. ...  ... When I went in, the door was stuck and wouldn't open. An employee came around from the counter and opened it for me. He explained that it sticks when it's hot out and that most people just think they're closed and walk away. I made a joke saying, "Well I guess I need to start hitting the gym, huh?" Both employees just stared at me and smirked like, "This guy's an idiot." Feeling a bit uncomfortable I ordered my drink.  ...  ... When my drink was made, the barista didn't say anything, he just set it up on the counter and began making the next one.  ...  ... I felt really uncomfortable and like my business wasn't wanted. At the location by Target the employees are warm, welcoming, and friendly. I'll stick to that location from now on.


REVIEW #5:  1 stars  (248 chars)
I am also not a fan of this Starbucks and I also will travel further to the other Starbucks on Shea.  Seems like everytime I would a latte it's really light and half the cup is filled with froth.  Feels cheated.   ... Shea location is much better.


................................................................................
LOCATION #15:  address="16815 E Shea Blvd"  city="Fountain Hills"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85268"  (10 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1204 chars)
Staff at this Starbucks, unlike most Starbucks in Scottsdale & Phoenix, actually exhibits happiness when customer walks up to the counter to order. Whether you get the morning crew of kindly beautiful women, or the afternoon crew of handsome manly men, you are made to feel like a blessing, not a chore. They all seem to know almost everyone by name, and if they don't remember your favorite drink, they will try to guess it. Moreover, these are efficient and skilled baristas, making my drink perfect every single time. And they are so attentive to the smallest nuance! One barista even noticed my lid was a bit cracked, and she came around the counter to replace it, without once interrupting my conversation with another customer. Who does that? Who even notices? Look for the barista with the gray page haircut. She'll take your coffee order like a U.S. Marine Lieutenant General while asking you about the NFL Playoffs and all the while beaming a Miss America smile that refreshes the most depressed day. Regardless of how tired I am, I'll pass by numerous Starbucks and fall asleep at the wheel doing so, in order to get my Mocha at this most singular establishment on Shea Blvd in Fountain Hills.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (668 chars)
Staff that works early morning 6a-7:30a shift, M-F, are all FANTASTIC! I am always greeted w/a genuine, warm smile by whoever happens to be cashiering. Their drinks are always made consistently good too! ...  ... *Side Note Personal Pet Peeve: The family-on-vacation donned in shorts or the retirees (also in shorts) who take their sweet-ass time at 6:45am ordering their drinks/baked goods in front of me in line. They do a lot of squinting at the menu, hemming and hawing over choices, scratching their heads, stepping back, etc. NEWSFLASH: There are working ppl who are on a time crunch for their commute - step aside if ordering is too much for you! Thank you. :)


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (520 chars)
I've visited this Starbucks 4 of the past 5 days for Frappucino happy hour and I could not be more pleased with each experience.  The girl working the register remembered my name after my first visit.  I'm surprised they are not busy during happy hour, but I'm sure that has to do with the "out of the way" location in Fountain Hills.  I'll be moving further away from this store soon and am disappointed I can't take them with me.  I rate this five stars because the staff is friendly and it's easy to park and run in.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (337 chars)
This is the best Starbucks in Fountain Hills beverage wise. I have never gotten a bad drink from this place. Service can be a little slow at times but it's not to the point where it's annoying.  ...  ... I love the staff here too. They are always friendly and courteous and very very helpful. I go out of my way to visit this Starbucks.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (326 chars)
I gave this Starbucks 1 star a few years ago. Since then this location has done a 180. The staff is friendly and knowledgeable. There are two stand alone Starbuck locations in Fountain Hills. I now go which ever one is closest to where I am going. I like the stand alone locations better and both in Fountain Hills are great.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (228 chars)
Every time I come to this Starbucks the people working there are friendly, polite, and provide great service. Drinks are always great no matter how busy they are. One of the best coffee places in the valley. Highly recommended!


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (184 chars)
My favorite Starbucks in Phoenix. Always nice, always the best service, WITH a smile! Kaylee and Dillon are both great! Too bad every Starbucks isn't staffed with such good employees.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (705 chars)
Albeit a corporate-run company, this Starbucks maintains the feel of a small mom & pop coffee shop. All of the employees not only know their customers by name, but are also eager to engage in friendly conversation. Furthermore, despite being located in Fountain Hills, which has a predominately older demographic, they are able to handle the sometimes impatient crowd with a smile or a few words of ease. As for those complaining about the product, blah blah... come on, you're walking into a Starbucks... you know what you're getting into. I just appreciate this specific one so much more than other Starbucks because of the awesome people who work there. Four stars because they are still not Peets : )


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (149 chars)
Convenient to were I work. Always friendly and polite. Sometimes too friendly when the regular customers come in, but they seem to get the job done.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (154 chars)
Surprisingly enough, this Starbucks didn't know how to make a red-eye Americano.  I had to tell them the recipe.  Goodness, what is this world coming to?


................................................................................
LOCATION #16:  address="1505 E Warner Rd"  city="Gilbert"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85296"  (13 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (794 chars)
I have been to A LOT of starbucks (Hey, there is one on every corner in Chicago!) but this one was memorable.  I was only visiting family for a week in Gilbert and probably visited this starucks more then I would care to admit in that week but they had my drink memorized and were extremely friendly.  No drive up and the parking lot can get a bit crowded in front of the starbucks but great inside.  Nice patio with 'misters' (I duno if that is correct terminology.  The little water sprayers to keep you cool) on the patio for days you want to sit outside.  This is a starbucks so I dont really have much to say about the food or drinks (you have all been to one.  You know what it's about) but this one never got my drink wrong.  The one by my house gets my drink wrong on a normal basis :/


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (345 chars)
This Starbucks is just great! The baristas and all workers alike have a very professional sense about them. They work fast and efficiently. The atmosphere is cool due to the furniture and the way they have their merchandise and their customization bar arranged together. During the summer, they run misters for the outdoor seating. Great place.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (255 chars)
My all-time favorite Starbucks!  ... They always greet you with a smile and wonderful service. Most of the Batista's get my order (which can be a tad picky, I admit) right all of the time; and when it's not, they fix it without hassle or complaint. Love.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (194 chars)
Love this Starbucks! They make my Passionfruit Iced Tea Lemonade just the way I like it (the ones in California could never quite do it right :/)! The staff are friendly, helpful and attentive.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (135 chars)
Always friendly. Always yummy. Always quick. I love that I can use my virtual Starbucks card on my smart phone to pay for my purchase.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (89 chars)
Its Starbucks! great crazy coffee concoctions, excellent customer service & cleanliness.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (31 chars)
Good service and great drinks!


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (18 chars)
Best coffee ever!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (809 chars)
Who hasn't ever had some Starbucks? Well I guess people who don't drink coffee or anything they have to offer. I loved Starbucks ever since I was a pre-teen. I used to go to this Starbucks every morning before school started; they even knew my name and order. I thought that was super cool and it was...until I started realizing why I wasn't getting into the shape I wanted to be.  ...  ... They offer such yummy choices and I love it!! However, I have to limit myself going there...except if I am having straight Black Pike's Roast, then I don't really mind going. Everything else in there is a treat to me.  ...  ... The ambiance is so cozy and smells like home. I love coffee but if I go to Starbucks everyday,  maybe I'll get bored. So I am a fan, but hopefully, not anytime soon, become an obsessed fan.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (303 chars)
Minus points because it would just be so much easier if this was in a location (within this strip mall) with a drive-through.  It can be a little tough getting in an out of here because of how busy Target and the other businesses in this strip mall get. Otherwise, it's Starbucks...  Yay Pumpkin Spice!


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (391 chars)
Just a typical Starbucks but a long line-always. no drive-thru but patio seating if you bring your 4-legger which I did! why is it that my lattes always taste different at every Starbucks? I thought that was a point of a franchise was that the product was consistent... It is the closest to my house so that is where we stop when we have a lounging day together-that is my 4 legger and me:)


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (1046 chars)
Though I like going to Starbucks for their drinks the real reason I go there is a place to get away and get work done on my computer.  I enjoy sipping my green tea lemonade while working on my computer.  This Starbucks has recently undergone a remodel.  Though I LOVE the location the remodel leaves me lacking.  The tables along the wall where there are plugs to plug in my computer are gone.  The center isle has now been replaced with a HUGE LONG table.  Not sure who is going to sit here.  Even if you do it sits in the middle of the floor so you have foot traffic all around you and there is no power outlets.  The remodel has added space for people to sit but has taken away from the coziness of the place along with the ability to reach an outlet.   ...  ... If you like working on your computer this is NOT the Starbucks to come to any longer.  If you are just want to grab a quick cup or coffee or coco on while out on a shopping excursion then stop on by because they will set you up with your caffeine buzz with a smile on their face.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (169 chars)
They close at 9:30 on Fridays? Are you kidding me? If you have to turn away business because you're closing, worse shoo away the customers you have, something is wrong.


................................................................................
LOCATION #17:  address="3765 S Gilbert Rd"  city="Gilbert"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85296"  (9 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (125 chars)
I pass 4 Starbucks to go to this one, I love the staff and the atmosphere. And it being next to Chipotle doesn't hurt either


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (15 chars)
Great service!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (340 chars)
Typical Starbs...but the baristas always have smiles on their faces, so I like to go.  It is the closest coffee places to my house, so I go often for a quick triple espresso.  They spell my name right, too (one T), without me ever having to say anything to them.  ...  ... This is right by Chipotle, Jamba Juice and Fatburger, off the 202.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (127 chars)
Happy & friendly staff, great service & they'll make you a new drink if you don't like your crappy decision. Whats not to like


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (666 chars)
i wasn't sure which Starbucks I wanted to pick to write about.  I go to this one once in a blue moon (long story about this one), but there is also another one I frequent on Ray and the 101 (brand spanking new)  I also go to the one on University and Hardy in Tempe...but I have the same issues with each and every one of them...why do they have to be so friggin cheerful in the morning???  Stop it!  Nobody can be that upbeat at 6am...even after I drink my tea...I am nowhere near their cheeriness...STOP THE MADNESS!!!!! ...  ... Besides all of that...I do love my green iced tea and blueberry coffee cake (or Lemon Cake...i switch)...good stuff and convenient...


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (497 chars)
I don't know why, out of all the Starbucks in the Valley, this is one of the ones I'm fondest of. It's just your average Starbucks. The staff is friendly, the food and drinks are overpriced in comparison to some of the local coffee shops, there's free wifi, and it's on the comfier side of chilly during the summer.  ...  ... Also, there are two leather chairs in the corner that are ridiculously comfy and great if you're looking for a comfy spot to curl up in for a bit with a book and a drink.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (167 chars)
I'm not a huge Starbucks fan. I only go when I'm given a gift card. Stopped in this morning to try some of their tea. ...  ... Found out earl grey isn't my cup of tea


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (50 chars)
Don't go here if you're in a hurry. Slow service.


REVIEW #9:  1 stars  (300 chars)
The people here are awful. They were talking crap on my wife within earshot because of what she was wearing. I understand they work in one of the more "difficult" service industries but you'd imagine that the heaps of money their family has would be able to educate them enough to have some manners.


................................................................................
LOCATION #18:  address="3931 S Gilbert Rd"  city="Gilbert"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85297"  (10 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (907 chars)
I normally wouldn't even think to review a Starbucks, cuz really, why? Most people have probably been to one and they don't all differ too much. ...  ... I started composting, and people have told me that Starbucks gives away their coffee grounds (Barnes & Nobles doesn't - at least here they don't). I went there to ask for it and they put my name down and asked me when I could come pick it up. They said that they would start collecting it for me throughout the day when I was going to come. When I went to pick it up the other day, they really delivered! I had a ton of coffee grinds and it was perfect for the compost! ...  ... All the workers that I interacted with in this specific Gilbert location has been so friendly and helpful. Even when they were busy, they would make sure that I was helped. (I felt bad since I was just coming to pick something up.) ...  ... Definitely A+ for their service!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (555 chars)
Friendly service here!  12 tables inside, 2 comfy leather chairs, lots of outside seating. Music wasn't too loud & general mood was mellow.   ...  ... No drive thru.  Services: Lunch, Oven-warmed Food, Sirena Espresso Machine, Starbucks Card Mobile, Wireless Hotspot. ...  ... I was impressed that their food case was so full on a weekday at 2:30pm (see pic): http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/7ITv2jv4rB-UuQwAo2ntjw?select=sSu-8pjsWRNuhXxqu_Omdw ...  ... We had a great experience here on a road trip while we were using the Wifi before heading home to CA.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (482 chars)
I wouldn't typically review a place like Starbucks and I'm a little embarrassed to admit I pay almost $7 bucks for a beverage that doesn't have booze.  However, I had the best drink here and they deserve all my stars. ...  ... I get a hot, venti, chai tea latte, soy milk and 1 to 3 shots of espresso -- depending on my mood.  That's been my drink for the past 8 years and I had the best one EVER at this Starbucks recently.  It was so delish I slurped it down in under 20 minutes.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (313 chars)
Melissa is a Starbucker after my own heart.  On a hellish day that required 3 espresso shots I met Melissa.  She schooled me on how to order my drink so that it would be a dollar cheaper and also told me that if I paid with a Starbucks card that I would eventually earn my way to free soy milk.  You rock sistah!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (427 chars)
this Starbucks really care for customers service. I really hate myself for not remembering my barista name. they greet you as you walk in. if your a regular they greet not only by your name, but they know what you want already. they work on it so you can enjoy your lattes, frap, espresso, etc... right away. I love coming here at night to hang out, until their closed. if it does get hot the mist outside helps with the heat.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (356 chars)
I love going to this Starbucks.  It is such a pleasure to walk in and find Jessica, Becky and Josh there.  They are so efficient and pleasant.  I order a drink that is a bit tricky to understand and they get it right EVERY time!   I had to give 4 stars because I went in a couple of times and someone new made my drink.   But it will not alter my opinion.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (107 chars)
Trying something new! A mocha frapp...we'll see. Great atmosphere with places inside and out to just hang.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (56 chars)
Great staff and of course the coffee is always the same


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (813 chars)
This location of Starbucks is pretty good. The reason for the three stars is because as I was coming in the door of this Starbucks yesterday I was almost taken out by the girl who was taking out the very large trash can. I offered to open the door but she didn't hear me and almost ran over my foot with the trash can. Clearly her mind was somewhere else. Bad first impression. ...  ... The cashier who took my order was extremely friendly and cheerful. I ordered a caramel macchiato with extra caramel on the sides. They over did it a little bit on the extra caramel but I know that I walk a fine line whenever I order this drink with extra. Overall not bad. It's a Starbucks and I'm in this area a lot so I will be back. To the girl who was taking out the trash, just be more aware of your surroundings please.


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (506 chars)
The coffee is to be expected as most Starbucks are the same.  It was the service that was disappointing.  When we got to the counter the 17 year old who apparently knows everything told us there would be a 15 min wait while they brewed more coffee????  What??  I asked why 15 mins, and was advised that was how long it takes.  I got back into my car, drove to Dunkin Donuts, walked inside, ordered and received my coffee in 12 mins...  yup, it was literally quicker to drive somewhere else and get coffee.


................................................................................
LOCATION #19:  address="SR-202 Lp Williams Field Rd"  city="Gilbert"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85295"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (715 chars)
Starbucks is hurting my wallet by being inside grocery stores and now Macy's!!! However, I can't complain because they are always around when I need my fix! My favorite lately is the skinny vanilla latte since I am watching the calories. My all time favorite is the white mocha. The prices are creaping towards the insane but for convenience and consistent quality it is worth it. I don't like their coffe, hence the 4 stars. Just their espress drinks and green tea lattes! Staff is always friendly and fast at this location. When they were packed a couple weeks ago they had someone come out and take orders in line while someone was ringing and they got a line of about 15 people out in minutes! Very impressive!


REVIEW #2:  1 stars  (346 chars)
Every time I go through the drive thru I'm waiting for at least 20 minutes. I thought this was a fluke at first but tried a couple more times with the same result. Which sucks cause they are the only Starbucks with a drive thru by my house. Most of the time I have my toddler with me and don't want to have to get her in and out of her car seat.


REVIEW #3:  1 stars  (87 chars)
The worst coffee I have ever had from a Starbucks!! And they don't accept gift cards!!


................................................................................
LOCATION #20:  address="5894 W Thunderbird Rd"  city="Glendale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85306"  (12 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (402 chars)
If i have to choose between this location and the one on 43rd Ave. It has to be this one..   ...  ... Why?  Because here, they get your drink out in literally 2min or less.  Im not dogging the other location because they do great on the drinks, but my God.. you can spend 20min in the drive-thru at times.  ...  ... If you want fast, friendly and awesome service, this place kicks all kinds of ass. :)


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (319 chars)
Attached o the bagel joint. They always seem to have a crowd. Great study spot. Have been to this location since it opened. Staff as changed over the years, but is still rad. Lots of food in the lot. patio is a little rough at times, evil ants in the summer do to the fact that ants are addicted to carmel frappacinos.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (164 chars)
Walked over from the Einstein's that it's attached to (big plus). People were friendly. I was barefoot and given no issues, so it seems to be barefoot friendly :).


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (86 chars)
I work here now, and that makes it awesome. However it was pretty awesome already. :)


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (583 chars)
I'm a total Starbucks... hell, coffee junkie! I like that this place is small and not too busy. The parking situation can be a bear sometimes since it shares spaces with Einstein Bagels and Blockbuster, but you can park a little across the way if it was really full so it's not extremely bad. Most of the time Starbucks is Starbucks, however I find that sometimes they don't make the drinks here consistently - at times they'll taste really sweet, sometimes too bitter. I guess it depends on how the barista was trained to make the drink. But as long as I get my coffee it's cool...


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (521 chars)
This Starbucks gets the "Congeniality" award :D ...  ... Why? ... *They share a hallway with Einstein Bagels! 2 of my favs connected :) ...  ... Other things I like: ... *plenty of parking ... *never too large a crowd ... *friendly staff ... *police presence (there always seems to be 1 or 2 vehicles in the parking lot) ...  ... Areas for improvement: ... *a bit slow with getting the drinks out.  ... *although they ask you for your name, they don't call it out when your drinks ready, which causes a bit of confusion.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (508 chars)
At first blush, this seems like a rather mediocre Starbucks. Two (or is it three) tables in a very small seating area. Look around the side of the building to see some nice outdoor tables, complete with fresh water squirted to cool you down, and it seems a little less average. What really makes this my most frequentest place for a buzz near campus? The amazing staff. Despite working for yet another soulless corporation, they create community and warmth easily bikeable from my apartment and grad school.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (740 chars)
The parking is crowded and awkward, but if you are already coming to this location for the bagels at Einstein Bros. next door then I suppose this is a decent Starbucks.  It is small - less than a dozen small tables- and was extremely busy on a Sunday morning.  The staff was friendly and helpful and the drink was made well (which is why I drove an extra mile and a half from the 43rd Ave and Thunderbird location).  The wait in line was over 10 minutes, but my drink was made quickly after I ordered. ...  ... I can't imagine sitting to study or work at this Starbucks, but I saw at least one person doing so. ...  ... As a side note, I do not like this new heated pastry thing they are doing.  I kind of like my scones cold or room temp.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (281 chars)
Starbucks is starbucks...it's on my way to work and if i have time i will swing thru hear. Negative is it takes forever because everyone else and their mama seems to go the same time i do. Staff at starbucks are usually always awesome, I would know I've worked at several of em ;)


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (130 chars)
The place is pretty clean but had to wait over  30 min just for a cup of expresso when nobody else is in front of me? Ridiculous!


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (456 chars)
First time I have ever been to a Starbucks where the service was not friendly. No one made eye contact or even said thank you. I grabbed a snack box that was already opened and realized as I was paying. I informed the cashier and she just grabbed it and threw it and stated "anything else?" Then the barista added syrup to my iced coffee after I stated please no sweetener. There was no line and it still took 10 minutes to get a plain grande iced coffee.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (158 chars)
Worst service ever. I feel like everyone here has an attitude problem. They don't even greet or thank you. Ugh. I now drive out of my way to avoid this sbux.


................................................................................
LOCATION #21:  address="6645 W Peoria Ave"  city="Glendale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85302"  (12 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1973 chars)
Why on earth would I review a Starbucks, right? I mean, lets face it, Starbucks experiences are fairly run of the mill.  Anyone who hasn't had a beverage from Starbucks has probably just crawled out of their bomb shelter because their 30 year supply of freeze dried astronaut food has run out.  Once they get over the shock that the 'big one' never hit and there is no longer a USSR they will quickly have their first Starbucks experience.  But I digress.   I have one reason to leave this review:  the girl that ran drive thru that one time I went knocked my M F'ing socks off.   ... I don't often do Starbucks, however I am a sucker for one thing: you put the word salted in front of caramel and I am there. Starbucks did just that so there I was, looking for a salted caramel mocha fix before class.  No time, so I chose drive thru where I was greeted by the most chipper voice I have ever encountered.  Now one might think 'well yeah, if I was surrounded by untold amounts of caffeine I too would be perky at work.'  But no my friends, this was a whole new level of happy, whoville had nothing on her, the Grinch would have had no shot stealing cheer from this drive thru, his heart would have exploded.  Her sunny disposition would not have simply defeated the Grinch, it would have made him dead. ... She commended my salted caramel choice, I felt proud.  She suggested a venti, which is far too much caffeine for me but I could not resist.  She said I deserved it, and I believed her.  She was excited to swipe my credit card, complimented my hair, and handed me my beverage.   ... I didn't even need that coffee, her personality was infectious, I was ready to Carpe Diem!! or Yolo for the younger crowd. ...  ... Then someone stole my parking spot at school and that was over, but I still had the coffee and it was good. ...  ... Either way, that girl, whose name I don't know, that one time I went to this Starbucks knocked my socks off, and for that I thank her.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (393 chars)
My go to Starbucks almost every morning! Everyone is always so friendly and my drinks are always delish! I'm not sure why other reviews say this drive thru is slow, I'm almost always in and out of there, considering it's early morning and hello ... It's Starbucks, everyone loves it so of course it's going to be busy. But in my experience it's always been pretty efficient in the drive thru!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (91 chars)
This is my FAVORITE Starbucks! The people are great! Management is great! Love this place!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (76 chars)
Fast, friendly, consistent service and drinks... Super fast drive through .


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (383 chars)
Me "I need that green ice thing, it's the color of pistachio pudding, and I want a large" Starbucks "One venti green tea frappuccino?" Me "yeah that one!" Oh how you understand me Starbucks :) Staff was very friendly here, they have nice seating and outlets for doing a bit of work or reading. I came here on a Sunday and it was pretty busy, only negative was the floors were dirty.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (315 chars)
Tried the drive-thru and staff was great, took three different orders in one car!  ...  ... Tried the vanilla macchiato and the Vegetable & Fontiago Breakfast Sandwich. ...  ... Vanilla Macchiato - So Good ... Vegetable & Fontiago - Delicious  ...  ... Never knew (now I do) that Starbucks serves a good breakfast.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (189 chars)
3 stars cause they get my drink right every time, minus 2 stars cause the Wi-Fi is horribly slow, Burger King across the street is 69% faster... did some calculations to figure that out...


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (377 chars)
No longer my favorite Starbucks. Horrible customer service. Received bad service twice in 4 days. Apparently it is so hard to smile. Girl at the drive through really did not seem to care. Decided to go inside for once and they forgot my drink. The girl did not write it down, and seemed more interested in talking with her friend then helping me. Don't see myself coming back.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (224 chars)
Terrible service! The cashier was rude and not as friendly as other Starbucks employees. My drink was completely forgotten about; I had to go up and remind them after 30 minutes of waiting. These girls need to be retrained.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (90 chars)
There weren't many people in the store and the service was slow... Like, incredibly slow.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (1813 chars)
I'm been here numerous times and received *okay* service, but this last time it was just terrible! Typically I'm there to meet clients as Starbucks is generally a nice place to do so in a quiet, relaxing atmosphere.  ... Let's start by saying my name is Morgan. Yes Morgan, a unisex name. I am a girl and have known many Morgans both male and female. I've even run across a few unscrupulous business people who question if I am really Morgan (generally for credit cards, banks), however while they sound skeptical and ask more then the typical security questions, never, and I mean never, have I been so horrified and embarrassed as I was in this Starbucks. Nor have I ever met someone quite so ignorant and rude.  ... The other day, I went into the Starbucks with clients and when I handed my card to the cashier, he asked if 'he' was with me. When I replied "he?" the cashier continued to look around us (a group of females) and ask where was "he, Morgan". Apparently 'he' needed to be around to show his ID. My jaw dropped! I replied that I am Morgan to which he looked at me skeptically, sighed, then brashly stated that I needed to show him my ID.  ... Last I knew the appropriate way to handle this situation would have been to politely ask for my ID, not to assume (ignorantly so, mind you) that I am not the person on the card because, well, Morgan must be a male only name! More over, once he knew that I was in fact Morgan, being rude beyond that point was just uncalled for and unprofessional on so many levels. Worst yet, he never apologized, you would think for that much he would have. Nope, nothing. It certainly left a lasting imprint on my clients which had a few (mind you highly embarrassing) chuckles at my expense.  ... Thanks for the laugh. Guess I'll find somewhere else to waste my money.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (123 chars)
Been through this drive thru twice.  Both times order was messed up.  And they don't really seem to care. Very frustrating


................................................................................
LOCATION #22:  address="8251 W Union Hills Dr"  city="Glendale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85308"  (18 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (456 chars)
I was quite surprised with the previous reviews on rudeness, especially when i come from a city where rudeness is part of the everyday norm.   ...  ... Our drive thru gal was very polite and sweet, without being overly sacchrine-y or fake.  Servie was quick and they were patient AND polite when naming and explaning all the breakfast sandwiches to companion who had never had one.  ...  ... Drinks great, not watered down.  Would come back in a heartbeat


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (417 chars)
I went through the long drive through to discover amazing service!  The voice through the speaker was such a refreshing delight to hear. He was so happy and talkative, very polite and brought a smile to my face!  Just how it should be when you drive away with your starbucks treat in hand! I'm ready to take on the day thanks to my new favorite location!  Nad the flan latte is all its said to be and more!  Love it!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (357 chars)
This place has an awesome drive thru. Not a bad location either right off the 101 freeway and union hills. Again the drive thru service was fast and the people who work there know how to get things done I had my coffee in my within like 1 minute. To be honest that's not bad considering that I was the third car back, keep up the good work Starbucks crew!!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (293 chars)
The baristas here are great.  I have to say, some mornings, I come in pretty grouchy because I haven't had my caffeine fix yet.  They always cheer me up.  This location has a drive through, but the line gets pretty long.  It's very convenient to the freeway so it's pretty busy most mornings.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (54 chars)
I got coffee.  ... It was Starbucks. ... It was good.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (284 chars)
This is Starbucks and you know what to expect!  Consistent as all the rest of the locations and good coffee.  What makes this location stand out is that it's the only drive thru location in the Arrowhead area.  It's nice to not have to get out of the car once in a while in Suburbia!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (260 chars)
Terrific location, staff was legit. Small selection of retail. Fast service. Packed lobby. You can see the ocean out front. They have a good selection of  treats if you get there in the am. If you are a partner this is a real bucks so you can get you deal on.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (157 chars)
Courteous staff and it's Starbucks.  Their coffee speaks for itself.  I love the drive thru makes my morning coffee run on the way to work that much better.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (92 chars)
This place is busy!!!  Drive thur and walk in.  Friendly staff!  The wait was not too long.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (522 chars)
Am always amazed at how different each Starbucks is in terms of service. Today I was here to redeem my "coffee bag" free cup. I asked to upgrade to an americano as I cannot drink the Pikes because of the acidity.   The girl ( in the drive-through) said she couldnt do that. I explained why I couldnt drink the Pikes and that I had done this before at a Starbucks with no issue but she still said no.   The store at 75th and Bell has an awesome crew and I continually go back there unless I am in a different area of town.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (351 chars)
I just don't know anymore! They used to be good but the last time I stopped there in the drive thru, besides a 20 minute wait, to my surprise after getting back on the freeway that my caramel mocha turned out to be hot milk only!!! Dutch Brothers off of the 101 & Thunderbird IS THE place for fast & friendly service always with your correct order!!!


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (256 chars)
Hit or miss with the drinks... 3/4 of the time they forget to add my classic syrup and only add the one pump of white mocha that i ask for... i leave with bitter tasting coffee only convenience is that its a drive-thru and there's not many around the area


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (1041 chars)
I would give this Starbucks a 0 but it doesn't let me. Today was the 4th time I was kicked out of a Starbucks when I had my Certified Therapy Dog with me. She has a vest and I have an ID I wear. I was told today my dog can't be in the store. I have spoken with SB "higher ups" in the past (when we were thrown out of other stores) and they say the staff cannot ask me about my dog or kick us out. It is against the law to throw a Certified Therapy animal out of anywhere. Starbucks has broken the law 4 times now. Not to mention humiliating & degrading me in front of other customers. I was called "Sweetheart" at another location (59th and Union Hills) in front if a packed store by an employee and was told I can't have my dog in the store, even though we were both clearly marked. Today was the last time SB is throwing us out. I have contacted several news outlets. They are not only rude but broke the law, numerous times. My dog is Certified and visits Nursing Homes and Hospitals. Starbucks, you threw the wrong duo out........again.


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (575 chars)
I was visiting some relative in the area and stopped at this Starbucks.  I visit a lot of Starbucks and this store seems poorly managed.  The wait was 20 minutes for our  simple order after we paid.  The staff were more concerned about drive thru customers who paid after us than our order.  There were no tables inside so we went to sit outside.  As we were sitting outside the manager INTENTIONALLY shut off the misters when it was 110 degrees.  He claimed they stopped working. But they mysteriously shut off after our neighboring table complained about the poor service.


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (554 chars)
Starbucks supports planned parenthood. I am pro-life and will only support businesses that are pro-life, like Lifeboat Coffee at www.lifeboatcoffee.com. When you make a purchase at Lifeboat Coffee, $1.00 is donated to a pro-life organization! No more will i go to a Starbucks or buy their brand at a grocery store. ... In addition, the last time I was there, I got a caramel mocha. When I got on the freeway to take my first sip all it was was hot milk! Terrible, terrible ,terrible! I needed my caffeine!  ... And let's not forget the slow service!!!!!


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (458 chars)
I use this starbucks frequently because its close to where I work. Over time I have experienced coffee served cold, orders completely wrong, extremely slow and unenthusiastic service. This is so common I expect it now. In fact when they get it right im actually surprised. Ive contacted their management on a few really bad occasions and receive the same apathy. I suggest only going there if you have to because, afterall, it is a very convenient location.


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (120 chars)
I dislike this specific Starbucks a lot, my drink is always made wrong. Staff Is awesome but drinks wise, not the best.


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (118 chars)
Slowest drive thru ever!!!!! Mcdonalds is faster then this. Please hire better and faster people. This is ridiculous.


................................................................................
LOCATION #23:  address="Luke Air Force Base Exchange 7123 N 138th Ave"  city="Glendale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85307"  (4 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (235 chars)
Our Baristas rock , we love to put a smile on your face when you come in try our new drink Vanilla Macchiato  , creamy milk with the silky vanilla sauce topped with fresh brewed espresso shots can't get better that this so common by !


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (303 chars)
I come in the evening and the crew is always so welcoming. They take the time to know the customers, though at times they get real busy but they keep that smile on their face. The place is small and is not like other places but the crew makes me want to come back even if its just to sit down and chat.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (263 chars)
Small Starbuck's franchise right next to the entrance to the Main Exchange. Friendly staff who make terrific lattes. Place is small with a couple tables but always clean. Rest rooms are in the corridor a couple doors from the Starbuck's.  See you there sometime?


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (188 chars)
Not a big fan but Tax free yeah!  Off base has more selection and you can find deals. Unless your buying a high price item i would shop elsewhere. The lines get bad so don't be in a rush.


................................................................................
LOCATION #24:  address="1690 N Dysart Rd"  city="Goodyear"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85395"  (19 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (773 chars)
This is THE best Starbucks. The service is always fast whether you go through the drive thru or walk up to the window. I go a few times a week and they always remember me and joke around with me as if we've known each other forever. The coffee is always good (I'm from Seattle, I know good coffee..), the food is typical Starbucks food (sandwiches, bagels, sugary treats!) and the staff is really just amazing. They never mess up my drink, unlike the Starbucks down the road, which is why I'll drive the extra couple minutes just to come here!  ... This location is mainly a drive thru location. You can walk up to the window, but you can't go inside. Convenient if you're driving through town and need a quick pick me up. OR...if you just want someone to smile at you. ;)


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (461 chars)
I always get 5 star service here.  I'm most often there when I stop by and get a coffee on the way to the farmers market early Saturday mornings and it's almost always busy!  Luckly, busy doesn't seem to matter the employees always have a smile and are ready for a quick chat while you order or wait. ...  ... This location does seem to be a few cents more then others though, even the one just down the street near Target is almost a buck less with 2 coffees.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (454 chars)
Hopefully I have the right location.  If so, this place is only "to-go".  There's some outdoor sitting but you can't go "inside" to order something. ...  ... I come here probably a couple times a month and I always get pretty good service.  Really chipper folks but I guess I would be, too, if I was serving coffee all day (and drinking it too - presumably!) ...  ... Even when the lines are long, it goes by pretty fast.  They've got it together there.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (328 chars)
This is the most pleasant Starbucks I have ever been to. There is always a polite person on the other end of the speaker when ordering and and even funnier and pleasant person when paying. I think they hire only these type of people which makes it a even more joyful experience while picking up your favorite starbuck beverage.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (274 chars)
This Starbucks location is fantastic! The staff is always friendly and the service is fast! The entire Real Estate Brokerage visits on a daily basis to get their morning started. Though it would be nice to have a lobby, the new renovated patio is perfect in warmer weather!


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (212 chars)
I was so sleepy so my boyfriend offered since it was on the way. It was drive thru only, there were 6 cars ahead of us but we got our coffee quick though. I love it! Very enthusiastic friendly drive thru people!


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (161 chars)
I absolutely love this star bucks. extremely friendly staff, quick and efficient service and great environment. ask for john to make your favorite coffee frapp!


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (144 chars)
I love this Starbucks! It's my go to spot every morning! I definitely recommend the green tea latte here, it's fabulous! I love you Starbucks!!


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (142 chars)
I love this place! It's my everyday go to place for coffee on the way to Estrella CC :) They're always polite and have my coffee ready to go.


REVIEW #10:  5 stars  (88 chars)
I love this place! It's my everyday go to place for coffee on the way to Estrella CC :)


REVIEW #11:  5 stars  (85 chars)
Great service!!! Very friendly and made with a smile every time. Starts a great day.


REVIEW #12:  5 stars  (68 chars)
I stop here every morning and always get fast service with a smile!


REVIEW #13:  5 stars  (26 chars)
Great drive thru service!


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (567 chars)
I would call this location, "my starbucks".  I frequent Starbucks about three times per week but the funny part is I only drink the iced tea.  I love this starbucks because of its location which is about a mile north off the I-10 on Dysart rd.  I also like how its an "express" location because it means people, like myself, just want to get a drink and go.  I don't really care for the coffee shop experience, so this place is great for me.  I give it 4 stars because I want my ice tea very cold when its served and there have been times where it has not been cold.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (378 chars)
My Friday morning treat, being from Seattle I have to enjoy Starbucks from time to time and Friday is normally it.  This is a drive-thru (and walk up) only location which for that time of day is perfect for me since I don't need to take extra time getting out, going in, coming back and then leaving.  Staff is always very friendly and pretty quick in getting your order ready.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (264 chars)
A great kiosk style Starbucks!  I miss having the lobby, so that is the reason for the four stars.  The walk-up window is awesome and their newly re-vamped patio is a great place to spend a sunny Phoenix day.  The partners at this store provide excellent service!


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (128 chars)
Love the drive through only concept.  In and out in a flash!!!  This place must get busy, they have a ton of employees working.


REVIEW #18:  4 stars  (106 chars)
Mmmmm... starbucks...  ... Always fast and near my son's daycare. What better combination can we ask for?


REVIEW #19:  4 stars  (90 chars)
Love this place!! Always friendly and gets the order correct and delicious the first time


................................................................................
LOCATION #25:  address="1229 E McKellips Rd"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85203"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (85 chars)
Fast & efficient service, great staff. Very personable location. Highly recommended!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (28 chars)
just like the rest of them!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (301 chars)
Line out the door, everyone in line is ordering multiple drinks, barrista is kickin a$$ but working hard and an old man walks up and asks her to fill his cup with water...now? Selfish SOB...barrista smiles, fills his cup and goes back to making drinks...that's why they call her Rock :) she's awesome


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (215 chars)
New furniture and updated look.  Heard they are going to open another one in Frys so there will be two right next to each other.  Wow!!! I have never had any problems at this location.  It is the typical Starbucks.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (137 chars)
Hit this location early on a Sunday morning. It was packed!  Line to the door!!  Even with so many people, they were quick and friendly.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (17 chars)
Great service!!!


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (364 chars)
It's a Starbucks.  Nothing special or bad about the place.  Usually I stay away from Starbucks but this one is convenient next to the Frys that we shop at.  Starbucks just opened inside the Frys, so not sure how long this place will be around as they are next door to each other.  I will be going to the Starbucks in the Frys from now on just because of convince.


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (323 chars)
Music is too loud (obnoxious) and the internet sucks, slow. I love Starbucks but at night this more like a nightclub, but you know without the people. Currently using my phone to tether just to do the homework I can barely do because it is so friggin loud here. But this is just the humble opinion of one gold card holder.


REVIEW #9:  1 stars  (1338 chars)
If you want a burned cup of overpriced coffee and then be served by "Barrista's from Hell", go to this Starbucks.  I've been here several times passing thru on appointments and EVERY time I go there, the barrista's have a nasty attitude, like you are lucky they are even going to take your order after waiting a couple of minutes at the counter this tall, gangly, brunette with big glasses FINALLY turned around and took my order without offering an apology for the wait. I went next door to the barber and wanted to give him a tip but he didn't have any change so I went back to this Starbucks that I was just in 15minutes prior and asked if they could break a Ten dollar bill. The same moron has the gall to state (again with NO APOLOGY) that she couldn't break the bill unless I bought something!!  I just bought something!! It's Starbuck's policy she nastily responded. I said that is a lie!! I go to other Starbucks and have never had a problem getting change, not that I have done it that often, but it's called customer service!!  What a poor excuse for a "thinking human being" barrista and Starbucks should clean this entire site out. Close it up or get some people that care, want to provide good customer service and most importantly, like their job and want to be there!!  WILL NEVER GO HERE AGAIN!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (438 chars)
Horrible service every time I come. Id give NO STARS IF I COULD! Order either doesn't get done or they ask for your name and don't call it and someone takes your drink.  Here's a noble concept, some people actually sometimes order the EXACT drink.  ...  ... My sandwich was taken by someone who ordered the same thing. Only thing I got was a the obligatory Sorry.  Last time I ever go to Starbucks. Thank god Dutch bros is down the road!


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (29 chars)
SLOW service rude employees.


................................................................................
LOCATION #26:  address="1457 W Southern Ave"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85202"  (13 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (518 chars)
I have to say this Starbucks is the best.  They know who you are what your drink is and are very personable.   they are awesome I have not seen another Starbucks like this ever.  They  don't argue in front of the customers as I have seen many times before.   They ask how are you doing and don't just talk to each other (ignoring the customer)  as I have seen before at other  Starbucks.   They are awesome.  I had to relocate to another state.  Sadly I will miss this Starbucks they are simply the BEST!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (480 chars)
You always know what you ate going to get when you are at starbucks, but you can't always assume it will be a great experience. Here you can. Everyone who works here is a great person and they amazongly remember so many peoples faces, names and drink orders. A lot of the regulars are great people too. This is also a pretty nice location to study with a table that seats 4 with outlets, 3 two peron table with outlets and the two comfy leather chairs also have tgeir own outlets


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (430 chars)
Vikki just blew my mind, she made me and my bf the best drinks we've ever had at Starbucks, most make the Java chip too sweet and this is perfect and some make my favorite Italian cream soda too watered down and always forget the whipped cream but again it's perfect. She offered us desserts, we bought them and did everything timely and with a friendly cute smile. This is my new Starbucks Bc of of her, make sure u leave a tip!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (59 chars)
Great location right outside the perimeter of Fiesta Mall.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (150 chars)
This is where I go to enjoy my Iced Coffee & chicken sausage & egg white wrap every Saturday & sometimes Sunday. ...  ... Great staff & good service.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (52 chars)
Large, clean, friendly staff, mist machines outside


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (444 chars)
Need to improve service. The cashier is nice but slow. Drinks came out slow. They had one training barista making all the drinks. He kept asking questions to the cashier. It just looked like they didnt have enough people working. My drinks were not up to par. The only nice thing was one drink was free because it was taking them extremely long. It just didnt seemed well managed. I would rather drive little bit farther for better experience.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (110 chars)
Starbucks is Starbucks is Starbucks. If it wasn't like $9 for a muffin and a smoothie I'd go here more often.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (86 chars)
Yeah, it's a Starbucks, but the staff are great.  Always ready with a pre-dawn smile.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (47 chars)
It's Starbucks, what else do you need to know.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (506 chars)
It's the bare minimum that you would expect from Starbucks. I have never been able ti order a breakfast sandwich because they always run out before 10am. When asked how many sandwiches they usually carry the lady told me only 7! No wonder they always run out. They are only good for making you a drink at a mediocre pace. And don't expect much from these baristas, They have a sense of entitlement to the place that subtly overwhelms the customer service. Handle the stress ladies, its just a coffee shop.


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (364 chars)
I have to come to this Starbucks because its the only one in my area between home and work. Too bad its the slowest Starbucks I've EVER visited. It seems like they could use their staff more wisely when a rush comes in. There is no sense of urgency when taking your order or preparing it. Just leaves me feeling frustrated. Staff is nice at least, maybe too nice.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (331 chars)
Love the shop. Love the baristas. Love the coffee. Hate the smokers who swarm the outside patio and make drinking coffee outside hell for non-smokers. The friendly staff has no interest in enforcing the non-smoking city law and Starbucks policy!  If you are a non-smoker, it is inside or nothing.  If you smoke, the patio is open!


................................................................................
LOCATION #27:  address="1641 S Stapley Dr"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85204"  (10 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (109 chars)
This place has just been on point with my special drinks and the staff here has been fantastic and friendly.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (98 chars)
I love Starbucks, and Speedy is the best coffee person ever.  Thanks Starbucks and thanks Speedy!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (52 chars)
Fantastic service, fantastic staff, great location!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (2260 chars)
Imagine this: I had just driven 3 days from Minnesota to Arizona.  I knew that my favorite coffee shop in Minnesota, Caribou Coffee, didn't exist in the desert southwest.  Tired, a bit intimidated, and craving coffee, I find my first local Starbucks about 2 miles from where I live.  I park my car and walk up to the store, and from the moment the coffee aroma hit me, I knew I had found a place I could get away, drink great coffee, and relax reading my book, just like I had done back home.  The baristas (at least 2 or 3 of them) are extraordinarily friendly.  I had an extended conversation with one about Near Eastern and Asian culture and languages, which blew my mind. That had never happened to me before, and it brought a profound joy to my heart.  I had spent nearly 30 years in MN and I had never encountered such friendly staff *anywhere*, not even in the coveted "uptown" area of Minneapolis (known for being down to earth, organic, open minded folks).  I felt immediately welcomed in a strange land, one in which I wasn't yet comfortable.  I don't have much money, but this Starbucks gets what little dollars I do have; it gives me an escape, a feeling that I am "home", and that sense of community I so dearly miss.  I've spend many hours in their cushy chairs, either applying for jobs on my laptop, or reading a book out of my favorite series.  I don't know what I would've done if I hadn't found this Starbucks in my first few days in Arizona.  I know, many of you would say, "Gee, Starbucks?  Really?  Couldn't you have found a more local coffee shop?"  No.  I couldn't have.  I'm broke, and I have no internet access where I live.  To stumble upon this shop was awesome; I was never a fan of Starbucks when I lived in MN, but now, I'm a huge fan.  At certain hours of the day, you can't find a place to sit, but that makes it all the more warm and friendly.  People here don't seem to mind if you sit directly next to them when it's busy (Minnesotans apparently really like their personal bubble).  I give it 2 thumbs up, but you'll have to see it for yourself.  I may be merely a lonely traveler looking for something familiar, but I was impressed with the service, the friendly faces, the product and the cleanliness of this coffee shop.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (272 chars)
Even though this is a location with no drive thru, it is still faster than the drive thru's at other locations. So I come to this location instead.  The staff is nice and they usually remember my name and my drink which makes a girl patron like me feel special of course.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (219 chars)
We went in here to kill some time before a movie. The people were nice and helpful. The menu is easy to read and there is a decent amount of seating inside.  ...  ... Our drinks didn't take long to make and were tasty.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (208 chars)
I'm a fan of Starbucks, and this is a pretty good one.  Nice setting in a kind of plaza area with plenty of outdoor seating and outdoor tables.  Beyond that, pretty standard Starbucks but doesn't disappoint.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (102 chars)
I can always count on Starbucks for a consistent cup of coffee wherever I happened to be in the city.


REVIEW #9:  1 stars  (940 chars)
Sad how Starbucks lost its customer service edge that they were known for...  Headline - A Seattle company that lost its Pacific Northwest roots.  My daughter had saved up some coupons for the new Fizzio soda.  She was so excited to have daddy daughter date with our start at Starbucks.  The team member lady was extremely rude and loudly said "we can serve you because these coupons are expired."   I said "serve us???"   "Ok.  We don't need to have a drink here if you can't serve us".  I don't think she meant it they way it came out but her attitude was so bad that we just left.  My daughter was very sad and embarrassed about the explosion from the team member.    The real bummer is they were two days past.  Ha!  The old Starbucks would have said, glad to help you.  Enjoy your drink.  Instead of inferring, your an idiot why don't you just leave.   Hope they take some time a coach that poor young lady before she does this again.


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (713 chars)
My sister and I stopped in her after a movie to enjoy some coffee.  I am a frequent flyer of Starbucks and visit them at least 3 times a week.  I had never been to this particular location before and I will NEVER go back!  The barista was so rude, like, unbelievably rude.  And of course she didn't have on a name tag so....She was thin, brunette, mouse-y looking.  I politely asked her for a couple of waters to go along with my order and she ROLLED HER EYES at me and said "Yeah ok".  When I then tried to confirm my order was correct with her, she acted all offended and said "I'm sure it's right ok?" again, with a very rude tone.  I've never been treated this way at a Starbucks.  They should be embarassed.


................................................................................
LOCATION #28:  address="1653 S Dobson Rd Ste 101"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85202"  (20 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (468 chars)
I wouldn't normally check in or rate a Starbucks I go to because they're all pretty much the same. I believe this particular location recently went through a new facelift (remodel). It looks different from all the other Starbucks I've been to: High bar tops and community tables, nice outdoor setting, and open space. The setting reminds me of some of a few coffee places I've been to in NYC. Maybe that's why I like it so much. Oh and the baristas are welcoming too.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (304 chars)
I don't love the coffee at Starbucks, but this place is getting 5 stars for their service! They are quick, ACCURATE, friendly, and they always remember my drink even though I only go there about once a week! Amazing! The staff is great and I thought I should leave them a nice little "Good Job" on Yelp!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (260 chars)
5 stars for being my favorite starbucks in the valley. All of my favorite baristas either work at this location or used to work here lol. They just had a remodel and the place looks fantastic.  Generally speaking I get fast service and everyone knows my name.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (148 chars)
I live close to this one so that means I come here often duh lol. But I love the bistros they're so funny and I always get a great cup of coffee :)


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (112 chars)
My home. I love this place. They are so fast and always chipper. A great start to my work days. Thanks ladies!!


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (109 chars)
I love coming here due to the people. Not only are they nice but tent alway make my drink the way I want it.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (102 chars)
I love Starbucks, I go to many locations through out the valley but this one has a cute outdoor area!


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (97 chars)
This Starbucks has excellent customer service! Plus they are super speedy too :) love this place


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (67 chars)
Love all the electrical outlets here...great mobile work location.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (566 chars)
I love this Starbucks...well I love everyone that works there, save for one redheaded surly girl. My cousin and I call her Sister Surly and the moment we see her, we head on off to the other Starbucks on Dobson and Warner. ...  ... It's your typical Starbuck's fare -- coffee and pastries. ...  ... Next door is  Jamba Juice, across the parking lot is a Massage Envy and then next door to that is the Good Egg. You can have breakfast and then go to Starbuck's after. ...  ... Overall, this Starbuck's is my favorite in the Valley...except when Sister Surly works...


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (524 chars)
I'm a big Starbucks fan, but I had to take away a star from this location for a few major reasons for a guy-on-the-go (residential real estate agent) like me.  They don't have a drive-thru AND their parking lot is almost always packed!  The parking lot being packed isn't always because everyone's at Starbucks - it happens be in a very busy plaza - but it doesn't change the fact that it is major pain to hunt for 10 minutes for a parking spot for a cup of coffee that only takes me 3 minutes to order and receive!  Aaugh!


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (476 chars)
Mmmmm starbucks, who doesn't like starbucks as it is?? This location is one of my faves because it's right by school! There are plenty of outlets around for my laptop and the employees are all so nice! And if you go with someone who doesn't like or want coffee, well there's a Jamba right next door! The only downfall I have found so far is sometimes it gets a little noisy in there. Great place to meet up with study buddies, but a little too loud for me to study on my own.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (438 chars)
I've come here a few times in the past, and now that Starbucks has free WiFi, I've found myself coming in on a more consistant basis.   ...  ... I like it here because they have plugs at enough tables that I can sit with my laptop and not be restricted to just a few seats in the place.  Hours are great, and they obviously offer a variety of drinks and pasteries to choose from.  Service is great, and all around a good clean Starbucks.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (435 chars)
This particular Starbucks has great customer service, there usually isn't a line, and they always have a smile on their face. HOWEVER, the parking in this plaza is something else to speak of. They don't have a drive-thru so being that I'm always on the go and need to be quick, it makes it difficult. I know that I can find a parking spot around the corner and walk to the door, however, it makes it difficult when I need to be quick.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (130 chars)
Depending on the time, claim a seat/table before you get in line. If you wait you may be sitting outside. It's a popular hangout.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (91 chars)
I like this Starbucks!  Very quick, good baristas, and plenty of seating - inside and out!


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (88 chars)
Great staff and they're more than willing to make any customized drink at your request.


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (139 chars)
Still a decent stop anywhere for the whole coffe shop thing, but have been enjoying some of the other coffee shops in the area a bit more.


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (488 chars)
The customer service is fine. The atmosphere is fine. The quality if beans are terrible. They purchase they're beans at a low cost and roast them black so they don't taste like crap beans but they are. Longer the roast, more acidic it'll come out. And no one likes acidic coffee. So I go to local coffee shops that bug their beans locally of roast it them selves.  If you like good coffee you don't like starbucks. I've worked in coffee for 6 years and have been to 5 roasters so I know.


REVIEW #20:  1 stars  (76 chars)
This is a starbucks. How sweet and not like coffee do you like your coffee?


................................................................................
LOCATION #29:  address="1939 S Val Vista Dr"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85204"  (25 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (685 chars)
This Starbucks is always so darn friendly! Never a bad service! ...  ... What can I say? I'm a repeat customer. Why? Well, not only because they're darn friendly! Also because they offer more than coffee! Their coffee is great and all, but I really enjoy trying their panini's and refreshers. Yum! ...  ... I am amazed at how consistently happy and courteous the customer service is here. Is it like this at all Starbucks? I may never know. I like it too much here to try anywhere else on purpose.  ...  ... I've been to other Starbucks and the service varies. Here, it's awesome all the time! Not only are their cold green tea Refreshers refreshing, so is the service and atmosphere!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (496 chars)
It helps to know that I give Starbucks in general great reviews because I love it so much.  This starbucks gets 5 stars because the people there are so kind. I have met a different person every time I've been there, and each person is not only nice but personable.  They seem to genuinely care about the people walking through the door, and that, afterall, is an important part of enjoying your coffee experience, the smile that comes along with the cup. :) ... Special feature: Drive through***


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (473 chars)
With a vast majority of Starbucks locations in this world, you pretty much know what you are going to get.  What sets one Starbucks apart from another is the staff, and the staff at this location is top notch.  Always friendly, always in a good mood, and always there to make sure you get your caffeinated beverage ASAP.  Aside from my crack addiction-like need for multiple shots of espresso daily, the friendly faces of these baristas make my morning each and every day.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (437 chars)
This is the drive-thru Starbucks closest to my home and conveniently located near the 60. I always receive friendly warm service here. Last night I pulled into the line 5 minutes after they closed (I didn't realize this at the time) and someone inside noticed me. I was served and they didn't even tell me I arrived after closing until I asked what time they closed. ...  ... That's my idea of customer service that exceed expectations!


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (349 chars)
Starbucks is Starbucks, but this is a great location. Clean, friendly employees, plenty of parking, plenty of seating. All Starbucks are not created equal. Some are poorly laid out and staffed, some are very well run. This is the latter. And there's a drive thru! Been thru there many times and never an excessive wait. Excellent job at this store.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (165 chars)
Location, Location, Location.  Great spot to drive-through and grab a coffee on your way to hop on the 60.  Never had a messed up order.  Really friendly employees.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (161 chars)
thanks for the great kick off to a nice working morning with the boost i need with a cup of joe to get the morning running! thanks for waking me up STARBUCKS!!!


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (154 chars)
Quick and friendly service! All Starbucks are not the same! The baristas here are wonderful. I enjoy starting my morning here and studying here at night.


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (149 chars)
Love this Starbucks! It is right off the freeway, and has a drive-thru. Derek is wonderful! His sense of humor and fast service is much appreciated!


REVIEW #10:  5 stars  (121 chars)
Went through the drive-thru and Francis took my order and was very nice and carried on a conversation. Enjoyed my visit.


REVIEW #11:  5 stars  (107 chars)
Love the employees here. Everyone is so friendly and helpful. Definitely love that they have a drive thru!


REVIEW #12:  5 stars  (82 chars)
Venti, non fat, light ice, chai, best drink ever! Love all of the baristas there.


REVIEW #13:  5 stars  (78 chars)
Thank you morning crew for getting my d day started with a smile, quickly....


REVIEW #14:  5 stars  (58 chars)
My second coffee for the day...Mocha Coconut Frappuccino.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (392 chars)
It's a Starbucks.  It's not an outstanding one, but it doesn't suck. ... The baristas smile.  I've never had a screwed up order (but then again, I order tall Americanos.  If you screw that up, you have failed at life.) ...  ... It's the closest to my office. I can walk there. (unless it's one of THOSE days that Phoenix is trying to melt my shoes off.) ...  ... They also have a drive thru.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (99 chars)
I love this Starbucks!  Every time I go the service is FAST, coffee is great and I'm out the door!


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (35 chars)
Starbucks....can't live without it


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (599 chars)
We happened to be out this way and saw the drive-thru.  I had an iced pumpkin spice latte.  I don't know what they did but it was super strong and tasted bitter.  Being that I was a mile  down the road and about to get on the freeway before I tasted it, I didn't go back.  I drank as much as I could but it just didn't taste right.  And I know my coffee and I especially know my Pumpkin Spice Lattes!  I love those darn things!!  My daughter had a chocolate chip frap and that was fine....maybe the chocolate covered up the bitter taste....but I will think twice before I go back to this Starbucks.


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (368 chars)
You know what you're going to get when you go to a Starbucks. This is a clean location, with a drive thru window, and speedy service. To get to the drive thru you do have to drive around to the back of the building. For the most part I try to avoid Starbucks for local independent coffee shops. In a pinch though you know what they have and can get your caffeine fix.


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (132 chars)
Service was slow people here seemed very confused on what was going on they have boxes laying around the store it's 3 stars at best


REVIEW #21:  3 stars  (132 chars)
Drive thru takes far too long and parking is terrible in the morning. If you have the time to wait then the staff is very friendly!


REVIEW #22:  2 stars  (490 chars)
Ohkay, So I was working 3rd shift this day, Went throu the drive throu got a Carmel Machiatto. These people, over flilled the coffe to where when they handed it to me, and i put the straw in it over flowed onto my work scrubs! not to mention the coffee was burnt!! ...  ... I mean yeah more for your money but not when its all over you and you hav burnt coffee..... SO.... Taste before you drive off!! Not to mention, when I went back to get "Fresh" coffee, they were totaly rude about it!


REVIEW #23:  2 stars  (407 chars)
Coffee has went down. No big deal anymore.  They used to also have a good sweet selection.  Got a chocolate chip cookie which cost over $2 and it was as thin as a mint, and no bigger than a chip ahoy.  Also got a scone which used to be very good. Now they come in a plastic wrap, individually wrapped. That means mass produced and not local anymore. Tasted like one you get at Fry's.  $10 for this garbage.


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (1593 chars)
I wish they had an option for NO stars!  My daughter went on 1/4/14 evening to pick up something to drink before getting her fianc from work.  While there she misplaced her keys.  When she realized it she back tracked and asked workers in Starbucks if anyone had seen them.  There were about 5-6 employees there at the time.  They said no.  She searched the restroom, the store, the outside seating, her car, etc.  She then remembered tossing trash out so she dug through the trash to no luck.  She texts me to bring the spare keys and we drive 15 minutes to the store.  While there we are all trying to trace back the steps in looking through trash, cars, restrooms, etc.  No luck.  An employee that was leaving came up and asked my daughter if the keys had a distinct look, she said yes.  He said oh we found those the restroom and thought they were the stores and put them in the safe.  Really!   At this point my daughter is upset and starting to breakdown, it took them 5 minutes to open the safe and there they were.  Did I mention that my daughter is 9 months pregnant and due in 4 days from this incident.  Yeah, no one at this store offered to help her even though they saw her trying to dig through the trash.  No offers to help look for them, nothing.   And when the keys were returned, no apologies for holding the keys for now an hour.   My daughter was upset for the next hour as she felt this store employees ignored her situation and not 1, not 1 person offered to help.  This is very sad. ...  ... Very Disappointed in this stores Employees that worked the evening of 1/4/14.


REVIEW #25:  1 stars  (1379 chars)
Horrible service: as per previous reviewer, I concur, the girls working on the weekend here were really horrible. I think they specifically pick them from the Juvie section.  ... Went here for my morning Joe, always the same  ...  ... Me: "Short doppio machiato"  (lingo I learnt at other starbucks. ) ... Girl at counter (GaC): "Wha, Wha can't hear you"  ... Me: Repeated order ... GOC: "Wha what can't hear you!!" ,(after taking off her headphones) "Oh!, a machiato... oh yeah..."  ... Me: (thinking)Thank heaven for small miracles ...  ... On getting my coffee (5 minutes a tad late given I was the second in line) I guess gossiping about their boyfriends was more important. The coffee was filled to the brim with milk. Not looking good!!! ...  ... Me: Did you put milk in the machiato order? ... Girl who made the coffee: Yeah!! why? (rudely) ... Me: well machiato is only supposed to have foam. ... Girl: Oh.. (making a deriding face) ... Me: Um!! (flabbergasted at the poor service... and I thought Starbucks paid these people higher and trained them rigorously.  ) ... Girl: Why U want me to make it again? then mimed deridingly  below her breath "Machiato doesnt contain milk"  ...  ... at this point I was quite sure she would end up spitting in my coffee or do some insidious act. So had to walk of with my milky unwanted coffee wishing I hadn't paid up front for it.


................................................................................
LOCATION #30:  address="2010 W Guadalupe Rd"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85202"  (8 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (544 chars)
This Starbucks location just opened a couple weeks ago about 1 minute from my house but yesterday was the first time I actually made a trip by.  I used the drive thru and the person asked right away what they could get for me and repeated my order back to me to make sure it was right, which it was.  When I pulled up to the window the girl there was super friendly with a big smile which always puts me in a good mood.  My drink was ready right away and I was on my merry way.  I will definitely be making this Starbucks a part of my routine!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (531 chars)
I'm pretty much here every morning...even jumped a few curbs and did a few illegal things to get in the drive thru line. Yes, i have a green tea addiction..GUILTY. ...  ... Always really quick here both in the drive thru and if you get out and walk up to the window you get fast service as well. ...  ... TIP: if you need ur caffeine in the morning and you are usually in a rush you might want to give yourself 10 extra minutes and get here no later than 7:05am- after that traffic and feigns get crazy! ...  ...  trust me i know.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (414 chars)
Always fast here! Love that I don't have to give myself 15-20 minutes extra anymore to get coffee at the Starbucks by my house because now I found this one by work and only spend 5-10 minutes here without having to worry about being late. Only thing is that the cars in line don't pay attention when the lines moves because it moves so fast. If they got off their phone and paid attention it would go ever faster!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (360 chars)
This was my first time at this location, and my experience definitely made sure it won't be the last. The person who took my order was very friendly, definitely a good thing on a Monday morning before caffeine. When I arrived at the window, my drink was ready, so I was in and out - with a perfectly blended frapp to boot! I would highly recommend this one :)


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (66 chars)
Fast , friendly and had a great sense of humor at the drive thru.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (305 chars)
Gotta love a hot cup of joe! This location is super convenient as it is on the way to work, had a drive thru, and has outdoor seating if you want to hang out for a bit. My only issue with this location is that the lines get long and the parking lot is tight to navigate. Otherwise, it's a solid location.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (216 chars)
Pretty new location. This one is drive thru or walk up only. They have no inside seating but there are some shaded outdoor tables. Bathrooms are outside as well. Staff is super friendly and drive thru is very quick.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (72 chars)
Great place to get a quick fix. Friendly staff and usually pretty fast.


................................................................................
LOCATION #31:  address="2043 S Ellsworth Rd"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85212"  (15 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (889 chars)
Awwh SB's, how i love thee and your caffeine. I have been to this location a few times now and i have had excellent service each and every time i have been in (or) gone through the drive-thru. They do have free Wi-Fi inside you are looking for a place to chill.  ...  ... Recommendations for drinks:  ... * Black Tea, Green Tea or Passion Tea Lemonades are very refreshing.  ... (I prefer w/no classic syrup and just add a little raw sugar, but i like these drinks less sweet than most folks.)  ... * Black Tea Iced plain is really good too. ... * Cool Lime Refresher is delightful as well. ... * Chai Tea Latte Iced (sometimes i like it dirty too....... get your mind out of the gutter "dirty" means they add a shot of espresso.) ...  ... Recommendations for treats: ... * Almond Croissant ... * Blueberry Oat Bar ... * Reduced-Fat Pumpkin Cream Cheese Loaf Cake ... * Cheesecake brownie


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (657 chars)
Being a former Barista it is hard to find a Sbux that really gets me going.  I live in Scottsdale but happened to be in the area of this Sbux.  Even though they are a busy store, they seem to make every customer feel like they matter and not just a transaction.  Drinks were made quickly and pastries were fresh.  The really great partner (Clint) even offered to warm my morning bun up to me, even though he was busy getting other pastries!!  What a great barista!!!! ...  ... The store was one of the cleanest I have ever been in, which is amazing considering their busyness! ...  ... I would definitely be back to this location!!!  Amazing job everyone!!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (600 chars)
I can't even.. This place, man. Being a regular has its perks. Every time I walk in there in the morning, Brittie welcomes me - "Hey Tate! We doing the usual today?" As well as making me feel like a valued customer, as well as a friend - I see that other customers appreciate it too. ...  ... On top of the fantastic customer service, my order is always, needless to say, correct. Iced Carmel/Vanilla Latt, and a Bacon Artisan Sandwich.  ...  ... Side note, finally achieved my Gold Card on the rewards program.  ...  ... Couldn't be happier with this location, as well as the company overall. A++++


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (144 chars)
If you hit Baseline, you've gone too far- tucked in with a couple other businesses. Friendly, fast service in the drive-thru. Didn't go inside.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (23 chars)
Awesome personalities!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (1147 chars)
A few great things about Starbucks: ... 1. You'll always be able to find one, even if you missed the one half a block earlier. ... 2. You'll always get the same great tasting coffee, no matter the location. ... 3. You'll walk out smelling like coffee if your stay is anything beyond getting it to-go. ...  ... This particular location is no exception to the rule.  That being said, if you like Starbucks coffee, you'll like it here.   ...  ... Living close to this store and visiting semi frequently, I've been able to observe its ups and downs. ...  ... Ups: Free WiFi!  Day crew is awesome: they have always taken great care of me and are incredibly polite.  Outdoor seating with spraying water overhead in the summer makes it very pleasant.  Restrooms are generally clean.  Food selection is growing.  Drive thru available! ...  ... Downs: I always smell like burnt coffee after sitting in the store for any duration of time.  ...  ... To conclude, this is your typical Starbucks coffee shop and does well to keep you buying coffee with their ever so faddy Tall/Grande/Venti paper cups and free WiFi.  Way to go Starbucks marketing department!


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (329 chars)
I come here all the time. There are two things to be said about this location. The drive thru is painfully slow, you will wait on average 20 minutes (going inside is not much quicker either). That being said, the staff has always been very nice to me so I can't complain there...which is why I keep coming back despite the wait.


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (1309 chars)
I visited this Starbucks around 10 a.m. on the day after Christmas. It's a hot spot, evidently, as the drive thru line was long AND there was a line halfway to the door inside.  ...  ... I chose to park and go inside. It was the slowest moving line I have seen at a Starbucks in a while. I ordered my drink "a tall nonfat latte, one pump gingerbread," which is how I was taught to order the drink at another location I visit occasionally because, I was told, they don't charge for one pump.  ...  ... The girl behind the register put my drink in as a "nonfat gingerbread latte" and charged me for the $0.40 difference. When I attempted to correct my order, "I actually just want a latte with one pump gingerbread," her retort was "it's only like $0.20 difference."  ...  ... WELL, Miss Moneybags, it's $0.40 different. And, because of your unwillingness to accept my order as placed, I paid you for additional pumps of syrup, whip cream and God knows what other goodies you put on top of a gingerbread latte... because, I certainly don't know... I only PAY for the crap, thanks to you, I don't actually take my drink that way!  ...  ... So, yeah, "I have had better" and I don't think I will be back. I'll hit one of the 80-bajillion other locations within a .5 mile radius, next time I'm in the East Valley.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (912 chars)
The kids and I LOVE Starbucks but this one leaves a lot to be desired.. We have been here a hand full of time and each time I keep asking myself why do I go back to this one?  ...  ... The service there is almost rude. They seem as if they are annoyed to be busy. They never seem to be happy to service you. Drinks take forever to make, even though they aren't as busy as other ones are. We won't even go into the fact that my order has been messed up the last 2 times. ...  ... The main issue I have is the fact that 3 out of 5 times when sitting and relaxing with a snack, someone has to sweep the floor near me. Really? While I am sitting there? ...  ... There are much better Starbucks and I think I am going to try some others locally. ...  ...  ... 12/06 - The kids and I went in today for our "snack" wanted to say things were better today. I am not going to change my rating until after my next visit ;)


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (755 chars)
I should've listened to the other reviewers. Rude and annoyed. That describes the people working there on the particular day I was there. They seemed annoyed that people were there to order coffee!  The cashier was rude and rolled her eyes when someone said "Oh!  Can I also get a pumpkin muffin?"  It made me uncomfortable. I ordered a peppermint mocha and when I took a sip it was soooooo strong I felt like I did a shot of peppermint schnapps!  I went to the counter and said "I think there's an extra shot of peppermint in here. It's really strong". The girl took it from me and made me another one. Never said a word. Not a sorry, not a oh no let me make you another one.....nothing. I guess I'll stick with what I know and not change up my routine.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (452 chars)
Service here is extremely slow. Waits in the drive thru are an average of 15-20 minutes I've waited longer if the line reaches the end of the drive thru. Inside is not much better.  ...  ... Simple iced caramel macchiatos are made differently by most baristas so they rarely taste the same. ...  ... Other than that the store is always clean.  ...  ... For as busy as this store is they need an extra barista because the wait times here are ridiculous


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (334 chars)
Not impressed with this location as they managed to mess up an easy order. I ordered a Hot Skinny Vanilla Latte, Decaf and I ended up with an ICED Skinny Vanilla Latte. Since I was in a hurry, I had to take the drink instead of getting the correct one. Upon review of my receipt, it had been put in as a ICED latte. ...  ... Oh well.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (234 chars)
pretty busy at around 7 AM on a friday... i waited 20 minutes for my drink and they forgot my peppermint! :/  not the best starbucks experience i've had.  BUT they do have a drive-thru.  wonder if that line would have moved faster...


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (186 chars)
This location seems to go through an abnormally large number of new staff constantly. I have not had a problem with getting the correct order, but customer service is very hit and miss.


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (210 chars)
It's Friday afternoon 2:45 pm you'd think the drive thru would be quicker than the last time I was in it (on a Sat 22min), nope 10 minutes. 2cars ahead of me. I'm not ever coming back to this one. What a joke.


................................................................................
LOCATION #32:  address="2832 N Power Rd Ste 101"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85215"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (806 chars)
Thought I should make use of another buy one get one free coupon for myself & my son. We chose another location because previously when using the same coupon at a different location for the 1st time we had received a difficult time. I was leary about using the same type of coupon again but needed an afternoon pick me up. We went through the drive through and I made sure to mention the coupon, it was like night and day. Meagan whose smile you could hear through the speaker was a breath of fresh air. She said "no problem", we got our order quick without any issues. Meagan was super sweet and even my son commented on how nice she was. and made it a point to say thank you and goodbye to her. My son suggested that I should meantion her on Yelp, so here I am. Meagan thank you, you brightened our day!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (613 chars)
Never thought I would be reviewing a Starbucks, but I had to mention this one.   ... Went here a few nights ago.  In front of the store the seats were crowded.  I expected a wait inside.  Instead, the service was fast and friendly.  I ordered only a water and a cookie.  The person I went with ordered a coffee and said it was very good. ...  ... The next morning, I realized I had left my planner behind.  When I asked about it, I had barely gotten the question out to the barista when she said, "Yes."  She promptly went back to get it and this is the main reason this Starbucks gets the great review. Service.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (413 chars)
I've been a morning regular here for many years and I drink my fair share of coffee. This is probably the most consistently good and friendly Starbucks I have visited in the valley. Keep it up, guys!  ...  ... I don't do a lot of afternoon/evening coffee, so I can't comment too much on that except to say that the place is fairly quiet in the afternoons and the people who work then seem to be just as friendly.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (238 chars)
Great experience here. Came infor the Wifi & a drink. It was clean and they were friendly. Offered free samples of new products. Small seating areas. There are about 6 tables outside with misters above. All in all a good Starbucks store!


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (233 chars)
Today was only my second time coming into this particular location and to my surprise and pleasure, Kevin, Starbucks' Barista, recalled my name in greeting me! These little things speak volumes to me and I will surely not forget it!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (417 chars)
This is a great Starbucks! The Manger Leighton is always so friendly. I used to just go to this bucks while visiting my boyfriend and they would remember my drink and order. Now that I live here it's as if they know when I am about to walk in the door. The team is friendly and the place is always clean.  In addition to all this The team knows about current specials and the goings on with Starbucks so that's cool.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (388 chars)
I LOVE Starbuck's and I LOVE the people at this location HOWEVER, the service is always so incredibly slow.  Last weekend I waited in line (inside) for 28 minutes for my drink and spinach feta wrap.  That is a long time.  A few weeks prior I waited for 35 minutes in the drive thru.  If there were no cars behind me I would have backed out.  BUT....My food and beverages are always good.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (80 chars)
Not my favorite of the local baristas but it's Starbucks...terribly consistent.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (35 chars)
Just like all the other starbucks.


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (1156 chars)
Why does everyone like Starbucks? Its always busy and It's overly priced, overrated coffee. I only stop by here if I forget to make my blend the night before and if I am going to school/work and I'm too tired to function. Well I stopped by here around 9 am and the drive thru was super packed (of course) so I went inside. I looked around, only saw a couple of people so I thought everything was going to be all good. Well I ordered an iced coffee, nothing too complicated, the guy asked me my name so I told him. A few minutes later the guy was calling out Sarah a bunch of times and I looked around and I was the only female in there. I just assumed this Sarah girl had left early. Well 20 freakin minutes later I still didn't have my coffee so I went up to the front and asked the dude where my coffee was. He said he was calling my name a bunch of times but I didn't come up to get my coffee. My name is Callie, like California. Not Sarah. I don't know how he managed that to mess up. When I finally did get my coffee, it tasted like crap. Circle k has better coffee than this. I'm going to stick to making my own brew, saves me some more cash anyway.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (567 chars)
I'm such a fan of Starbucks and this is the one closest to my house. It's terrible. The wait times are extra long, at least 10 minutes and often 20 or more in the  mornings. I would also estimate 1 out of every 5 of my drinks have been wrong, usually adding sweetener to an unsweetened order. I hate to admit, I still go frequently but not if I'm leaving the neighborhood and have another store to choose on my way.  ... Double check your drinks and budget plenty of time into your stop and you should be ok. If not, it's a very frustrating location, save your time.


................................................................................
LOCATION #33:  address="344 S Power Rd #101"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85206"  (9 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (343 chars)
What a great day to start! Beautiful people greeting me, "Good Morning :)"  with the smile on their face. I ordered a Grande Vanilla Iced Latte, a Danish Bread and a Zucchini muffin. I've been to this place several times and still customers service here isn't a diminishing star! I love you Starbucks...I hope it's OK to come once in a while.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (112 chars)
My favorite Starbucks in Mesa. It's not even the closest one to my home, but worth the experience. GREAT staff.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (107 chars)
This is one of my favorite Starbucks locations - my drinks always come out right and the staff is awesome!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (66 chars)
Very friendly staff.   It's the best place for coffee in Mesa AZ.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (594 chars)
This Starbucks is my favorite! I stop in fairly frequently and the service is always consistently great! It is a very busy location so wait times are sometime long, but it is always worth the wait. The atmosphere inside is nice, very relaxing, and not crowded at all. The baristas are friendly and remember the regulars. The only downside to this location is the parking situation. There are not many spots and sometimes the drive-thru line can back up making it hard to manuver in the lot. Aside from the parking issues I recommend this location when people are looking for a great Starbucks!


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (431 chars)
This Starbucks (located at Power & Broadway in east Mesa) just opened a few months ago. It is located a block from Banner Baywood and Banner Heart hospitals, so they get extremely busy between 0600 and 0730am with hospital employees running in, or using the drive-through, to get their morning dose of caffeine.  ...  ... Staff members have been great during each of my visits and the inside has the usual ambiance of a Starbucks.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (244 chars)
Like this place, the baristas are really nice but there is no comfortable seating. Really wish they had some cushion chairs. I have my car worked on down the street and hang out while it's getting fixed and the hard chair are bad for the back.


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (919 chars)
No complaints about the drinks every drink I've ordered from here has been good, my complaint is about the wait. Yes it does get the AM rush 6-730, but so do other locations. One morning I decided to go inside to order my drink thinking it would be faster versus the extremely long drive thru line.... i was WRONG... I went in about 640 ordered my drink, a shaken green tea lemonade.. and I did not get my drink until 657.. which is RIDICULOUS for a TEA.... I think I counted about 7-8 people who ordered coffess.. fraps, macchiatos, etc AFTER me.. and go their drinks BEFORE me... I noticed the barista working made ALL The coffee drinks first and then took a minute to make my tea... which literally took LESS than a minute. to pour make and give to me.. i will NOT be going back to this starbucks again, maybe during a day.... but NEVER in the morning because I was late for work when i got there in plenty of time!


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (530 chars)
Staff here are great. Thanks, guys.  ...  ... Now we come to the game-changer for me. Recent renovations have resulted in two things happening:  ...  ... 1) A table is now thoroughly unstable. Staff knows but no one has replaced the faulty table. Hot coffee on this table will immediately spill. With Banner next door, this won't be pretty.  ...  ... 2) I can no longer sit in the chairs here for more than an hour. They hurt! ...  ... I'm going to move my [$70/month] coffee business down the road, to a pre-renovation location.


................................................................................
LOCATION #34:  address="4409 E McKellips Rd"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85215"  (10 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (434 chars)
Okay, so I love Starbucks ~ actually their caramel macchiatos: ...      * whole milk, single venti, no foam, extra whipped cream, upside down,  ...         caramel macchiato! ...  ... NICKIE (at this specific location) makes THE SMOOTHEST caramel macchiatos . . . ever . . . every single time!     ...  ... I have found EVERY employee at this location to be courteous, friendly, outgoing, kind . . . and they even have puppy bones!!!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (284 chars)
I hit this place everyday. They are by far the fastest Starbucks Ive ever been to. Sad to see some of the old employees move on..Brandon was a pretty awesome GM. Always said hello, and made you feel like you were walking into his home! ...  ... Keep up the good work. I will be back.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (264 chars)
This Starbucks location is slightly smaller than the location I usually go to in Las Vegas. Although, there is still ample seating for parties of 1 & 2. The line was short and the staff seemed very sweet. This location has a drive-thru and the restroom was clean.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (231 chars)
My recent experience was amazing. Chris was extremely friendly and helpful with my drink order. The iced coffee macchiato was the way to go. I'm very pleased and will visit again. Thanks to Chris this is my favorite Starbucks. ;-)


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (115 chars)
I have been here many times and I always get a good customer service!  ... Free wifi and affordable drinks?! Sure.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (317 chars)
Almost always quick and professional. The get my order right.  They are friendly and classy.  James works weekends. He is handsome young guy who teases about wearing his pjs to work because I always show up in mine thru the drive thru.  Even though sometimes Starbucks tastes strong I love it and would pick it first


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (96 chars)
Love the drive thru at this location. They keep it moving pretty quick and are always friendly.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (1031 chars)
I wish there were more independent coffee shacks around but it seems that for convenience sake, there is always a Starbucks. With that said... I met a friend at Starbucks the other day, it is always pretty nice because of the outdoor patios. This is a stand alone location which makes parking super great. Howie-my new 4-legger needs to continue to work on his socialization skills. So this was a perfect opportunity. Well, lets just say Howie enjoyed the cigarette butts on the ground and chewed gum that the staff does not clean up. Well, I would expect the person who was smoking or chewing gum to dispose of their trash in the bin, but there was NO bin outside. Now that seemed odd to me. Anyway, they should keep a tidy environment. The peppermint latte I had ordered was pretty darn good. There are only 5 tables on the patio and no umbrellas? really? I know it is winter but the sun is so bright it would have been nice. For the size of the place I was surprised that their patio was not larger. All in all an OK adventure.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (138 chars)
Very nice little shop with quality staff.  Not real wheelchair friendly as there is always a lot of display product narrowing the aisles.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (88 chars)
Slow service, not always the most pleasant staff but my drink has never been messed up.


................................................................................
LOCATION #35:  address="4972 S Power Road"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85212"  (5 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (380 chars)
Went here to fill up our SHINEY new Starbucks tumblers with fresh Christmas drinks! I could not believe how busy it was!! The staff handled the massive amount of people with Speed, accuracy and a smile to boot!! Stephanie did an awesome job navigating my SIX confusing drink orders! A big thank to the Starbucks crew for such a great job under such pressure on Christmas Day !!!!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (211 chars)
Starbucks! Another great establishment. A ton of drinks & options to make the perfect concoction to satisfy the finicky of taste buds. Great & friendly staff. Clean restaurant & restrooms. Hats off to Starbucks


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (147 chars)
This Starbucks is clean. The employees are friendly. The manager Janora is fantastic! I liked it so much here I wanted to work here and got hired!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (76 chars)
Can't go wrong with Starbucks. They make your drink till they get it right.


REVIEW #5:  1 stars  (368 chars)
Has to be the absolute slowest Starbucks I've ever been to... One lady goes back and forth like she can't think of what to do next... They carry on personal conversations instead of focusing on getting drinks out... Watching people standing in line and looking at their faces looks like a bunch of zombies...but what can you do when their isn't another one to go to??


................................................................................
LOCATION #36:  address="5110 South Power Rd"  city="Mesa"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85212"  (4 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (101 chars)
Very courteous service. They will remember your name and drink order, even if you don't visit daily.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (74 chars)
Always fast courteous service. Seems never to be too busy when I come in.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (67 chars)
what can I say........IT'S STARBUCKS!!! of course it's great !!!!!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (34 chars)
Vince was excellent he's the best


................................................................................
LOCATION #37:  address="7518 W Thunderbird Rd"  city="Peoria"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85381"  (9 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (76 chars)
Great service, they remember your name and what you drink.  Always smiling.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (60 chars)
Love this place they always get remember me and my order :)


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (420 chars)
I liked this Starbucks, parking was plenty, there was a good amount of inside seating with outlets for your techno gadgets, and staff was so nice. I'm a green member so I get free refills on coffee and tea, she actually let me change my drink though from tea to coffee on my refills and gave me samples to test which coffee was best :) On the down side the bathrooms were dirty and there seemed to be a wait for coffee.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (836 chars)
I am not a huge Starbucks coffee fan (too bitter for my taste) but I can not deny that I thoroughly enjoy a Venti White Chocolate Iced with 2 extra shots and whipped cream on a hot day. ...  ... When I'm feeling especially indulgent I'll spring for the Coffee Frapacino.  The heck with the calories! ...  ... The staff is always warm and friendly with big smiles and a ready welcome.  I get a kick out of listening to the booming barritone voice of the barista.  Don't know his name, but he is young and his voice and personality are that of a much larger guy.  Personality plus. ...  ... Usually fast, usually accurate.  When they make a boo boo on a drink they give it to ya for free.  Can't knock that kind of service. ...  ... I love the whole ambience in these coffee houses even if I'm not "in love" with their "straight" coffee.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (74 chars)
It's your average Starbucks. Decent amount of seating inside and outside.


REVIEW #6:  2 stars  (212 chars)
Way too main stream and over-priced. Coffee is not as good as what would be found at a local shop where the employees actually care. Employees were rude and slow, even when there were not many customers waiting.


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (689 chars)
Was debating between 1 or 2 stars because my breakfast sandwich and coffee were good, but chose just 1. The other bad reviews on this location are right on par with my complaint. My advice is to go to another location completely. The female cashier I encountered was rude.  ...  ... First, I walked in and looked at the pastries and she said hello 3 times like she was trying to rush me and there wasn't even a line behind me. When I asked if they had a particular sandwich available, she said abruptly said yeah and gave me a snotty look. Then, I gave her my credit card and she snatched it out of my hand. Is customer service just not taught or emphasized anymore these days? Guess not.


REVIEW #8:  1 stars  (657 chars)
Wow! Service has gotten worse and worse at this location. Last week I had one person in front of me and 15 minutes later was still waiting for our drinks. So, today I order and a new girl is working the reg. never in my life have I had a barrista mess up my drink and then calls me out in front of the whole line to rering me up for the 60cent difference and then continues tell me I ordered it that way. Not only did she get  size wrong but I guess she didnt hear the skinny part either. Anyways, I wonder if that little girl realizes that 60cent rering just cost them about $150/ month in business. Usually, Starbucks has such good customer service, ugh!


REVIEW #9:  1 stars  (145 chars)
This location is slow and can't multitask. I've compained three times to corporate about this location. Keep driving and find a better location.


................................................................................
LOCATION #38:  address="10625 N Tatum Blvd Ste 104"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85028"  (9 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (2048 chars)
As a former Starbucks manager, I hold Starbucks stores to extemely high standards. I frequent SBUX a lot. By a lot, I mean more than the average Starbucks freak. With that said my input is based on what I know the founder of Starbucks wanted out of each store, and how close the store is to achieving that level of quality service. If any of the points below has an "N/A" next to it, that simply means I was not able to form an opinion based on our interactions. ...  ... 1-Below Standards ... 2-Meets Standards ... 3-Outperforms Standards ...  ... Store Review ...  ... Now that I live in the North valley, this is my regular Starbucks store and I feel very fortunate to have such a great Starbucks in my neighborhood.  ...  ... Avg Visits: 4-5 times/week ... Partner Friendliness: 3 Partners smiles, cheery, strike up conversations ... Partner Appearance: 3 Always look professional (some are well decorated!) ... Partner Knowledge: 3 They knew my drink, know coffee well, and since they know I'm a former barista, they love talking back and forth about coffee in a way only Starbucks nerds would talk.  ...  ... Store Appearance (decor): 2 Standard Starbucks cookie cutter appearance that Starbucks so desperately does not want. ... Store Cleansliness: 3 This store is always very clean.  ... Store Comfort: 3 Comfortable setting and furniture for doing work for long periods of time.  ...  ... *Either 1 or 2 for this section. Its either right or wrong* ... Beverage Taste: 2 Iced Single Venty Hazelnut Breve Iced Coffee, Dirty Chai, or Triple Espresso ... Beverage Consistency: 2 Never had funny tasting drinks ... Beverage Temperature: 2 Always ice cold or steamy hot. ... Beverage Preparation (I watch): 2 No health hazards, shortcuts, etc. ... Beverage Mistakes: 2 Never had a wrong drink made but watch out for customers that accidentally steal your drink!  ...  ... Will I return?: YES ...  ... I personally don't care for Starbucks food and do not believe that is what Starbucks is about. Therefore I do not review their food offerings.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (829 chars)
ooh, yeah, another Starbucks review. So this would be one of three Starbucks locations within a mile radius of my house, but its my favorite! This place has a few tables and chair inside and a little bit more outside on their patio which I love! They have a decent selection of equipment and drinkware to purchase (like I even need more, but I'm a junkie so I'll buy the new design, sigh) and their baked goods are always equally as tempting. The baristas have always been super friendly and welcoming and offer different  drink suggestions when I go "um, I don't know what I want, but I always get a carmel macchiato, but I don't want that today, but I don't know what I want". Drinks are made pretty quickly, even with a line and the bathroom is always clean, so when your espresso diuretic kicks in....you're good. Woot Woot!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (536 chars)
I visited this Starbucks after having my nails done two doors down. I paid cash for my nails. Hang on there is a point to this ;)  I ordered a mocha frapp and gave the girl my debit card which was declined because I hadn't realized that it had expired and I hadn't put the new one in my wallet. Talk about embarrassing!! The girl said "no worries, it's on the house". I was dumb founded. Who does that these days? Thank you! I have yet to stop by and repay them but definitely will do so! Kudos to the girl! Wish I had gotten her name!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (424 chars)
Me and my wife come to this place all the time. She needs a lot of coffee, that's why. Anyways, we like to come here and get an black tea for me and an Americano for my wife and then head on over to Petsmart to look at puppies and kitties. Next we go over to Ross and try to score some sweet deals so we look like high fashion. That's basically how every weekend goes and it's all started by this very awesome Starbucks. A+


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (575 chars)
Ok I admit it, I have a Starbucks addiction. I'm not proud of it, and it continues to get worse.  I'm a fiend for iced coffee with soymilk, I order them all year long. No fancy latte for me, I don't need the extra calories. ...  ... This Starbucks is rad and it is simply because of the cool employees that work it. I was recently hipped top the Rewards Program, and I have already earned enough points for free customization. No more paying for soy.. It really adds up when you buy 30 a month...   Thanks for the friendly tip that will bring this junkie back over and over.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (247 chars)
Screw you and your new hibiscus tea. It's so delicious I now get Starbucks twice a day.  ...  ... If that isn't bad enough you always have yummy little tasters, knowing I have no willpower and you will take even more of my money on my next visit.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (246 chars)
This location is a little small but along with seating inside they have tables available outside.  Every time I've ordered it has always been very fast, which I appreciate. The staff is very friendly and my soy latte has been perfect every time!


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (2065 chars)
Okay, so maybe not really "free" coffee.  I was gifted the January cup, for lack of a better term, which allows one a free cup of coffee every day during the month of January. ...  ... I like coffee.  Starbucks is okay coffee.  The thing I don't like is how they wash my cup every time before they put coffee in it.  I don't like that.  I don't want them washing my cup, I can wash it myself and I don't need you washing it after I wash it.  Besides, maybe I like it dirty.  Maybe you should ask first, but don't ask if you are already washing it, that's just silly. ...  ... Next, they like to run hot water in it to "pre-heat" my cup.  whatever. sniff.  If the coffee gets cold that fast when you pour it in an insulated cup, maybe you should consider serving it at a higher temp.  I promise I won't sue you. ...  ... I always feel kinda weird going into a Starbucks, not that it's a bad place, but maybe I'm just old and cranky and I just want a cup of coffee, I don't need any flavorings or fluffing, just a plain, simple cup of coffee.  I sure don't want to try any of the pastries or foods you have in the display case - I have no clue how long they've been there and if it's more than a couple of hours, then I really don't want it.  I don't want to try your latest coffee rage, or maybe I do, but generally, I just want a cup of coffee.   ...  ... mostly, I can navigate the maze of half-calf, soy latte, americano's and escape with just a cuppa and my sanity.  Some days I get stuck in the crowd of people that think once they order, they can just stand around anywhere, because, really, why would somebody want to put cream in their cuppa before you have your conversation with your long-lost coworker whom you just saw yesterday, so you just stand right in front of the coffee stand where I have to politely wait for you to finish reminiscing and interrupt, so I can get to the cream.   ...  ... Oh, and I'm still amazed that a cup of iced tea, that you fill like 1/3 with tea, then water down with tap water still costs almost $3. ...  ... //rant over.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (275 chars)
This location is just ok probably because it is small and yet folks pack into this tiny box of a location. They have offer La Boulange pastries and seem to have a good assortment of salads and sandwiches available throughout the day. I like that this location is open early.


................................................................................
LOCATION #39:  address="120 E Taylor St"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85004"  (8 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (371 chars)
I like this Starbucks since parking (which rarely ever full) is located just 20 feet from the front door. I've been lucky enough to experience their server fail a couple times and walked out with free drinks. If it's not for the large framed, frumpy, unfriendliest dark male Barista who works afternoons, I might give this spot 5 stars. He makes going there unwelcoming.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (188 chars)
Wanna feel old? If so, this is theee Starbucks for you. It's manned and mostly filled with ASU students. That aside, it's your standard Starbucks with the same service you're accustom to.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (144 chars)
Very friendly employees and whenever they make a mistake they will just give you the other drink for free. Great if you need coffee in a hurry.


REVIEW #4:  2 stars  (298 chars)
Man, Starbucks, way to completely butcher my requested pumpkin spice latte.  The pumpkin powder was still floating around the edges of the cup and it tasted awful too.  I've had this drink at many Starbucks and this is the only place that messed it up.  I'm no longer surprised at the low reviews!


REVIEW #5:  1 stars  (1680 chars)
Every experience up to today has been mediocre at best.  Today was probably the most annoying.  I've never written a bad review about anywhere before, but today's experience warranted such a review. ... The employees usually seem snobby, or annoyed that they have to help me.  I thought their jobs were to help customers? Maybe I am wrong.   ... On three separate occasions in the past, I have ordered a grande blonde roast, and since it has to slow drip or something, it usually takes a little longer...no big deal....but then they forget about it and I have to go up and ask about its status.  They have been apologetic and I have been given the complimentary drink card on two of those instances, but I'd rather just have my drink and good customer service. ... Today, the girl at the register, Shayla, stood there talking to the other girls behind the counter about their weekend, laughing and hanging out, while I was standing there waiting.  There were three people behind me waiting as well.  Shayla finally decided it was time to help me, but still not even paying attention she took my order and gave me my total before I was done ordering.  Very frustrating, horrible customer service.  All of the other employees were just standing there as well, so its not as if no one saw me standing there.  They all just seemed distracted, or more interested in talking to each other than helping anyone.  I was very close to walking out, but she finally asked me what I wanted just in time. ... Starbucks, or whoever owns this location needs to hire some employees who have an idea of how to provide even semi-good customer service.  I will not be visiting this location anymore.


REVIEW #6:  1 stars  (639 chars)
Worst coffee drink I have ever had and it only cost my $4.65. ...  ... I absolutely hate giving one star reviews, but this place needs to figure out how to make their signature coffee drinks instead of handing out a cup of milk with ice. The service was friendly, but the entire time I was there I couldn't help but feel a little out of place due to all the freshman year ASU students sporting their Victoria's Secret PINK gear. The line was long, but they were staffed appropriately so the wait time was minimal. ...  ... I knew I should have gone to Cartel, I need to stick to my gut! ...  ... One star for friendly, inadequate service.


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (544 chars)
Actually run by Aramark, this Starbucks is part of the Taylor Place shops of the downtown campur of ASU. Staffed by students, service is typically friendly, if a bit slow.  ...  ... The real problem is they must be even more lackadaisical about cleaning the place. The coffee fixins station is always covered in crumbs and spills, the refrigerated foods cooler is scantily-stocked, and what's left is withered up and stale, and the bathroom is just downright nasty. ...  ... I shudder to think of the condition of the food and drink prep area.


REVIEW #8:  1 stars  (249 chars)
This is the worst Starbucks of all time. Drinks are always bad -- or completely wrong. Slow service. Disgusting bathrooms. Annoying baristas.  ...  ... I only go here if I'm desperate for caffeine, in a rush, and don't have time to walk to Royal...


................................................................................
LOCATION #40:  address="13637 N Tatum Blvd Ste 6"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85032"  (13 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (525 chars)
Whenever I venture to this Starbucks I always find a ton of people just hanging out reading or playing on their computer. I, however, am always the one parking unevenly in the parking spaces in front and running in and out with my beverage of choice. There are plenty of chairs/tables inside and outside for you choosing...oh and they have misters for those hot months! ... The employees here are friendly and fast. This location must be doing something right cause there is always multiple people here which is nice to see.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (247 chars)
This is my morning place. A quick drive from my house and conveniently located on Tatum. The lines here move quickly, coffee is great, staff are friendly. What's not to love? It's what you'd expect from a Starbucks, but what few actually deliver.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (1818 chars)
This is just my first stop to this Starbucks, but I'm impressed with the versatility yet non-complicated design and execution of the way this Starbucks operates. While I find the entrance a little too tight (when you open the door you have 2, maybe 3 meters before the ordering counter), I find the overall horizontal design of the cafe compensates for this entrance flaw. More importantly, the variety of chairs, couches, and sofa chairs gives options to the patrons here, along with a moderate amount of power jacks for those running electronic devices that need a constant power draw. ...  ... The baristas here are very friendly and will be chatty with you, providing valuable insight of the surrounding area, areas of interest depending on what you are looking for. ...  ... The clientele here is varied, if you are a people person like me. I have seen elderly couples here already at 7 PM, but I also have seen students of various edges step in and out for a quick coffee, from the nearby dance studio next door. ...  ... I've seen middle aged couples come in, along with people of my age group (23-29) pop in to just grab a cup of fancy Starbucks joe and sit down to study or read off a Kindle. ...  ... All in all, I think this place definitely gets the job done, and the Google powered wifi here gives this place a major plus that most Starbucks do not have. (Seriously, AT&T wifi is crap, it can barely support ten users at a time, Google hotspots are FAR more powerful). ...  ... I may or may not come here in the future. I think there are other Starbucks I want to venture to first. The baristas here mentioned that there are Starbucks in Tempe that open far later in the night and would offer the kind of people I would probably get along with. Who knows, I am still new to this strange and busy city! :)


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1677 chars)
As a former Starbucks manager, I hold Starbucks stores to extemely high standards. I frequent SBUX a lot. By a lot, I mean more than the average Starbucks freak. With that said my input is based on what I know the founder of Starbucks wanted out of each store, and how close the store is to achieving that level of quality service. If any of the points below has an "N/A" next to it, that simply means I was not able to form an opinion based on our interactions. ...  ... 1-Below Standards ... 2-Meets Standards ... 3-Outperforms Standards ...  ... Store Review ...  ... Avg Visits: Once/week ... Partner Friendliness: 3 Partners smiles, cheery, helped customers around me with issues unrelated to business, initiated conversation ... Partner Appearance: 2 A couple baristas had a lot of facial growth (unkempt) but still looked professional) ... Partner Knowledge: 2 Knew how to make my drink. ...  ... Store Appearance (decor): 3 very stylish, progressive appearance ... Store Cleansliness: 2 chairs scattered througout store, some tables very worn.  ... Store Comfort:1 The chairs are not comfortable at all.  ...  ... *Either 1 or 2 for this section. Its either right or wrong* ... Beverage Taste: 2 Iced Single Venty Hazelnut Breve Iced Coffee ... Beverage Consistency: 2 Never had funny tasting drinks ... Beverage Temperature: 2 Always ice cold or steamy hot. ... Beverage Preparation (I watch): 2 No health hazards, shortcuts, etc. ... Beverage Mistakes: 2 Never had a wrong drink made.  ...  ... Will I return?: YES ...  ... I personally don't care for Starbucks food and do not believe that is what Starbucks is about. Therefore I do not review their food offerings.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (316 chars)
I wish I could just copy Susan's review, but that wouldn't be right.  So here's mine: ...  ... Friendly employees ...  ... Wi-Fi ...  ... Comfy seating, inside and out ...  ... Get my order right every time ...  ... Reliable experience all-around ...  ... Always clean ...  ... No drive-thru, but close easy parking


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (242 chars)
This is my local Starbucks around the corner  near my apartment. This location is very fast....has a friendly staff....and of course the half off Fraps from 3-5 pm are the best deal in town right now.  Eat, Drink, and be Merry my Friends!!!!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (216 chars)
Nearest Starbucks by me, me and my boyfriend visit all the time. Its a great Starbucks to attend but depending on the Barista, some tend to pound those up-charges on your drink. I recommend it, its a great location!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (141 chars)
-Consistant  ...  ... -Friendly staff. ...  ... -Quickly helped customers in line. ...  ... -Clean store. ...  ... -Plenty of places to sit.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (81 chars)
I was here for a business meeting at about 8:30 at night. It was nice and quiet.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (1258 chars)
Forewarning: I am not a Starbucks frequenter. Nor a coffee snob. ...  ... I stopped at this Starbucks on Christmas Day. I realize that virtually no one wants to work on Christmas and it was nice that it was open! Ok, now that the positive stuff is out of the way... ...  ... I don't fully understand the Starbucks jargon. So I struggled through ordering a medium blended vanilla coffee drink with skim milk & no whipped cream. The woman taking orders was extremely snobby and stuck up through the whole thing. I thought she was going to tell me to "get out" when I ordered a medium instead of a "grande". Whatever lady. ...  ... I had 3 people in line in front of me and about 5 people behind me. It took, no lie, EIGHT minutes for my drink!!! For real?! The barista could not have been slower & offered no personality, conversation or pleasantness. The employees were just chatting amongst each other while, at this point 7 people are waiting for drinks & only the snail barista is poking along with the drinks while the other 2 watched. ...  ... Also, man a few people behind me wanted coffee ground. Apparently, "Sir, there are TWELVE ways we ground our coffee. I'm gonna need you to be more specific". Again, in stuck up mode. Oh get over yourself lady.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (144 chars)
Dirty, generic, and loud. They have a few funky chairs in the corner, but they're awkward and uncomfortable. Other than that, it's a Starbucks.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (1504 chars)
Ok, it's a freaking Starbucks, what do you expect - well, I expect overpriced but consistent coffee and the barrista to NOT BE AN EVIL BI-OTCH. The least they can do when charging $4 for a cup of coffee is attempt to be friendly. I used to go to this one several times a week but NO MORE. I'm done. How many times can you stand at the counter and be totally ignored while the employees chat behind the pastry case? Almost always, apparently. Went there 2 weekends ago with my kids and ordered a sweetened iced coffee, like always. After getting an incredulous look from the woman behind the counter - an older woman wearing a headscarf, in case her manager is reading this  - like I was crazy or something, like no one had EvER asked for an iced coffee before, she asked me how I wanted it sweetened. I said, nicely, just the way you always do it, with syrup or whatever. She LITERALLY rolled her eyes at me and said, so like you want sugar, or vanilla syrup, or what? I said no, no flavor, just the syrup sweetener you guys normally use. She says, so do you want a vanilla latte then or what? and just stands there looking at me like I'm NUTS. So I said forget it, I'll sweeten it myself. After slamming my credit card down in front of me, like I'd personally insulted her mother or something, she hands me a sloppy lukewarm cup of coffee half full of melted ice. Nice!!!! If it had only happened once, no big deal. everyone has a bad day now and then - but it's a pattern with this Starbucks. Too bad.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (21 chars)
Go to Dunkin Donuts!


................................................................................
LOCATION #41:  address="1610 N 75th Ave"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85035"  (14 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (595 chars)
I visited this location twice. The first time was awesome! We went through the drive-thru and the woman at the window was super nice and friendly. She went above and beyond! She was like a hawaiian or samoan descent. She was awesome!! Drinks came out perfect! No complaints. The next day however we came across a caucasian brunette female. She messed up our order, overcharged us and then we proceeded to inform her NICELY, then she copped major attitude. She 'literally' rolled her eyes. Who the hell does that???? lol. She made it such a hassle that we just said forget it, not even worth it.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (250 chars)
The only thing bad about this place is that you have to get there way too early in the morning to avoid the long lines inside and in the Drive-thru...other than that excellent service...my favorite is the cheese danish with a skinny vanilla latte :)


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (337 chars)
The morning drive thru is ridiculously slow. I know it's a morning rush time, and they make breakfast foods that aren't just grab and go, but I sat in the line for 13 minutes. It really is faster to find parking, go in and order, than it is to hit the drive thru.  ...  ... The staff is always very friendly and cheerful in the morning.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (286 chars)
LOVE this place, on my way to work. Hate the fact that the last 2 weeks I've been going, they have been trying to up sell me. No, I don't want an extra shot, umm no I don't want a bag of coffee, and no I don't want a $3 banana bread. But please, please remember I ordered NON-FAT milk.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (281 chars)
Wow this location is packed the drive through was really long so I decided to go inside.   ... The line inside was long but that was ok.  The staff is very friendly. I like the one based on the great customer service we need these guys and gals over at the Starbucks where I live.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (64 chars)
Starbucks is ok if you do not get coffee.  Go for the expresso!


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (889 chars)
This Is Actually the Starbucks Store I like the Least That I have been to in the Phx Area.... Every Time I have gone Whether Early In the Morning(not too early actually, around 6-7am) or At Night (About half an hour before they Close) They Take The Longest Time........... And ALSO Manage to Get My Drink Or My Companions' Drink Wrong..... Once we had to correct the barista taking our order Several Times... And She Still Got It Wrong... I know they might be busy or distracted but It's A Part Of Their Job To Get It Right....  The Manager Really needs To Think It Through A Lot More when hiring Young Teenagers... The Baristas that have taken my orders could try harder to improve their customer service skills As Well... Anyways... I Love Starbucks!!!  But have No choice but to stop here when I Am In the Area, but I recommend that If It Is possible For You, Pass on This Location....


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (472 chars)
i'm never gonna get my head around my fellow AMERICAN's obsession with STARBUCKS. i have friends that are late every month on their VISA and MASTERCARD accounts (which are probably mostly STARBUCKS charges anyway) because they have a forty-plus-dollar a week coffee habit. ...  ... still, when you're on the road, it's nice to have a place where you can drop by and jolt the senses into a heightened state of alertness and use their WI-FI to get caught up on your e-mail.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (100 chars)
Worst SB ever. Wait time is too long. Avoid this one. Starbucks on 91st and Thomas, faster servixe.


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (579 chars)
Worst Starbucks I've ever been too. I went there in the evening and they had plenty of staff, but they seemed too busy talking to each other and complaining about the only person working, to pay attention to customers. They wanted to cut her early so someone could take an extra 15 minute lunch. That doesn't make sense. I'm sure that poor girl could hear them talking about her because I could hear them in the lobby. The woman next to me said, "I can't believe them." Then walked out. If I wasn't already meeting someone there, I would have too. Never again to that Starbucks!


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (331 chars)
I always go here because it's close to my work. But screw them. Always so slow. The last time I went inside there were 5 people standing around. And I was late for work because the girls were too busy talking about their personal business. Man... act professional and do your job then maybe I'll come back. PS I love Starbucks! :)


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (201 chars)
You would think that being the first person in line at 5:45am would help you get great service. Well at this location that is not the case. It amazes me how some locations don't value their customers.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (177 chars)
Waited over 25 min in the drive thru because I had no choice (blocked in) after the cashier took an order from a guy on foot... Boo this place. Disgrace to the Starbucks chain.


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (129 chars)
Everytime I come here they mess up my drink... The only I like about this location is the baked goods. Never will I return again


................................................................................
LOCATION #42:  address="17045 N 7th St"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85022"  (16 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (80 chars)
Great Service, awesome employees who always seem to remember you, clean & cozy.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (628 chars)
This is MY starbucks....I go almost every single day. These are the reasons.  ...  ... 1) On my way to work ... 2) Right next to my bank ... 3) They are SO friendly ... 4) They understand when I'm off coffee and order "black water" that I mean a coffee of the day, black.  ... 5) The sweet girl in the drivethrough that is there almost every day I go always acts like it is her fault when I spill an entire venti hot coffee in my car. Even though I have an insurance policy on my car upholstery for a reason.....and it's not bad lids...it's that I should live in a bubble so as not to injure others! ...  ... Love My Starbucks!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (150 chars)
Great coffee, inside location isn't the best for hanging out and spending time catching up though.  The outside is fairly nice and offers more space.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (53 chars)
I think the problem here is management. Enough said.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (734 chars)
This location is right next to my house,  ... I ALWAYS stop here in the mornings to get my coffee, yet refuse to go through the god-awful drive through. The average time from start to finish is like 12 minutes. I  dont order anything fancy, so why should I wait for other people to get their fancy drink order? I just want my black venti coffee and be on my way. So walking in is the only way to go. Ordering a breakfast sandwich will add 10 minutes to your wait time, dont do it.  ... Its a fun place to study, very interesting conversations going on around you. They also have a lot of outlets so you can charge your laptop, phone, etc.  ... The guy who works the counter in the mornings is really sweet.  ... Egh, its a starbucks.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (642 chars)
It's hard to find a place where people are happy amd cheerful at 430am on a friday morning lol. Well you can tell that the Starbucks staff at this location are trying their best to help everyone get their morning started off on the right foot. Im never happy waking up early, let alone having to work befor 6am so my hats off to them. This Starbucks is located very close to my house and the fact they have free-wifi gives me a nice place to enjoy a morning coffee while checking morning emails or just browsing the web. The coffee drinks are a little pricey but they generally are of high quality so its worth the little bit of extra money.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (321 chars)
My drink always taste great, however that is what you are paying for consistency and price!  ...  ... Convenient to have a drive through, but never is it quick. If they could work on the time it took to be and in and out with your drink they'd probably receive better reviews. ...  ... Ill re review if anything changes!


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (230 chars)
The service is mediocre here. The drive thru is a very convenient but sometimes slow. They tend to be slower than most other stores and this store can get crowded really quick. I use this store because of the convenient location.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (113 chars)
based on my one experience here it was positive. I used the drive through, the lady at the window was very nice.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (833 chars)
Not a fan of this location.  Try the one on 3rd ave & south side of bell. ...  ... Wow, someone actually managed to ruin a Starbucks location!!  Slow drive through, condescending service, and overall lack of interest on the part of the employees.  ...  ... We stopped in on my hunny's birthday on our way to vegas. This is the location closest to us so we wanted to just get in and out.  The voice on the drive through was kinda short with us, but I get it- you're busy.  We finally get to the window after over 10 minutes waiting.  The guy does not give us our gift card back.  I go inside and they can't find it. My hunny goes inside, and at least gets them to look for it and reprint the receipt.  Starbucks corporate reissued the card for us a few days later so in ended up fine.   ...  ... Still, this location has no urgency!!


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (749 chars)
This used to be one of my favorite spots but lately it's been dirty almost every time I visit. Having been a barista, I know you can get slammed and get behind on the housekeeping but I have witnessed several times that employees seem oblivious to the mess on the floor, under tables, on chairs and around the condiment bar.  ...  ... The staff is always friendly and I still like to go but it's weird to sit and enjoy my java while looking at all the debris on the floor. I also inquired of one barista regarding what kind of milk they used, specifically asking about rgbh or rbst. She said they just buy the run-of-the-mill milk like the kind at Safeway etc. I will stick with the java & espresso - don't want no hormones or steroids in my latte!


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (470 chars)
Let me start by saying I love Starbucks. Seating inside is a bit haphazard and very few comfortable chairs.  ...  ... Today, their espresso machines were out of order and a hand written sign was on the door to let you know as you entered. Now anchor machine falling out of service may not be preventable, but both machines, including the one for the drive thru? ...  ... Were out of large straws as well which suck for those of us who order venti or Trenta size drinks.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (384 chars)
This has to be the SLOWEST Starbucks I have ever been to. I don't understand it. It doesn't matter the time of day/week -- its slow. If you don't have a good 20 minutes to wait, go elsewhere. And people if you have over 2-3 drinks to order DON'T use the drive thru! That's just common sense, right?! We got stuck behind someone that ordered 7 drinks! Not kidding... 7! Who does that?


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (1041 chars)
Ok. First things first, this is the location near my friends apartment and I go to Starbucks almost everyday. I walk in to the lobby the first day and I ordered a breakfast sandwich(and somehow they gave me a lemon loaf cake which they were annoyed to exchange even though I had my receipt in hand), and I also ordered a iced white mocha. The girl on the register was obviously new and confused and it took her a really long time to get everything in the system and the manager on duty was obviously annoyed with her asking for help. The second time I went to this location I used the drive thru thinking it would be better, my friend got a black coffee and I got an iced coffee figuring this order was a lot harder to mess up....WRONG. My iced coffee didn't have WM sweetener like I asked it had classic syrup and cream instead. And to make matters worse... I am an employee of Starbucks. I gave the girl my employee numbers and she said "wow you are a dinosaur" UMM THANKS?! It has the potential to be a good location but far from it now.


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (711 chars)
This is honestly the worst Starbucks experience that I've ever encountered.  That being said, I go here almost everyday because it's right by where I live.  Although, I'm starting to go up to the Happy Valley location more now.  For some reason, this Starbucks drive thru is frighteningly slow.  Almost upsetting slow.  I have tried to figure it out but I can't.  A couple times last week whoever takes the orders was trying to be funny and wouldn't just take my order and it was terribly unprofessional and annoying.  Every time I get my coffee drink I swear I won't be back...but I do.  They really need to up their customer service and speed it up a bit.  It's a prime location if they can pull it together.


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (484 chars)
If I could give them 0 stars I would. There's one nice younger boy who works occasionally. Other than him the staff is full of the rudest set of sorority rejects Starbucks could get. It's obvious they none of them want to be there and their sense of urgency is non existent. Don't go here if your in a rush to work! I avoid this Starbucks and just go to the coffee bean a few minutes out of the way. The few minutes out of the way is still better than waiting 15 minutes for a drink.


................................................................................
LOCATION #43:  address="1820 W Northern Ave"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85021"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (918 chars)
Since quitting smoking my coffee intake dropped off for several years, due to the powerful association between the two.  ...  ... It's only recently that I've felt like I could enjoy a cuppa Joe without wanting to suck on a lung rocket. Enter Starbucks, the only conveniently located coffee shop on my way to work.  ...  ... Starbucks are pretty much all the same when it comes to delivering decent, consistent coffee. This location is no exception.  ...  ... What really impressed me was the excellent customer service. On my very first visit I ordered my drink then immediately realized that I had left my wallet at home. The cashier didn't even blink, he just told me not to worry about it, they'd cover it. For a regular customer this would be great service, but for a first time visitor? Good stuff.  ...  ... While not an every day thing, I will definitely be stopping in once or twice a week. Thanks Starbucks!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (677 chars)
Love this Starbucks because of the booths. ... I do homework here, and reallllly dislike it when all I have to choose from are two cushioned chairs (that are always being taken up by the old guys with their newspapers-- no offense, I know they go their first and fair is fair) and a bunch of hardwood chairs... what can I say, I like a little cushion on my butt.  Can you blame me? ...  ... no. no is the answer to blaming me. ...  ...  ... anyway, their drinks are all right, the baristas are friendly (some a strange, but overall a friendly bunch) ...  ... I used to work at Starbucks eons ago so I'm really picky and I like this one. ... so patron it. ...  ...  ... holler.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (1335 chars)
Ok, so I'm sitting here now at this starbucks doing a job search.  I've been here several times before, on and off over the past few months.  This starbucks isn't so bad, but here's what I've noticed since coming here. ...  ... The staff is always friendly and helpful.  I like that about this place, and they really know their stuff.  The place is a long narrow suite, so seating is kind of tight, but ample.  Not a lot of room to spread out, but decent enough that you can at least move around a bit. ...  ... One of the downsides is that if your here to use the wifi, its free! (hooray!) the downside?  Good luck getting a plug! There's only two plugs available for devices at either end of the store.  If your stuck in the middle, I hope your battery has a long life! Plus, a few times that I have been here, There have been plug hogs who use all the outlets! Yes, theres only two, but who's the butthead who needs to charge their phone AND computer at a starbucks?  If your going to be here a while, I hope your battery life is good! ...  ... They do have outside seating with umbrellas, but their not always open.  Parking is ample, and its not half bad.  Great hours, etc.  Swing by if you have a chance, and you can get your coffee and wifi on like me!  Definitely not the greatest Starbucks in town, but not the worst either.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (826 chars)
Ordered a grande latte and asked with no flavor (can't have sugar or anything), almond milk (no flavor at this location), so got it with soy milk instead.  After I tasted it, I can taste the syrup flavor in the coffee, I asked for no flavor because I know they would put something like syrup in it and they screwed something this easy.  Starbucks need to retrain their baristas to make sure they can listen better.  I went around lunch time but the store wasn't all that busy at all.  They need to pay more attention on what the customers need and not just about how much money they can get from it.  I never had any problems asking what I want at other locations, not sure why this is a problem.  I'll probably give them another try if the management would reply this message back to me to see how we can resolve this issue.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (396 chars)
Normally not too busy but the staff is less than friendly and not very quick to get you in and out.  I wanted to blonde roast the other day and the cashier said "um, we are out and I'd have to make another batch of it."  Had he of asked me if I wanted to wait I would have said yes but he didnt even offer!  Normally I have pretty good luck with service at Starbucks but this one is hit or miss!


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (77 chars)
OK location, small with limited seating. Staff are not friendly at all. Meh.


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (339 chars)
This Starbucks is okay.  I only come here because its the only one on my way to work.  Their staff can be rude and unfriendly, they make you feel like you're not as important as the other customers are their friends are they know.  I think I'm going to have to find another Starbucks even if that means I have to go out of my way....  ::(


................................................................................
LOCATION #44:  address="18631 N 19th Ave"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85027"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (437 chars)
Thank god for Starbucks at 5:30am.  =) ...  ... I was on my way into work and was in dire need of a wake me up and some breakfast.  I stopped in hoping on a Saturday Starbucks was open and sure enough I was saved.   ...  ... I got a Venti Caramel Macchiato and a piece of coffee cake.  Both items were exactly what I needed to get me going this morning and keep me awake through my workday.   ...  ... Starbucks you saved me once again.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (225 chars)
This Starbucks is located inside the Safeway on 19th Ave. They made my order correctly and it was the late afternoon pick me up I needed. No complaints as you know exactly what you're going to get when you go to a Starbucks.


REVIEW #3:  2 stars  (633 chars)
Starbucks was having a happy hour promotion for about 10 days recently, where between 3-5PM you could get half price frappucinos.  I (or my wife) went four times over the promotion.  75% of the time our order was screwed up in some way, shape or form (whip when no whip was requested, caramel flavor when should have been coffee, venti when it should have been grande, etc.).  The drinks still tasted good, but dag, that is a pretty poor success rate.  Service was (and usually) is pretty friendly at least.   ...  ... Now the question...if I want a caramel/coffee ice blended drink...who am I going to choose, McD's or Starbucks...


................................................................................
LOCATION #45:  address="21050 N Tatum Blvd #100"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85050"  (24 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (227 chars)
I absolutely love this Starbucks location! I come here almost every morning. The drive through can be a little long at times but inside is never a long wait. The workers are so nice and outgoing! Love this place! Easy 5 stars!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (197 chars)
this is a great starbucks. ... I drive through at least 3 times a week always get great service. ... also a great place to sit and do homework, great people, great coffee :) ... near desert ridge!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (979 chars)
Most Starbuck are pretty much the same. All have the same menu for the most part. The difference between them rely on the location on the way the seating is set up. ...  ... Pros: Big parking lot, good use of space available without feeling crammed, 3 lounge chairs with counter for drinks. Unlimited use of wifi, right off the 101, outside seating ...  ... Cons: Expensive lunch ( if you plan on grabbing food, do it before), only two decent size table for workspace, Hard to see the location off Tatum ( this is probably more cuz of city/ complex rules with marking the building with a sign). The parking is hard to find. I got lucky finding the only spot right up front.  ...  ... Overall: All Starbucks are pretty much the same, this location is conveniently off the freeway, however lack of multi use tables for laptop work is a slight bummer. So I give it a four stars. They did however have great customer service. They did a pour-over for my favorite blend Blonde Roast.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (463 chars)
love coffee, recently started drinking it so i go here a lot. close by my house whcih is a big plus since its the only drive through starbucks close by me. i only gave it 4 stars because of the huge lines it gets. and when there is a long line the employees always take forever to make drinks. i went here at around 3 today and there was about 4 or 5 cars in front of me and the employees were slow and rushed me right when i got my drink from the drive through.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (312 chars)
Drive-thru is rather quick at 5:30am in the morning and the barista was quite cheery for such an early hour -- completely different experience that the inside for a past few visits.  Just goes to show that a good experienced barista can make all the difference in the world! ...  ... Will Drive-thru again soon!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (135 chars)
It's Starbucks.   ... At this particular location though, if the drive through is busy, just go inside... It'll be quicker, I promise.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (102 chars)
Aces!  No complaints good or bad.  Usually pretty busy inside like most Starbucks, as far as seating.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (88 chars)
They always make a great white chocolate mocha but the drive thru can be a little slow.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (66 chars)
The staff are great and fast... and the drinks are good as usual!


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (1093 chars)
This was our first time to this particular location and as the other reviews state - it was slammed both inside and in the drive-thru.  Took about ten minutes to get through the line, with about six people in front of me and about eight workers behind the counter.  ...  ... They also don't seem to have any storage in their back room, since they had well over 20 merchandise boxes sitting around the the store and unopened.  They also had a large pastry metal cart with single wrapped pastries sitting on them.   ...  ... The poor staff looked highly stressed and the cashier wasn't overly friendly, but wasn't rude or mean either.  ...  ... My drink order was correct and tasted just like it should though, and let's be honest - at the end of the day, isn't that all that you really want from your coffee? ...  ... Overall: B ... It's a busy location with staff under pressure to get through lines and lots of seasonal merchandise to put on display. It wasn't an exceptional experience, but it wasn't bad either!  Still the good coffee I was expecting to get - so all is right in the world.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (899 chars)
It's a Starbucks: they burn the coffee beans and use really artificial flavors but I'm addicted and so are you so we all grumble and pretend to be coffee aficionados while take the mediocre drinks on our daily commutes. ...  ... They never mess up my drink here but the wait is horrendous. Like, expect to wait 10 minutes for your drink when you're the only one in the drive-thru. If there are people in front of you you'd better have a lot of extra time or hope  you don't care if you're late.  ...  ... Another annoyance is the design of the drive-thru window with the curb. It's set like 3 feet back so when you pull up to pay/get your coffee you have to reeaaalllly reach out your window and even then you barely grasp the barista's hand to exchange money and get your beverage(s).  ...  ... I go here everyday because it's the only drive-thru right by my house. But I complain every time I do.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (580 chars)
Very busy location, even the drive thru always has a line!   ...  ... This Starbucks is probably not the best location to go to if you are in a big hurry.  Its hard to find a close parking spot.  Its also more difficult to get in and out of this particular stripmall because Tatum is usually packed.  Go to the light if you need to turn left! ...  ... The baristas have always been pleasant to deal with here.  One even took the time to look up the ingredients a a smoothie for me, so very accommodating.  I will say their bathrooms at this one seem to always appear dirty, yuck!


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (544 chars)
By far the slowest Starbucks I have been to. I have been here many times and i am always amazed at how long it takes to get in and out.  I live right up the street so hard to avoid but I definitely make a point to go to other locations if I am driving by one.  Just now, there was one person in front of me ordering a breakfast sandwich. From the time I walked in the door, it took 11 minutes to get an iced coffee in my hand.   ...  ... I like Starbucks because I know what I am getting, but really dont enjoy going to this one in particular.


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (334 chars)
Just a suggestion, but smile people!  ...  ... Really, it makes the customer service experience better and not make people feel like spawn coming in for coffee. ...  ... Not sure if it was an off day here with the staff but talk about a unhappy group of people!  ...  ... My coffee otherwise rocked! Perfectly hot just how I like it!


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (291 chars)
Decent coffee consistently, but suuuuper busy a lot of the time which means long waits. Actually, with just a few cars, the drive through is sometimes still very slow. I've also gotten the wrong drink on a driving order. A cappuccino is not a macchiato. Cinnamon dolce isn't white mocha. :/


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (1878 chars)
Meh, I've experienced much better... ...  ... We used to frequent this Star Bucks a lot until Press Coffee opened near by.  We wanted to top off a great evening with a nice cup of Joe and Press Coffee was closed at 7pm and it was 7:30pm, oh no.... so we stopped by Star Bucks. ...  ... The service started off as a standard Star Bucks, quick to greet, though missing the smile this time, and ready to make what ever caffeinated concoction your craving for. ...  ... Coffee #1 ~ decaf and sugar free vanilla syrup. Barista stated, "we are out to decaf, would regular coffee be ok?" What??  No, we would like a decaf please.  Barista, "that will take 10 mins, so you will need to wait".  We asked, why are you out of decaf? Barista, "we stop making decaf earlier in the day". We did not want to wait so we opted for a leaded brew. ...  ... Coffee #2 ~ regular coffee with sugar free caramel.  I watched the Barista and noticed she used the white pump for the sugar free vanilla and the brown pump for the sugar free caramel. Star Bucks used one collar for sugar free and the other for sugared syrups.  As she poured our coffee I asked her to please make sure she gave us sugar free and not sugar. I noticed you used both colored pumps.  Barista, snippy ~ "we don't separate our flavorings like the other Star Bucks". She then dumped our coffee's out and using the same cups proceeded to use the same pumps again...   ...  ... So we got both coffee's and proceeded to the cream bar and there was no cream...  So I asked a different barista for some cream.  She stated, "here ya go" and placed a gallon carton of cream on the bar and walked off. ...  ... Wowsers!  The coffee tasted burned as though it had been sitting there a while and we were for sure if we were drinking sugar free.  No sugar comma later so we are ok and don't plan to go back to this Star Bucks for a while...


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (278 chars)
ugh if they could get the drink right more than once it would be okay ...  ... it's like they don't even care - next ... oh is your drink wrong sorry - next ... what you want me to make it right - next ... please wait again while I remake it after all these other drinks - next


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (421 chars)
I ordered a venti iced Americano! Weak tasting no flavor. When I spoke with the server she told me it was prepared right. I told her it tasted weak did they use fresh beans? She continued to give me an excuse and that it was prepared correctly. It tastes barely like an iced coffee. Finally as a last resort she weakly offered to make me another. I could tell it would just be the same. No thanks and I will not be back!


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (251 chars)
Love Starubucks coffee but hate this location.  Always extremely busy and the people working at this particular one are always so rude and short with customers.  Will go out of my way to go to another Starbucks that offers a more pleasant experience.


REVIEW #20:  1 stars  (193 chars)
Bad service. Always out of stuff on a busy morning.... How can you run out of bold blend at 7:30 am. This is my third tint it happens. No sincere apology or offer a free drink for next time...


REVIEW #21:  1 stars  (183 chars)
This place is terrible. They are always unprepared, slow and just unpleasant to do business with.  I am an avid starbucks customer and this is the worst location I have ever visited.


REVIEW #22:  1 stars  (163 chars)
Still awful.  Getting worse somehow.  Still storing boxed inventory on the restaurant floor.  Still regularly messing up orders.  Still treating customers rudely.


REVIEW #23:  1 stars  (157 chars)
I may have had the worst cup of coffee at this Starbucks. This visit made me make a commitment not to schedule any business meetings at any Starbucks again.


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (145 chars)
I give this location no stars cuz they are horrible at there job took them 15 min to make a latte and my girlfriends iced coffee taste horrible!


................................................................................
LOCATION #46:  address="2340 E Baseline Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85042"  (16 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1324 chars)
Okay I'm not just saying this... And keep in mind I have never been inside this location... ...  ... But, I've been a huge coffee-snob my entire life almost so my taste buds are like super high maintenance when it comes to a good pull of espresso.  This Starbucks in particular is hands down, the best I have been to in the valley.  I work right down the road and I honestly hate going to any other Starbucks on my side of town (Not Phoenix).  The drive-thru is super fast and every single person on the morning crew is just phenomenal.  They are SO friendly and not once have they gotten my order wrong.  I'm not even going to lie, my drink is not a "normal" request.  And they get it dead on every single time.  I have not been to one other Starbucks across the valley that has gotten my order correct.   ...  ... I'm sure you guys can relate with me, but there is nothing worse than your first morning coffee being wrong (right? extra grumpy-here I come!).  BUT!  I do not have to worry about that here. It's amazing. ...  ...  I wish they knew how much I appreciate knowing that I can just go there, order my high maintenance coffee drink and know that its going to be just what I ordered.  I love it. THANK YOU! ...  ... - Natalie D.  ... - Drinker of the Venti Iced Americano - Blended, with Sugar Free Vanilla Syrup.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (269 chars)
Was a really bad day. My wife was mad cuz she couldn't find her cafe Verona blend of coffee in any other Starbucks. Trust me I called at least 12 other locations. This location was the only one that offered to brew my wife her coffee. Thank you so much. Made my night.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (72 chars)
Awesome morning crew!!! Keep up the happy vibe! ...  ... Great service!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1372 chars)
Update:New Management = New way of life.  this Starbucks has made great improvements.  I don't go as much as I used to when I thought I had less time.  but I do go often enough to read or just pick up a coffee and I've seen a great improvement in this store.  That's great. ...  ... 2011 Review ... I'm giving them a 3 because I rarely get exactly what I want from the window. But let me start with the good first.  Friendliest bunch of folks I've ever seen.  All people on the staff seem to love their jobs!  They also seem to work very efficiently.    ...  ... Unfortunately, the attire is a little small.  Ites not conducive to a small study group, even though it practically sits on a small college campus..  No couches or comfy chairs to sit and socialize. ...  ... My main reason for the 3 rating is the fact that I rarely get what I "want" from that drive up window!  I used to order a tall coffee and a HOT veggie sandwich.  The sandwich is almost always cold in the center, even if I ask them to heat it longer so the center is warm.  Sometimes I ask for my coffee with two pumps of cream and I have to go in to get more cream.  I have stopped ordering the sandwiches as much, saves me money, that's for sure.   ...  ... I started making my own coffee at home, and soon, I'll probably just stop by there as a treat once a week for the coffee, sans the sandwhich.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (595 chars)
Seing as how I work right down the road from this location, I have become a frequent mid day visitor of this Starbucks.  The drive through is always moving and they are consistent with every return trip.  I had to wait for a few minutes, no more than 10, and when I got to the front of the line, they comped my entire order of four drinks, nice touch.  I always see them moving people in and out with efficiency, so they get a four star review from me. At this point, you either have gotten used to the burnt taste of Starbucks or not, but complaining about, this late in the game, is annoying.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (354 chars)
This is a really good Starbucks location. Unlike a lot of the newer locations that have retro plastic chairs that look much more stylish than functional, it has lots of comfy upholstered chairs, plenty of plugs for web surfers, and a decently-sized outdoor seating area. The staff is really friendly and efficient as well. There is also a drive-through.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (188 chars)
Great Starbucks and always busy with customers on this corner.  Sometimes the wait is a little longer than expected. Other than this, this one has a decent outdoor patio and a drive-thru.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (53 chars)
Fast, friendly crew. ESPECIALLY on a Monday morning!


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (341 chars)
I want to like this Starbucks I really do, but they make it so difficult. I'm writing this review from the drive-thru which is where I have been for the past 13 minutes. The service here is super slow and there's a 50% chance they'll give me the wrong drink. I have to check it each time before pulling off. They need some serious training.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (227 chars)
Typical Starbucks. Usually very busy (nowhere to sit on weekends), and is not a big store at all. Since it is smaller, the selection of coffee mugs and other paraphernalia that they sell is not very big. Staff is nice, though!


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (212 chars)
I periodically go through the drive-thru of this location on my way to work, and though there are always  many cars, they are pretty speedy and very friendly. At this particular location I am happy to leave tip.


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (1409 chars)
Just dropped in ~3:30PM today for a coffee drink and newspaper.  The counter was dirty and sticky--obviously not clean.  I started to put my paper down so it could ring up and ... changed my mind. The girl ringing me up did it anyway, and it now has a sticky blotch on the back.  I asked her not to--she just looked at me (huh?).  So I mentioned that this counter--the one where customers put their drinks and pay--needed cleaned.  she just looked at me --and said "okay".  But she did not clean it, she went around to the salad food customer facing display case and checked that out.  When I picked up my drink on the other end, that counter was equally --not clean--sticky with rings and dried (kind of) spills.  3 people were working and it was not busy.  There is no excuse to have this place be dirty.  I didn't check the tables since I was taking it to go, but I bet they were dirty too.  These people need some house cleaning lessons--this is no way to leave counters and it takes just a minute.  It did not get done when I was there, and that girl or anyone else did not care.  She was maybe 5'6 with long curly dark hair tied back, maybe in early 20s, and maybe 20 # extra weight, and she had on camel-beige-colored pants.  I hope the food inspectors come in when it looks like this.  Some people who work here must have mothers at home cleaning up after them.  Obviously the manager is not on duty.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (1123 chars)
Not really a fan of this Sbux. Just sayin. I feel coffee should not be a hard thing nor should it take me so long to get . However, it's right down the way from my boyfriends and thus, convenient. Let's face it, when you need java, it's needed now. NOT in 15 minutes from ordering. Two things recently, on my way to my campus, very early in the morning, I ordered a quad nonfat dry Cappuccino. Doesn't seem that difficult, right. I start to walk out and realize it's a sugary, mocha sort of thing. Spat!! Ewww. No. I don't like chocolate that much and I hate sugar more. This drink I waited on for 10 minutes; my bf had his Americano and was having to leave me or he was gonna be late for a meeting ! She almost sneered at me when I told her the coffee was not what I ordered. Oh well. 5 more minutes and correct Capp. In hand ; wow maybe the baristas need more java?? Secondly, I splurged on a quad nonfat caramel latte and it's coming out to me as a frap? Hmmmm. What? Did I say 'cold'? Why no I did not.. More attitude. So there is my justification for 2 stars ... You see in this side of town... There's just no Peets!


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (1053 chars)
I rarely go to this super close to home Starbucks because of how slow their service is- not to mention their mediocre customer service. I'm running late this morning as it is and decide to stop for a passion tea (since I'm late already anyway) I get there & opt out of going through drive thru because the line is ridiculously long, so instead I get out and walk inside. When I get in, there are TWO customers ahead of me the lady ordering is ordering at least 10 drinks and the cashier looked extremely irritated. So me and the guy in front of me are waiting a total 10 minutes before they decide to get another cashier to help us along with the other 6 people that walked in after us. Anyways paid for my drink and waited for my drink- the barista who gave me my drink didn't look at all happy to be working. I asked her for water with ice along with my tea, she let out a huge sigh and asked another barista to give me my water... I was reminded EXACTLY why I do not ever go to this Starbucks - this is by far my least favorite Starbucks thus far...


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (727 chars)
This is the worst Starbucks I've been to. I've lived across the street for 10 years, so naturally we adopted this as our go to coffee shop. ...  ... I've tried giving them the benefit of the doubt bit after today's drink, I'm done. The employees are nice, but incredibly slow. The drinks are always watered down, and never flavored enough.  ...  ... I just ordered a Carmel Frap. It came thin and melted, with hardly any Carmel flavoring. It's white in coloring. This is the last blunder I'm allowing. It's ridiculous that they think Starbucks (the king of coffee shops) would be okay with these products being served. If I could return my drink, and give them no stars, I would.  ...  ... I'll be going elsewhere from now on.


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (406 chars)
The slowest drive thru ever. In the time I've been in line (only 3 cars in front of me, which is why I thought it might be worth it this time) I've downloaded the yelp app, created a profile, and posted this review. This is the third time I've tried this drive thru and it will be the last. I've never been in line for less than 15 minutes. Before I even ordered the two cars behind me backed up to leave.


................................................................................
LOCATION #47:  address="2425 E Camelback Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85016"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (760 chars)
While I totally agree with a lot of Yelp-ers who feel reviewing Starbucks is like reviewing water (it's plentiful, we need it to live, etc.), this location really deserves some recognition due to its wonderful staff. I work in the Esplanade and generally, this place is a culinary wasteland. But, at this Starbucks, the staff is truly special. Yes, they serve the same beverages as every other Starbucks, but the people who work here know my name, say hello and ask me how my day is and even start my drink before I have to ask. It is nice to be able to run down, grab a latte and share a friendly moment. I have frequented other Starbucks and other coffee places for years without getting this sort of assistance. So, Five Stars for the super-friendly staff.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (556 chars)
Walked here using the camelback underpass Saturday morning and we just beat the crowd. Five other people followed us in. There is lots of work space here and a large table that could easily hold a business meeting. The coffee was the usual Starbucks high standard and exquisite flavor. The barista was very efficient and the whole experience was marvelous. (And the bathrooms were spotless.) Lots of outdoor seating, which would be nice at a different time of year. Only four big comfortable chairs, so guessing this Starbucks caters to the working crowd.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (450 chars)
Out of over 30 times I have been to this location ordering the same drink, they have only messed up once - and it doesn't help that I am one of those people that order weird stuff to my drink.  ...  ... Now that everyone there knows me, we're good. If you are on of "those" people like myself, you may need to walk them through it the first time. ...  ... Super clean store and employees that actually DO care. I'll take my business to that any day.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (207 chars)
Great friendly Starbucks. If you don't work in the building I am not sure why you would come but it is worth a stop. A great pick me up. The staff is friendly and professional. The drinks are well made too.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (85 chars)
Always quick and friendly not to mention great outdoor seating if you have the time!


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (20 chars)
I love the changes.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (235 chars)
Surprisingly a great Starbucks considering its in a Safeway...it has lots of sitting room and is located in the Signature Safeway. It is conveniently located in the Biltmore area. Right behind this place is a great breakfast joint to.


................................................................................
LOCATION #48:  address="2441 W Thomas Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85015"  (6 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (294 chars)
I am used to NYC StarBucks, however a Starbucks is still a Starbucks.  They didn't know a lot of lingo and how to make specialty drinks which are trivial in the NYC area.  This one had a drive-thru window which was also something I am not used to.  All and all very good coffee and I am a fan.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (213 chars)
Convenient when on the go! This location is right off the I-17 and Thomas and easy to get in but not easy to get out which is the reason why I didn't rate it at 5 stars. ...  ... Outdoor only, nice patio seating.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (36 chars)
Quick service in a strange location


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (662 chars)
This Starbucks is weird. Drive through and walk-up only. Only outdoor seating. Weird can be good! But, it wasn't great.  ...  ... It's essentially in the parking lot of a hotel, and I visited while I was staying in that hotel. They had the same ratio as my local Starbucks... my drink was right 3 out 4 times. However, the one time it WAS wrong - it wasn't just a LITTLE wrong - it was completely the wrong drink. ...  ... Definitely not somewhere you'd go to do work in less-than-perfect weather, and it might as well be located ON the highway... i.e. there is a ton of road noise.   ...  ... However... friendly staff.  ...  ... Standard Starbucks experience.


REVIEW #5:  2 stars  (1062 chars)
This is an outdoor seating only Starbucks. There is a walk-up window for drinks, but no visable snacks. There is also a drive thru window for cars. There are 4 small round tables with 2-3 chairs a peice, and 1 larger rectangular table for disabled access with 2-3 chairs also. Prices are normal for a starbucks. Pros: Outdoors in late fall and early spring will be nice here, and it definately can't get crowded here. Cons: Only 2 umbrellas outside keep you shady from the sun or dry from the rain, there doesn't appear to be snacks here. No indoor seating, Midsummer here is going to be bad, also Semi-trucks are constantly shifting on the freeway here so it is very noisy, and there are no power outlets. There are several other open wifi spots here like the days inn and dennys, so you might be better suited to moving to one of those locations, but if you must sit here, then the att&t free wifi hotspot speed is 1.4 Mbit download speed, and 1.2 Mbit upload speed. (divide Mbit by 8 to get actual MB speeds). Overall I give this spot a 2 thumbs up out of 5.


REVIEW #6:  1 stars  (349 chars)
I'm a big Starbucks drinker so I was super excited when I found out how close this one was to us! However, to my disappointment this has been the only Starbucks that does not hold up to par. Every time I have gone my drink has been messed up. Even simple drinks such as a hot green tea. So sadly to say we won't be going to this Starbucks any more.


................................................................................
LOCATION #49:  address="2501 W Happy Valley Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85085"  (25 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (654 chars)
We all know that there so many variables that can go wrong during the morning preparation for work, all of which have the potential of starting the day off on a negative note in some cases these things can change the course of the whole day. This morning my experience at this Starbucks was just the opposite.. The drive through line was short and the team was not only friendly, but extremely knowledgeable. ... As a former Starbucks employee I can say this team is rare! Consistency is key to me and they've got it all!! I pass by two other Starbucks locations each day to this store because I know they will help me start my day off right every time!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (595 chars)
I am a Canadian and was in Phoenix for the winter. I ended up walking up to this Starbucks most mornings for a Latte, and very soon was welcomed by name by the staff in the store. They were all positive, wonderful, friendly people. When they were busy they always apologized for the wait. I am back in Canada now and miss my Starbucks visit each day. I am looking forward to coming back to Phoenix next winter and will definately have this store on my schedule when I return. The coffee is much the same in all the Starbucks I have been in. What makes this a great store is the fantastic staff!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (470 chars)
I was so sad when the starbucks on 39th and pinnacle close down. I literally work 6 stores down. So I can walk down on my break and get my venti GREEN TEA WITH BERRIES. Yummmm. now that they move it to 39th and happy valley with a DRIVE THRU its so hard to go there. The line is so long and same goes to the drive thru. ...  ... When they first open i went in and they recognized me right away and remember my drink instantly. Great costumer service and great drinks :)


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (380 chars)
At first I was disappointed that they moved from Pinnacle Peak because that location was across the street from my house. However, their new store on Happy Valley is so much nicer.  ... Great staff & excellent drive thru service! ... The people that complain about the slow drive thru are probably the same people ordering all their "special" drinks that aren't even on the menu.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (256 chars)
Seriously the best Starbucks in AZ. We live right near by and are frequent users. The staff knows us and our usual orders and are ALWAYS friendly. We are and always will be loyal customers to this particular Starbucks. The only con would be no drive thru.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (175 chars)
I go here a lot.  Everyone there is friendly and remember me and my drink that I order.  It really don't get any better!  This place can get busy with a long line at times...


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (130 chars)
I've yet to have a bad experience here.  I'm always greeted and served promptly.  Although, I only come in during off-peak times.


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (120 chars)
I love this store! The staff is kind and patient. I highly recommend this branch. They even helped me with my homework!


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (109 chars)
Love this Starbucks! Haven't had any major problems here, the staff is nice. They are efficient! Good store!


REVIEW #10:  5 stars  (101 chars)
Very helpful.  Barista took the time to explain perks that will keep us coming back! Thanks Hillary!


REVIEW #11:  5 stars  (37 chars)
Great service !! iced americano !!!!


REVIEW #12:  5 stars  (37 chars)
Love this location!! Lots of talent!


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (473 chars)
Food quality and taste aside due to it being a chain restaurant the thing that sets apart Starbucks from each other are the people behind the bar. This location has some great, friendly people who tend to make a consistent drink.  ...  ... Like other reviewers have mentioned, this location can get slammed (especially around 9AM) but it is a function of high demand as opposed to incompetent or slow baristas. ...  ... Overall, a good location with stable, amiable staff.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (36 chars)
What can I say!? It's Starbucks....


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (753 chars)
I used to frequent this Starbucks a couple years ago when I lived off of Jomax and enjoyed it.  I stopped back a couple weeks ago when I was in town and it was still the same.   ...  ... Starbucks-wise, they have the same menu as any other Starbucks.  What's annoying about this Starbucks is mainly the parking.  What a cluster.  It's an adventure just getting in and out of the lot without a fender bender.  I've never found the workers overly friendly either compared to some other Starbucks in the area.  The have a few tables outside that are sort of fun to sit at and watch the bumber cars and horns while you drink your coffee.  I don't know, if you live close it's probably your only option but there definitely are better Starbucks in the area.


REVIEW #16:  3 stars  (289 chars)
Service at this location is faster than the one on Pinnacle Peak Road (about 37th Ave).  But it still takes some time while the servers chat with their regulars.  Seems odd they cannot make the beverages while talking.  And work faster.  This company should know people have places to be.


REVIEW #17:  3 stars  (166 chars)
Coffee is coffee and this place sells it same as many others. Prices are higher generally but us yuppies like our name brands so here we are drinking some Starbucks.


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (139 chars)
Good Starbucks in the Happy Valley Shopping Center.  Excellent AC in this place and a nice place to cool off from the heat and get a Frap!


REVIEW #19:  2 stars  (742 chars)
Having worked for Starbucks years ago I know what it's like behind the bar. What frustrates me about this particular store is it never really seems to be "busy" but they are consistently slow! I've been coming here since they built it and I've seen staff come and go. Still one of the slowest Starbucks locations I have ever been to! ...  ... I'm not sure why exactly but nobody ever seems to be in any kind of hurry behind the bar. It's aggravating knowing I used to be timed at how fast my crew could crank out drinks at some of the busiest stores in Arizona.  ...  ... I am a loyalist, and I'll keep drinking the coffee, but I think I'm done here and ready to find another location to visit. If you're in a hurry, STAY AWAY from this one.


REVIEW #20:  2 stars  (607 chars)
i used to be an everyday regular here. baristas knew me by name and had my drink memorized. service was always slow ... friendly (most of the time) but slow. but i kept coming back because they knew me. stopped by again thursday morning, hoping it had improved. it hadn't. from the time i walked in the door to the time i got my coffee, i had wasted 17 minutes of my morning on a damn latte (yes, i really did time it). screw it ... i just don't have time for this place. if i have an outrageous amount of time to waste, i happen to need coffee, and i'm in this parking lot, i may return, but probably not.


REVIEW #21:  2 stars  (508 chars)
Located in the strip that faces Lowe's, just a few doors down from Ray's pizza.  I've had bad service a few times at this location, the seating is excessively limited, and the parking can be bad at lunchtime because of the surrounding lunch spots.  Worst time is a weekend at lunch when the lunch parking & Lowe's parking are so bad that it fills the span of the parking lot between the two. ...  ... There are a lot of young college aged kids working at this location, so that could be part of the problem.


REVIEW #22:  2 stars  (198 chars)
The staff here is very nice there is just never enough of them. This is not a single occurrence. I was third in line this morning and from the time I walked in until I walked out it was 13 minutes.


REVIEW #23:  1 stars  (296 chars)
If your not in a hurry this might be the Starbucks to go to. I have never been to a slower Starbucks. It's not that it's even that busy the staff just seems to be hungover. I go here just about every Sunday because it's close. But I think from now on I will be driving by and heading to another.


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (249 chars)
This is hard to say... But I do not enjoy my visits here. They are slow, crammed, difficult to get in line, and even harder to find space to wait for drinks or even fix my drink after. I love SB but this one needs a bigger store and better service.


REVIEW #25:  1 stars  (146 chars)
If you  want the slowest service when 2 people Are making drinks  then for Shure come here.... This is why old people shouldn't work at Starbucks


................................................................................
LOCATION #50:  address="2802 E Indian School Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85016"  (16 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (608 chars)
Obviously this wasn't built a Starbucks. It's more spacious than your average 'bucks, and has a cool little game room tucked away with a table to seat 8 or so. A few gents were playing chess while we were there. ...  ... Lots and lots of seating is available, although lots of it is taken by people working away on their computers. The customer service is excellent. ...  ... I had my first Fizzio (root beer). It was unexpectedly really good! Has a tinge of ginger in it, and with whipped cream on top it has a creamy aftertaste. I'm not a huge fan of cold coffee, so this might become my go-to cold drink.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (494 chars)
We have been in a lot of Starbucks locations   all over. This particular one has a very unique store layout as it is on a corner and is in an L inside. Last night when we were here we wondered what the building was prior to becoming a Starbucks. Today we are in again. It is a very comfortable environment with lots of parking.  ...  ... Usually we bring our own cups but had left them at home today. So we asked for our lattes in cups for here.  Coffee was excellent.  Comfortable chairs too.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (268 chars)
Very nice to have a drive thru here.  And there's a lot of parking and seating if you walk in, too. The meeting room is cool. Very nice use of the old building with a patio added for the cool weather.  The park nearby makes this a great stop with the dogs. Puppicino!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (265 chars)
I have nothing bad to say about this place. I've only used the drive thru and they are always fast and pleasant. Actually, super perky. Must be all the coffee they are drinking. Anyway, I would recommend it if you are in the area and want a quick drive thru treat.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (139 chars)
Great customer service! The staff are always very friendly. Location is nice and close to home. Usually a line but it seems to go quickly.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (85 chars)
The staff is impeccable with superb customer service!  My favorite Starbucks by far.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (903 chars)
This is your typical Starbucks with the typical menu, however, it's not a very typical set up. I was really impressed with this place, although the location next to a main road doesn't make it as appealing as a spot in cool section of the city. Considering that I have yet to see a cool section of Phoenix during my visits. ...  ... The pros: ...  ... 1.  Fantastic wifi. They use Google for their network and it works perfectly. No lag, no long loading times. Just perfect. Why don't all Starbucks use Google for their internet? ...  ... 2.  Very cool decor. I really liked the small room where people could get together for a lunch or evening meeting. Gave it a very official feeling. ...  ... 3.  Nice staff. Made the drinks just the right way. ...  ... The cons: ...  ... 1.  Not a fan of the location next to a main road. Has that strip mall ambiance going for it. ...  ... A good spot in general.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (835 chars)
Starbucks is across the street from my house and I'm officially a happy camper!   So glad to have a business other than title loans on this corner.    ...  ... The remodeling is fantastic, the place is spacious and airy with lots of light.  Great seating indoors and outside as well.  Drive through is convenient and easy to access.  Hours are great - open until 10 pm.    ...  ... We went a few days after the Grand Opening.  The place was busy but not overwhelming.  The staff were friendly and kept the line moving well.  They're still working on getting their product and quantities adjusted to the right amount, but I'm sure it will all come together soon!  ...  ... Look forward to heading to Starbucks and stopping by Sprouts on a morning walk.  So convenient!   Welcome to the neighborhood, Starbucks!  Happy to have you here!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (522 chars)
The layout and architecture of this Starbucks makes it a great place to work or read. It's very different than any other Starbucks I've been in.  ...  ... I've been here multiple times and the people that work there are always very nice and accommodating. Not only that, professional.  ...  ... I was there in the evening one time and some kids were being very loud both outside and inside.  After about ten minutes they told them they needed to go. I thought how they did it was nice and thoughtful to the other patrons.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (223 chars)
This store just opened up across the parking lot from my office, and I'm very happy. The staff is all very friendly and helpful. I'm not the HUGEST fan of Starbucks coffee itself, but I LOVE their Berry Hibiscus Refresher.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (221 chars)
I really like this location and it is within 5 minutes away. There is neither never a line at the drive thru or it seems to go very quick. Employees are friendly in addition. No complaints thus far! Thank you Starbucks!!


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (580 chars)
New and clean Starbucks. Plenty of outdoor seating to enjoy when the weather is nice. The closed study room is a nice idea but sounds from main room echo through it. I wore headphones to cancel the noise. I also found the long bar table to be too close to the register. Too much traffic and noise to get much work done there. Also, the table chairs are not cushioned and pretty uncomfortable. There seems to be underutilized open space. I posted a picture of rude people taking up the whole row of seats (I'll take it down if that's not allowed). But anyways, don't be like them.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (1643 chars)
Hasn't happened to me in a while. I was almost delighted! ...  ... For years I avoided Starbucks because I just drink black coffee: Plain old black coffee. And for years Starbucks had the worst black coffee in the biz. It was burned-tasting, probably over-roasted in some effort to cut the sweetness of the tons of sugar most people want in their coffee confections. So when I'd go to Starbucks and they'd cheerily ask "what can I get started for you?" I'd just say "medium coffee, black" and usually they couldn't understand. Then I got attitude. I got sick of it. I stayed away in droves. ...  ... But then they came out with that Pikes Place branded stuff (everything needs to have a brand. Intellectual capital and all that) and it was ok and they stopped giving me attitude when I'd order it. Maybe Starbucks could be a coffee destination for me once again. ...  ... So it was with some delight that my order at the drive-thru speaker was greeted with a pause and soft-voiced incredulity. When I rolled up to the window, $2.50 in hand, I beheld the almost-offended haughty visage of a tattooed coffee artisan, who handed me a cup almost without making eye contact. "Two-eleven" he said, flatly. I handed him the money and said "keep it", trying to smooth over the poor dear's rankled nerves. But an artist, once offended, can't be assuaged with a mere tuppence. He said nothing and retreated to his lair behind the window, obviously there to ponder the banality of the philistine he had just encountered.  ...  ... And I was delighted. Because I can now safely go back to my previous prejudices regarding Starbucks. Mission Accomplished!


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (278 chars)
No coffee brewed and ready to serve at 9:00 AM with 7 people working behind the counter. They Forgot about me after it finished brewing. Half and half was empty. 20 minutes for a basic cup of coffee. Not the best baristas in the Starbucks system. At least the coffee tasted OK.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (164 chars)
Effed up my pumpkin spice latte! One of the only things I enjoy in life and they didn't put pumpkin in it. I only give places a one "strike" chance.... Strike one!


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (426 chars)
If I could give no stars I would. We came to Starbucks and went to the drive thru. There was only one car in front but still had to wait 10 min for two passion ice teas. So we get home and my pregnant friend was craving the ice so finished it in less then 5 min, To her surprise there was a fly in her drink! Yes it went as horribly as you expect it to go. Thanks Starbucks for not checking your ice while making iced drinks.


................................................................................
LOCATION #51:  address="2815 W Peoria Ave"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85029"  (13 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (211 chars)
I love this starbucks always fast and friendly they make the drinks amazing every time I go in my drinks taste the exact same never off .... Love the manager always has a smile on her face when you walk in ....


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (1085 chars)
Definitely one of the better Starbucks in the area that I have been to.  I enjoy coming to this location a little bit more then the others for a variety of reasons. For starters, plenty of tables! I've been able to find a seat here every single time I've come over the last few weeks and this makes me very happy.  Also, for the most part, it's really clean.  The one time I needed a table wiped down (it was busy and the customer was walking out as I was walking in) it was done quickly by the barista. ...  ... Staff here is friendly and outgoing, and seem to do a good job of keeping it that way.  Place is well stocked, bathrooms are clean enough, and overall, I really enjoy coming here.  Even though it gets busy at times, its a far better experience then I've had at other Starbucks close to me. ...  ... Parking's a little tight, so be careful getting in and out, and it's in a strip mall, so there's lots of cars coming in and out.  Even though its an extra mile from my house, its worth coming here.  Free wifi as with all the other starbucks, and they have great hours too!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (300 chars)
Everything they do they do with a smile. Fun and friendly baristas. Knowledgeable and informative when asked about a tumbler cup they had on sale. I'm looking for a trenta size refillable cup and they informed me I can actually use their cup they give and I'll get the discount. Thank you Starbucks!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (194 chars)
I like what they've done with the place. It accommodates the college students and those who come here to study. Kind of busy parking lot and the mornings are a bear to get in here. Good service


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (1385 chars)
Okay, I'm not going to hate on the customer service of this Starbucks because it is WAY better than any of the other stores that are nearby. ...  ... And I'm not going to hate on their drinks, because it's really hard to mess up an iced coffee (it can be done, but you've really got to try to be lazy) ...  ... I will, however, hate on the last experience I had there: so I get my coffee, sit down to do some studying and a lady spills her drink outside-- no big deal, the barista heads out to clean up the mess and gets the lady another drink. While she's out there, the barista decides to sweep up the floor in the lobby... this is where I start having a bad day.  When she is sweeping, she is doing these long, swift strokes with the broom and kicking up a LOT of dust, random particles from people's shoes, etc. into the air around me... and she keeps doing this, over and over again until the air around me is pretty much filled with nastiness and I have to actually take off my glasses and clean them. ...  ... BLECH ...  ... I wouldn't recommend this place for a sit down study sesh, the one on 19th and Northern is better for that, BUT this bux is BY FAR a better deal when it comes to customer service at the counter or at the hand out-- just be sure to leave before they suffocate you with other people's dead skin, dirt and whatever else is hanging out on that lobby floor.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (330 chars)
Definitely need more help in the mornings.  There is one lady who when I see her doing the drinks, I do not get anything that day.  She is slow and always seems like she doesn't know what she is doing.  I only love it when the young girls are working drinks.  Never ever come between 7-8:30 am, expect to wait 30 mins to get out.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (270 chars)
Two stars because there isnt a drive thru.. and Im a lazy American who forgot that when you live abroad you walk for coffee and your needs.. Three stars because the peeps working are as friendly as it gets.. but the sugar/condiment bar is dirty.. clean it up Starbucks!


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (164 chars)
Decent as far as Starbucks go. Kinda have to wait a while for things to come out even when they are not super busy.. Not bad at all just leave a bit to be desired.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (132 chars)
I still hate coffee. Why Starbucks then you ask? Easy. Smoothies and muffins. 1 extra star off for being on the west side. Ba-zing!


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (949 chars)
I've been coming to this Starbucks for years I've always had such a pleasant experience Tiffany the manager has always been so nice to me and my family! But ever since the girl named gray has started working there my experience has been nothing but terrible! She has been rude to me on several occasions I've complained to the manager and I won't complain to her anymore because I do not want a free drink all I'm asking for is for gray to pleasant to me when I go and buy my drink at six am! She has an Issue with me and I'm not sure why! She refuses to make my drink right and when I ask her to make it correctly she always come back with a snotty remark she make me feel as if I'm a bother to her. I just want one simple thing done I want my drink that I paid for made correctly! Because of the way I am treated by gray I will no longer come to this Starbucks neither will my friends and family I refuse to be treated with such disrespect again!


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (384 chars)
Two stars only because the ladies working were fabulous although the one chalked my chai full of ice..... Ummmm easy ice was stated in my order for a reason because I want alot of damn milk!!!  ... The floor was dirty and there were no clean tables....  ... Maybe the worker bees shouldn't focus on the fashionable friendly faggot(me) because honey.... You ain't gettin none of this!


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (944 chars)
My gawd, have I been so blind?! Every morning I have a shot of espresso at home from my Miele (CVA 4070  Coffee System) with beans from Cafe Cortez. Each shot is velvety smooth with hints of smokiness and chocolate. This is probably one of finest shots of espresso just for me, every morning, except for... Friday. ...  ... I stay out at my bffs house way out in Surprise once a week to visit her and her bf.  So on my way in to work I sometimes stop by Starbucks for a Friday morning booster. So this morning I ordered a single shot of espresso and nearly choked. Simply horrible, its like a scorched burnt coffee taste that's so bitter while maintaining a weird sourness. My gawd this stuff is pure shit. I cant believe it, after all these years I finally see the light. Starbucks coffee for me is utter crap.  ...  ... I pitched it in the garbage and have sworn off Starbucks. The single star is for the wonderfully cute and perky "barista"


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (314 chars)
They can't get my order right here. I will never come back here. I gave them 3 tries and wasted money because I don't have time to go back an get my order fixed. Idk what's so hard about making an iced coffee with syrup and whole milk but these people can't seem to get it and also have an attitude while doing it


................................................................................
LOCATION #52:  address="2824 N 44th St"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85008"  (20 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1056 chars)
Listen, all you coffee snobs and hipsters out there, I know how much you hate the corporate coffee world.  Their cookie cutter green storefronts, drive-thrus, unassuming wooden furniture, and the latest and greatest jack Johnson clone playing on the speaker system.  Well I say to you, who cares?  I'm here for one reason and one reason only, and that's to further perpetuate my caffeine addiction, and there's no doubt that Starbucks' lighter roasts have some of the most caffeinated kick of any coffee out there.  So go to your totally underground hipster coffee joints where your baristas make hearts in your foam and talk about the best new music they read about on pitchfork.com, but don't come crying to me when you inevitably find that the evil empire that is Starbucks is so popular for a reason: they have good tasting strong coffee, friendly employees, and a comfortable atmosphere.  Anyways, this particular location is the bomb regardless of if I get hit on by the dude in the drive through window on a consistent basis....how can I blame him?


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (514 chars)
I love this starbucks!!! I go to it at least 4 days out of my five day work week!!! I am a starbucks gold card holder lol...the girls are all so sweet...they know our office staff by name and are so nice...they make the greatest vanilla chai frappaccinos and the best green.tea fraps!!!!! Everyone needs to taste their new dessert bites they r to die for!! My favorite is the salted carmel chocolate pretzel square! You cannot get much better then that...i do noteven like coffee but there is so much more here...


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (378 chars)
This Starbuck's crew is the best. Call 30 minutes in advance and they still had to traveling joe's ready for me when I arrived. Always get my drinks right, and the one time they have ran out of lemonade they gave me a coupon for next time to get a free what every size and kind drink. WoW and I did not even have to ask, they just gave it to me with my new drink and an apology


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (303 chars)
Yup - - love this Starbucks!!  ...  ... The staff is always super, super friendly. Love the way they greet you... just helps to put a smile on your face.  ...  ... I typically (98%) go through the Drive-Thru, and I have never had any issues with my order. It's fast... and a great Starbucks experience.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (244 chars)
My friends and I meet here every Thursday morning for coffee and time to talk together. The staff is incredible, quick, friendly, and make drinks accurately. It's always clean too. This S-bucks makes others look bad. It's the way it should be.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (65 chars)
Nice Staff & Great place to chill, drink coffee, & hang on wifi.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (1413 chars)
I come here for meetings almost once per week or once every two weeks. I got in the morning between 8:30-9:30 and stay for a while. The servers are all very friendly. I noticed one of the servers remembers people from before, and in-between rush orders, they are often cleaning up the area.  ...  ... A major plus for this location is that they have lots of seating and lots of plug-ins for those of us who use our laptops.  There are several small tables, a larger table, and tables by the comfortable bench area.  ...  ... The only complaints I have is that it's often busy, I cannot get a seat, and sometimes, the tables are crummy with someone's previous snack. Also, the sun is so darn bright in there at times. Of course, the sun annoys me most of the time anyway, but the shades on the windows only come about halfway down, and the sun is blinding. The parking lot can be kind of annoying too, depending on when one gets there/leaves.  ...  ... If you log into their (now) free wifi, there's a free song of the week. I have liked all my free songs of the week, a perk of going to Starbucks.  ...  ... I can't say I love Starbucks coffee, but I love their tea and option of snacks. They have the kind of granola bars I like, dark chocolate, fruit, and some other items that are quite tasty.  ...  ... The music is often the same every week I go, and sometimes it can get overly loud, but it's not that bad.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (751 chars)
I love this Starbucks and everyone that works here.  They're awesome!  Everyone in my office is a big fan and we can be found here often.  I do wish it were a bit bigger as it can get a little cramped at times. ...  ... My only aggrevation with this location is in regards to the ill-mannered (or are they just entitled?) customers in the drive thru that think it's okay to block the driveway (and sometimes even line up in the street) because they apparently can't be bothered to park and walk inside.  Honestly, I would love to know what is going on in the heads of these people when they are nonchalantly parked diagonally across the driveway, clearly preventing people from entering or exiting the parking lot.  Perhaps ignorance really IS bliss.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (491 chars)
Although, I try to go out of my way not to support "the coffee machine". I wandered in here while waiting for a ride.. ...  ... First person I meet is "Summer" she was completely & utterly full of sass & jokes. I loved her! She took my order & we joked throughout my wait.  ...  ... The interaction with the staff overall was just dope. It was lively, no one had any attitudes. I'm not big on Starbucks in general but I haven't received similar service from some of the local spots I visit.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (257 chars)
I go to this location often (2-4 per week). The staff is always friendly and my order is accurate. The line usually isn't to bad but I've noticed Monday mornings seem to be pretty long for drive thru. So avoid on Monday AM and you should have fast service.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (186 chars)
I love the Green Tea Frapps! Service at the drive-thru and inside is fast. Rarely crowded. I think it is a hidden gem. I've been here and sat outside. There is always seating available.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (1332 chars)
Some people may argue that a free drink is worth any price but I have to disagree.  This is the closest, free standing SB drive throuhg to my apartment and I normally utilize the drive through.  I don't understand why you can't get a better menu at the drive.  Maybe your die hard regulars remember this kind of stuff but I don't always remember all the items available to order.  And the drive through menu is more likely to sell you on food instead than on coffee drinks. ...  ... Over the past year I mostly go to SB once or twice a month at best.  In that time frame I have had at least 7 Complimentary drinks through the drive though because of the time it took to prepare them.  Some people say "hey, free drink" but when you spend 20 min in the drive through (I know I gauged my time through Kelly Clarkson songs) you start to wish you had the option to drive, far far away from the drive through. ...  ... I do give many cust service points to SB for the on the house frappachino when I finally got to the window but why does this always have to happen!  You are always quick to give me a free coffee when my wait gets long but who wants to sit for 15-20 min over an iced coffee?  Maybe you should take a look at your business model and figure out why I have had 7 free drinks in a year due to bad service at this location?


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (450 chars)
I know this place is over priced, but this place is the only coffee house near my work and I tried to come here as often as I can.  Everyone here are all very nice and have a great attitude on working here.  Service is fast and accurate.  They even have a drive-thru window for those that doesn't want to go inside the store.  They also don't have a lot of parking nearby and sometimes you will need to park in the back of the complex and walk over.


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (402 chars)
The location is next to Jimmy Johns but the drive-thru can get very hairy. The parking situation isn't great at this location. I ordered a caramel macchiato thru the drive-thru and it took at least 5 minutes to finally get my drink at the window. I would say this was one of the slower experiences I've had at a starbucks. The worst part, my drink was wrong, but didn't notice until after I drove off.


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (234 chars)
Just like any other Starbucks we have around, coffee works for me on my monday madness. I deal with the line, whether in drive-through or inside, for the bolt of energy. Staff is friendly and as quick as they can be during rush hour.


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (658 chars)
This Starbucks needs to work on their listening skills when taking orders from drive through customers. Since this location happens to be on my way to work, I'll stop by it occasionally. The problem is that they are so busy because they are located on such a huge intersection. Therefore, most of the time when I go here they get my order incorrect. And when I'm forking over almost 4 bucks for a nonfat latte, I don't want to experience issues getting my drink. Sometimes the line is also so long that it reaches all the way into the street.... I'd pass on this location as I'm sure there are probably less crowded locations that can take orders correctly!


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (487 chars)
I'd give it 3.5 stars if I could. This is the only Starbucks on my way to work, soooooo there you have it. The drivethru line is always time consuming, regardless of the time you get there, but the wait staff are super friendly and accommodating. They don't hesitate to give you a free drink if you've patiently waited in their queue. However, don't come here if you're already running late to work... come here if you have lots of time to kill and would like to win a free drink lotto.


REVIEW #18:  2 stars  (367 chars)
I really do love Starbucks. ... But this location ALWAYS forgets to put sweetener in my tea and we always drive off realizing it's too late to turn back because turning back is just even more inconvenient. ...  ... It's just really annoying and this Starbucks is a really nice one, considering the ghetto surroundings of a closed down grill next door and strip club.


REVIEW #19:  2 stars  (156 chars)
It's a Starbucks.  I come here because it's next to my office and I don't have time to go to a place with good coffee.  At least it's consistent and quick.


REVIEW #20:  1 stars  (1069 chars)
I had to take a couple of hours to calm down to write this review.  I have never been so annoyed in my life. ...  ... I usually go to the Starbucks on 16th St...but they don't have a drive thru.  The one on Thomas/32st has the worst service, so I decided to the 44th St location today.  I was craving a Roasted Pepper Panini today real bad. ...  ... I get up to the drive-thru to order my panini  ...  ... "No, you caaaaaaaaan't haaaaave that! I am soooooo sorrrrrrrrrryyyyyy.  We have been waiting for a new order to come in." ...  ... "Oh...well, do you have any other paninis?" ...  ... Instead of her answering, she said "You will have to stay in the drive thru line, but it doesn't look like it's that long" ...  ... Great...now I am stuck in a drive thru line that I can't get out of.  I was held hostage.  There wasn't anything else I wanted.  So I had to wait 20 mintues to get out of the drive thru.   ...  ... Funny thing, the person in front of me got a coupon for a free drink because they were out of what they ordered as well.  I, of course, got nothing.


................................................................................
LOCATION #53:  address="3049 W Agua Fria Fwy"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85027"  (19 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (844 chars)
I have been coming to this Starbucks everyday for 4 years now. I am so glad the management has changed it's already making a big difference the employees seem happier! The cleanliness of the store has gone up. Most of the morning baristas have been there since before I started coming in and know me by name. They have my drink ready before I even get into the store. Karen Viki and missy have been there forever. I don't know why this store has so many bad reviews I guess some People you just can't make happy. Yea sometimes you have to wait for a drink but if u come in and the line is out the door there going to be a wait these people aren't superheroes. This store is run very tight and i think its starbucks as a company thats to blame. These guys and girls work very hard for minimum wage and should be rewarded! Keep up the hard work!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (255 chars)
I've never been displeased with this location. It is across the street from work and even though we have a "Starbucks" in our cafeteria we come here. Better selection, plus we get out of the building. Everyone working here has always been super friendly.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (337 chars)
I'm a regular at this Starbucks. Never had a bad experience. Always a solid product, the staff, especially the young redhead, has been terrific. No caffeine coffeehouse airs here. Plenty of seating inside plus a large wooden table and comfy chairs. A number of tables outside perfect for me my iPad and a tall cold ice tea.  Free wi-fi.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (261 chars)
Great customer service.  I called in to order 6 coffees.  Got to the store and only 4 were correct.  Geez.  The lady apologized.  She gave me all I wanted.  My order!  Then a manager gave me a $10 gift card for the trouble.  Thank you for keep customers happy.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (228 chars)
Always mess up my order. I went in with my wife and there was 1 person behind me waiting to order. I was told that I couldn't pay seperatly to get 2 stars. I had to combine my order. I could understand if they were really busy.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (118 chars)
Super friendly, super fast, and yummy tea.  =)   Plus it was next door from the pizza joint and on the way to my car.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (462 chars)
I love the fact that this location is close to the theater because I study and do homework for school before I hang out. I understand all the baristas are busy helping customers but wish the store could be a little cleaner to include the restrooms. I am a health food journalist with the Examiner and I have visited the Starbucks at the Happy Valley Norterra location and they are always clean. Hope to see changes soon but the crew are amazing they really are.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (43 chars)
Great place to get a steaming hot Tea Bag.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (496 chars)
This Starbucks is one i go to ONLY when i am shopping in the deer valley amc area. I would NEVER go out of my way to come here. The staff is so unfriendly, it honestly makes me sick. There are always new people and i have come across only maybe 2 or 3 that have been somewhat friendly. This Starbucks is dirty (maybe clean the bathroom once in a while?!) My drink is never ever made right, they slop it together. Honestly, don't waste your time coming here unless you are in dire need of coffee.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (288 chars)
I don't hit the corporate crack pipe too often, but when I do, I love me some banana nut loaf and Chai tea! For some reason though- this location, the last couple of times that I have ordered the bread it has been semi-stale.  I mean, at 490 calories a whack- it should taste PHENOMENAL!


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (250 chars)
The service is so slow.  Short staffed.  The lady at the register is very nice and really tries.  They have only 1 person making drinks at any given time and in the morning it is horrible,  Only store in the area.  Avoid!!  Lunch time is even worst.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (1270 chars)
They should just shut this location down. I can not get a drink to come out of that store correctly to save my life. I am not exaggerating, my drinks are wrong more than they are right. I will give them some credit, when I order a drip..they nail it ever time.  ...  ... This issue has been going on long before the whole "New management" story.  ...  ... They write out your drink right and then you walk out with it completely wrong. ...  ... Wrong sizes, missing ingredients...obvious ingredients and my favorite, coffee grounds at the bottom of your cup.  ...  ... AVOID at all costs. Trust me, the drive down the road to a different Starbucks is worth your time. I promise.  ...  ... I go to this location everyday for one reason only, it's super close to my house. I try to go to locations by my school or work but in the morning when you want your coffee before your drive you hit up the one closest to you.  ...  ... I have called and called and called and called to try and let them know something needs to change. Eventually the business will dry up and the lazy employees will be with out a place to go to work.  ...  ... Today was my final incorrect drink. I will be taking my daily spending to a new location. Trust me, the amount I spend will make a dent.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (620 chars)
I feel the need to review this Starbucks because, well, when I was in there, it was without a doubt the most disgusting coffee shop I've ever seen (and I've worked for that generic 'independent' coffee shop we all know).  I've been a student for ages now and have been to many a Starbucks in my day and this is, by far, the nastiest one I've seen.  I hate to knock a place purely for how it looks, but when the tables are nasty, there's dust on the windowsills, and food debris everywhere....it doesn't seem that appetizing.  I know it may be a recession and you're suffering but seriously, clean up your act Starbucks.


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (372 chars)
They commit the ultimate sin for a coffee shop: milk is NEVER available over at the drink station. No milk of any kind. And then when you go up to the barista stand to ask for milk, some of them give you the stink-eye.  ...  ... If it didn't have the built-in traffic from the movie theater next door and American Express and Petsmart, this Starbucks would tank but fast.


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (294 chars)
Very disappointed with this location. I was told they were out of sausage breakfast sandwiches and then someone 20 minutes after me was able to get a sausage sandwich while I was sitting right there. No sense of urgency by anyone working there and it seems understaffed no matter when I go in.


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (275 chars)
pathetic customer service...  ordered a decaf for my mom.  they said they don't brew after noon but they would start a pot.  after 7-10 min of waiting I went to check on it and they didn't even have it started yet!  just canceled the order cuz we had to make our movie time.


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (215 chars)
The bathroom is disgusting, it should be check on regularly, especially when there are 3 of you working an no one actually doing anything and you're not busy. ...  ... As far as service and product, it's Starbucks.


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (139 chars)
I am just ordering while an employee who walked in ahead of me has left with her drink. It's always nice to know the customer comes first?


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (90 chars)
I don't think I have ever been to a slower Starbucks!  Nate has one speed!  Slow....crazy


................................................................................
LOCATION #54:  address="3110 N Central Ave Ste 185"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85012"  (8 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (558 chars)
I stopped here only to buy 5 gift cards, so I didn't actually buy any drinks or other items. ... The young girl that helped me had some trouble ringing the 5pack, so we decided for 5 individual cards. ... She was very nice and helpful, and when I misplaced my credit card (as I often do : ( she was very clever to check the gift card display... silly me I had left it there while checking out the gift cards available. ...  ... I spent a week training at Interface and I did like the outdoor seating they have at this location. It is very nice and friendly.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (548 chars)
I probably visit 100 different Starbucks per year in my travels.  This is 1 of my favorites.  The store font is perfect and captures the beauty of the Phoenix Sunrise which makes the mood that much more perfect at a coffee shop in the AM.  The staff is very friendly and upbeat as should be the case for a morning coffee shop.  The patio is huge with lots of outdoor seating and the inside is really cool how they have a long leather bench that runs the length of the store and lots of 2 tops all the way down it.  Lots of seating and comfortable.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (115 chars)
Great Starbucks.  Gets very busy in the morning yet they keep the line moving.   David the Manager is a great guy.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (516 chars)
My go-to study starbucks. Plenty of indoor and outdoor seating. Music's usually not too loud. Wifi could be spotty sometimes but there are a couple of active networks. Their attwifi is not as reliable as the google wifi down at Starbucks, Indian School and 28th. Sometimes there's a spanish club that comes here to practice. I don't know what's proper coffee shop etiquette, but I think it's pretty rude to start jabbering away loudly when everyone else is quietly studying. I know I'm in a public space, but still!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (493 chars)
When thing I love about this Starbucks is the seating outside.  The landscaping is really beautiful and the trees are really tall.   ...  ... This Starbucks is in Park Central.  Park Central has been around longer then I have been alive.  I do remember back in the day when I was a teenager that there was a Dillard's outlet store in this shopping center.   ...  ... Anyways, I always enjoy coming to this Starbucks and drinking my coffee outside under a tree with either my hubby or friends.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (382 chars)
This location is nearly always busy; but the staff works hard to keep the lines moving and getting drinks out on time.  ...  ... It's clean, good location with plenty of indoor and outdoor seating. The recent remodel was a much needed improvement.  ...  ... If you are in a rush in the mornings...either get here early or find a different location. Still, it's a great place to be.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (373 chars)
I stopped by this starbucks because of the awesome patio deck. Great service and even better atmosphere to have a coffee in. I especially liked the huge couch theyare had in the back. ...  ... If you stop in you can guarantee that this place will almost always be super busy, lots of outdoor seating so if you are down with this awesome az weather, have your java outside.


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (165 chars)
It's Starbucks only with bad customer service.  Baristas with attitude that don't know their own product.  If I'm paying $7.00 for a coffee at least drop the 'tude.


................................................................................
LOCATION #55:  address="3130 W Carefree Hwy"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85086"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  1 stars  (788 chars)
Not so happy campers here...maybe they need to drink some shots or drinks??? ...  ... 2nd time here since it's a pass by location when visiting the family.  The first visit months ago we ordered a coffee and frappe which was not done well.  So I thought it was an off day. ...  ... Now, getting a small $25 gift card for part of a birthday gift was a reason to go again.  Machi was fine, shots were strong (was a good thing), but an issue with my Very Berry Hibiscus.  No berries??? and I was told it was for looks.   And when the coffee drinker wanted some half & half, she gets handed a carton of Albertsons.  ...  ... After a few drinks on the way I gave up.  The berries do make a difference:( ...  ... I guess not all Starbucks are not on the same page...especially in Carefree, AZ.


REVIEW #2:  1 stars  (332 chars)
I made an account just to review this Starbucks inside Albertsons--that's how bad their service was. I asked for two very simple drinks, a black sweetened ice tea with and without lemonade, and I never tasted a disgusting Starbucks drink until now.  I will definitely be driving an extra 2 miles to get quality Starbucks at Anthem.


REVIEW #3:  1 stars  (332 chars)
I made an account just to review this Starbucks inside Albertsons--that's how bad their service was. I asked for two very simple drinks, a black sweetened ice tea with and without lemonade, and I never tasted a disgusting Starbucks drink until now.  I will definitely be driving an extra 2 miles to get quality Starbucks at Anthem.


................................................................................
LOCATION #56:  address="3165 E Lincoln Dr"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85016"  (8 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (418 chars)
One of my fav Starbucks! Cant beat the location-- looking at Squaw Peak mountains is awesome.   Lots of seating and nice set up inside store.  Friendly customer service from all staff. I drink tons of coffee -many of them  free refills because of my gold card status and they never make me feel guilty or bad.    ...  ... I highly recommend checking out this location when you want good coffee in a pretty atmosphere.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (351 chars)
Not a lot to say here. Nice Starbucks. Large, clean, kept to a comfortable temperature, like most Starbucks. The staff seem attentive and stuff, like most Starbucks. Bathrooms are clean, like Starbucks. Music is quiet and backgroundy, like most Starbucks. Internet works well, like most Starbucks. Nothing too original or unique, like most Starbucks.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (330 chars)
Decided to try this Starbucks as it has a Clover machine. Had a Komodo Dragon and it was very flavorful. Everything about this Starbucks is up to the usual high standards. Not the most parking-friendly location, but there is ample parking if you are willing to walk 50 meters or so. Nice friendly baristas. Lots of sitting space.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (291 chars)
I love this place so much!!! Amazing location, incredible views, and the staff is at the highest of customer service standards.  ...  ... They remember the regulars, they're  all very light hearted and great at making our drinks!!! They have the new Clover, and Fizzio!!! They are amazing!!


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (217 chars)
Great beverages, and incredible service:). The Manager of this unit was awesome.  Very personable, with sincere and authentic care and concern for her guests.  Motivated me to create this account and write a review:)


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (960 chars)
This is the former location of the Russ Lyon Realty office that was at N. 32nd St & E. Lincoln Dr near the 32nd St. Trailhead.  Starbucks just opened this morning and I happened to be driving by.  The staff is friendly and apparently the whole crew from a North Scottsdale store moved down to this spot to open it. ( A guy that lives in Scottsdale and works down the road from here said that it was really cool, and odd.  Kind of like deja vu for him.) ...  ... There is a small patio of to the side with tables, chairs, and a misting system.  Located right beside the newly moved Squaw Peak Animal Hospital, this Starbucks is sure to attract a hiking and dog-friendly crowd.  Parking will be challenging, there isn't a drive-thru and the cool patio is off the side, somewhat oddly oriented. ...  ... I would visit this plaza often when At One Yoga was still in operation (if they had known that Starbucks was moving in, maybe they wouldn't have closed shop?)


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (41 chars)
Great customer service at this location!


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (352 chars)
I was in the area this morning, and stopped in for my "hang." They didn't have dark roast. The woman said she'd brew some, but laughed at me when I suggested that coffee prepared with different methods tasted different. So I left, and went to a different location where they had dark roast available, and treated me and their own product with respect.


................................................................................
LOCATION #57:  address="3175 E Thomas Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85016"  (13 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (348 chars)
Why the four stars? No parking. Well, not enough parking. We went through the parking lot at least three times hoping to find a spot and had to resort to parking next door. The coffee? Of course, it was wonderful! Hubby had an iced coffee, and he NEVER has iced coffee but Phoenix is just too hot to have hot coffee in the middle of the afternoon!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (162 chars)
I came here again and had a good experience. The staff was really nice and I got my drinks quick. That is my usual experience, so I will bump this up to 4 stars!


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (1369 chars)
I've been doing this trend lately where I wait until I check into a place on the Yelp app before I write a review, even if I've been to the place before. Well,...it just so happens that the time I checked in was one of the worst experience I've ever had at this Starbucks. ...  ... My husband and I decided to stop by to get a small breakfast with coffee. I ordered a Mocha (no-whip) and he ordered a Caramel Macchiato along with our food.  ...  ... We got out food immediately (because that just how they do it.), but our drinks on the other hand...took 18! minutes. Now, don't get me wrong, it's not like the place was packed. It was just us, another woman behind us in line and a couple other people already enjoying their drinks. ...  ... There were three staff members working. I could tell there were some drive-through orders, but it just didn't seem to make sense that we hadn't gotten our drinks yet. THEN the girl that ordered after us got both of her drinks and left. We stood there waiting... Luckily they noticed us waiting and finished our drinks finally, but as we were waiting our food got cold and our moods spoiled. ...  ... I haven't had as horrible of experiences here - they are normally pretty, well normal - but this time was different and that's why I'm giving it 3 stars. A mixture of good experience with bad - right in the middle seems fair.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (664 chars)
It sad that I give this place 3 stars considering I have been going there everyday for 3 years.  Mainly it is the place on the way to work closest to my house.   ...  ... This place is busy and they haven't seemed to figure out how to run the drive thru and the inside, it floors me sometimes that they don't have more employees on the machine.  The don't seem to get the morning rush, I am often 15 minutes late to work because they move slow ...  ... They do finally know me there - took a while but now they make my coffee how I like it, weekend crew hit or miss.   ...  ... I will continue to go because it is my place and close.  I just wish they were faster


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (547 chars)
I can see why this place has a less-than-stellar rating. I went on a Thursday for a little afternoon pick-me-up. The location was easy to find and the drive-thru was easy to maneuver. However, the service is what gives them a 3-star rating. I pulled up and did not receive a smile from the barista, something that Starbucks usually prides itself on. The transaction was "quick and dirty", in fact I didn't really know the transaction was over, he just walked away from the window. Hmmph. Less than impressed, but hey, at least I got my goodies :)


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (473 chars)
Typical Starbucks. Yes, drive thru is available - entrance is on the right. I had a coupon that (I did not know) was linked to one of my gift cards that had no money left in it, but the barista was kind enough to let me pay with my gift card that did have money in it! And, he was super cool and friendly.   ...  ... Awesome because of the hours (they close at 10 pm while others close at 9 pm) and the baristas, but I'd never come back because it's in such a shady area..


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (178 chars)
Friendly staff, quick drive through. Normal products for Starbucks ...getting a little pricy since the price hike. If you register and refil your gift card you can earn rewards.


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (1649 chars)
Anyone who knows me that I am a fan of Starbucks.  After having been turned on to them about five years ago, I have never looked back.  Every Starbucks that I have gone to has had exceptional customer service. ...  ... Except this one. ...  ... I usually order one item:  a grande skinny mocha latte, hot.  I have ordered enough at different Starbucks to know when it is made right, and when it's been royally hijacked.  With this Starbucks, it's a 50/50 chance that the drink will be right.  And, frankly, I'm too lazy to bother to complain or have the staff make another one. ...  ... My biggest complaint about this location, however, is the staff.  I often would go here to get schoolwork done or to work on projects for my clients, so I could sometimes spend three to four hours inside.  The amount of vulgar language that I heard coming from their mouths as they bantered with each other was astonishing.  And it wasn't as if they were whispering it; they were openly using this language.  I would hear them talk about their romantic lives, sometimes in details.  How these employees remain employed is beyond me.  What I heard is simply deplorable. ...  ... I have since moved from that location and go to a different Starbucks 12 miles or so away.  I made it a point to go back to this Starbucks to see if anything had changed in the six months since my last visit--and it hadn't.  Within one hour of sitting inside doing project work, I heard the expletives as they were bantering. ...  ... If you have any sense of professionalism about you or are offended by an occasional expletive from the staff, I would steer away from this location.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (1270 chars)
When you go to a Starbucks on Thomas Rd, I suppose it's only fair to adjust expectations accordingly, as I did. This gem of a Starbucks, however, took my lowered expectations, met them, and said "we can go lower." ...  ... Parking is abysmal. 50/50 chance during peak hours you'll need to park next door. Keep in mind there's also always an option to keep driving. Once you enter, you'll be greeted with a friendly cold shoulder. Quality customer service here. ...  ... The bathrooms, if you have my luck, may be out of both rolls of toilet paper. Don't be a fool like me and proceed before checking. If you have the bad luck of reading this on the toilet, and you are now checking the toilet dispenser, realizing that it's too late, fear not. You don't need to go Indian style, you can use the toilet seat covers in a pinch. Not for the dainty, but better than the alternative. ...  ... If you're like me and you want to save the next guy from the terrible dilemma depicted above by informing the staff, prepare to be thanked with expert levels of passive aggression. ...  ... Altogether not my favorite Starbucks experience, but the drink was potable so 2 stars. ...  ... Good if you: wipe with your hands ... Bad if you: are snobby about things like customer service


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (694 chars)
So by now everyone knows about the Starbucks running water fiasco, right? ...  ... http://abcnews.go.com/International/SmartHome/Story?id=5964908&page=1 ...  ... I drive up to the "almost in the hood" new store, and while I'm waiting for my grande, extra hot caramel macciado with half 2% milk and half whole milk, one splenda, no whipped cream, but drizzle the caramel on top?  Oh yeah, and can I have it double-cupped instead of one of those sleevey-things and while I'm waiting at the window I look over and see that little friggin spigot just running for no apparent reason. WTF I say, it's true.   ...  ...  ... They let the water run all the time!  What ass-clown came up with that idea?


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (302 chars)
So the service was good--timing, acceptional since we were in no rush..  ...  ... Ordered a venti iced coffee & a tall White Mocha (hot) ...  ... But she didn't give us a straw for the iced coffee.. and we had driven off before we noticed.  Maybe she was a new barista because she seemed a bit nervous


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (586 chars)
I'm not a big Starbucks fan but I have a gift card from work and it'll do in a pinch. The drive thru line wrapped all through the parking lot so I parked and went inside. The staff was courteous and I just had a plain coffee.  ... The other clientele I found to be pretty snotty self entitled yuppies. In the parking lot, I almost get hit by some guy rushing through. I start backing out and this guy jumps in his sports car slams it into reverse and almost hits another car and leans on his horn!!!  ... Anyways, it's been awhile since I've been to a Starbucks and now I remember why.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (389 chars)
Ok, seriously @Starbucks, there should not be visible evidence on the toilet seat that the prior user was... um.... having a bad day. ...  ... Gross. ...  ... No other comments. That's just unacceptable. ...  ... BTW: after being there at least 90 minutes, I used the restroom again just prior to leaving, and there had been zero cleaning done. ...  ... NEVER GOING BACK TO THIS LOCATION!


................................................................................
LOCATION #58:  address="4010 E Greenway Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85032"  (16 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (351 chars)
This is the only drive-thru location on my way to work and it is usually pretty busy but they seem to get us through quickly (haven't been late yet!). They are always friendly and quick. Only once did I notice my drink wasn't quite sweet enough but I am kind of a sugar-holic when it comes to coffee. Maybe they were trying to do my pancreas a favor.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (227 chars)
This location rocks. Consistently great service/coffee. This is not the closest Starbucks to my house but is officially my Starbucks. Whether I go in or order through the drive-through they give me my coffee fix. Great job!!!!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (192 chars)
My store. They  know me, I know them. They treat me right. I go through sometimes to buy something as a treat for someone else and I say- make it beautiful it's a gift and they do! Awesome!!!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (100 chars)
Got a white mocha frappaccino with caramel sauce blended in with an espresso shot!  It was amazing!


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (64 chars)
Like always.  Starbucks comes through with exceptional service.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (683 chars)
Okay, okay. I broke my promise, I returned! I was in a rush and the drive-thru seemed like a promising alternative. I drove up to the ordering board pessimistically, well knowing that my service this morning would be atrocious. Much to my surprise, the woman who took my order asked how my morning was, and she....THOUGHTFULLY responded to my reply! (This is a rare one in the drive-thru industry kiddos)  ...  ... After a few short minutes of waiting behind an Escalade far too large for the small driveway to pay for his coffee, I pulled up to the window. I received good coffee too! And smiling employees! I was in shock.  ...  ... Kudos for making improvements guys, keep it up.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (512 chars)
Okay so we all know what to expect from Starbucks. The selection is the same. So what it really comes down to is the staff. And this location happens to have superb staff. I always end up leaving this place with a smile on my face, regardless if I'm having a grumpy, frumpy morning. I'm sure the fact that I'm leaving with a giant cup of caffeine helps with that... but the people working the drive-thru are always quick with a smile and laugh, and seem to genuinely want to spread those smiles to the customer.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (260 chars)
This is my local Starbucks down the street and around the corner near my apartment. This location is very fast....has a friendly staff....and of course the half off Fraps from 3-5 pm are the best deal in town right now. Eat, Drink, and be Merry my Friends!!!!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (236 chars)
I do like my Starbucks - I haven't been able to choose a favorite yet although today I tried the Grande Caramel Flan Latte with Soy milk and so far, it's better than the other drinks I have had - hope this one stays around for a while.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (138 chars)
I have been here 2 times. The staff are friendly and didn't have to wait long for my Carmel frap, my fav! Going to continue to come here.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (114 chars)
I go to this starbucks VERY often.  Most of the time the coffee is perfect. But everytime, the service is amazinf


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (60 chars)
Great and speedy service, I would definitely go back again.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (136 chars)
Today I just didn't like the chai tea latte...tasted watered down...didn't even drink half if it had to throw it out, just tasted gross


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (787 chars)
Okay, so I went to this Starbucks on Saturday and ordered my usual caf mocha and a breakfast sandwich,the sausage classic. ...  ... They did not have one so they offered me a spinach-type breakfast sandwich. It was hard as a rock, overcooked, old and I threw it away. ...  ... I went by today, which is Thursday, ordered my caf mocha and the sausage classic sandwich and, once again, it was old, stale, overcooked and hard as a rock. Had to throw it away as well. ...  ... I called the store and the lady said, "what do you want us to do for you"  i said a gift certificate would be nice. Her suggestion was that I drive all the way back to their store to pick it up...Even though I had just said I could not come back to get another sandwich! Ridiculous!! ...  ... I will not go back!!


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (501 chars)
The new reduced fat turkey bacon sandwich is TERRIBLE.  Why did you mess with a great thing?  The original with the whole wheat english muffin, egg whites and turkey bacon was so good.  I will never buy the new one again.....and probably will never buy any food items at Starbucks again.  Terrible.  Disappointing.  To add insult to injury, my husband's Veggie Egg sandwich was hard as a rock when we got home.  What a waste of money!  Pay attention to details and understand what your client's want.


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (443 chars)
Service this morning was abysmal. I changed locations this morning, running late in hopes that the drive-thru would be more speedy. Yeah, right. ...  ... The line moved painstakingly slooooowwwww. When I got my coffee, it was barely 2/3 full, and the rest was all whipped cream. I ordered a Venti Vanilla Latte. I'm not going to pay five dollars for a cup full of whipped cream, I wanted the coffee.  ...  ... Last time I visit this location.


................................................................................
LOCATION #59:  address="4340 E Indian School Rd Ste 3"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85073"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (617 chars)
As far as Starbucks go, this one is my favorite.  The staff there is always so friendly and ready to serve you with a smile.  Unlike most coffee shops (that are run by hipsters and burnouts) these people truly care about you and what you've done with your day.  They are also the only store I've been to that asks me if I would like to try something different in my drink, like adding mocha to a chai or caramel sauce to the pumpkin spice.  There is always high turnover at places like this, so negative reviews should be taken with a grain of salt, as a large percentage of the staff is different from one year ago.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (41 chars)
The girl here Jess is such a sweetheart!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (1183 chars)
The parking is the worst problem here... during the day the lot is JAMMED: too few spaces for too many businesses! Otherwise I'd give them 5 stars... ...  ... Having said that,I'm a certified Starbucks Junkie, and a "regular" here. This location is where I stop for coffee and a snack after leaving my workout 3 days every week, and where I stop to buy my GF her favorite vanilla latte. The service is good, the staff is top-notch, and I like the layout of the interior. My drink orders are always correct. I never get the "Sorry, we're out of Pike Place" syndrome that I often get in the afternoon when I stop at other Starbucks locations. The service is as fast as Starbucks ever gets (not the highest bar to reach, I know). And, after going into a LOT of Starbucks, where the staff act like a bunch of slackers, the gang here really CARE... their performance shows it! ...  ... This store is more clean, neat and organized than most other other locations, too... the Starbucks nearest my house is a PIGSTY behind the counter by comparison.  ...  ... I drive past 3 Starbucks on the way home from the Gym: this one is least convenient to get into, and it's STILL the one I prefer!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (604 chars)
I like this location a lot because this Starbucks is quick, convenient and unlike other reviews I've never ever encountered an issue with my drink - a major plus because sometimes walking into a Starbucks can be a nightmare in the morning. ...  ... The crew here is lightening speed fast, and they take your order practically once you walk in the door to help get you on your way. Most of the people who walk in are in a rush to get to work, and finally I've found a Starbucks that actually understands that. This is just a cheerful place to be in the morning, it's your friendly neighborhood Starbucks.


REVIEW #5:  2 stars  (520 chars)
Any true Starbucks fan has visited probably 50 different locations.  Well, I'll just say that out of the 10+ times I've been here, this is still the worst. ...  ... I don't want to sound negative, so I'll just admit that I've never received quality customer service, and that parking here is an absolute nightmare (which is NOT their fault, so I gave them 2 stars).   ...  ... Their customer service is more painful than a kick to the face with a golf shoe. ...  ... On a more positive note...  Hey, the sun is shining!


REVIEW #6:  1 stars  (1201 chars)
This place is TERRIBLE : I would give no stars, but that is not an option. ...  ... If you want anything more than drip coffee you are SOL.  And be specific about your drip coffee order  ("room for cream", sometimes means "half full") ...  ... I will recount my latest experience in a long string of "one more chance" visits to this specific location. ... It was cold and rainy, and perfect weather for a nice warm drink.  I arrived, ordered my drink AND . . . ... I waited for my Latte (a simple 2 shot, short Latte, nothing fancy here). ... I watched as the "barrista" FINALLY pulled the two shots for my latte . .  ... Then let the cup sit, for a few minutes . . .  ... He then poured milk into the latte, BUT stopped about half way full?!  ... There the making of my drink stopped . . .  ... It wasn't served to me half full, it just sat there getting colder. . . ... I waited, and waited, and looked on expectantly. . .  ...  ... After 15 minutes of waiting, and then watching this idiot make half of my latte, I realized that whatever "drink" I would get would be cold by the time I got it. ... So I finally had it and left (mind you I had already paid!!!!!).  Never again, I done with the BUX.


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (744 chars)
I've been in town for a conference and have stopped at this starbucks several times.  The first time I went visited this location, there was a fly buzzing around the pastries.  I went back a couple times later and they were incredibly slow and were serving drinks out of order.     ...  ... I went back today and I had to walk out because I couldn't wait any longer.  The pastry case was empty (at 4 pm) and they had to give a free drink coupon to the customer in front of me because they were out of something to make her drink with.  I visit starbucks around the country on a regular basis and this was the slowest by far.  There doesn't seem to be any urgency in their pace.  I've given this establishment several chances.  I won't be back.


................................................................................
LOCATION #60:  address="4605 E Chandler Blvd Ste A"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85048"  (14 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (132 chars)
This starbucks is really clean eveyone seems to know each other and what they are going to order it's hard to find that these days.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (36 chars)
Great places, full of nice baristas


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (384 chars)
I like this location, it is clean and the staff is friendly.  The drive thru is SUPER SLOW so if you're in a rush, get out of your car and walk inside.  This is the main location in ahawatukee, so it is packed most of the time.  Not too much sitting space inside, so it's more of a place for a quick meeting or get your coffee and go.  Otherwise, another one of my places for coffee!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (381 chars)
This is a good location, and constantly busy! They have good service, everyone has a great attitude, and the lobby is nice and comfortable.  ...  ... My only complaint with this location is the parking lot, and specifically how hard it is to get in and out, especially when it is busy. Be ready to cram through some tight spots and dodge some cars if you are there when it's busy!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (274 chars)
Good neighborhood Starbucks. I love that there is a drive thru here. It makes it so convenient to swing through on your way to run errands on a Saturday. Only real criticism is the drive thru line. It's always long. But that's just because we are all too lazy to go inside.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (247 chars)
As good as a Starbucks gets! This is such a busy location. I really wish they would put another one in the Foothills. I've also had quite a few 'pay it forwards' in the drive thru- which always make my day. Then I get to do it to someone else! 8)


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (235 chars)
Great place, clean and friendly, fast internet connection.  ... The only thing is they don't have that much outlets. They have 3 that I know of and they are in the corners where only one person can use it and blocking off from others.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (201 chars)
The coffee shop is clean, we staffed and they get the order right.   One of the better Starbucks that I have visited in the Valley.  ...  ... At times the place may be crowded, but a decent clientele.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (550 chars)
This is my second choice location when I'm looking to fill my Starbucks requirement for the day. ...  ... It has a drive thru so this works for when I'm a bit on the lazy side. ...  ... The barista's are always helpful but have spoken down about other Starbucks locations and that just leaves a bad taste in my mouth (not coffee, just put downs). ...  ... Note to Starbucks - if you are listening - the piadini thingy with the spinach and feta was sooooo good, why, oh why did it leave and can it come back? - This would get me back into this store.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (349 chars)
I prefer to go to local coffee shops and support them rather than go to Starbucks. My only issue with this Starbucks is that the staff aren't very friendly rather you're going through the drive-thru or going inside. This one was right next to my house so I would stop in purely based on convenience but if I had time I'd go somewhere else for sure.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (275 chars)
Friendly staff and consistently good service. This location needs to be expanded however. Often times you can't get a seat. I've seen in.erous people come and and leave without buying anything due to lack of seating. Me included. Take over the location next door and expand.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (408 chars)
This is a horrible Starbucks! They consistently mess up and don't compensate for it.  It's very disappointing because we love Starbucks! Both gold members and now have to find a new Starbucks:( we even asked if we could have the managers card and none of the regular staff knew how to help us nor did they apologize! It took 20 minutes to get our drinks! First ordered in the drive thru then had to walk in.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (252 chars)
The employees at this location are more concerned with each other than the customers making the service consistently slow. Thankfully a new coffee shop opened less than a 1/2 block away and I don't have to suffer the indifferent staff here any longer.


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (193 chars)
The employees at this location always seem to have a latte up their a**. The few times that I have been here, I have felt that I'm bothering the employees and interrupting their conversations.


................................................................................
LOCATION #61:  address="4747 E Elliot Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85044"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (290 chars)
This is my favorite Starbucks that I stop at on my way to work. The staff moves pretty fast and they know my drink and have it ready by the time I get to the front of the line. They always have a smile on their face. Thomas is always friendly and helpful. Two thumbs way up for this place!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (320 chars)
This location is in the safeway.  It's a nice location with a lot of seating, which is rare for a safeway starbucks.  The location is very busy, especially in the mornings.  If you're in a rush, it might take awhile to get your coffee.  The staff is very nice.  It's close to the freeway and located on 48th and Elliot.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (495 chars)
I haven't been to this location in a couple of months. But, I didn't get the kind of Superior Starbucks Service that I'm accustomed to. The young lady seemed like I was disrupting her day by being there to order coffee. She didn't smile, greet me or even ask my name to put on my coffee cup as they normally would do although she didn't need to because it's on my Gold Starbucks card...hint hint I buy a lot of Starbucks Coffee. Despite all of that everyone else was great and so was my coffee!


................................................................................
LOCATION #62:  address="50 W Jefferson St Ste 170"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85003"  (17 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (2081 chars)
Never thought I'd write a review about a Starbucks, but this one is worthy of a review. ... I work doing a job I don't like.  I get to work early...like before-God-wakes-up early. ... I'm usually not in a good mood during my first few minutes there. ... But every morning, a couple co-workers and I make a trip to this Starbucks.  Its like 5 minutes away walking (it used to be on Adams and we went there, too). ...  ... Its always nice coming here.  There are 3 staff members that I know by name now (Jason, Johnny, and Brittney (SP)).  These guys are great.  Friendly, talkative, easy going, and down to earth.  I've gone to some starbucks and felt like I was really doing something wrong by coming in and ordering a beverage.  This location is so not that way.  Even when they get busy - they stay at the same coolness level. ...  ... Another thing that I really love here is the way they just hook a brother up - suggesting awesome drinks that I would never have thought to put together.  I've had some crazy delicious frappes thanks to these guys.  And before them, I never knew what a Black Eye was!  A lot of times I'll just say "make me something good", and they hook it up. ...  ... Besides the early morning crew, I've also had good experiences in the afternoon when its pretty darn busy.  Don't know any of their names though. ...  ... This place is such a requirement for my work day.  I need it.  Honestly.  Its not just the caffeine (I actually get decaf anyway)...its not just the familiarity of having a warm beverage in the morning.  Its coming here and seeing familiar faces and chewing the fat about the NBA, and having that personal touch, and stuff (and the cute cashier with a great smile that i don't know her name...).   ...  ... These folks are great here. ...  ... I don't know enough about what is good coffee and what is not to rate the coffee.  I mean, I drink the decaf with white chocolate and cinnamon dolce just about every morning...and I think it tastes good.  So yeah, I can't say their coffee or frappes are better or worse than anywhere else.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (620 chars)
This Starbucks location is one of my favorites in Phoenix. The size of it is suitable for fairly large crowds - Comic Con was in town, and they had plenty of room for everyone that came. The baristas are super friendly and do their job very well - very professional. I spent a couple of hours there in between my meals and walk around the city. The drink I ordered was spot-on. The men's restroom was very clean (not sure about the women's... ha). There are plenty of outlets to plug in your electronic devices.  ...  ... Would I recommend this Starbucks location to others? Absolutely. Will I be back? Most definitely.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (441 chars)
This location is one of my favorites, and while I have two others that are a little closer to my office, I make the effort to walk to this location.  The staff is amazingly friendly.  Also, they can really move customers through so that even with a long line you aren't stuck waiting for too long.  What makes this even better is that you still get that personal connection and friendliness that you hope for when you walk into a Starbucks.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (440 chars)
So happy I came here on a hot AZ day.  It's pretty hard to find if you are not familiar with the area.  Lots to eat near by so it's a convenient place to get your coffee or Iced beverage on.   ...  ... I got my usual- Green tea, w/soy latte.  I sometimes get the frap and it ALWAYS tastes so refreshing!  I want one now!!!  The ladies here are very friendly and work quick.  No complaints here. ...  ... I am sure I will be back very soon.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (208 chars)
Starbucks you are the wind beneath my wings.  I come here A LOT.  All the baristas are very helpful and kind.  This place has saved me numerous times from a stressful or sleepy day.  Long live the Americano.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (206 chars)
What can I say....I love Starbucks!   This location had a very large in door seating area. It is also located in a great little square of shops, attractions and even fountains!  What more could you want :)


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (106 chars)
Next to the light rail station! Great customer service and theres outlets under the table hidden so cool!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (1093 chars)
A good representation of "the Starbucks experience" with an air of sophistication, reasonable simulation of hardwood floors, free Wi-Fi, courteous, competent staff, expensive coffee, and the infamous PSL: Pumpkin Spice Latte, which Lord help me, at 300 calories for a small ("Tall" in Starbucks parlance), I love.  There are also some healthy food and snack box options, as well as some excellent if more-sweet/less healthy cakes and cookies, and all that I've tried have been quite good, quite consistent with the level of quality expected. ...  ... The cool, comfortable atmosphere is an inviting, consistent pleasure.  Inside and out, this SB  offers a great the view of the CityScape Plaza  for some great people watching, though the polite but persistent panhandling can be discouraging to sitting outside.  SB coffees are frequently too strong as well as too expensive for me to partake of on a regular basis, but I respect that they do provide health insurance benefits to their employees.  ...  ... To repeat, a good representation of the positive aspects of the Starbucks experience.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (822 chars)
Yay!! A Starbucks within reasonable walking distance to the office! This one is much nicer than the older one over on Adams. This Starbucks location is updated, bright and airy, and has some cool folks working in here. There's outside seating, and it's on the edge of a nice park with water works and even more outside seating.  The seating is a bit crowded, and they don't have the green stoppers out where we can grab one -- you have to ask the barista for one.  Either way, this location is great for a hot or cold drink, especially if you need a break from work or if you're walking around enjoying the nearby shopping.   ...  ... This Starbucks is on the SEC of Washington St and First Avenue.  From the street, it could be easy to miss; however, if you're walking, it's beside Jimmy John's and across from Chipotle.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (480 chars)
While in town for a meeting, I took the light rail down town to check out the scene. I stopped by this Starbucks bordering a bustling plaza. ...  ... Pros: Super friendly staff - interested in what brought me to town, but not in a creepy way. Also, ample seating - outdoors on the plaza, and plentiful seating inside, including large community tables and smaller standard tables. ...  ... I would definitely come here to get work done, hang out with friends or just people watch.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (248 chars)
Friendly & quick service.  ... While attending Volleyball Festival Tournament the Starbucks at Phx Convention Center had a huge line! We walked a short two blocks & found this one! Nice shades seats outside. Most importantly my drink is delicious!


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (214 chars)
Always polite at this Starbucks. They are not that quick but that's because there are just so many people coming through this place. Totally strange mix of people here too with lawyers in suits to homeless people.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (95 chars)
Convenient location in Cityscape, friendly staff and consistent service and quality of drinks!


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (68 chars)
Great Starbucks with enough chairs for the large volume of patrons.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (244 chars)
I placed my order and got what I wanted.  That's fine.  But why was I bothered by the Barney Fife rent-a-cop?  He had the nerve to keep coming past me and after he asked a bunch of dumb questions.  Oh Maybe It's Because I Look A Certain Way...


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (235 chars)
Employees here are great, location is great. ...  ... Don't pick the white marble table in the corner(on the right when you walk in) it's broken and wobbles a lot. ...  ... Internet speed is horrible, speedtest.net got 1mbps/0.32 mpbs


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (103 chars)
Baristas here are more interested in talking to each other than making an iced tea. 8 minutes? Really?


................................................................................
LOCATION #63:  address="520 W Osborn Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85013"  (5 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (302 chars)
Today I went to Starbucks for there BOGO free deal with my mom.  The lady at Starbucks was really nice.  I got my favorite peppermint mocha and my mom got eggnog latte.   ...  ... It is nice to get a drink in Safeway.  Then you can in joy your coffee and do your grocery shopping at the same time.  :)


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (469 chars)
I should say when we went to this Starbucks it was 5:30am, and none of us had more than 5 hours sleep the night before.  SO...that said...the person making the drinks was very nice, and got the order right.  I got a caramel macchiato, extra hot with low fat milk.  I added whipped cream....because I could. I am not a huge huge Starbucks fan, but at 5:30 this morning...it was the best Starbucks ever!  lol.  It is in a Safeway, so you can also pick up some groceries.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (183 chars)
Love this Starbucks. The employees are always friendly and get your drinks promptly. Because it is in a Safeway, they may not have everything a standalone would have but that's okay.


REVIEW #4:  1 stars  (1212 chars)
This is possibly one of the most ridiculous things that has ever occured to me in a "coffee shop".  This $tarbucks is located inside the Safeway at 7th Ave & Osborn.  I rarely ever patronize a Sbucks, but my grandmother was wanting some coffee, so I obliged.  Being the coffee snob I am, I opted for a tea.  Even bagged tea is better than corporate coffee in my eyes (even if it's by the same company). ...  ... I ordered an iced rooibos.  Tea.  Who can screw that up, right?  He made my grandmother's latte, which appeared "fine" (though one has to wonder) and proceeded onto my tea. ...  ... Plastic cup.  Adds ice.  Fills with water.  Adds tea bag.  Swirls the cup around and hands it to me.   ...  ... -- "Do you want a second tea bag or something?"  ... -- "Huh? What? Why would I need two tea bags?" ...  ... I stand there acting confused.  Did you expect ice water to create iced tea, or any tea at all?  I tell him he has to brew the tea, then dump it over ice.  He shoots back that he did *exactly* that.  I demand he remake it.  This time I told him to brew me the hot tea, give me a separate cup filled with ice, and I will deal with the tea steeping and such.  He does that, and I make my tea.  Ugh.


REVIEW #5:  1 stars  (323 chars)
What can really be said about starbucks that hasn't already? What seems to be 10 years ago awesome coffee has turned into todays "meh... ive had better." ...  ... This is the location inside the safeway. I usually stick to a tea, but if you're looking for coffee close to this area, try Lux on central about .5 miles away.


................................................................................
LOCATION #64:  address="530 E McDowell Rd Ste 109"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85004"  (10 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (316 chars)
I go to this SB's every morning on my way to work. The staff all know me by name, scream good morning to me as I haul my sleepy ass in there every morning and they know what I want and make it fast.  My hat goes off to Misty, Thomas, Jade and all the others who get me in & out as fast as they can and with a smile.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (223 chars)
Loved the employees of this store.  I told them I need to get 2 drinks with the hospital, with food, and 2 bags, so they put my drinks in to a carrier and sealed my hot drink with green plug so it does not spill.  SWEET!!!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (199 chars)
I've been coming to this location for over 2 years. I have had only fantastic service experiences. Never a bad one!!! They make excellent drinks too! True artisans that know their craft well. Solid!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (216 chars)
One of the better chais I've had. The staff is friendly and quick. I was in and out in under 10 minutes. 4 stars because I believe in a drive thru Starbucks. I could see struggling to find parking here on the daily.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (199 chars)
I go every morning. Heston, MJ and Joel are the regular staff, and pretty much know us by name. It's the smallest, busiest Starbucks I've ever been to. Patience! They're working as fast as they can.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (109 chars)
yummy. Especially right before a long day at work !!  ... Caramel machiato not stirred is my recommendation.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (918 chars)
Same Ol' - Same Ol'  What did ya expect!   Still, if you want some caffeine, and you need it now, here's the place to juice up right before making that visit to Good Samaritan Hospital down the block to see a hurting bro or sista! ...  ... Located just on the north/west corner of 7 th and McDowell in a little strip mall of about four other businesses.  Next door to Einstein Bagels as their neighbor companion and moderate outside seating.  Indoor seating is slim at best and not much in the way for room.  Just a thin suite for the in&out feeling (Move it! Move it!)... ...  ... Let's try and get excited about this Starbucks!----???----Well, there is a Bus Stop for local transit just in front!----That should lift your grocery bags some---or at least your duffel bag.... ...  ... During the day I felt like ordering a double-shot instead of getting shot at!  That's a positive!  (not sure about night though?...)


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (976 chars)
I'm done with this location. The drinks are the usual you'd get from any other Starbucks. However, beware if you aren't a regular. I stop by this location every few weeks if it's convenient to get a hot vanilla latte--nothing fancy. But they always manage to get the complicated, fancy drinks with a cup of sugar done well before mine, even when I'd been 2 people in line before them. Are these folks regulars? Maybe, but that's no reason to provide bad customer service to everyone else. Twice they'd completely forgotten my order. ...  ... These folks are also quick to call the cops on homeless people walking by or sitting outside reading the newspaper. Most other locations in central Phoenix don't seem to have a problem when homeless people sit near or in the cafes; in fact, I've seen baristas at other locations offer water, etc. So, if you're not into a place that criminalizes someone who hasn't done anything wrong, I wouldn't recommend patronizing this location.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (899 chars)
Ordered a drink here that I get at another location regularly. The other location told me there is a very specific way to ask for the drink, which will make the baristas job easier and I was told it was a company wide thing. So I tried to order it here the same way.... BIG mistake... The cashier, Heston was rude and seemed annoyed that I would be asking for the drink in such a way, he even told me to "get to the point". I admit, I was struggling to order it because I have completely forgotten what exactly to say but his attitude toward me was unnecessary! I apologized for "wasting" his time and he said, "next time just say what you want. We are busy and I don't have time for this song and dance!" Good. Grief! I have to mention... I was the ONLY one in the store at the time, so I am not too sure why he was in such a hurry... ...  ... I will not be coming back. I suggest you do the same!


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (611 chars)
SInce when does a trip to Starbucks take 20 minutes. No, I didn't get a fancy frapuccino order for 5 people at work. Actually, I only one an iced coffee and a regular americano. No reason to take that long, unless the person in front of you ordered enough sugar-based drinks to give you a sugar high for a month. Oh and maybe the fact that there are only 2 people working there on a busy morning has something to do with that. Either way, I would rather go to any other place for coffee or skip it all together. This Starbucks made me late to work and I cannot believe they have such a low standard of service.


................................................................................
LOCATION #65:  address="5557 N 7th St"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85014"  (18 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (706 chars)
I have to say that even though I am not a huge Starbucks aficionado, coming here last night was pleasant..  After patronizing Starbucks in NYC and San Fran for 2 years each, its nice to finally be able to sit down and have a cup of coffee, without there being a 1,001 people in or out at all times, thus making it a very unpleasant experience.  The drive-thru was not busy and only 2 people were there with on laptops.  The employees at the counter were very nice, and we were chatting up a storm. Knowing that I will be able to come in here without a line during 5 p.m., is something of value to me. I would say I am glad to have this location in my neighborhood, and will be returning soon! Thanks guys!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (253 chars)
My favorite Starbucks so far!  It's spacious and comfortable inside.  This is one of the newer locations, so everything inside looks good! ...  ... My only issue with this place: Get a better internet provider...  Wow the internet can be rough here...!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (167 chars)
Very "inviting" staff! met the manager Ben... who was extremly friendly, spoke to me for over 5 mins... which was pleasantly surprising! clean restrooms... big plus!!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (130 chars)
Not a bad location and definitely way easier than the Bethany Home and 16th St. Starbucks to get in and out of. Definitely a fan!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (400 chars)
I'm not a huge starbucks fan, but my friend and I came here to study, and this is a great place for studying!  In fact, all the other people here were studying too! We will become regulars!  ...  ... Btw the staff is very friendly, but then have you ever been to a starbucks where the staff wasn't?? ...  ... Don't get the pumpkin spice frappachino unless you want to die from sugar overload!! Yuck!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (356 chars)
I often go to this shop and I enjoy it.  It's a bit larger than usual so you can do work at the tables or relax in the large chairs.  The staff is friendly and by now they usually know my order.  Lots of parking and the drive-thru is fast. ...  ... One con is that the large chairs tend to have crumbs in them.  You have to do a brush down before you sit.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (209 chars)
The drive thru here is very efficient, and the staff is always nice and friendly, even at 6am on a Monday (always appreciated!). My only complaint is that sometimes my extra hot coffee is not so extra hot :-(


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (121 chars)
Location is close. Staff is nice. Best part is that it's never crowded. Willing to do a pour over of my favorite coffee.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (1347 chars)
We drive through here every Saturday  and Sunday on the way to dog park.  First off, I like Starbucks coffee, and the hearty rich punch of coffee flavor.  I like that Starbucks does an "Americano", which is probably their only "frou-frou" drink other than a  latte that exists in the non-Starbucks world.  I've found some independents don't do Americano's because they think it's too "Starbucks".  Go to France folks, "Americanos" all over.  So knowing that I like Starbucks, here's the scoop on this shop: ... 1) Service is inconsistent - sometimes courteous, quick and spot on (usually the Sunday AM lady who is currently out due to knee surgery), but sometimes they are slow and get the order all wacked up and forget things.  ... 2) the blender is near where the person taking the order often stands.  "I'd like a wrrrrrrrrrrrrrrr.  A what? whrrrrrrrrrrrrr.... ... 3) Sometimes panhandlers hang our at the drive through.  Hasn't happened in the last month or so, but has occurred more than once.  We always notify the person at the window - don't know if they do anything about it ... 4) Inside is generally clean and neat ... 5) When I do go inside, I inevitably get stuck behind people who like to blab about themselves to the person behind the counter, other people in line, or someone on the cell.  Maybe that's  just a weird coincidence.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (270 chars)
Dude, it's a Starbucks...just like the other one down the street from the other 4 just around the corner... ...  ... My one and only visit to this location (so far) was pleasant and I successfully ordered, acquired, mixed, and drank my Americano.  Mission accomplished.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (173 chars)
Average location with drive thru. Employees friendly, but still got a one drink order wrong after confirming at drive thru speaker when ordered and at window where you pay.


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (712 chars)
Booooo Booooo! I'm NOT a StarYucks patron. Really. I'm not. However some evil friend gave me a StarYucks gift card and of course I had to use it. So. I tried. I don't do the half caf, part skim, part whole, chai, with light chocolate sprinkles venti grande tallie or whatever. I truly  hate those people. But I did request a soy latte. They were out of soy. Hmmm...Ok. I run a restaurant, I understand running out of products. Next day, same StarYucks. Same drive thru. Same monster in the window. Soy Latte please. Sorry, no soy milk. Oh for crap sake. This StarYucks is 200 yards from a grocery store. That sells soy and other market goods. So I peeled out, went to Lux, and my world was at peace. Once again.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (154 chars)
Need some iced love!  At least I can say Starbucks is consistent in making really bad coffee.  Add lots of sugar and milk and you'll never really notice.


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (1180 chars)
So today was the last straw.  I am a new customer to Starbucks and have visited this store on several occasions and for the most part the employees have been efficient but very grumpy.  I have on two occasions in the past month spoken to the manager about it - I think his name is John - about the grumpy people that work there.  On the phone he promised me a free drink the next time I was in (which he conveniently forgot when I asked him about it). ...  ... The first few times I was in I was waited on by a young lady who never smiled (actually it was more of a scowl) and when I interacted with her she was blank faced and sour in her reactions.  This was the person I spoke to the manager about.   ...  ... Today I was served by a young lady who basically threw my drink at me (energetically) and when I asked for extra ice she scowled at me.  Never said thanks, smiled or offered any pleasantries. ...  ... Basically the service in that store s*&ks.  I have been in there multiple times and have never really gotten anything close to what I would call happy service. ...  ... Thought you should know.  Unfortunately I will not be going into that store again. ...  ... Greg


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (908 chars)
Baristas here are rude! Try to avoid this Starbucks as much as possible. When my dad ordered his drink with his accent the barista (Hanna) at the drive through made fun of him! How insulting. When it was my turn to place my order I made sure to share with Hanna a couple of customer service tips. She was so embarrassed she had someone else give us our drinks. I wish I would have had the chance to talk to the manager about her behavior, but honestly I had more important things to do. Also, on Sunday when I went through the drive through they quickly told me what my total was without asking if there was anything else that I needed. "I am not done yet! " and then the guy laughed. Apparently everything you tell them is a joke. Also, last month they were out of venti cups..... I personally love Starbucks, but when it comes to customer service one bad experience it's all it takes to  lose the loyalty.


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (637 chars)
Terrible! Today was the 4th, yes 4th time they have messed up my order. 1st, they forgot my sandwich, 2nd they sent my sandwich to the drive thru, 3rd they sent my iced coffee to the drive thru, and a day later (!) They forgot to make my coffee altogether. Mind you, the last time I was the ONLY person in line. How is that even possible. I can't tell you how many free drinks I've gotten out of this location. These most recent 4 issues are just in the past month. There are many more I could go in to, but I don't have the time or energy to start. If you can put up with the service, then I would say go there to just get free drinks!


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (461 chars)
I try to support local coffee shops in general (grow your local economy, folks!), but Starbucks' vanilla rooibos, when served over ice, just cannot be beat.  So I frequent Starbucks too! ...  ... Not. This. One. ...  ... For some reason, this location just cannot handle serving this brewed tea iced.  It is literally the only location that I've ever been to that flat out refuses to do it (on three separate occasions, by three separate baristas).  I give up!


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (308 chars)
I spend a lot of money each month on my iced coffees and I love Starbucks, but this location gets my drink wrong EVERY time I go there. The reason I continue to go to this Starbucks location is because it is so close to my work and I only get a 30 minute lunch. I wish they could get their service in check!


................................................................................
LOCATION #66:  address="570-598 E Osborn Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85014"  (22 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (470 chars)
I usually wouldn't write a review for a Starbucks, but this one is special.  ...  ... Located in the Old School plaza on the corner of 7th Street and Osborn, this is one of the most well designed Stabucks I have seen. There is a nice shaded outdoor space with a giant couch and several tables. Inside, there are several 2-4 person tables with one large family style table in the center. ...  ... As for the service and coffee...its what you would expect from Starbucks.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (211 chars)
My coffee spot. Everyone's super nice and I love my dirty chais. The drive thru is pretty quick as well. Sometimes I just like to go in and sit and wait for my coffee. Relaxing and I dig the inside layout. Yay!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (86 chars)
I like this Starbucks. I came in the afternoons and it was always a great experience.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1236 chars)
This Is a New Store So Obviously It's Not Going To Be Perfect at First... Either Way No Place/Restaurant/Business Is Completely Perfect...  ...  ... First Off, If you want to Ensure Your Order Is Correct Make Sure The Barista has your Order Correct and Don't Just Drive Up to the Window without Verifying Anything Because That Is More Likely to allow your order to be taken wrong. ... Please Do Your Best Not To Order Additional Items AT The Window Because It Will Only Take Longer And Consequently Will Make Any People In Line Behind You Wait Longer... So Please Avoid Ordering at the Window... ...  ...  Also, Starbucks Is NOT Meant To be A Super Fast Drive Through Place As It Is Not Just Any Random Fast Food Place... It Is Meant To Be A High-Quality Welcoming Coffee Shop... So Do Not Be Surprised If The Wait Is a Little Too Long.. Especially If you saw a Long Line But decided To Go Anyways... In The End Your Nonfat Pumpkin Spice Latte Should Be Worth It... And If It's Not... The Person at the Window is Not to Blame... And Starbucks can Afford one less customer... Or two.. Nevertheless Patience Is a Virtue...  ...  ... If you follow Through With These Tips, Your Starbucks Experience Should (And Will Most Likely Be) Great!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (264 chars)
Brev Cappachino!   ...  ... I've never been a big fan of taste of Starbucks coffee but, certainly, it's always a welcoming environment.  However, today...my coffee was brilliantly made...even in the paper cup!  Hoo-rah, for the new Starbucks on 7th St and Osborn!


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (537 chars)
I visited the establishment on Friday 11/15 in the afternoon. ...  ... I give this place 3 stars for the following reasons: ...  ... 1.  Service was on the slow side at the registers (4 people in one line, 1 cashier - possible staffing issues). ...  ... 2.  The wi-fi is PAINSTAKINGLY SLOW!! (with only 3-4 people present in dining area).  Internet speeds clocked in at less than 1Mbps at times.. never better than 1.5 Mbps (could hardly read emails, browse websites - and yes same experience on laptop, tablet device as well as phone).


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (495 chars)
I really like the layout of this new Starbucks and the building is pretty cool too.  Normally the services at Starbucks are pretty great.  But this time around we did not have a really good experience.  The guys that check us out were nice and friendly.  When we were waiting to pick up our coffee, we waited more than 10 minutes and we only had a couple of people ahead of us.  Also they make my mom's coffee wrong.   ...  ... Since I really like Starbucks I will give this store another shot.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (326 chars)
Just your standard Starubucks with a new industrial modern look.  The interiors is cute.  BUT...  ...  ... WORST PARKING LOT EVER!  - So pay attention when you go thru the parking lot.   ...  ... And don't use the drive-thru, you lazy people.  You know who you are... You almost got me into 3 seperate accidents this morning.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (305 chars)
This is a brand new location for Starbucks and it's mostly a drive through venue. There is a pint-sized area inside (4-5 tables) and a larger outdoor patio if you wish to relax with your beverage and pirate some wifi. ...  ... Employees here were prompt and pleasant. Overall, a fairly typical Starbucks.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (249 chars)
The drive thru is usually consistently efficient but don't bother going inside...they are slow, unfriendly and disorganized.  I have no idea how that is but I've been stopping in here pretty regularly for a few months and this is what I always get!


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (230 chars)
Nothing to write home about. It's hit or miss when it comes to good service. It's also hit and miss when it comes to drink integrity. Some days the iced coffee I order is great and others it's over sweetened or had too much milk.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (173 chars)
I would have thought they would have better service considering the overabundance of staff. Kind of an "iffy" location. Not easy in & out access. Parking behind store only.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (1189 chars)
I rarely leave negative reviews.. but this is consistently the worst service out of any Starbucks I've been to - EVER. Unfortunately I go here because it is close to my house and I love starbucks iced coffee... But almost ALL the employees are always completely out of it, slow, not eager to help, and constantly make mistakes because thy aren't listening/don't care. It's so weird - I actually really think Starbucks manager and corporate staff would not be happy. Normally I love starbucks but this is more like an overstaffed-yet-super-slow store pretending to be starbucks. It's not fast or efficient like the brand is known for. It's like everyone hired here are high school dropouts with no desire to do anything. It's bad service EVERYTIME and the drive thru line is always really slow because the chick they always have it makes so many mistakes. Also- they never have the creamer out on the weekend mornings and it's like pulling teeth trying to get their attention to ask for it. All I get is a black iced coffee, and it ALWAYS takes at LEAST 10 minutes.... on the weekends after 10am. Not their busiest time. The line is just long because all the workers are alway so confused.


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (715 chars)
This Starbucks is never open at 5am when I try to stop by.  One morning I wasn't in a rush so I patiently waited for them to get their stuff together.  A half hour later I finally got my coffee.  I don't always have that luxury. ...  ... This morning, the interior lights were on but there was an employee standing outside, knocking on the door, to have no one open it for him.  The drive thru board was off as I drove through irritated that once again they were not open.  This was at 5:10am.  Every time I visit the store first thing in the morning they have not been open.  ...  ... I don't plan on visiting this store again.  It's obvious there's a trend with the employees that they can't get to work on time.


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (512 chars)
This Starbucks single-handedly caused me to swear off all Starbucks as my new years resolution. Every time I visited this location they were beyond slow, and have a tendency to mess up my order. I ordered a soy latte and got severely burnt regular milk. It's slower to go inside and be one of two customers than to be at the back of a 10 car line up in the drive thru. I only went here because I was in a hurry- the one things Starbucks is usually best at. I live across the street and will never go here again.


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (368 chars)
Been to many Starbucks and this place is by far the worst. Staff are absolutely rude and unhelpful. How can there be absolutely no sugar or sweetener at 10am during a weekday? Unacceptable! And when I asked about it just got a snippy sorry? Never again, go to park central a few blocks over instead. This town needs a real coffee place instead of this corporate crap.


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (280 chars)
Slowest Starbucks in Phoenix. Whether I'm the only car in the drive thru, in a line through the parking lot (often), or waiting inside, they have never been faster than a 10 min wait time. ...  ... If you find yourself on the corner of Osborn and 7th, keep driving. Not worth it.


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (237 chars)
I like this one, nice people, nice atmosphere, great location, I just for the life of me can't figure why whether in drive thru or in store, the service is sooooo slow and they often get drinks wrong! Not sure where the blame should go!


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (177 chars)
7 minutes to get an iced tea. I was inside and there was no one in front of me.  I rarely come to this location because it always takes this long whether its peak times or not.


REVIEW #20:  1 stars  (121 chars)
Boo. There is already a great coffee shop on this corner  Urban Beans. Stay local get better service and food and drink.


REVIEW #21:  1 stars  (120 chars)
Slowest Starbucks ever! Going on 15min for vanilla latte. 15min may not sound long, but for a drink, on a slow morning.


REVIEW #22:  1 stars  (90 chars)
Horrible service. Long wait times.  No communication.  Over staffed and under performing.


................................................................................
LOCATION #67:  address="7000 E Mayo Blvd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85054"  (12 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (417 chars)
This is my - on the way to work - Starbucks and I must say, the staff are always polite, efficient and friendly. My very early mornings at work are always made much more pleasant. I've been to roughly 1 million of the 10 million Starbucks in this nation, and customer service is apparently optional. This store is the exception. Take the extra trip to come here. ( just please do so after 8am so there's no line ) :)


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (276 chars)
Never a bad experience at Starbucks.  I am here with my dog, Molly.  Being respectful of the premises I did not bring Molly into the store. I called the store and spoke to Terry who took my order and brought it out to me. She even brought Molly a cup of water...a nice touch!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (196 chars)
Super fast service. It is a little hard to find since the actual Starbucks is hidden by other stores. Friendly customer service and the whole place was clean and not messy at all which is a plus.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (170 chars)
I love Starbucks coffee.  My new favorite is the blonde roast.  This location gets pretty crowded, especially on Friday mornings.  The baristas here are really friendly.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (150 chars)
I love stopping by this Starbucks. The staff here is great and it seems to be a lower traffic location- which makes for a quick drink or quiet break.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (762 chars)
This Sarbucks is right next to my work so I am here 3-4 times a week (at least!) One thing I really like is their large patio equipped with a misting system.  The majority of the tables are under the roof awning so it's a great place to relax with your coffee and utilize their free WiFi or go old school and read the paper. If your lucky you might even see one of their regulars; a gentleman who sits outside with his toucan on his shoulder! Scared the bejesus out of me first time I walked past him... ... Inside the baristas are friendly and efficient and have no problem making custom offers. They also regularly have samples of new drinks and/or food items out for customers to sample. There is also adequate seating inside if you can't deal with the heat!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (156 chars)
Quaint little spot, gets pretty crowded during busy hours, but experienced baristas that handle it with ease. Other than that, just your average Starbucks!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (59 chars)
They make good coffee and the service is consistently fast


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (111 chars)
Smaller than normal Starbucks, but plenty of parking.  Nice location in nice shopping area.  Staff was polite.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (441 chars)
Just like the rating. Meh. ... Baristas look like they are bored out of their minds. ... My friend wanted to inquire about their free Tall Hazelnut macchiato, and boy were they sour about it. They decide to honor the promotion, like they should, and gave my friend her free drink. I bought a venti sized, and was given what? Caramel macchiato. ... Disappointed for sure, and I won't be coming back, mainly cuz I live in Southern California.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (22 chars)
Consistently average.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (279 chars)
Don't get coffee here. One staff person isn't clean.    There's a grungy looking bearded guy with Mohawk that works on weekends, saw adjust his underwear from the crack of his a$$ and did not wash his hands. He reached in far, ish was nasty yo. . Also, slow wifi and no outlets.


................................................................................
LOCATION #68:  address="701 W McDowell Rd Ste 100"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85007"  (24 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (587 chars)
This store is brand new,  just opened this past Sunday!!  It is right on the edge of the F Q Story historical district.   ...  ... The store has a more traditional coffee house feel than other Starbucks have.  With the exposed red brick and the open cubbies for storing the syrups, cups and saucers it, the store really says "Come in and stay awhile".   There's is a nice sitting area with two home style chairs and a chaise lounge. ...  ... The patio is inviting with a quite grassy area and many trees.  In just a few months, this is going to be the place to hang out and enjoy life!!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (455 chars)
It's my fav starbuck cuz it's across the street form my house. It taunts me daily. Pavlovian response make my mouth water for a white mocha nonfat no whip everytime. The people who work there remember the regulars and offer suggestions and even help you save money by working the angles to get you the combination special price.  Also a good place for people watching or picking up a little something on the way to the light rail or antiquing up 7th Ave.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (350 chars)
This place is pretty much everything I'm looking for from a Starbucks.  Good, standard drinks.  Very friendly staff who remember my name and my order.  Always clean and definitely one of the busier Starbucks locations in the Valley.  Parking in the relatively small attached lot can be tricky at times because they share it w/ a Pei Wei and Sidebar.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (187 chars)
I haven't had bad service or a bad experience at all since my last review - it's actually been great each time! I've been back at least 10 times since then. And will continue to go back.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (182 chars)
"The Purple Starbucks" this is what my friends and I refer to this one as!  I've never received anything short of great service at this particular location.  Always clean and quick!


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (131 chars)
Great friendly service. The morning crew know and remember their customers. The drinks are out fast. My favorite store in Phoenix.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (90 chars)
Fast and super friendly and got my drink order right.  That is all I expect at Starbucks!


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (32 chars)
Great location. Friendly staff.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (1074 chars)
Situated next to a Pei Wei Chinese restaurant on the southwest corner of 7th ave and McDowell, this starbucks seems to have a classy crowd probably due to the reviews here on Yelp. There are 10-20 seating places outside with plenty of umbrellas and inside they keep the a/c at a pleasant 75F. Vaulted exposed wood rafters and modern industrial large ac ducting give this and outdoorsy feel without being garrish.  All the servers were polite and fast and I even tested them by paying in quarters for the hell of it.  Plenty of fresh looking food available and the wifi connection speed is the standard 1.4Megabit DL and 1.2 Megabit upload (Divide Mbit by 8 to get actual MB) Ping was 62ms.  5 or so tables inside and 4 comfy victorian-esque seats available for those who want to enjoy wifi or a good read, with side tables, lamps, and plenty of power outlets.  My Chai Latte was manifico, Pros: Indoor Outdoor Seating, upgraded seating, Snacks Coffee Tea, Power outlets, AC, Friendly Staff, Clean, Fast, etc.. Cons: it may be hard to find a seat, due to its popularity now.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (820 chars)
This 'bucks is right down the street from my house, so whenever I get a caffeine fix, I take a little walk to my local Starbucks. It does suck that this, Pei Wei and SideBar took over the fierce Emerald Lounge, but business is business.  ... Anyway, in no time at all the staff knew my name and my drink. Does that mean I go there too much or they're just that good? I vote for the latter, and on top of it these guys know the right way to make my drink. I've tried to explain my drink to other baristas in other stores from Phoenix to LA to Vegas to San Francisco (jeez I visit Starbucks too much), and they never get it quite right.  ... Also the place is usually spotless, even when it's crowded, which makes for a great hang out spot. And unlike other Starbucks, it has a grassy lil area to make it feel more comfy!


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (739 chars)
This 'bucks is right down the street from my house, so whenever I get a caffeine fix, I take a little walk to my local Starbucks. It does suck that this, Pei Wei and SideBar took over the fierce Emerald Lounge, but business is business.  ... Anyway, in no time at all the staff knew my name and my drink. Does that mean I go there too much or they're just that good? I vote for the latter, and on top of it these guys know the right way to make my drink. I've tried to explain my drink to other baristas in other stores from Phoenix to LA to Vegas to San Francisco (jeez I visit Starbucks too much), and they never get it quite right.  ... Also the place is usually spotless, even when it's crowded, which makes for a great hang out spot.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (729 chars)
This is a great Starbucks because I found it early on a Saturday morning when I was passing through town really really jonesing for some of my coffee. I was so relieved I wasn't even upset for having 2 people in line ahead of me. I got my mocha with a minimum of drama, always a plus. The server was pleasant and perky, even smiling. Much better than the Circle K worker across the street. He was a sourpuss. Starbucks had cleaner bathrooms too.  ...  ... I got my gas from sourpuss and my coffee from perky smiles. Back on the road in less than 20 minutes.  ...  ... Directions: Take the 7th Avenue North exit off of I-10. a few blocks north to the corner of W. McDowell Ave. It is on the southwest  corner of 7th and McDowell.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (680 chars)
The only way this Starbucks could be any more convenient for me would be to add a drive thru! It is situated right off the 10 (just a short 2 minute drive from my house), so I can swing by first thing in the morning before I get on the freeway to head to work. It's a smaller store but most people that come through here don't hang out, they are the "grab your coffee and go" types. However there is a really nice patio outside if you choose to enjoy your drink there.  ...  ... The employees here are always super friendly, relaxed, and quick with your order, even when the line is to the door! Out of all the Starbucks in the downtown area, this will always be my first choice!


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (656 chars)
A cute Starbucks that still has some character despite the corporate attempt to make it just like every other. The wall where the seats are (along the window) is still solid brick, so there is no way to put a power outlet. Instead, they have the power outlets in the ceiling, so your cord gets to dangle. Odd, but charming. And when you're looking up and stretching to get the power adapter into the jack, note the wood rafters and unfinished ceiling hiding up there. ...  ... They also have some umbrella covered tables outside. ...  ... Wi-fi worked great. ...  ... Tip: This is an "interesting" neighborhood. Watch your surroundings in the parking lot.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (406 chars)
I'm a fan of Starbucks fan, so I'm biased.  But this is what I like about this store (because they aren't all the same). ...  ... I love the building.  I kind of wish that all cafes had this version of interior design (and even the Starbucks theme works here). ...  ... The staff is so darn nice.  They help start my day with a real smile and a kind word. ...  ... The coffee and food is relable and good.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (367 chars)
I usually prefer giving my money to local venues, however, this is my FAVORITE Starbucks. ...  ... The baristas are always in a great mood and smiling. They also make an effort to remember their customers, which is difficult to do in such a large city. ...  ... The only downfall is the fact they share parking with Pei Wei, often making it difficult to find a spot.


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (245 chars)
Love Starbucks)))) The place is nice, the service is great and it's walking distance from my place.  The only thing I don't like - sometimes they don't have my fav pecan tart. That's the only desert I'm enjoying.  They should have it always))))


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (1014 chars)
I am visiting Phoenix for the first time this week, and I like to have familiar along with all the strange of being here newly. I have not traveled much abroad, so I can imagine it being orders of magnitude more difficult if it was in a country with a foreign language.  ...  ... So seeing a Starbucks was a relief. Say what you will, but coming home in a different neighborhood is a good thing. You can say that SBUX is a home away from home. I am sure hotels try to do the same thing, to remain unique, but familiar enough so you can relax better.  ...  ... Came in on Monday morning and ordered 2 Americanos. Nothing special. Got my coffee and drove away. There is no drive through, and they share the building with a Chinese-themed restaurant named Pei Wei Asian Diner. In looking for this Starbucks, I discovered that  Pei Wei is a subsidiary of P. F. Chang's. Now you know.  ...  ... The SBUX was clean, not crowded at 10 in the morning. Service had  to be good because I was the only customer in the store.


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (792 chars)
I like this Charbucks a lot. I just wish they served non starbucks coffee :) ...  ... It's right on a busy corner, but there are steel bollards to prevent drunk drivers from crashing into and killing the folks sitting on the patio.  ...  ... It's right off the freeway, so I have a lot of business meetings there when I'm working at home - other people can get to it easily from nearby areas.  ...  ... It's grassy outside and there is comfortable seating.  ...  ... Inside this starbucks, it's all exposed brick and duct work. Very urban cool. ...  ... I hate that Starbucks charges for WIFI. I never use it - it's not worth it. I get Internet over my phone, anyway. ...  ... There aren't a lot of coffee options right in this area, so this is pretty much it for me when I need a cuppa joe.


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (498 chars)
It's not the friendliest staff that works here at night. I went in once and was really impressed with the building and the remodel they did, but the two girls working that night ignored me for the most part. What really pissed me off was the girl who made my drink walked away before ringing it up to get someone else to ring it up for me. No problem I understand she is probably logged into the cashier, but she sure as hell took her sweet time finishing stocking the fridge before she helped me.


REVIEW #21:  3 stars  (304 chars)
Starbucks is Starbucks, but their service is a big part of why I paid $3 for an iced tea rather than wait in line across the street at McDonalds. Unfortunatly, they fell shortthis time and I even got a grimace when asking for extra ice for me tea. It's 110 out, ice is nice - especially for that $3 tea.


REVIEW #22:  3 stars  (79 chars)
Iced mocha was good, but nothing special. Servers were very friendly, however.


REVIEW #23:  2 stars  (1063 chars)
My previous experience at this location was great. My experience tonight was anything but great. It took the barista five minutes to even come out from the back room. Then she was rude when she took my order. She wouldn't even talk directly to me except to ask me what size I wanted. She was too busy talking to her co-worker and friends that had come to visit. I watched for my drink after I ordered it, but it took a few minutes being that there was a lady ahead of me. I was getting my stuff around for a minute and she didn't even call out my drink - she just left it sitting on the counter. I mix it up and take a sip of it, ready to ignore all of that, only to have my tastebuds be overcome by all the extra flavor in the drink. I got a venti caramel crunch frappe and could only drink a fourth of it, because it tasted like I took a bottle of syrup and drank it. ...  ... I say all of that to say that it was the baristas working that made this experience a bad one. I still very much like this location, but I will have to watch for some decent baristas.


REVIEW #24:  2 stars  (740 chars)
Probably won't be going back to this Starback... I ordered the green tea frapp and Chicken Bacon Swiss sandwich... Waited 10 minutes to be told that they were out of the ingredients for the sandwich. :-(   The guy exits to the side after relaying this bit of news to me. I sit.., as I am waiting to get a refund. Guy returns only to start taking orders. I go back up to the counter and inquired about the refund. Guy states, "oh, we have it." Uuuh!  ...  ... I get the $6 sandwich and literary there are two cubes of chicken and two shriveled up slices of bacon on a half toasted bun. Geez! ...  ... Seating is limited. The store is very tight. ...  ... Good thing that the green tea frapp had it going on or this review would be one star!


................................................................................
LOCATION #69:  address="730 W Camelback"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85013"  (8 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (880 chars)
So there is a Starbucks on every corner but each has it's own unique look and customer service. This was my first visit to this new location. I like the buidling structure. It is quite unique compared to most Starbucks locations that are not attached to other shopping centers. It has this appeal when you walk in that is cozy. very trendy and upbeat but still that relaxing coffee shop we know Startbucks for. The team was mighty friendly. Properly staffed for the amount of traffic I can imagine to walk through the doors. Even though I did not walk in during rush hour there was still plenty of patrons who were meeting or dining.  ...  ... Greeted by the friendly team on staff for the day. My drink was properly made and served with a smile.  ...  ... This location is much larger than traditional Starbucks. Plenty of room to meet a small group inside or outside the venue.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (381 chars)
Great Starbucks whether you go through the drive thru or inside. I stop by every morning (drive thru). Service is quick and the employees are all really nice. My order has always been correct. ...  ... The inside is spacious and there is a nice sized patio. It's always been real clean anytime I have been inside and even if there are a lot of people, it never feels very crowded.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (291 chars)
Boo so much for adding a business on yelp. lolz.  ...  ... Literally was the second or third person here once they opened. Hehe ...  ... Irma helps me every other morning. She is super friendly and love her energy at 8 in the morning.  :) ...  ... I LOVE THIS patio here. Loveeee STARBUCKS.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1001 chars)
The upside of this Starbucks is that it has one of the world's biggest patios. Seriously. It's an enormous wrap-around patio.....like something you'd see on a southern Victorian-style home.....oooohhhh now I'm craving fried chicken.....I digress. ...  ... So yeah, they have a pretty bad patio. I mean bad in the Micheal Jackson sense, not in the textbook definition. It's even full of misters to keep it cool. It's still a bit toasty to sit out there in the summer though. ...  ... What I don't understand about this laptop-dwellers' paradise is that they have such limited seating indoors. Seriously. Half of the restaurant is empty floor space. Why not jam pack it full of tables and chairs? Back east, that floor space is top dollar....tables are so squeezed into spaces, you sneeze and you hit the guy three tables over.  ...  ... Needless to say, you'll need to get there early to claim your spot if you want to sit indoors. Or you can brave the elements and sit outside. More tables out there.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (1054 chars)
Update: they're getting better.  I got an iced coffee for a day of errands.  Although I still prefer to frequent local joints, this was cold and refreshing.  The service has also improved. ...  ...  ... I have gone against my better judgement today by going through the drive thru at the new Starbucks by my house.   I try to support local businesses and want to commend SB for retrofitting  an old restaurant BUT have some reservations about their ability to be successful based on the service I received.  I pulled in behind one car at 3pm on a Saturday and there were at least 5 employees inside with a couple of customers waiting at the counter.  I waited 9 minutes at the window after having to repeat my order twice and when I got it home, it was wrong.  It was a skinny hazelnut and a lemon loaf, NOT rocket science! To top things off, the guy waiting on me said HE had to make my coffee.    What is that supposed to mean?! I know your staff is new and are working out the kinks but I expect more from you.  It's not like you have no competition.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (745 chars)
There have been 2 or 3 restaurants in this location over the past 10 years or so and I think that Starbucks hit the nail on the head by taking over this location.  The patio is awesome!  Great for people watching (trust me, there are a lot of people to be watched from the light rail, to the queens over at Charlie's).  My biggest gripe.  The staff seem so discombobulated with their service.  They always seem to be going in neutral.  I have personally had to wait 10 minutes for an iced coffee which is already brewed and I avoid the drive thru at all cost.  I am not a fan of drive thru's at any type of restaurant.  Overall, this is a great location and I will continue to be a regular but please, get the customer service kinks ironed out.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (299 chars)
Staff is great, product is great, poor location. You will be harassed by homeless people and pedestrians if you sit on the patio. It is right next to one of the busiest light rail stops. Constant panhandlers if you are on the patio, no joke. After I had 5 in 10 minutes once, I stopped going there.


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (842 chars)
I was delighted when I found out this Starbucks location was opening. I work down the street so I thought this would become a regular stop for me on my morning commute. ...  ... The employees of this location have all been very nice and welcoming, however, the morning crew really needs a stronger manager to be working with them. I stopped frequenting this location because of the snail like pace of the service. No matter if I go through the drive thru or walk into the store the team can never complete my order in a timely manner. ...  ... The order I am having trouble with consists of a medium coffee and a breakfast sandwich. Obviously the coffee is given to me immediately, but the breakfast sandwich has always taken at least 15 minutes to get to me and usually cold. Somehow my order always seems to get lost amongst the employees.


................................................................................
LOCATION #70:  address="9925 W Camelback Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85037"  (16 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (615 chars)
This is a great little Starbucks.  The fact that they have a drive thru alone puts them at the maximum alloted stars.  But, the people that work here have always been friendly.  When I used to live a few blocks away I went here a couple times a day.  I was just back in town for a few days and came here everyday and they are still holding strong with their customer service.  If you live in this part of Glendale, you probably know that not too many places have employees who smile or seem happy but this Starbucks has hired some good people it seems.  Definitely worth the drive if it's a little out of your way.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (515 chars)
I've stopped here twice when I was out that way for  DODGERS spring training.   ...  ... Both times I went through the drive through and ordered frap Java Chip.  Frab Java Chip has 2 road bumps, 1 all the ice has to be ground up well enough to get through the straw.  2 all the java chips haveto be ground  up well enough to get through the straw. ...  ... This location is 2 for 2 and  that is better then  I can say for any other starbucks I've been too. ...  ... It's much appreciated when they do things right.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (363 chars)
I come to this Starbucks location 1 to 3 times a day. The staff are always cheerful and pleasant and if there's ever a problem with my order (which is very rare), they fix it promptly and with a smile. I love this place! By far they are the best Starbucks in the Phoenix area and I have mostly been to all of them. Keep up the great service guys.....you rock! :)


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (214 chars)
i went here to get two passion fruit tea but when i went to my wallet i was short in cash. The staff there were very nice and told me don't worry. After that pleasent experience, they will always have my business.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (73 chars)
Great staff always friendly and offer a great tasting and speedy service


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (28 chars)
always fantastic service!!!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (341 chars)
Quiet and mellow location. Great for work/study. There is an outlet with 6 adapters in the corner of the store.The sofa chairs and one table have easy access to it. If you have a long cord, other tables can reach it as well. At the other end of the store, there is a table with an outlet. Staff seem friendly and there is plenty of parking.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (319 chars)
Generally good service (a few baristas aren't as friendly as others). Drive thru is almost always quicker than going inside, despite how long the drive thru line may be. Drinks are consistent, which is important- some Starbucks tend to be inconsistent. When they do make the rare mistake, they own up to it and fix it.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (305 chars)
You can never go wrong at a Starbucks for coffee and a quiet chill place for studying or anything really. Just a tip, once you get here and you see any availing tables or chairs grab it. They go fast here because this is a smaller coffee shop. Other than that, as always great staff and great enviroment.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (201 chars)
I've been going to this Starbucks for several months now. the Batistas are always friendly. The drive-thru can get congested, but most.that have a drive-thru seem to have that issue from time to time.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (162 chars)
For a company as large as they are, they sure do know how to do things right.  I don't often take out a loan to get coffee, but when I do, I make it a Starbucks.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (378 chars)
Just disappointed in there prepared foods as quality has dropped significantly lately. I understand baristas are rushed and don't expect perfection everytime but the protein boxes and salads have been wilted lately, have had old fruit, missing salt for my egg and only 7 grapes this time. I just think the price is absurd for the tiniest quantity of food to be of poor quality.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (121 chars)
There are some awesome people here a few not so...sways confused over cafe expresso and just expresso... that's annoying


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (811 chars)
Sitting at this Starbucks right now and am witnessing the same rude customer service I just received.  I walked in and was not greeted except with "I will be right with you".....  I wait a minute or two and am greeted again with same response.  The barista was just standing there punching in numbers and complaining about cups or something.  Then when I finally ordered, I felt as if I was inconveniencing her.  Before my order was completed she was helping the person behind me.  Asked if they wanted their regular.  Let me repeat, my order was not completed!  Then he gets his order way before I got mine.  Just frustrating to say the least.  I really like the location of this but just awful service today.  Awful.  Seems like this barrista picks and chooses who she wants to be friendly to.  End Rant.  :)


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (390 chars)
The baristas were nice enough but the service was incredibly slow.  There was no line when I came in but apparently there were at least 2 or 3 orders ahead of me ... and they didn't start serving the first one ahead of me until 2 minutes of waiting.  I got the chocolate chip blended drink and it was really icy ... I've had the drink before and it's usually creamier.  Very disappointing.


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (231 chars)
The drive through barista has been a bit surley when I have visited there.  Today the credit card receipt blew out their window and the barista only said "lovely" and stomped away as if it was my fault?  They seemed a little rude.


................................................................................
LOCATION #71:  address="Phoenix International Airport 3800 W Sky Harbor Blvd T4/Concourse C"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85034"  (33 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1753 chars)
Stopped in to get some boiling water so I could heat up the pasta I brought from home (airport food is usually expensive & not that great), p/u a Very Berry Hibiscus (yum!), & make good use of the airport's free WiFi & ample wall plugs (and seating) in Starbucks. Fortunately, it didn't have that stinky coffee smell (I hate that) & it was extremely quiet for a Starbucks. ...  ... Susan was my cashier & she was very personable. She teased me for thinking that my request for hot water was silly. LOL I only ordered a Very Berry Hibiscus, but she's a great salesperson because she asked if I wanted to get a larger beverage or purchase any pastries. I didn't order anything else because I brought my own pasta & chips and wanted to grab a cocktail before my flight. Like a typical Starbucks, the line never seemed to end and the lady who was making the drinks was super quick! Her strategy was to ask people in line what they ordered before they paid and helped to keep the line moving along nicely.  ...  ... *Confession: Every time a plane takes off or lands, the entire room shakes slightly & that's not the easiest thing to get use to since I'm from California & it seemed like we kept having mini earthquakes.* ...  ... Unfortunately, I was unable to obtain internet access in Starbucks (and I wanted a cocktail) so I moved closer to my terminal after I ate. Other than having technical difficulties (WiFi may only be available in the terminals), I'd highly recommend this Starbucks when you're stuck in the Southwest terminal waiting for a flight. The customer service is excellent, the place doesn't smell like coffee (the smell makes me nauseous), there's plenty of seating and wall plugs, and even if there's a line, you get in & out quickly!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (164 chars)
Amazing service and value.  When all other vendors mark up pricing beyond that they stay neutral.  Earned my business!  ...  ... Hot bagel, yogurts and tea for me.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (65 chars)
Good Peppermint mocha hook up on my way back to San Diego! :)~~~


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (57 chars)
Always good, wait times unpredictable. Great ice coffee!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (843 chars)
This is just outside C security check point to the right. If I hadn't been actively looking for it (believe me, that chai was gonna happen) I might have missed it.  ... It's one of the newer Starbucks at Sky Harbor & I love that they made it more like an actual cafe, with plenty of seating.  ... Granted, even though the person who took my order wrote my name on my cup, the person who made it did not call it out, instead they said the type of drink..... a woman grabbed my drink (& so did I) & although I tried reasoning with her & telling her my name was on the cup, she insisted it was hers.... people who are caffeine deprived are scary, but fortunately in this location, you know they are not armed, LOL!. The Barista had to step in, pry her fingers off my cup & tell her that hers was coming up. The airport is always an adventure! :)


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (365 chars)
This is a quiet Starbuck's in an airport! Wow....didn't think this could exist? Well now that I blab about it on Yelp!, it may become slightly busier. It's situated in an odd location at the end of a usually broken moving sidewalk connecting the C and D concourses within Terminal 4. (Southwest).  ...  ... I really like a Starbuck's with no line and will be back!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (306 chars)
Yup, I'm gonna review a Starbucks in an airport....  ...  ... I think I always grab a coffee here, with each flight. The staff is friendly.  ...  ... As MarNae B said, it's a "lil pricier". A tall cup of drip coffee is $2.07 with tax.  ...  ... You can use your Starbucks cards here, but you can't reload.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (139 chars)
Typical airport 'Bucks. Everyone is so friendly.  Strong Americano hit the spot after an early morning.  Woke me up!  Thanks to the staff.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (114 chars)
Good starbucks, but their system was down and we couldn't pay with our gift card and I couldn't get my star! Boo!


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (100 chars)
1.) Coffee  2.) Place to sit & charge your phone. Is there any other reason NOT to like this place?


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (99 chars)
Quiet lounge in an airport Starbucks? What a pleasant surprise. Big leather chairs and relaxation.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (51 chars)
They make fine brewed coffee.  $2.44 out the door.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (47 chars)
Good Coffee and great that it's in an airport!


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (12 chars)
Great help!


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (1644 chars)
Good Mocha for a Branded Coffee Stop ...  ... SITREP ...  ... The metrics for coffee are pretty standard from Starbucks to Starbucks.  So that a Mocha I grab at the first Starbucks in Seattle is going to taste about the same as the one in my hometown of Sacramento to the one here in Phoenix.  And in the end, the taste of my mocha is the driving factor behind an overall rating. ...  ... Where "The rubber meets the road", so to speak, is in the execution of customer service.  Here, this Starbucks pretty much fails that measurement.  ...  ... THE SETUP ...  ... You're in an airport.  That should be the first clue to any establishment that it's going to be busy.  When I was here, it was EXTREMELY busy.  And yet, when you have a line about 12-16 people deep, waiting to (hopefully) grab a coffee and decompress, you are going to need more than ONE barista manning both the register AND the coffee machines, and making us wait about 20 minutes to get the coffee. ...  ... Minus 1-Star right there. ...  ... COST ...  ... Why is it that airports and businesses at airports somehow justify the idea that charging MORE for services and product at airports can be supported?   ...  ... I.  DON'T.  CARE.  ...  ... The fact airport establishments jack up their prices is a completely reviewable metric and one I will ALWAYS denigrate.  You can give me any excuse you want that the reason my cup of mocha here is a full $1.10 more here in Phoenix than at home, I won't ever accept your airport tax rationalization. ...  ... Minus another Star right there. ...  ... THE LOWDOWN ...  ... Great coffee.  But get more staff.  And f*ck airport taxes.


REVIEW #16:  3 stars  (621 chars)
I was here in the early morning coming from a flight from San Antonio for a connecting flight to Long Beach Ca. and I needed a soothing frappe, plus a mild jolt after those dosing naps. Well I've ordered the Coconut Mocha frappe, which was was okay, I should've asked for extra blended because it got kinda icy and couldn't taste much of the mocha. ...  ... This guys were prepared early, four people working in the morning? thats great! no long lines, and I got my order within minutes.  ...  ... Afterwards I sat at the terminal and took a picture with my Coconut Mocha frappe on hand with a beautiful Phoenix sunrise.


REVIEW #17:  3 stars  (613 chars)
There are at least four Starbucks in this airport - this is the one in T4 just inside Security Checkpoint C by gates C1-C10. ...  ... A surprisingly nice airport Starbucks. When I was there, it was quiet without a line. There is a seating area with four tables and three sets of four armchairs. You could actually sit here and believe that you were at any Starbucks, not inside an airport. ...  ... The place was well staffed (I believe there were three employees), and my drinks came quickly. They had bananas when I was there, which was nice, plus a limited assortment of baked goods (it was later in the day).


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (193 chars)
good o'l reliable starbucks...would be nice if the regular coffee was just as strong as the ones in the stores.  but good enough.  free refills too!!!  so don't forget to ask.  nice employees.


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (162 chars)
It's Starbucks. ...  ... At the airport. ...  ... What you see. ...  ... Is what you get. ...  ... For about $1 more. ...  ... Consider it. ...  ... Airport tax.


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (159 chars)
The crew seems to mean well but should slow down or be more precise in their order management so as to not mess up so many drinks! The coffee was good though.


REVIEW #21:  3 stars  (137 chars)
A bit slow for an airport setting and the staff were blaming each other for an order gone wrong for the customer in front of me...tacky.


REVIEW #22:  3 stars  (91 chars)
Always busy, be patient.  I gave 3 stars because 1 or 25 in line they only have 1 Barista.


REVIEW #23:  3 stars  (78 chars)
Your typical Statbucks experience just a lil pricier cause it' the airport (:


REVIEW #24:  3 stars  (53 chars)
Service isn't so great but the coffee is always good


REVIEW #25:  2 stars  (377 chars)
There are two other Starbucks in the airport, don't go to this one the line is too long. One is in baggage claim and the other is just before you go through security ...  ... In addition, while I rarely get food at Starbuck's I was excited to see vegetable frittata on the menu at this locale. Sadly, there were no detectable veggies in said frittata. ...  Most disappointing.


REVIEW #26:  2 stars  (369 chars)
This is what you would expect from an airport Starbucks. If you have time and are waiting for boarding I'd say it might be worth waiting in line. They definitely were understaffed for the crazy morning crowed. We probably waited almost half an hour and at the end I didn't get what I had actually asked for. I definitely have experienced better, and hence the 2 stars.


REVIEW #27:  2 stars  (234 chars)
slow service....not what people want in an airport.  When we asked about a particular souvenir mug, the cashier just shrugged and pointed to the small display that we had already looked at.  We left without coffee, and without a mug!


REVIEW #28:  2 stars  (231 chars)
Stopped in the one by the C security checkpoint in between flights.  It was very busy, quite a long line.  My drink was fine, but the fruit and cheese thing I bought turned out to be growing fuzzy mold.  Would not stop here again.


REVIEW #29:  2 stars  (155 chars)
It is a typical airport Starbucks.  They really need to be more efficient when people are needing a bite to eat and coffee before they board their flight.


REVIEW #30:  1 stars  (407 chars)
Pike's Place was the only thing on brew. ... They would not consider making something else and instead suggested a "specialty coffee."   ... I explained to them that I desired neither the flavor, calories, or price of a "specialty" coffee - all I wanted was a coffee that didn't suck. ...  ... They could not provide a coffee that didn't suck and they had the audacity to act like this was somehow logical.


REVIEW #31:  1 stars  (321 chars)
Went to the store in terminal A, service was not very good. Manager was talking loudly on cell phone while not doing anything. They wouldn't fill my travel mug and had to waste an additional paper cup to keep my hand from getting hot while pouring the coffee into my cup. Not impressed, not what I expect from Starbucks.


REVIEW #32:  1 stars  (240 chars)
Probably the worst bagel I've ever eaten... granted, I should know better for ordering a bagel at an airport Starbucks, however I was starving, I was super late to my gate, and it was right in front of it.  I'll wait for peanuts next time.


REVIEW #33:  1 stars  (152 chars)
Cashier busy doing their side work, when customer ready to check out n being reminded by other co-worker. Customer service please... Is this Starbucks?


................................................................................
LOCATION #72:  address="Sky Harbor T3 Concourse 3400 Sky Harbor Blvd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85034"  (5 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (469 chars)
Giving this Starbucks 4 stars because of the customer service of the morning staff only. Been to this location at other times of the day and nothing compared to the morning staff. They are very friendly and do their best to great everyone with a smile. They actually take into account people are flying. I do agree with other reviews of the pastries. They suck and they are never that fresh but they also aren't the same pastries you find in the stand-alone Starbucks.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (400 chars)
This airport Starbucks is really nice and open. There's plenty of seating and there's several key tables located near posts with A/C for charging the phone/laptop or blow-drying one's hair.  ...  ... Service at this Starbucks is quick and because the atrium-based Starbucks is prior to TSA, it far less busy than the small, old dirty location just past the TSA. ...  ... Great job and funny barista!


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (648 chars)
Great tasting half-caf.  But, the service was a bit slow for me.  I don't normally come to an airport with a lot of time to spare, so pulling up to the starbucks and getting my coffee in less than 5 minutes would be appreciated.  Nevertheless, I had time to spare, so the long line and wait wasn't much of a problem this time.  I think that perhaps they were caught off guard by the crowd on this day.   ...  ... One thing I've noticed is that Starbucks franchise service is not as good as the service one received in the Starbucks stores that are owned by Starbucks.  Oh well, grab your coffee and drink up then pull up your laptop and charge up!


REVIEW #4:  2 stars  (321 chars)
Really manager, you want to argue with me when I was given clearly a days-old croissant and thought you should know?!  Not even worth arguing.  ...  ... Extra star is because they gave me a small glass of water with no hassle. I actually wanted to buy their bottled water but it was room temperature for whatever reason.


REVIEW #5:  1 stars  (160 chars)
Mmmm tasty croissant right out of the ice box and directly into my bag.  I love paying $2.50 for over priced cold hard bread.   ...  ... Keep up the good work!


................................................................................
LOCATION #73:  address="St. Joesph Hospital 350 W Thomas Rd"  city="Phoenix"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85013"  (4 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (394 chars)
Great customer service. This place is always busy no matter what time of day it is, but the staff are quick and you will get your coffee!!! (Remember, it's inside a hospital with nurses and doctors who have worked for hours on end). Only thing is if you got a gold card, yes, it works and you can get your refills, but you can't redeem your free drink, they just don't have the technology yet.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (395 chars)
I come through St. Joes on a daily basis and in spite of consistent lines they manage to get my Chai to me in the same amount of time as less busy locations. So far this location is the only one that consistently gets my order right as well. Apparently Starbucks baristas have trouble understanding the phrase "whole milk," but not here. This is the only Starbucks that gets my business. Truly.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (116 chars)
Very spacious, close to the medical center...  Nice place and lots of room to sit outside and enjoy the weather...!


REVIEW #4:  1 stars  (1154 chars)
While visiting my father who was admitted to St. Joseph, I had to get my Americano fix. The first day, I felt like the barista was irritated that I had asked if they had a canister of non-fat milk. ...  ... The second day I had brought a 2nd visit coupon from another location. The offer said $2.00 iced drink after 2PM, which sounded great. The same barista, the one with the mullet, was quick to point out the fine print "Participating Locations Only" with a nasty attitude. When I told him that I didn't feel right buying full priced Starbucks drinks twice in a day, he rolled his eyes and said "Oh well, YOUR LOSS!" ...  ... So today, I made every effort to get my coffee elsewhere. I usually look for the non-corporate coffee shop, however, in this neighborhood it seems like the only options for quick espresso drinks in this area the Starbucks peppered all over the downtown area. ...  ... The staff here made me really appreciate the Starbucks by my house as well as all of those small independently owned shops that I really enjoy so much more. ... If you must get your Starbucks and you are going to the St. Joe's, GET IT ON THE WAY, NOT HERE!


................................................................................
LOCATION #74:  address="1757 W Hunt Hwy"  city="Queen Creek"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85143"  (14 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (164 chars)
Super Starbucks!! Clean, friendly... Coffee and service are great. The music is a perfect volume!! The workers are super nice especially the supervisor KIMBERLY :)


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (137 chars)
I practically live at this Starbucks :) ...  ... The service is great, the staff is friendly, and I never have to wait long for a drink!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (134 chars)
This is one of my favorite Starbucks locations. They are super friendly, get your drink order right the first time, and they're fast!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (110 chars)
This is the cheers of coffee shops . Where everybody know youre name .Very Nice ,and clean . Very organized .


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (96 chars)
Everything here was great coffee was perfect so was the food and service was quick and pleasant


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (69 chars)
Everyone here is friendly and makes a great drink- love my lattes!!!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (164 chars)
Love Starbucks. Obviously. Dakota is super sweet and I love when she serves me. My only irk about this location is they don't carry their fat free cream cheese! :(


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (179 chars)
I like this location, but one thing they need to keep the music low inside so you can hear yourself talk with a group of individuals or phone calls. ...  ... Very friendly staff.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (176 chars)
Still this Starbuck does not understand that their music is VERY LOUD it should not be as loud that you cannot to hear your conversation with someone. ...  ... AGAIN IT'S LOUD


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (958 chars)
I went to Starbucks today to work on my homework and grab a coffee. However, I told the lady what I wanted and she told me that it was over 5 dollars. I always get a ice coffee with soy milk and white mocha. I let the lady know I would not pay that because its never over 4 dollars for that drink especially a grande. I've been buying this same drink for over a year now. She was so RUDE and kept telling me that was the price. She wouldn't help me figure out what the problem was. She just kept giving me a rude look and saying that was the price. I ended up telling her I wanted a refund. after I sat down, she preceded to talk badly about me behind the counter. I went back up to talk to another lady which I asked what the price was and she rang me up RIGHT. Apparently the lady who rung me up the first time didn't listen to what I wanted. This could have been prevented if she helped me by figuring out what was wrong. She was rude and unprofessional.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (728 chars)
I love Starbucks....but have far too consistently had a poor experience with the staff at this location on hunt highway. Too many of the girls that work there have, more often than not, put off a rude and unfriendly vibe. They have acted snotty and irritated instead of friendly, helpful, and welcoming. I HATE the feeling i get when I go there, as far as their customer service goes.  I keep hoping the "girl" of the day is just having a bad day...but when I go back it's the same poor uncomfortable experience.  Part of the experience of going to Starbucks, is the HAPPY helpful understanding kind employees. This location needs an overhaul because I think they all ate a bag of "meany pants".  Get a clue people. Be nice!!!!


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (470 chars)
This location has gone downhill. The staff make bad drinks and when you ask them to fix them, they get upset. I skip coffee now unless I can make it to another location.  ...  ... They used to have friendly staff with amazing drinks.  ...  ... Now they employ people who don't like their jobs. ...  ... Update. Brad at this location is one of the rude employees. Came in today 5/14 and he seemed very irritated and short with me because I asked for a whip cream sample.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (226 chars)
I have actually stopped coming here.  The staff is very rude and act like you are bothering them by getting coffee.  If you can make the drive go to another Starbucks.  The staff here is just rude and clearly hate their jobs.


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (155 chars)
Slow slow slow!!! I have never had to wait as long as I do here. After giving them several chances I have just given up and refuse to go to this location.


................................................................................
LOCATION #75:  address="Target 21398 S Ellsworth Lp"  city="Queen Creek"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85142"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (123 chars)
It's a target Starbucks always understaff and slow but it's one of the only ones in the area so it's not a bad place to go


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (56 chars)
A little understaffed but still a Starbucks, good stuff


REVIEW #3:  1 stars  (119 chars)
What's the point of having a Starbucks if it doesn't open till after 8am?!?! Most people are already at work by then..


................................................................................
LOCATION #76:  address="13610 N Scottsdale Rd Ste101"  city="Scottsdale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85254"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (327 chars)
GREAT new location!  I am amazed how many Starbucks are in the Scottsdale area but here's another one!  The new one has a great layout with a good number of indoor seats.  It also has a drive through which is super convenient!  The drinks are made well, which I have come to expect from Starbucks and the baristas are helpful!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (150 chars)
Great new location, definitely a plus for the neighborhood.  Fast service, friendly staff, and great drink.  Can't beat it on a summer day like this.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (492 chars)
The food and beverages are always predictably good, the staff are always predictably friendly, and the seating is very much adequate. My only complaint, otherwise I'd give 4 or 5 stars, is the Internet access is super flaky. I'd come here to work but after far too many lost VPN connections there is absolutely no way I could trust this Wi-Fi service with my job duties. (In fact, I had to post this with the PotBelly WiFi because the Starbucks connection went down while logging into yelp.)


................................................................................
LOCATION #77:  address="15054 N Scottsdale Rd Ste 100"  city="Scottsdale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85254"  (25 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1939 chars)
I have been to Starbucks all over this wonderful continent of ours....and this may be one of the best of them all. So let me set the scene for you because for you TRUE Starbucks fans you will understand what I am saying. Picture yourself walking into Starbucks.....the smell of the coffee drinks being made....dimly lit room.....tables and chairs for all of those who want have there latte's,....tea....coffee....iced coffee...mocha's.....pastries......ipads.....laptops....cellphones....etc....Then BLAM THOSE HUGE LINES....PEOPLE WALKING BETWEEN YOU AND OVER YOU BECAUSE THE COUNTER IS RIGHT NEARBY AND YOUR LIKE ARRRRRRRHHHHH. However those days are a thing of the past at this location. ...  ... There is plenty of outdoor seating.....nice dimly lit room as usual.....tons and I mean tons of space and outlets for that matter for you to get digitally plugged in no matter what kind of device you have.....and then BLAM.....ooooohhhh wait I got ya there...LOL. ...  ... There is no BLAM because the "digital" space you have to work with is at least 20 feet from the counter.....and while it does get busy here....you won't really notice a crowd unless your absolutely paying attention to the crowd only. The service is awesome....the coffee drinks are awesome as always.....and trust me they really do keep the line moving. I was really impressed with the size of this location....I have not seen one bigger....I was also impressed with all of the "digital" space and outdoor seating......have not seen more anywhere........I was also impressed with the service....I was also impressed.....WAIT.....I think you get my drift.....I WAS IMPRESSED PERIOD. ...  ... This Starbucks has shot up to #1 on my list of Starbucks locations....if you know one better anywhere in the country...with the exception of the one at Starbucks Headquarters....LOL....please let me know.....and as always continue to Eat, Drink, and be Merry my Friends!!!!!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (1232 chars)
Ok, don't nut punch me 'cause I'm writing a review on Da Bux.  I'm not here to review the mediocre drip, the yeast infected pastries, nor the annoying indie music.  I'm here to say that this Starbucks has more eye candy for the 30 something crowd than a 75% off sale at Banana Republic.  It starts with being one of the largest Bux in all of Phoenix.  It is 3X bigger than any of the other green brown stations in the area.  This lends itself to bunches of coffee cake crusted comfy cushions and chairs that spill out into an L-shaped patio with a Parisian bistro flair.  Now for you ladies (hey, hey, ladies!), the pecs around here usually sport specs since they are in their 30's to 50's, but they got cash (or they are at least nicely dressed perverts).  NOW, for us guys, the breasts around here are more fake then the goods lining Shanghai's flea markets.  But heck, as long as those nipples aren't plastic, I'll bite. ...  ... +++'s: THE best Starbucks for older eye-candy (30+), free Wi-fi with your starbucks card, ample seating, always a good clean crowd, in Kierland commons ...  ... - - -'s: it's another Starbucks ...  ... In sum, if you want to enjoy a cup of Joe (or Jane) in style, this is the Starbucks to do it at.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (1187 chars)
The only reason to drink coffee is if I'm all stopped-up from my wife's pot roast. Otherwise I steer clear of coffee and caffeine related products. ...  ... Fortuitously however, I discovered another reason to like coffee, and did so at Starbucks yesterday. ... Their trenta sized cup. ...  ... It was a great Sunday dinner...pot roast as usual but now it was Monday morning and time to 'pay the piper'. I stopped at Starbucks on the way to work. ...  ... As bad luck sometimes has it, traffic was running slow that day...much slower than usual. I suspected something was wrong.  ... It was...the overhead freeway sign indicating a severe crash on the 51. ...  ... Great. ... I just drank thirty ounces of coffee and was now in the throes of a face-grimacing, bladder-busting event. ... This is where the thirty ounce cup came in handy.  ... Once filled with warm, steaming coffee, it was now filled with something equally warm and steaming. ...  ... Whether you like coffee or not, you'll enjoy the wide rimmed opening and the large capacity of the trenta sized cup.  ... It's able to contain even the most hearty of uncontrollable pissing events.  ...  ... Way to go Starbucks trenta!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (537 chars)
Compared to other reviews on here about this Starbucks location this one in particular is not bad at all in my opinion. Every time I have gone into this location I have always left very pleased. The store is huge and has tons of seating inside and has a good amount of seating outside. The bathrooms have always been clean and fresh. Lines can be long but go by quick. The employees are always nice and friendly and have always gotten my order right the first time. Overall I like this Starbucks and won't stop coming here anytime soon.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (142 chars)
Great place to hang out and have a coffee. That is if you  can find a table. This place gets packed. Can't beat Kierland for the environment.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (5 chars)
Yes!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (1219 chars)
If I had it in my heart to give a Starbucks a five-star review, this would be it. But in writing a review, I have to take into account the coffee product itself, and honestly, with our Jura machine at home, we get better coffee and espresso, and go figure --  we use Starbucks beans.  I'll chock it up to our grind and strength. ...  ... Having prefaced it by the above, this is probably the best Starbucks location I've visited. Even with ten people ahead of me in line, it was less than five minutes before I had my cafe latte and spinach, egg white and feta wrap in hand! The place was packed with nary an available seat inside, so I grabbed one of  the comfy outdoor patio seats. It was a perfect morning to linger over my drink while I waited for a friend to finish up at the dentist.  ...  ... It's also great for people watching as just about everyone who works at Kierland Commons stops by for "whatever". ...  ... As an aside, it was the first time I tried the spinach, egg white and feta wrap, based on the recommendations of two young girls in line behind me, and ooh, it is by far the best "fast food" breakfast I have ever had!  Kudos to Starbucks for steering me clear of the former beloved Egg McMuffin!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (1155 chars)
I don't live in Scottsdale. I don't have much in common with people that live in Scottsdale (no money, no little dog with blinged out collar, and no BMW) but I do enjoy the ample seating and courteous staff of this Starbucks location. There are an abundant number of comfy seats (10 I think), regular seating (at least 20 seats) and a huge outside seating area (with at least 10 tables), more than any other Starbucks I've been too. It's usually pretty busy during the day, but in the evening it's the perfect place to study or meet a few friends.  ...  ... Although I usually just get an iced tea or water, the times I've ordered other drinks they were well-made and to my specifications. On the one occasion they forgot to make my drink, they promptly gave me a free drink coupon and apologized profusely.  ...  ... All that being said, it's still a Starbucks and if you're afraid of the big bad corporation, feel free to steer clear. ;) Being in a part of town where there aren't any indy coffee shops, I have little choice. But, if you're feeling brave, and in the mood to have a cup of joe in a nice location, Starbucks at Kierland is a good choice!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (1007 chars)
It was a rainy day today, and I was meeting two friends to study at Starbucks at Kierland.  A great location with plenty of seating, apparently everyone had the same idea as me.  When I walked in, all inside seating was taken and there were long lines to order drinks and also for the restroom.  Recognizing this was due to the weather and that Starbucks couldn't do anything differently about this, I was quite impressed with how quickly the lines moved and how friendly the staff were.   ...  ... Ordering a tall hot chocolate, I enjoyed a nice hot beverage while only waiting a short while to find seats for my friends and me to study.  With so many people there, the Internet was quite slow for a while until many of the customers left (when the weather got better).  More seating appeared, the lines subsided, and the Internet got faster.  All in all, it was a very productive few hours for my friends and me as we also got several beverages and enjoyed the atmosphere.  I'll definitely be going back!


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (441 chars)
This place is always packed!!! But it is a great place to work because they have the coolest "desktops" near the front entrance. ...  ... There are also an abundance of the "comfy" living room style chairs.  ...  ... This is a "big" Starbuck compared to others in the area. There is almost always a line waiting to order. But they keep things moving.  ...  ... Aside from my above comments... its a Starbucks. You either love it or hate it.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (225 chars)
I love Starbucks no matter the location but as the Kierland Starbucks location is closest to my office, it is the one I most visit! With that said I love the staff here as they are very friendly and always remember my order!


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (180 chars)
Love this Starbucks for the business vibe! Lots of meetings going on. More than enough outlets for your laptop, but always crowded, so finding one is tough. Love the upscale feel.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (141 chars)
Yes, I am a SBUX fan.... I frequent many.  ...  ... But this one is always, always so busy! It can be super difficult to score a table here.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (121 chars)
One of the toughest tables to get in Scottsdale...sort of feels like a walking on a runway...Oh, and they've got coffee.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (86 chars)
Love to study here with my earplugs in...Of course you can also just people watch. ;)


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (51 chars)
I refuse to review a Starbucks.  Oops, I just did!


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (37 chars)
Great service and my Chai was great!


REVIEW #18:  4 stars  (34 chars)
Pretty nice place to get coffee:3


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (1079 chars)
As a Starbuck's Gold Card holder (aka I drink far too much Starbucks), I have become accustomed to certain attitudes and services from them. And this place didn't really hold up to those expectations. First off, this Starbuck's is located in a large outdoor mall so you know it is going to be busy. It was about 5pm on a Saturday and there were still a few hours left in their day. Once we got up to the counter, there was no hello or smile, just what can I get you. We ordered 2 Soy Lattes and the first thing the barista says is they don't know if they have any soy left. I'm sorry but you are a Starbucks located in a mall, how do you run out of an essential item like soy or any type of milk like product half way through you day?? After checking with other workers, they said there is just enough for us but then they are out. Awesome. We at least got our soy lattes but what about everyone else for the next 4 hours they are open? It is like saying they ran out of half and half. I'm sorry but a Starbucks should not run out of certain things and creamers are one of them.


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (757 chars)
A large and always-busy location, the Starbucks at Kierland has a reputation as the "pickup" Starbucks, as in, it's a great place to meet and perhaps find a spark with fellow coffee lovers.  ...  ... The pre-work line can get long, but behind the counter they move fast. I've set up shop a few times to work and haven't had trouble finding a spot, usually against the wall for some good people watching (no Prince Charmings though)!  The last dirty chai latte I had from this location was overly milky, so that's clouding my mind right now!  ...  ... If you are a foufy drink aficionado, check it out, but if you're a purist, save some money and head around the corner to Chloe's for 50 cent hot or iced coffees and fantastically unique muffins and scones.


REVIEW #21:  2 stars  (2184 chars)
So, at this point we've all formed an opinion of what we think of Starbucks coffee?  Either it floats your boat or doesn't. ...  ... Coming from the Pacific Northwest, I was use to a wide selection of different coffee places, Tully's and Peet's (where it all began) for example; or any of the number of small coffee shacks that seem to be on every corner in greater Seattle.  But here in the Valley, unless you're willing to track down a Fry's Marketplace to find a Tully's, you'll need to settle for Starbucks. ...  ... Now that I've gotten that out out of the way, I have a love hate relationship with this Starbucks location.  I come here several times each day, or to the Press Coffee across Scottsdale Road.  The Baristas are great, very friendly and rarely if ever get my order wrong.  What is frustrating is what I call the Internet moochers.  Because of Starbuck's free WiFi policy, there is never a place to sit inside and enjoy your drink and read the paper.  Or, God forbid, getting up and ordering a refill.  People will pounce on that seat! ...  ... It was different before they changed the policy and made WiFi free.  Don't get me wrong, some days it's actually pretty good.  But for the most part it's a bear getting a seat and what is the capacity here?  50, maybe 75?  That's a lot of customers drinking Mr. Schultz's version of Peet's coffee!  So I would guess this is one of the largest, certainly most profitable stores in the greater Phoenix area.  Why change the business model if it isn't broken, right? ...  ... Well in the beginning, when Mr. Schultz took over the marketing at Peet's, he wanted to recreate that coffee house feeling that he found in Paris.  The feeling I have here is of a college library on caffeine.  A lot of laptops open, but not a lot of coffee being drank. ...  ... So, if you're on the run and just want to grab a Cup of Joe, then this is your best bet in the Kierland area.   ...  ... But, if you want to order your brew, sit down and read the paper, or just enjoy a conversation with your neighbor -- try Press Coffee across Scottsdale Road and the real life version of Frogger getting there.  Now, that will get your heart racing!


REVIEW #22:  2 stars  (319 chars)
Super busy and pretty dirty!!! Huge trash pile with 2 overflowing trash cans.  The bar where you pick up your drink was sopping wet with ???? ...  ... My friend and I met here and we saw a nice lady with a hermes birkin!  Seriously, class up Starbucks! ...  ... The women's restroom also had no tp!  Really nice touch.


REVIEW #23:  2 stars  (112 chars)
Positively the snobbiest Starbucks I've ever been to. Get over yourselves and crack a smile, for goodness sake!


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (715 chars)
I arrived at around three, there was one lady ahead of me at the end of the counter already waiting for her drink. Sadly the barista was too busy flirting to notice I was in my work uniform and clearly on a break. Ten minutes later I get a cup two thirds of the way full of watered down chai. I don't know if he put skim milk in there or what, but I asked for whole milk and was very disappointed in what I got. It shouldn't take ten minutes to make a full decent cup of chai, let alone part of a poor one. Give me a break. I watched him and he was talking, not paying attention to what he was doing and stopped several times to chat with another lady while making my drink. It's no wonder I prefer Dutch Brothers.


REVIEW #25:  1 stars  (240 chars)
Went in with a friend who wanted to meet here.  I've never been a fan of SBX, truly the MCDs of coffee. ...  ... Save the money, either buy good grounds to make your own cup or go to Circle K for a slightly better coffee at half the price.


................................................................................
LOCATION #78:  address="20343 N Hayden Rd"  city="Scottsdale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85255"  (9 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (898 chars)
If I had to write a review for EVERYTIME I come here well...anyway. I drive thru pretty much every morning however if the line is too long (Which often times it is depending on who is running it) I will pop in for my Venti no foam latte with 3 sugars in the raw. For those of you who tell me there is no foam in a latte Just zip it there is and Starbucks puts a ton of it in unless you tell them not to OK! ... Anyhow they are always SO nice there, never a problem...if they make a mistake they always fix it. One day they found out I was buying some coffee for the teacher and so they gave me a bunch of brand new drinks they had made wrong (All hot) and said here give them to the teachers they deserve it! How nice is that?  Ya don't get service like that very often. I found a home for every one of them. I had like 6 coffees plus the two I bought...Anyway very convenient and always friendly!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (61 chars)
Very friendly staff! Would be awesome if open a tad later :/


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (1164 chars)
Since this Starbucks is right in the middle of North Scottsdale, you gotta expect great service here. Usually, they deliver! (The four stars is in relation to other Starbucks locations, not coffee shops in general.) ...  ... The staff here is overly friendly, which I prefer (better than unfriendly). Some of the baristas know me by name because I worked close by for a year and a half. The turnover rate is as high as any other Starbucks, but those who know me are pretty familiar with my order, and one guy even asks if I want my "usual." I always love that.  ...  ... Unfortunately, this location has a poorly designed drive-through that is INSANELY BUSY for much of the day. I tried it a few times in the morning and have waited upwards of 15 minutes for a drink. The setup is just a disaster - the line starts to block the whole parking lot, and since people drive like crazies in this complex, you have to be careful and aware when pulling in or out of an area. Just a heads up. ...  ... But inside, the staff is pretty quick, and I've never had to wait too long for a drink. So if you're in a hurry, going inside during busy times might actually be faster.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (57 chars)
Good Barista. Nice Friendly people. Slow service though.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (667 chars)
This Starbucks location is one of the busiest in northern Scottsdale (though the location on Shea Blvd is probably worse).   ...  ... On the other hand the folks inside are wonderful.  I've never had an order mistake and the line moves very fast.  Nice group of Baristas! ...  ... The parking lot is shared with Good Egg and Subway and it can become very crowded and crazy in the mornings.  I've seen many a luxury car get rear ended in the lot while it's owner is inside getting a latte.  At times the drive-thru (poorly thought out) can wind around the corner ten deep. No exaggeration. ...  ... So, as they use to say on TV:  "Let's be careful out there, people!"


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (523 chars)
I have always loved a good upside down iced caramel macchiato at Starbucks and with that said I will continue to go. My only complaint to this one particular Starbucks was the manager. I don't recall her name but she has dark hair and has a hard time smiling. She looks down right miserable. If you dislike your job and you work in the service industry please do the die hard Starbucks customers a favor and leave. Other than that hiccup I will always enjoy my iced drink even though sour puss tries to ruin my experience.


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (178 chars)
Only one barista here. Takes FOR EVERYTHING to get your coffee. I do have to say that the barista was very nice and did her best. But ONE employee for this Starbucks??? Really?!


REVIEW #8:  1 stars  (499 chars)
Why is it that people who work at starbucks think its ok for them to ignore customers when they are in a con station with other staff ...  ... All I want is a cup of coffee, I don't want to be your friend, you don't need to know my name. I am the only one I the store! It's not like twenty people are here asking for a black coffee ... When I ask for a black coffee why do you ask if I want room? Room for what ? I want it black! ...  ... Please Starbucks teach your staff to serve not make friends


REVIEW #9:  1 stars  (324 chars)
This is the slowest Starbucks I have ever been to. Third in line and it took 30 minutes to order and get my drinks. Part of the problem was some rookie ordering stupid drinks and part of the problem was the guy working the register was new. They have way to much employee turnover here, you have to wonder what is going on.


................................................................................
LOCATION #79:  address="23535 N Scottsdale Rd"  city="Scottsdale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85255"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (172 chars)
I like their seating area. It has a nice sized inside area and also a bright outside area that is tucked between a walkway and another store. One of my favorite locations.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (108 chars)
Without a doubt this is my favorite coffee spot. Always greeted by a great staff and a great cup of coffee!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (33 chars)
Super nice baristas and servers.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (490 chars)
This is my favourite Starbucks for many reasons. It is within walking distance from my house. The staff is always super friendly and always smiling. ...  ... I also enjoy the new food selections including the bistro boxes, sandwiches and paninis. Another nice feature is the outside seating that extends to under the trees. ...  ... I just discovered the new Starbucks app on my phone, and like the fact that I can have my Starbucks card on my phone,  with the added features and benefits.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (234 chars)
Conveniently located near where we were staying in North Scottsdale, I have to say that the baristas are uber-friendly and make a mean iced peppermint mocha! So good, I came back every morning until we had to head back home to CA. :)


REVIEW #6:  1 stars  (874 chars)
I will never come back here. They couldn't understand how to make a Mocha Frappe with Hazelnut flavor. Once that was finally figured out, I overheard that they had spilled my drink dumping half the contents out. I saw them pick up the cup and used the same cup to remake my drink, when I asked for a new drink in a clean cup, the shift supervisor got huffy about it, angrily grabbed my drink threw it hastily in the trash can and made me a new drink in a clean cup finally.  ...  ... Although they did give me a card that says they were sorry I had a bad experience enjoy a beverage on us, that didn't excuse the bad customer service and possible health violation of serving a drink in a dirty cup.  ...  ... This Starbucks was very packed and very poorly ran. I would expect more out of a place like this and would assume anyone else would have wanted a clean cup as well.


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (194 chars)
Not that any SBUX is worth going out of your way for, but this one is worth skipping. The service I've experienced each time I've been is pretty dang poor and the drinks always seem quite cold.


................................................................................
LOCATION #80:  address="2865 N Scottsdale Rd"  city="Scottsdale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85257"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (414 chars)
Coffee is only one of the reasons I frequent this Starbucks. Everyone that works at this location is Amazing.They know how to make your coffee right and they always have amazing suggestions for new drinks when I just can't decide what I want,Again! ... Days when I am running late I still find time to come here and see my peeps that make my day with their cool Barista skills and their even cooler personalities.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (303 chars)
I've been to this location a few times while getting gas and shopping at Albertson's or other stores in the area. My Caramel Macchiato decaf. with soy has always been tasty so I assume it's been prepared correctly. I've never had to wait more than two people. There are table and chairs inside and out.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (239 chars)
Rarely crowded. 4 tables indoors, many more outdoors. Wifi is usually fast. Only downside is that it's next to a gas station, so the visuals out the window aren't exactly spectacular. But if you care about that, why are you in Scottsdale?


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (168 chars)
This starbucks is small and sweet. I like that it is attached to a low-price gas station too. I had the carmel apple spice -which I am in love with & it made my night.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (140 chars)
i just really like starbucks. and now that it's the holiday season, i'm always shelling out for one of the froo-froo pumpkin spice latte's.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (300 chars)
It's a sweet spot. They have Teavana tea which make me like them even more. It's not super crowded which makes it nice. As his fit the parking the big lot of parking is right next to it (Albertsons') so I don't really think parking is an issue. ...  ... I like Starbucks' that are close to ASU more.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (187 chars)
Super busy in the morning but what coffee shop isn't right? But I ordered my coffee and a breakfast sandwich and was out taking care of business in 10 minutes.. no complaints whatsoever!


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (258 chars)
Eh, I tend to  avoid this location.  It is attached to a gas station which makes for traffic and tricky parking. It is very small location,  Also, the barristas here have messed up my order multiple times.  When they are made correctly the drinks are great!


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (134 chars)
This location doesn't have a drive-thru and it's quite small, so I don't frequent it often, but it's a Starbucks and it's consistent.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (129 chars)
Starbucks is 'ok' , I'm not really a fan of their coffee, I like the fact that they have restrooms and I love the cheese Danish.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (86 chars)
Convenient location, seating inside and outside, and some good Joe. Plain and simple.


................................................................................
LOCATION #81:  address="4032 N Scottsdale Rd"  city="Scottsdale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85251"  (24 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1096 chars)
I know Starbucks are the big bad corporate guys, but they're actually a pretty sustainable company, and their employees even get insurance if they're part-time, which is more than you can say for more part-time employers. I always feel I have to explain why I like a chain store, which is ridiculous, since its' a free country, but I think Starbucks has a pretty strong case. Anyway, this location is always pretty busy, but the baristas are unfailingly pleasant and friendly, and the couple of times they've messed up my drink orders, they've been quick to fix the situation. The manager is often there and hops right in with the others, making drinks and acting like any other member of the team. I'm a complex individual when it comes to coffee, I love to experiment and try new twists on things, and a couple of the baristas in particular have had some yummy ideas. White chocolate mocha with a pump of raspberry and a pump of hazelnut! I know it sounds like too much but just try it. ...  ... I need to learn how to make cake pops at home, though, my cake-pop lust is getting too expensive!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (1051 chars)
i have always like starbucks. they serve good, predictable strong coffee for a decent price. i have never had a bad service experience in a starbucks....if my coffee ever tasted stale, cold, old, whatever, they always, always, always fix it...no question....sort of like the wal-mart of coffee. plus, it's always so cozy in a starbucks.  ...  ... i have never gotten a fancy coffee....always the same...."small" coffee. but i received a gift card for this christmas towards starbucks this year. and i am constantly craving caramel machiatto's (sp?). this thing is fantastic! it's so sweet and strong and just plain delicious. please don't tell me how many calories are in it because then i'll feel guilty for drinking them...but man, they are like macayo's margarita's on a hot day....they go down so quick and smooth, and before i know it, i'm wanting another. unfortunately, i have to sleep sometime, so i'll have to ration for now....until my gift card runs out then it's back to regular, plain ol coffee....2.65 for a small....robbery i tell you!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (441 chars)
This location squeezes as many seats and outlets as possible into one small location. They know everyone coming in needs a place to sit and needs a spot to power up. Between all the outdoor chairs and all the seating indoors, you should find a spot. It's just not a comfortable joint if you're looking to sit and chat with someone. But for me and my laptop, it's perfect.  ...  ... Fun for people watching on Scottsdale road on the weekend.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (379 chars)
If there were 10 stars for this location, It would be granted!  I go here everyday Monday through Friday. A great way to start my day and sometimes a nice refreshing treat in the afternoon.  I always have the best service, they know me when I walk in the door and my drink is ready before I even have a chance to swipe the "Gold" card. Always a friendly staff with a warm smile.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (52 chars)
The staff is super nice and service is always fast.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (43 chars)
Starbucks is always great! Can't go wrong.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (16 chars)
Great location!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (537 chars)
This particular Starbucks doubles as a police station. Want to get a free Starbucks at any point? Make a bet that either a cop is either inside or will walk in while ordering a drink. I guess bougie Scottsdale cops must be getting paid more than the Dunkin' Doughnut variety. Regardless, at least you can rest assured that the pastries will be fresh. ...  ... Altogether a pretty good Starbucks, but it lacks a seating area for groups, which drops it a star. Other than that, the drinks are par and the staff isn't rude. Can't complain.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (418 chars)
Love John, the Manager. Always there with a smile and great at customer service. This Fashion Square Starbucks is a VERY busy locations with lots of visitors but these guys are efficient and friendly despite it. ...  ... Wish they had some inside seating and comfy chairs for the hot and cold months.  But enjoy the spacious outdoor seating which is unique for starbucks when there are NO SMOKERS and weather is good.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (396 chars)
Starbucks is Starbucks when it comes to the coffee and food, but the staff at this location are particularly helpful and nice. One offered to help me decide on what drink to choose, and promised that if I did not like it, he would make me another one free of charge. The seating is a bit limited because the place is somewhat small, but other than that, an above average cookie cutter Starbucks.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (252 chars)
Don't know what has changed over the past few months but this is now my favorite location. I come here everyday, especially since its practically walking distance from my house and my drinks are now always made to perfection. Thanks guys, way better!!


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (178 chars)
Im at Starbucks, different locations like 3 times a day. My order is always right, service is always fast, and its an easy place to come sit and get some work done on my laptop.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (158 chars)
BF has found his "go to" for the duration of our stay here in Arizona... because the pink packet and chemical packets our timeshare provides does not cut it.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (147 chars)
I love the coffee, service and the fact that I can use my computer on their internet service keeps me loyal and coming back for more. ... Debbie H


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (95 chars)
Friendly service, delicious hot chocolate, good friends on a Friday Night--what's not to love?


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (67 chars)
good prompt service and the baristas know what they're doing here.


REVIEW #17:  3 stars  (636 chars)
I am not a person that frequents Starbucks. I don't particularly like the chain for a plethora of reasons, but that is where a friend of mine that I was reconnecting with after 15 years wanted to grab a coffee, so I was not in a place to argue. ...  ... Though I will say that the coffee tasted reminiscent of paint thinner, which it has at every Starbucks that I have visited across the country, the staff here was friendly and perky. The barista was especially cool, and fun, and she helped to make my experience at a coffee shop that I generally disdain, more pleasant. The place was clean too which Starbucks stores are not always.


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (221 chars)
Not a big Starbucks fan.  But the Staff at this one was gracious and courteous. So I figured they should get kudos  for the job they did.  The place was exceptionally clean and everyone was busy and productive. Good job.


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (103 chars)
Spinach wrap was cold... :( Avoid this place in the morning, you will compromise quality or your time!


REVIEW #20:  2 stars  (1031 chars)
Okay, first thing is first, I love my coffee, and I love Starbucks but THIS particular location has failed to please me, twice. The first time was about 3 weeks ago, I came here on a Wednesday afternoon, wanting a vanilla chai latte. Eh, I must say, it wasn't as tasty as I expect but hey, everyone makes mistakes, no biggie. So today I decided, let me try this location put again since I'm here. I got here around 10 am. I went through the drive-thru and it was PACKED as usual. When I got to the window I specifically ordered a tall double chocolate chip frappucino. What I was handed was a Venti Carmel macchiato. Um...and when I told her what I did order, the barista caught the nastiest attitude and told me that I should have spoken louder. Exxxcusssseee me?!?! Being the nice human I am, I took my new drink she handed me and it was a java chip frappucino .....*sigh* I am so over this. I smiled and put 2 bucks in the tip jar and drove away.  ... Okay, LOVE LOVE Starbucks but this location, no I will hold off, thank you.


REVIEW #21:  2 stars  (458 chars)
Visited here while I was in town for spring training 3 different times. This place gets pretty busy, and I don't mind waiting for my drink but they didn't know how to handle the rushes very well. They wouldn't call out drinks or names rather let them sit there to be picked up. The line moved really slowly and the crew seemed like they weren't all working together or communicating. I will say they did make my drink perfect each time, can't compain there.


REVIEW #22:  2 stars  (413 chars)
I spent a good three hours studying. Besides having a great facility for wifi, seating, and noise level, the service could use a lot of work. If you're in the service industry, people who apply for this jobs should be mindful that they will be working with people. In other words, they can be more friendly and cheerful no matter how difficult it may be. Other than that, I did enjoy my peach green tea lemonade.


REVIEW #23:  2 stars  (304 chars)
I always love star bucks but honestly Internet at all star bucks are horrible it's so slow and it sucks coz one of the reason I hangout in the store is to enjoy my iPad and drink my good coffee since Internet is slow then i cant to that. I wish they would update their Internet specifically this store:3


REVIEW #24:  2 stars  (18 chars)
Kinda smells bad.


................................................................................
LOCATION #82:  address="7050 E Shea Blvd"  city="Scottsdale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85254"  (16 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (719 chars)
I've been going here off and on for 5 years and the customer service here is amazing! I went on a no Starbucks strike for about a year not because I don't love my Starbucks but I purchased a very expensive espresso maker and wanted to get my money's worth from it.. Anyways I have a thing with touching cold stuff so I always get a sleeve on all of my iced drinks so after a year of being absent I drove thru the  drive thru ordered my venti iced Carmel macchiato and sure enough they remembered me and put my beloved sleeve on my drink! Love these guys especially the long haired skinny one. They are always so nice and remembered how I like my coffee after a year of not seeing me!  ...  ... Great customer service!!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (519 chars)
Been going here since the first day they opened. The staff is great but one in particular, Alexa McCall (or McCaw?) is an exceptional employee.  While waiting for my coffee I overheard a couple talking about her as well. They said she creates a very fun atmosphere. I'm amazed at how many customers who are driving up say hello by her name!  Wow!! Now if that doesn't prove excellent customer service I don't know what does. I agree with the couple this Starbucks has a great vibe. Oh, great  Latte's too!  Kudos to ya


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (208 chars)
Always a quick, friendly drive through! And they make my iced mocha perfectly every time. Love this location. The only downfall is pulling into the parking lot, a lot of congestion right around the entrance.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (108 chars)
Always super busy but the crew at the drive thur always has a smile for me no mater what day or time it is.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (36 chars)
Great Location!  Very professional!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (271 chars)
Not a fast drive thru service but the staff is pretty friendly.  There's a guy there who works the drive thru window and he makes great conversation while you wait for your drink.  IThe only negative thing is that they only sell plain bagels. I wish they had multigrain!


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (983 chars)
Not sure why there are such bad reviews for this location. As far as Starbucks go, it is pretty average (not especially bad). They get points knocked off due to the small size and lack of sitting/lounging space. You can only walk up or drive thru at this location :( But the drive thru is quick enough. I've never had any issues with my order getting mixed up or attitude from the baristas. I mostly visit in evenings or afternoon and it is never busy.  I've also been during morning hours, but not super early... so I can't comment on early morning rush. ...  ... Seems like this low rating is partially skewed from people who don't like Starbucks coffee in general... understood, but I wish we could just filter out those reviews.  After all, we all know what Starbucks IS and ISN'T by now. Some of us need an accurate review of the location without coffee snobbery polluting the rating :P  ... (see there ^^^ I included the smiley so my snobby coffee brethren can't take offense)


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (342 chars)
Def not your standard Starbucks as far as layout.  There is no inside sitting area and Scottsdale is usually scorching hot in the summer.  There are misters outside and awesome shade that help with the heat.  It took longer to get a drink, but it was an ok experience.  It is just another Starbucks...nothing too special about this location.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (224 chars)
Small Drive-thru and walk-up window at this location. Outdoor restroom with key access that was moderately clean. Drink was excellent and the outdoor seating area was small but adequate. The window staff were very friendly.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (501 chars)
You'll never find me rating a Starbucks lower than a 4, but this one is way too congested. Yes, the staff is friendly and it is convenient, the parking lot/drive through is a mess.  ...  ... This Starbucks is a drive thru - walkup window only. On busy mornings, you'll find yourself backed up onto the street just trying to drive in. If you decide to walk up, you need to park your car and get out. The drive-thru lane and parking lot overlap, which makes it hard to back-up out of your parking spot.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (369 chars)
They are consistently busy, but apparently are not able to perfect their craft. Very, very slow. Whether it be four cars in line, or twelve, I always seem to be waiting at least 15 minutes or more for my coffee. One time it took SO long, they gave me my coffee for free... which is nice... but when I got to my destination I saw that both drinks I received were wrong.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (1140 chars)
I wish I could give it a half of a star.. The only thing they do "right" is that they make some kind of drink for you.  It's probably not going to be what you ordered, but I guess there's always the option of going back, waiting in line for another 10 minutes, asking them to remake it, getting a dirty look about it, then finally getting it back 5 minutes later. ...  ... Who wouldn't want to do that...? ...  ... This is the closest location to my house; however, it is the LAST one I would choose to go to..  : / ...  ... The set up is semi inconvenient, but I don't really go at the rush hour times of day, so I can't comment on that aspect.  SOME of the baristas are nice, but out of the 30 times I have gone there, I think my drink has been made correctly 6 or 7 times.  That kind of inaccuracy is not what I would expect from anywhere, much less such a well known company like Starbucks. ...  ... But on the other hand, I don't HAVE to go to this location, it's just the most convenient, so I guess I should just suck it up and drive to a different location- like the one inside Desert Ridge.  I've never had a bad experience there.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (639 chars)
Horrible service. Twice now I've gone there and they keep messing up my drink. I work for Starbucks!! It's not hard to get a drink right! Believe me. Horrible service. The people that work there All have bad attitude. One lady doesn't even look at you when your ordering your drink. I think that someone needs to go In there and fix it and make it a welcoming Starbucks that it's known for. Ya a few of the employees that work there are absolutely wonderful but when you get that one that is just rude it just makes you not want to go there anymore. I stopped going. They still get my drink wrong when my mom goes to get coffee. Horrible.


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (627 chars)
Whatever you do, don't visit this location. I've been a Gold Card member for a long time, and never had an issue at any other locations. The 3 times I have visited this location, I've had bad experiences. ...  ... Just today, On Starbucks.com and at another location, I was told I could get the Frapp Happy Hour discount until 6pm. The person that I dealt with would not honor the discount, and it's clearly shown online!  ...  ... Anytime I mentioned that the discount goes till 6, the employee just asked if I wanted to pay with my gold card or another way, totally avoiding the issue! What kind of customer service is that?


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (580 chars)
This is the worst Starbucks I have ever been to across all 50 states.  ...  ... 1. They can't multitask and serve multiple customers (it takes 20 minutes to get your drink). I don't care how busy you think you are; I have seen busier Starbucks figure it out.  ...  ... 2. When they make a drink with flavoring, they put the flavor in with the milk and steam it, this burns the syrup and spoils the drink.  ...  ... 3. No one smiles or says a simple 'thank you'.  ...  ... This Starbucks is less then a mile from my house (in walking distance) I am now a proud owner of a Tassimo.


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (34 chars)
Over priced, coffee tastes burnt.


................................................................................
LOCATION #83:  address="8912 E. Pinnacle Peak Road"  city="Scottsdale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85255"  (8 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (524 chars)
This location is fab for many reasons. The renovation is awesome! The staff is super nice and helpful. Yeah, there is no WIFI (how is that possible!?!?) and it can get a bit cramped inside. However, it's just up the road from the disaster of a store at Scottsdale road and pinnacle peak. I make the jog over to come to this store, and it's 99/100 times faster. I love the sit down bar area in front of the clover brewing system! All in all - the way every store should be. Oh, can't forget the awesome patio space thy have!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (791 chars)
Visited here on Christmas Eve morning and it was packed! I was thinking, "aw man, this is going to take for-ev" and then I got to the front of the line an put my order in, haha. Super fast and efficient! I enjoy the unique name spellings that both me (which is common cause I have a different name) and my friend Gina got transcribed on our cups (her's was spelled 'Jeanay'). They were up staffed, which helped, and all the employees seemed to be in a jolly mood. ...  ... Again, it was super packed and thus no where to sit inside, but there were a few tables left to choose from outside. Unfortunately they were all in the shade, making this thin-blooded Arizonian, unable to tolerate the weather for more than seven minutes before we retreated back to my car with our scrumptious drinks.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (306 chars)
Nice Starbucks in far far North Scottsdale. ...  ... Basically all the retail in this area revovles around strip malls.  You can't escape it as this Starbucks is located in one; however, they do have a nice outdoor patio which has views of the mountains.  You can't beat that with your morning cup of Joe.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (66 chars)
Jon, Tess, Charlie, Erin, Kathleen and whole gang are the best!!!


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (373 chars)
Out of the several Starbucks I've tried north of the loop in Scottsdale, this is the only one worth going to. The others are just run of the mill. While this location is also pretty much standard, it also features the Clover brewing system. Sadly, their bathroom doesn't have a urinal. ... Long-short: this is the fancy Starbucks. If you have the choice, come to this one.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (217 chars)
It's Starbucks.  You know what you're getting.  I did try the blonde roast recently, and it's definetly milder.  Not to my liking, but if you're not a fan of their usual blends, try the Blonde.  It really is lighter.


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (1816 chars)
I would first like to say I am a Starbucks addict. Even more true, I'm a caffeine addict and mother of 2 young children. I can't say that I necessarily HAVE to have Starbuck's brand coffee. I can't even say that Starbucks has the best coffee and lattes around. It's more of the little things that I have begun to love and appreciate about when I go there. First and foremost, I love it that all the baristas at my regular (most frequented) Starbucks know my name and know my drink. They are the hardest workers out there dealing with a lot of nasty Snottsdale customers and they serve my drink with a smile on their faces. Secondly, they are consistent and if they made my drink unsatisfactorily, they have always remade it and STILL with a smile on their face and a sincere apology. Lastly, they are friendly to my kids. My kids can be some of the loudest and not always as well behaved as I'd like them to be but the baristas talk to them, give them stickers and even know their name!! ... Occasionally, I have been to other Starbucks near my neighborhood because it's more convenient than going to my 'regular' Starbucks. I have been to the one at Pinnacle and Pima  maybe 15 or so times. Most of the baristas that work there are awesome but there is one lady that is consistently grumpy and crotchety. I wish I had a dime for every time for every time she threw out ATTITUDE and eye roll as if her day was ruined by brewing my coffee. If I did, I would definitely have a fortune to pay for my Starbucks addiction. ... I used to think it was just me or maybe she had a bad day but she is consistently rude. My husband, separately and unsolicited, has told me he has had the same experience with her.  ... Why do we keep going? The answer plain and simple: My addiction is strong and this Starbucks is convenient.


REVIEW #8:  1 stars  (2152 chars)
THIS STORE IS TERRIBLE! THE WORST SERVICE I'VE EVER HAD! ...  ... As a former Starbucks employee I was APALLED at the disgusting service my mom and I received here. We walked in about an hour before closing time and I ordered an iced grande white mocha, she ordered an iced venti, lite caramel sauced melted in the bottom 2 splenda Americano...honestly, not that complicated! We weren't really greeted, we more or less received an annoyed glance from the barista and the shift supervisor working. The guy making our drinks didn't pay any attention, didn't mark our cups and didn't call back to the person ringing us up! He was too busy talking to his friend, also an employee there who was off the clock, to pay attention to what he was getting paid 8 bucks and hour to do. He of course messed up our order, and when my mom pointed out that her drink was  gritty, he sighed, rolled his eyes and promptly informed us that it "was the splenda that YOU ordered in your drink..." instead of apologizing and offering to remake it. I don't expect a kiss ass but some on, have some customer service common sense! My mom, being irritated with the guys rudeness just asked for a drink coupon, which the shift supervisor informed her it would take 10 minutes for her to get one (they're supposed to keep them up in the front at all times for reasons like this! duh...). The off-shift partner then said "just give her a piece of paper that says one free drink and sign your name with the store number" which she did.  ...  ... Here's where it get's good.. ... We turned around and left the store, minding our own business when the rat-faced employee off the clock says "I bet they didn't f!@#ing ask for it metled, that b1tc!" to which I turned around and replied, " Actually she FUCKING did ask for it melted, but you were too busy distracting your little barista buddy for him to pay any attention to his job" she then promptly informed me and my mom we could go "back to South Scottsdale, honey" and that she wouldn't get into trouble for how she acted... ... We called the manager and still have not heard back over a month later. Amazingly terrible service.


................................................................................
LOCATION #84:  address="9051 E Indian Bend Rd"  city="Scottsdale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85250"  (18 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (451 chars)
It's Starbucks, so you know what to expect in terms of product. This location gets an above average rating because they have not screwed up my order too often and because it is closest drive-thru location on my way to work. The drive thru entry and exit is a little wonky--but this seems to be the case with all other Starbucks in this area (if I ever happen upon a Starbucks with a thoughtfully designed drive thru, I just may faint from the shock).


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (316 chars)
This is a Starbucks - they have coffee.  I do not drink coffee, as I consider it homeless food, but I do drink tea, which I purchased on this visit.  It was not bad.  Also, the scoundrel who took my order said "May the force be with you" as I left, which I believe is a movie reference.  I appreciate his joviality.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (158 chars)
Love coffee, love Starbucks. place was fast but the girl could hardly understand me through the drive through even when i was speaking loud and very clearly.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (40 chars)
Yummy but too expensive for everyday :(


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (22 chars)
Gotta love Starbucks!


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (3002 chars)
*SIGH* ...  ... Iced soy caramel macchiato, you are...the bomb. Like *tick tick*...you and you alone deserve 5 stars despite your evil origins (no, I'm not going to go into a long rant or tirade about the nefarious motives of the Starbucks Corporation...it's like complaining about carbs while eating a pb&j sandwich...I'll let you witness my hypocrisy at another time...). ...  ... However, I get really annoyed when I have a gift card and for some reason or other the cashier says 'the card isn't working in our machine, you will need to call the phone number on the back of the card to get your balance', please give us another form of payment. (Which I invariably do, because I would rather just get the transaction over with instead of bickering with people who handle my consumables (foods, drinks...Drinks...etc.) ...  ... However, that will not stop me from Yelp!ng my feelings about how you done done me wrong...here goes... ...  ...  ... 1) The gift card is for YOUR store (well, not YOUR store entirely (probably), but it's certainly more YOUR store than MY store, as I imagine you are more likely to claim it than I am...in general...blah blah blah...semantics). The phone number is on the card in YOUR hand. The card number is ALSO on the card that YOU are holding. And you are the one who is processing the purchase. Cashiers are the alchemists of the retail world. I push a card through your window, you not only return my card to me, intact...but you also give me a present (sure, if you're going to get hung up on details, I BOUGHT the present...but you can't tell that just from looking at the card)...and a receipt (ok, the receipt kinda gives you a clue that it isn't 'REALLY' a present...but who looks at receipts anyway? Not I, said the cat!!)  ...  ... It's awesome! Oh...oops, sorry, I got distracted...back to the point... ...  ... Why aren't YOU able to get the balance of the card and/or type in the 16 digits?  ...  ... It's not like I'm going to go to starbucks.com to buy apparel. (That ain't my style)...The card is going to have to be used at an actual brick and mortar store, because I tend to use Starbucks cards for...(and you can call me crazy if you'd like, in fact, please do...it gives me a warm, tingly feeling all over...or maybe that's the mischievous, frolicsome (is that a word? Well...it is now!) coffee-beany pheromones wafting up to my nose sending a nearly instantaneous salivary response from my brain to my drooling mouth...*mmm...caffeine*) coffee...or sometimes tea if I'm feeling froggy. The card's magnetic strip will quite likely ALWAYS be faulty...but one way or another, you're going to need to figure out how to get that $50 off of the card and into your accounts receivable department...$6 at a time... ...  ... and ...  ... 2)...Well, there is no '2'.  ...  ... So cashier...for the benefit of everyone else out there with a good-giftcard-gone-bad, please just type in the dang number and we can all move on with our lives. ...   ... Thanks.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (506 chars)
So I had just left Sally's in this shopping complex and was on my way to JoAnn's when my Starbucks radar kicked in and I saw this little (literally) shop. I honestly didn't think you could walk-in to this location, I thought it was drive-thru only. However, after I received my drink and started to drive off, someone walked in, lol. So FYI, if you want, you can go in, but you probably can't turn around ;) ... The lady at the drive-thru was nice and I didn't have to wait long for my delicious beverage.


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (1465 chars)
i usually don't review starbucks because they're generally all the same. ...  ... this one was just not up to their brand standards, though. you can see on other reviews some of the issues i will mention here. ...  ... staff wasn't very friendly upon arrival. i ordered a hot beverage in the middle of a hot summer day. yes, i know what i ordered. why are you questioning me? O_o also, if you're going to ask my name, and then ask me to spell it to you, please try to listen. no point in having me spell it to you for you to get something completely different! #unusualnameproblems  it took about 10 minutes for my drink to be made. the guy that took my order just rang me up and walked away leaving the drive-thru barista to hop over to the other bar to make my drink. she didn't seem too pleased. sad thing was this translated into grumpy customer service. ...  ... i sat down in the room with all the tables and notices that there wasn't really any air flow. it was at least 104 degrees outside, but inside wasn't cool and refreshing like you expect starbucks to be.  ...  ... after sitting a while more, i began to notice how quiet it was in this area with all the tables. i could hear all the baristas bantering back and forth but there was no music!! music adds to the ambiance that IS starbucks.  ...  ... it was just a weird experience all together. thank god there are tons of them around so next time i can just pick an entirely different store to visit.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (1123 chars)
This location is not up to Starbucks standards. I asked for a refill on my passion tea and the response was "did you just get in the drive through because if so I can't do a refill. I said no, I got it at another location much earlier today but I'll just get a water. ... .she said ok venti? I said yes and I'll also get a veggie breakfast sandwhich." I handed her my gift card and debit card to reload it. I said I have a coupon code and I had to repeat it twice. She could have just asked if I got my drink in a drive through and gave me the discount for having the same cup and listened for the code better or ask to see it on my phone to get it right. My breakfast sandwhich was cold in the middle and the guy before me got bacon and was asked if that is what he ordered. He said no I thought I ordered...and it was as different one and not the one I ordered. This location is always hiring. Maybe they were new but it seemed more like a lack of customer service skills. I wonder where the supervisor was during all of this. These people need training and the supervisor should have corrected the mistakes on the spot.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (587 chars)
Starbucks is Starbucks-mediocre at best. This particular location is just the slowest one I have been to, and the customer service is little to be desired. Maybe it's because it's a drive thru location?  ... One of the baristas gave me a hard time about getting soy in my coffee? He thought he was being funny but seriously.. You work in customer service, your sarcastic responses to my request are unnecessary. Also? If you're not busy, an iced coffee shouldn't take longer than 5 minutes to prepare.... Just saying. Considering the other reviews, this appears to be a recurrent issue.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (427 chars)
This location has some serious AC issues.  It's either 20 degrees too warm or 20 degrees to cold.  Customers all talk about it but nothing seems to ever get done about it.  The building is really 2 separate rooms.  1 is where you order your drinks and the other is where the sitting area is.  It feels like 2 completely different temperature zones.  They would benefit from a visit from someone to fix their thermostat issues.


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (235 chars)
Everytime I go through the drive thru at this Starbucks, I end up leaving very frustrated. The wait time is always around 8 minutes, which is way too long for something that should be quick. I will not be coming back to this location!


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (87 chars)
Slowest Starbucks ever. I have been here numerous times, and it never gets any faster.


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (1281 chars)
I generally would not be reviewing a Starbucks on yelp. I normally check in, and be on my way. Until my horrid experience today! ...  ... My drink is a bit on the complicated side. I order a Venti cinnamon dolce latte with 4 shots of espresso, breve and no whip. I've never had a barista question my order, aside from the typical,  "hot or iced?" Today, however, was the best I've ever had, "is that all?" With sarcastic laughter. Followed with, "that will be $6.53." I thought this was on the questionable side, because my drink is normally close to $8.00. For $8.00 a drink, it looks like I'm now also paying for sarcastic rude entertainment. The barista continues on with her rude behavior at the window. I was never greeted. I hear one employee talking to the other questioning my drink, followed by, "charge him for the breve." She finally comes to the window and says, "$7.83" I hand her my card. Still, no type of customer service.   ...  ... I finally get my drink, and thank her. She STILL SAYS NOTHING!! I thank her, and get nothing. Where is the customer service??? Is this place a ghetto franchise?  ...  ... I will never return to this location. I work in real estate and will spread the word.  HORRIBLE customer service! I wish I could give zero stars. Such a shame.


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (1199 chars)
I will be the first one to admit that I have a Starbucks addiction and go there each and every day. You may judge me based on the fact I do not support local coffee houses, and that is all fine and dandy. But what I want every morning to start my day is great customer service and a consistently great product. Is this too much to ask? I certainly think not. ...  ... Occasionally I visit this Starbucks on my lazier mornings because they have a drive thru. I must say, the level of service, plainly stated, sucks here. They make my drink wrong every time and usually argue with me about it. Last time I checked, if I order something daily I know what is should look/taste like. Please just make it right the first time, and if you messed it up.....just say sorry with a smile and re-do it. Enough said. I will never be back to this location again, even on my lazy days. Having the convenience of a drive thru is not worth dealing with the nasty employees and slow service. ...  ... Now if you want a great Starbucks experience I would highly recommend the location at Scottsdale Fashion Square. Every employee there has a great attitude and John the manager exemplifies consistently great service.


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (464 chars)
Worst customer service!  They close their doors before 9, and I was in once and they asked someone to leave because they were closed and it was 4 min till 9!  Refused to refill a kids drink...even tho they have before and ALL other Starbucks have done so!  Worst manager in evenings!  Also, they said they couldn't do a pour over of Sumatra for me...they could only do what was brewing!  Don't waste your time...go to starbucks at Indian bend and scottsdale road!


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (386 chars)
SLOWEST Starbucks on the face of the earth!! I wrote this review while waiting in the drive thru lane for 14 minutes !! Please hire new people with a sense of urgency. If you absolutely have to have your morning Starbucks fix like I do, DO NOT get trapped in that horrendous drive thru. Get out of your vehicle and go inside because its no fun to start your day with stress !! Ugh !!!!


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (191 chars)
Slowest.  Starbucks.   Ever.  Seriously.  I've gotten more free coffee from this than a support group meeting.  I'd rather pay and get it on time.  I like the employees but maybe speed it up


................................................................................
LOCATION #85:  address="9301 E Shea Blvd"  city="Scottsdale"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85260"  (29 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (2322 chars)
As a former Starbucks shift manager, I hold Starbucks stores to extemely high standards. I frequent SBUX a lot. By a lot, I mean more than the average Starbucks freak. With that said my input is based on what I know the founder of Starbucks wanted out of each store, and how close the store is to achieving that level of quality service. If any of the points below has an "N/A" next to it, that simply means I was not able to form an opinion based on our interactions. ...  ... 1-Below Standards ... 2-Meets Standards ... 3-Outperforms Standards ...  ... Store Review ...  ... Let me preface this with two things. First, this store is not perfect whatsoever. However, this store is the busiest store in the state of Arizona in terms of revenues so in light of that, I'm cutting them some slack with the 5 stars. Second- The clientel that this store deals with is sometimes less than pleasant and they do a fantastic job at turning around bad situations. So lets begin!  ...  ... Avg Visits: twice/week ... Partner Friendliness: 2 Partners smile, cheery, initiated conversation, although there are a few bad apples  ... Partner Appearance: 3 All looked professional without exception ... Partner Knowledge: This crew is very experience and knows coffee and Starbucks well ...  ... Store Appearance (decor): 1 Could use some work ... Store Cleansliness: 3 despite being the busiest store, it is always clean from my experience ... Store Comfort:1 This is by far my biggest complaint. I used to frequent this store every day for lunch when I worked in this area. 3 out of 5 times, I could never get a seat and during Arizona's summer's, there was no chance I would sit outside. I often either had to give up finding a seat or wait 15-20 minutes to get a seat.  ...  ... *Either 1 or 2 for this section. Its either right or wrong* ... Beverage Taste: 2 Iced Single Venty Hazelnut Breve Iced Coffee ... Beverage Consistency: 2 Never had funny tasting drinks ... Beverage Temperature: 2 Always ice cold or steamy hot. ... Beverage Preparation (I watch): 2 No health hazards, shortcuts, etc. ... Beverage Mistakes: 2 Never had a wrong drink made.  ...  ... Will I return?: YES ...  ... I personally don't care for Starbucks food and do not believe that is what Starbucks is about. Therefore I do not review their food offerings.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (570 chars)
If you can beat the cars competing for a prime spot in entering through their Drive-Thru, I'd recommend stopping here. ...  ... Why you ask? Well, every time I've been here: ...  ... 1. Staff associates are genuinely friendly ... 2. Staff consistently asks appropriate follow-up questions as to not assume and mess up my order ... 3. Coffee, latte, mocha, et al. are always on-point and made with precision. ...  ...  ... I tried their healthy fare Spinach and Feta breakfast wrap yesterday and am now a FAN! Not only is the calorie count lower, but it really is tasty.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (357 chars)
Truly one of the friendliest hardworking starbucks crews I've ever seen.  Yes they do need to add more tables inside - but the very supportive manager told me she's working on it! ...  ... And to those who strike stars because of "drive throughs and global warming" .... you walked here, in 105 degrees, right!? Like global warming, hypocrisy sucks too ...


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (190 chars)
Michael, you are the friendliest Starbucks worker ever. Your good energy made my day. Thanks Nina for taking the time to make the best double tall dry cappuccino I've ever had at Starbucks.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (33 chars)
Fast, friendly drive-thru.  Yay!


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (25 chars)
Amazing customer service


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (1022 chars)
This location is always busy, especially in the morning. It can take up to 20 mins to get through the drive-thru which is never fun when you are trying to get to work on time. And the parking lot situation is terribly done, totally not their fault obviously! But the employees who work there are absolutely awesome!!! When I was in there this morning my card declined and I had no other way to pay for it. She told me to keep my skinny latte and muffin and not to worry about it, it happens. But I swore up and down that I would be back and of course I was later that morning and I left a tip! I'm an honest person but some places would take your drink back and simply throw it away, but they understand their customers are not first timers and will be back! Not saying go there to try this, but its nice to know great people and decent companies still are to be found around the valley! ...  ...  ... *update* I returned to pay my bill and they wouldn't let me pay for it! Apparently it was my 1 millionth visit freebie!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (732 chars)
Definitely one of the busiest Starbucks ever...  the drive-thru is always chaotic, cars trying to get into the drive thru from the south, north and east ends.  Cars blocking the road, people walking in and out.  Watch out so you don't hit anyone!  However, inspite of all the chaos, the crew in this branch are super NICE & quite efficient actually!  They can usually deal with the drive thru traffic, it goes pretty fast but going inside is even faster.  Just park your car, go inside and pick up your coffee.  Sometimes, the inside line gets too long too but the baristas have a system tohasten  the line.  This Starbucks is in my "hood" and I go back all the time inspite of all the  chaos...  Why?  Because the service is GOOD!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (686 chars)
I like this Starbucks even though it's ridiculously busy. In fact, I think this is the busiest one in the state...or something like that.  ...  ... I usually go through the drive-thru when I go here. I like the fact that they have a drive-thru because I'm too lazy, at times, to get out of my car and go in. Fair warning though...the drive-thru can get really backed up sometimes, so it's probably quicker to park and go inside. ...  ... Working the drive-thru can be challenging because some of the drinks sound alike. I know if I worked it I wouldn't be able to tell the difference between a machiato and an americano...so props to the drive thru workers who never screw my order up.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (664 chars)
Hey, look, here is another Starbucks on this corner, let me try it out and feed my coffee addiction! ... So, in all honesty, I have never ventured inside of this location. Being located right across the street from where I work, I'm usually one of the 7-10 cars in the drive-thru line at 0630 in the morning. But let me say, kudos to you Starbucks for making your drive-thru long enough to accommodate all of our semi parked cars in the morning! And double kudos for being able to make the drinks for the seven other cars in front of me quick enough that I'm not late for the start of my shift (no need to wake up earlier with this Starbucks crew)!  ...  ... xoxo


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (459 chars)
This is a Starbucks. That means certain expectations and almost identical menu. This is an incredibly busy store. It is a rare moment in the morning when the drive through is not occupied by more than ten cars. It seems slow service but if you go in there will be a similar line that has slower service... Or so it seems. we have never had a mistake in our service. The staff is always friendly. We keep going. Don't hesitate to trust to the food or service.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (428 chars)
like any good ol starbucks, it's right near work/home/commute/gym/etc.  ... i'm a fan of the strong yet bitter taste of starbucks. we buy their bags of coffee at the supermarket and then take our empty bags in for free coffees.  ...  ... this location always has a friendly staff and the it's usually pretty busy with alot of hospital folks or people trying to look important on their laptops or ipads.  ...  ... yay starbucks.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (169 chars)
Internet works now. Seating is adequate (a good thing). Service is fast and friendly. And my hummus+chicken+pita+veggies tray is the freshest I've had at any Starbucks.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (117 chars)
I enjoy the atmosphere, the size could be more moderate to keep the private cozy feel but you win some ya lose some.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (98 chars)
The line was a little long but worth the wait! The staff was very friendly. This is my Starbucks.


REVIEW #16:  3 stars  (1257 chars)
This is one of,  if not the busiest Starbucks I have ever been in.  Being from the State of Washington, I have frequented hundreds of their stores, and generally find them relaxing - comfortable to sit and have a cup of coffee, read the morning newspaper, or browse on my laptop.   ...  ... This is not the place for that. It must be because of its location in the midst of a medical center, offices, shopping center, and the bordering residential area.  The first time I came here, I just happened to find a seat.  Rather than catch up on the news, I simply watched the parade of different people come through. It was fun, but tiring and exhausting in a way, especially when I hadn't had my morning coffee. ...  ... That said, the service was great.  The crew worked hard getting everyone served, and doing it with humor and politeness.  I was impressed how they handled themselves in the bustling and chaotic atmosphere, with customers yelling to be heard, and some not happy about the long lines. ...  ... I have since found a number of locally owned, quiet spots that I prefer for my morning coffee.  But every once in a while I will stop by, just to watch the diverse clientele and the frantic atmosphere. One thing it is great for - people watching!!


REVIEW #17:  3 stars  (1177 chars)
As others have noted, this is a very busy place, but for good reason. It's in a fantastic location on Shea Blvd., and the people who work here are incredibly friendly and very hard working, although some of the employees at other nearby Starbucks, such as the one near the Wal-mart by Raintree & 101, are (shockingly) friendlier. It's impossible to get coffee and/or breakfast here in the mornings, though, if you're on your way to work. At 8:30 in the morning they really need to put the most efficient (not necessarily the friendliest) person in front of the cashier counter, and it seems they did quite the opposite. It would also be nice if they could extend the front wall by about 2 feet and put more tables inside. The atmosphere is usually somewhat chaotic, and the music can be just a bit too loud and repetitive, too, but the fact that they even have a lounge chair at which I can park myself with a laptop and chillout for hours on end with free wi-fi I shouldn't complain too much. There aren't any other loungeable coffeeshops very close to this intersection (94th & Shea). UPDATE: Scratch that. Coffee Plantation @ Scottsdale Road and Shea. It's worth the drive.


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (549 chars)
This Starbucks is A-OK considering the amount of business they do.  The service is friendly and they are very efficient at making you're favorite caffeinated Starbucks beverage.  I've been to this Starbucks several times and find them to be somewhat inconsistent at making my coffee or cool drink.  I also think they could be more efficient at cleaning up after people leave.  It's sort of a self serve experience after you've given the coffee barista's you're money. ...  ... But then again it's Starbucks, so may be I shouldn't expect too much...


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (390 chars)
Starbucks is Starbucks is Starbucks.  It is nothing special and this one leaves a little to be desired.  At peak times, the wait can be a bit intense.  The staff is not very friendly or enthusiastic.  That being said, this location is the closest to home and on my route to work, so its what happens when my coffee making boyfriend sleeps in late and I'm left to fend for myself in the AM.


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (386 chars)
So they took the advice of many of us and revamped the place, putting in more tables, and putting efficient workers in at the cashier in the mornings. Great! Only problem is, the wi-fi doesn't work. There's an "attwifi" router, but it's broken. ...  ... Wi-fi is just not optional anymore. It's 2011. A coffee shop without wi-fi might as well be a coffee shop without any tables. Pass.


REVIEW #21:  3 stars  (367 chars)
Service was curt, but pleasant and quick.  Grande looked tiny when flat lid was locked into place (I ordered no whip).  Mocha frappuccino was TOO sweet, I could only drink a third of it, the part with the slushy ice, before tossing the rest away (please recycle plastic!).  Thank goodness I only paid half-price during Starbucks' happy hour (May 1st through May 10).


REVIEW #22:  3 stars  (283 chars)
Instead of going thru the Drive-Thru, I walked in and order Hot Cafe Mocha and light Carmel Frap with both  light on the whip cream. The gal that was making the Frap got lost into what she was making and the whip cream oozing out of the top. My Cafe Mocha seemed to be watered down.


REVIEW #23:  3 stars  (32 chars)
A Starbucks inside a Starbucks.


REVIEW #24:  2 stars  (607 chars)
This Starbucks gets some of the worst marks for service, correct drink order and overall friendliness.  I normally don't expect to hear: "yeah, what do you want?" from the Barista who clearly wasn't having a great day before I stepped up to the counter. ...  ... This store is way too small for the area and tempers seem always to be short here.  The drive-thru doesn't make any sense since it's location only creates a traffic jam.   ...  ... BTW, does anyone really go here to Chipotle?  Starbucks!  Buy them out and reconfigure the location. ...  ... Sorry, I try to avoid this location like the plague.


REVIEW #25:  2 stars  (539 chars)
This place is so freaking busy all the time! The only reason I am giving it 2 stars is because its overpriced and Im not a fan of waiting 20 minutes for a cup of joe every time! Not to mention my bucket of energy is always drained from all of the miserable customers that go to this location! It could just be that Snotsdale is not for me! If you enjoy being around miserable people who all have sticks where the sun dont shine and enjoy adding people to their miserable energy then GO HERE! Otherwise its just like every other Starbucks!


REVIEW #26:  2 stars  (449 chars)
This is by far one of the worst Starbucks.  The place is very busy and while the servers are quick they are far from polite.  Usually when drink errors are made Starbucks is more than willing to fix it but here the staff are almost combative.  Everytime I have gone here too it is as if the ac is broken.  The interior is warm and stale.  It makes you long for the chipolte next door.  Bottom Line: SKip this SB and head across the lot to Chompies.


REVIEW #27:  2 stars  (324 chars)
This has got to be the messiest Starbucks I've ever been to.  I don't know if its just because it is small, but it is very cluttered.  Every time I've gone in there, inventory boxes seem to be just lying around.  I've had a few rude baristas in the drive-thru, a few pleasant ones.  Overall this location is just a bit meh.


REVIEW #28:  1 stars  (327 chars)
Im bummed that I couldn't make a return without a receipt for a mug I got as a gift. I was going to put the credit towards a double steel walked travel mug but now I've got to figure out what to do with this one. Perhaps another location will allow it.  It's possible this is a company policy, but I find that hard to believe.


REVIEW #29:  1 stars  (239 chars)
The drive-thru at this location is not unlike the Apapa-Oshodi Expressway. ...  ... *The Apapa-Oshodi Expressway, the gateway to Nigeria's two busiest seaports, Apapa and Tin Can Island, is home to the worst chronic gridlock in the world.


................................................................................
LOCATION #86:  address="13706 W Bell Rd"  city="Surprise"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85374"  (20 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (334 chars)
I love the staff at this store. They are the reason I keep coming back.  This store is usually very busy - however the employees take the time to talk to you, get to know what's going on and really build a relationship with their customers.   ...  ... Any Starbucks can make you a drink - this Starbucks is more about the experience.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (268 chars)
I'm a Huge fan of this Starbucks!!! It has awesome outdoor seating and if someone is smoking (which they are not supposed to) You can ask the manager and they will have the smoker stop immediately. My family loves coming here and it's great for business meetings too!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (883 chars)
This is a very nice quaint little Starbucks with some nice outdoor seating near the Surprise Stadium. We met up with a friend from SoCal who was in town the same times as us and came here after the game to just chill.  ...  ... The staff was very nice. We placed our orders. It was a pretty quiet Friday night approaching closing time. We were very happy to find that even in this part of town, closing time for the Starbucks was 11pm. We though for sure that, since everyone in this area had already been in bed for 3 hours,  they would tend to close earlier. Thank goodness no.  ...  ... I ordered a tea and was very happy to find that they had honey to put in it.  SG ordered a decaf frap. They were just as good as any other starbucks and perfect for what we had in mind.  ...  ... Oh, and the bathroom was very clean. A key point when you are drinking lots of tea or coffee....


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (411 chars)
If you make chai tea lattes, they will come! At the very least, I'd show up for sure, lol! ...  ... This location is small, has some indoor seating and outdoor seating.  ...  ... Service is friendly, but they always seem to be training new batistas when I visit of late & the wait time to get my drink (not order) seems to be higher than in most other locations.  ...  ... The drinks are as great, as always :)


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (329 chars)
This Starbucks is close to my work, so I'm in here on a regular basis. Though it can be busy at certain times in the morning, the staff is always friendly and they work hard to get everyone's orders out as quickly as possible. I appreciate their customer service and will continue to go here when I need my morning caffeine fix!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (286 chars)
I can't, for the life of me, remember the Barista who assisted me, but she was HILARIOUS and fun!  I would come back just for her customer service.  She was a little short blondie.   ...  ... The customer service was great.  It is located near a frozen yogurt place as well. Win!  Win!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (281 chars)
Yes, it's a Starbucks... what's there to Yelp about, you may wonder?  ...  ... The staff. They're friendly and welcoming; they're prompt; and they're accurate. I frequent many locations, and have come to really appreciate these qualities. Great job, kudos to the team at this one!


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (469 chars)
Seating inside is very limited, there was more outside however hopefully you like the sound and view of traffic from Grand. Staff is friendly however they didn't seem like they know what they were doing. Plus they messed my order up, ordered a tall chai tea and got charged for the grande, I tried to explain but he didn't seem to know the difference. Not the Starbucks you want to come to if your trying to read a book or study a bit, it's more of a social Starbucks.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (405 chars)
Stiff competion from the other 2 starbucks near by.   ...  ... Employees are nice, but I often forget about this location since it is hidden from the street view and this intersection in surprise is such hell, I rush past everything in this corner. I hate trying to get out of this parking lot, be it onto bell or onto grand. ...  ... There's one right across the way inside of B&N... i usually go there.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (325 chars)
Starbucks...what can one expect...the coffee is decent. What makes each one different than another is the employees. This one has okay morning staff but much better evening staff. Not a very spacious place to hang out, so if it's busy, there will most likely be little room to sit and it will be cramped if there is seating.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (285 chars)
Starbucks coffee: you know what to expect. ...  ... Surprise: Always something interesting going on. ...  ... Combine the two: one jam packed starbucks that is way too crowded.  I do not think it would be possible to find a seat that was not occupied by a geek-squader using a laptop.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (69 chars)
Service could be better, but everything is usually quite acceptable.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (736 chars)
This particular Starbucks has some very friendly barista's however you're positive experience at getting a tasty cup of you're favorite caffeinated beverage and doing some light reading or surfing Yelp stops there unfortunately.   ...  ... They are very inconsistent at making their drinks.  They seem to have different people working each time I visit.  Their is nothing worse than spending TOO MUCH money for a cup of coffee already, let alone have it made wrong with either too much ice, not enough coffee or too much water...  Argue... ...  ... Another note, they need to focus more on cleaning their table/chair area for their customers. It was so dirty I could not stay and enjoy my watered down, over iced, not tasty beverage...


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (517 chars)
I've never been a huge fan of this particular Starbucks location, the coffee is almost always lackluster and the shop just seems messy. On my last visit, which was about 2 weeks ago, a young man maybe around 19 was working as the barista and couldn't seemed to be bothered because he was busy flirting with some young girls that we're hanging out there. I just had a tall cup of coffee which was burnt... Needless to say I won't be going back and instead I'll be going to the Barnes and Noble cafe across the street!


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (259 chars)
I hit up Starbucks all over and my iced green tea is not what I've come to expect, it is very weak. Have been to this location before and had whip added to my no whip soy latte. I hate giving a poor review, but my experiences here have not been the greatest.


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (115 chars)
Ehh its ok!! The location at bell & reems is 10x better!! Better service there & better drinks. This one is okey..


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (61 chars)
Seriously slow tall old man doesn't know how to make drinks.


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (892 chars)
We have been to this location before and decided to give them another chance.  Wrong.  Same as before, it took forever for the girl at the cash register to ring us up, she forgot both of the food items we ordered.  Finally we sit down to wait for our coffee, I get mine pretty quickly, however it took way to long to make my boyfriends drink, which was less complicated then mine.  5 other customers received their drinks before he did.  I didn't really understand what the problem was, our drinks should have been ready at the same time.  1 lousy cashier, 1 person making drinks and 1 loud mouth female talking and laughing so loudly, we left because of the conversation she was trying to carry on with one of her co workers.   The first time we went to this location, we stood at the counter for quite awhile without being acknowledged.  We definitely will find another location next time.


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (888 chars)
This location is the worst around. The baristas were rude and pushy with their products. When I refused to buy their nasty tea or over priced coffee the cashier became overly sarcastic and short with us. ...  ... While waiting for our drinks, the baristas loudly bad mouthed a coworker and one even went as far as to talk about cutting the hated girl's hours so they didn't have to work with her as much. Not professional, not impressive, just plain rude and off-putting. ...  ... The inside dining area is small, crowded, and disgusting. The girls could spend less time talking trash about their fellow coworkers and more time doing what they're being paid to do.  ...  ... The outside dining area is mismatched (not in an attractive way) and is reminiscent of walking through crap at a yard sale.  ...  ... I won't be returning here and I won't be recommending this location to anyone.


REVIEW #20:  1 stars  (747 chars)
funny how one bad experience leads the way for all the others to fall into place. ...  ... the staffing here is terrible.  two people on register, one making drinks...and the ones at the register are clueless.   ...  ... i gave the girl 5 dollars to add on to my starbucks card and we purchased two drinks.  she essentially pocketed 5 dollars because of her incompetence.  I had 6 something pre existing on my gold card and my total came out to 9 dollars.  somehow she ended up charging me twice and because the website does not reflect pre existing balance after your transaction is complete, I can't go back and try and get my money back.  and when I mentioned something, she said, no.  you owe more. ...  ... NEVER AGAIN!! TRAIN YOUR CASHIERS!


................................................................................
LOCATION #87:  address="1717 S Rural Rd"  city="Tempe"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85281"  (6 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (129 chars)
I think this Starbucks had great customer service and I was in and out of the drive thru in 5 mins. When does that ever happen??


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (528 chars)
This location has a drive through and a lobby ... I have never had an issue parking in their lot ... The lobby has both comfortable chairs and less comfortable chairs ... Right next to Potbelly's so if you are studying and want a sandwich you can pretty much just step outside, ... The drinks are made to standard, and the people who work there are nice. ... One less star because although the people who work there are nice, they are not very knowledgable and that is kind of irritating. ...  ... Otherwise I am a fan, indeed!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (375 chars)
Not sure why this location has such low ratings! I've been through the drive-thru at least a dozen times and never leave dissatisfied (other than when they're out of blueberry scones). The service is always friendly and the line typically moves pretty fast. My only complaint would be that they've overfilled my drinks on multiple occasions... I'm not a fan of sticky hands.


REVIEW #4:  2 stars  (289 chars)
This starbucks doesn't live up to the standard of the starbucks name. Each time I have been there my drink has either been made wrong or poorly. The location doesn't seem to be prepared for their morning rush. I make the extra drive down rural to go to another starbucks to get my coffee.


REVIEW #5:  1 stars  (271 chars)
Worst starbucks I've ever been to. I repeated my order three times and they still got it wrong-- twice. Even after they remade it it still didn't taste right. They messed up two other people's drinks while I was standing there. And they were slow!! Won't come back here.


REVIEW #6:  1 stars  (207 chars)
The guy at the drive through line treated me like I was stupid because I missed the order thing. On top of that the coffee is mediocre. Thanks for ruining my morning coffee and insulting me at the same time


................................................................................
LOCATION #88:  address="1800 E Rio Salado Pkwy Ste 120"  city="Tempe"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85281"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (105 chars)
The staff is amazing!! They are so friendly and willing to answer any questions I have! Love this place!


REVIEW #2:  2 stars  (1265 chars)
On Thanksgiving morning my husband and I wanted to make our one-and-only outing for the day a stroll to our nearest Starbucks. I go to a different Starbucks near my office on a daily (sometimes twice daily) basis. On this day, I order my usual non-fat latte and was disappointed at the flavor, or lack of, to be more accurate. It had little to no espresso taste, and was not the right temperature. I told the barista that my latte was not up to par (compared with what I get every day at another store) but received no acknowledgement or apology. She promptly made me another (again no acknowledgement or apology) which tasted exactly the same - blah.  I then conveyed my displeasure with the order taker, even offering to pay for another just to have it made correctly. Now I was getting somewhere, as she finally explained her awareness of a problem with their machine, and has been waiting for some time for management to do something about it. I'm not sure why she didn't explain this in the first place. In any case she (the order taker not the original girl) made me another, which actually tasted superb. So at that point I wasn't sure if it was equipment or server deficiencies, and her explanation left me confused and not sure if I ever wanted to return.


REVIEW #3:  2 stars  (813 chars)
I work near here, so it's the most convenient place to get coffee when you're hungover and already 5 minutes late. But every time I go in I wonder why I had. ...  ... Starbucks' coffee isn't really that good for the most part, but I've definitely had some good baristas that know how to make a good latte. The baristas here however, are obnoxious teenagers who don't know/care what they're doing. It's dirty and hectic, and they're always throwing empty pitchers around and sighing heavily at the STRESS of it all. You probably won't be addressed for a few minutes when approaching the register, as the girl will be frantically stirring some frappuccino mix and mumbling to herself about how much she hates her life. ...  ... At least the coffee's been hot every time I've been in here. But guys. Relax a little.


REVIEW #4:  2 stars  (387 chars)
Very peeved when I was enjoying some fascinating books on Star Wars ;) at B&N today and then go to order a latte with my SB Au Card and they don't accept them nor SB rewards... whuuhh?  Seriously??  Why even carry the name of the chain if you're not going to treat it like a chain.  Girld told me I could get a B&N card.. eh, me thinks not! ...  ... Sorely disappointed... felt tricked.


REVIEW #5:  2 stars  (206 chars)
It's crammed on the inside and they don't have any comfortable chairs to sit in while there. Don't plan on spending any amount of time here with no place to hang out-chairs they have really hurt your back.


REVIEW #6:  2 stars  (158 chars)
This is the Starbuck's inside Target. Friendly staff and great drinks however I docked them a couple stars because the tables in the seating area are filthy.


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (6 chars)
Don't


................................................................................
LOCATION #89:  address="1817 E Guadalupe Rd Ste 101"  city="Tempe"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85283"  (16 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (732 chars)
I have been coming to this Starbucks for awhile and there is a reason why. I started out with the drive-thru that has always been fast. Even if there are 10 cars in line, I can count on getting my coffee within 5 minutes max. Way awesome for someone like me who is constantly on a busy schedule. I then went inside one morning when I had extra time and the staff was so friendly! Everyone was engaging, they completely made the best coffee ever! And my breakfast I ordered was just the perfect temp to eat right away. The store manager introduced himself to me as Nicholas and has made a point to say hi to me every morning since I've been back, even on drive-thru. I will always come to this Starbucks, even if it's out of my way!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (484 chars)
I love this Starbucks because the people are ALWAYS friendly and very sociable, smiling, and they are fast! I enjoy coming here, whether through the drive-up or walking in and always get treated like more than just a number but like a VIP.  ...  ... This Starbucks has free wi-fi as well so I know I can bring my laptop here and do what i need to do online (including Yelp reviews) and not get hassled. There are plenty of tables both inside and out and this place is always hopping.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (471 chars)
They are always fast, friendly and smiling. Whether you go the drive-thru route or go inside, they are definitely on top of their game. Perfect every time. ...  ... I don't venture out of my two favorites very often . . . Vente latte with whole milk or Vente green tea latte with whole milk, no sweetener. Perfect every time.  ...  ... I have given them a fair chance to mess something up (I have drunk enough Starbucks to have a gold card!), but no, perfect every time.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (195 chars)
I really enjoy this location! They are very courteous, have never gotten my order wrong, and have a great atmosphere if you want to go in and get your drink. I definitely recommend this location


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (134 chars)
I love it here... Drive Thru is faster than most others and I can have my Venti Iced Quad Skinny Vanilla Latte in my mouth faster....


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (82 chars)
Quick, friendly service. They always get your drink right. The location is clean.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (45 chars)
chai tea latte hot...is my all time favorite


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (537 chars)
Yeah so this Starbucks location is close to work. I come ... here to grab a Tarragon Chicken Salad sandwich and a coffee. ... Parking is ok if you come early in the morning before the ... Habit wakes up. Service is pretty good although the drive-thru ... window takes priority. Never too crowded - just your usual ... poser with laptop or ipad hanging out. There's also seating ... outside. I'm a to-go type so that doesn't matter much. They ... are consistently quick, never messed up an order and that's ... what keeps me coming back.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (285 chars)
As far as Starbucks go, I usually have good luck with this location. I'm usually able to get through the drive-thru in a few minutes and the products they deliver are consistent and essential to my morning commute. Good customer service and how can you go wrong with a hazelnut latte?


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (208 chars)
Oh Starbucks how do I love you so, no matter which location I go to, my order comes out the same and always perfect! Its bliss in a cup!   The baristas always friendly and kind!  Yep I will keep coming back.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (126 chars)
Great little Starbucks with an awesome drive-thru that usually doesn't have a line. These baristas are always super friendly.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (965 chars)
This is my local Starbucks-- I enjoy the outdoor seating and banana choco chip bread. Usually the baristas are friendly and during one of my last visits the guy behind the counter even gave me a great suggestion when he saw I was struggling to make up my mind. However, during a routine run yesterday morning, I received the worst Starbucks customer service ever (and I'm including the airport Starbucks in that statement too). ...  ... I asked what the Chicken sausage and egg white wrap had in it (besides the obvious) and the flustered barista (there was no one else behind me) replied, "A lot of stuff, I don't know." And just stared. The F? Since it was obvious things weren't going my way, I switched gears and asked for a blonde iced coffee to which he curtly told me "you can't do that, we only make iced coffee one way." Le sigh.  ...  ... Of course, none of this will stop me from coming again but I wish I'd asked that dude, can't we just all get along?


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (209 chars)
Tall soy chai tasted like any other one that I have had at Starbucks. The BFs drip coffee did not taste like it had been there for a decade.... and they had a mug his mom wanted (she collects Starbucks mugs).


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (518 chars)
Everyone loves Starbucks, but sadly at this location has terrible customer service. I walked in, no welcome or anything like everyone usually gets. Stood at the counter and the young girl kept waking back and forth, then cleaned out the drain then finally came to the register and said "what would you like?" No how are you or what can I make for you today. Her makeup was completely blacked out eyes, had scars all over her arms and no smile. Definitely wont be returning to this location again. Highly disappointed.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (62 chars)
SUPER SLOW!!!! If you are in any kind of hurry don't go here.


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (56 chars)
The drive through is soooooo slow. What's up with that?


................................................................................
LOCATION #90:  address="1926 N Scottsdale Rd"  city="Tempe"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85281"  (14 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (470 chars)
This is a Starbucks location close to home that has a Drive-Thru. It can be a bit awkward if you come from the side of McKellips since it curves to the left if you're ordering coffee via Drive-Thru.  ...  ... Parking lot here is a bit small but usually never have any problems. I haven't had any major issues with my drink orders here; however sometimes it can take a bit longer during the AM hours than the evenings.  ...  ... Free WIFI and there's also patio seating.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (107 chars)
I love this place I always get the iced caramel macchiato it's amazing I'm actually a Starbucks junkie lol


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (570 chars)
This Starbucks is located on a busy street, on a busy corner in Tempe. There are plenty of places to sit outside but who wants to in AZ in the summer right? ...  ... The weekend we were there, the women's restroom had plugged up in a an ugly way but no worries, I tend ot use either one if I have to go so I popped into the men's. ...  ... The place was clean (besides the toilet) very cool and even better, the staff was very cool. It's nice to get your regular drink at a Starbucks and it tastes as good as it does at your fave Starbucks in San Diego...thanks ladies!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (535 chars)
Being from out of town and getting in at 3 am. I was so glad to find a Starbucks close to the hotel. Just a short walk away and I was enjoying good coffee and light breakfast items. The only problem is I had to get dressed and make myself semi-presentable.   If you have ever had coffee made from those little 4 cup coffee pots in hotels you would be looking for another venue for coffee too. I have learned that if you are stuck in that type of situation make sure you have some Via with you and add it to the pot. It helps big time.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (490 chars)
A great place to meetup for Coffee and Patries.  It's located right on the border of Scottsdale and Tempe, so it's convenient when I setup quick meetings with clients and colleagues. ...  ... I'm a pretty boring Coffee drinker....99% of the time, I'll order Coffee and drink it black.  On rare occasions I will try something else.  It's a Starbucks.  The Coffee and food is consistent with all of the others I've been to. ...  ... Service here is good as well. ...  ... Return Factor - 80%


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (407 chars)
Great location in South Scottsdale near Tempe, friendly staff and you don't have to wait over 5 minutes for your drinks.  They do have a drive-thru lane if you don't want to get out of your car during hot summer weather or cold winter weather.  Sometimes you might not be able to enter the store from Scottsdale Rd. as there's a bus stop right next to the entrance.  Overall a great location in Scottsdale.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (288 chars)
Great location, friendly staff and your typical Starbucks drinks. I don't drink a lot of coffee so I usually have tea and you can't really go wrong with tea :)  ...  ... Mostly female staff in the morning and they are all very nice ...  ... Not very packed as well makes for fast service


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (149 chars)
These guys are super cool. Fast and friendly, and my dog wants it noted they give out awesome dog treats to dogs, whtether they are behaving or not.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (67 chars)
In and out quick, with hot coffee. Friendly staff. Good Starbucks.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (289 chars)
I hate going threw the drive-thru is "charles" is the one working the window. He creeps me out. Plus when he is at the window it seems to take FOREVER ... Other than that I am addicted. I am here atleast once a day and usually the people know my order without even having to say anything!


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (208 chars)
Very friendly staff, clean restaurant and bathrooms and super drinks! I guess that's why it is always busy at this location.  Check it out but don't sit on the leather chairs, they are reserved for me...lol!


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (440 chars)
I use this location since it is so close to work. However,  I will no longer be using this location any longer. I have given the store many chances to make up for slow service. ...  ... I typically use the drive thru. I always have a long wait, Friday was the last time I was there and I waited for 10 minutes. I will use the coffee shop across the street (Dunkin Donuts) for now on. The coffee is just as good and they are extremely fast.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (332 chars)
The patio is right next to a bus stop and also right next to four lanes of loud traffic. Not sure which is worse, but bus people might take the cake and that includes random homeless dudes shuffling through the garbage while you attempt to enjoy coffee. This location is doomed if your looking for the outdoor Starbucks experience.


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (65 chars)
Slow and understaffed.  Looked past me and took known guy behind


................................................................................
LOCATION #91:  address="3223 S McClintock Dr"  city="Tempe"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85282"  (12 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (485 chars)
Starbucks is my ultimate go-to place for coffee. I don't go there a lot because I can't always afford it, but when I do, it's a treat in itself. Love their specialty drinks and the wonderful customer service I receive each time I go. Also, Starbucks is one place I love receiving gift cards from for the reason of treating myself or just something different from the usual.  ...  ... This location is always quick and reliable and I keep going back because their service is top-notch!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (252 chars)
I live this location because there is not a crazy line on Saturday mornings and they brew their iced coffee to perfection. As a former sbux employee, I can taste that some other locations don't know how to brew it correctly because it tastes watery :/


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (106 chars)
this is my fav starbux the drinks are perfect the store is allways clean and the servers are allways nice


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (571 chars)
I was in a time crunch and needed a little caffeine to start my day. Drive-thru yeah! Well, if I would have noticed the long long long line in the drive-thru I probably should have opted to go inside or bypass all together. Well, I made it to my destination on time. But a bit stressed. My iced peppermint latte was just what I needed and it was soooooo good. I am used to having Starbucks at the airport and it just never seems to taste right, so I was super happy to have it just like I like it. Thanks for the boost of energy which was needed on this particilar day:)


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (408 chars)
This is my favorite Starbucks in Tempe. Over the past year they have hired some awesome baristas that are much more friendly than what's been around in years past. Plus, I love the trivia they have on the white board behind the espresso machines. It can get busy in there but it's a good mix of students, young professionals and older folks from the surrounding neighborhoods. Lots of patio seating as well.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (253 chars)
They were really helpful. The girls behind the counter were really nice. The wait wasn't too long, especially for 8:30 in the morning. When I got my drink the lady wanted me to make sure it tasted good before I left. Very considerate. It was perfect =]


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (49 chars)
Nice location, prompt efficient service. Keeper.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (1724 chars)
Did you know that Starbucks now offers free Wifi?  You no longer have to pay to surf the net here.  Amazing!   ...  ... I've been going to various Starbucks for years.  Surprisingly, I've never been to this location before, because I am usually at Goldbar right across the parking lot. ...  ... Recently, I found out from another Starbucks that they've dropped the charges for thier internet service.  So, since I was a little burnt out on going to Goldbar, I decided to mix things up and come here for a change. ...  ... The interior seating is limited.  Not a whole lot of places to sit, especially if your trying to plug your computer in like myself.  There is seating outside, but I try to avoid it in the summer if I can, even with the spritzers. ...  ... I placed my order for an Arnold Palmer.  After I paid, I sat down at my computer and waited for my drink....and waited some more...and more waiting.  It wasn't until another customer told me that my drink was ready that I was even aware that the drink was done and just sitting on the counter.  I was sitting, literally, right in front of the register!  How could they not have annouced that my drink was ready?  I sat there for a good 5 minutes!  Its hot outside! I'd like my drink! ...  ... Normally, I stand by the bar area and wait for my drink, and they will annouce when its done.  Not here!  Minus points for that, especially considering I was sitting right there! ...  ... Anyways, I will probably be back to this location, but only as a back up to when A) Goldbar is full and I need to get online, or B) when I'm sick of Goldbar and need a change of pace.  These situations happen on a regular basis, and its nice to mix things up every once in a while.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (903 chars)
Not great, but not awful. ...  ... This is your typical Starbucks. It's usually pretty average, however the last few times my coffee has tasted burnt. One time, they warned me saying it was the bottom of the batch but the two subsequent times I have not received such a disclaimer. Also, my recent Pumpkin Spice latte tasted strange, and my friend said it tasted like hot chocolate. Not good, but not awful.  ...  ... There is limited seating inside, but the patio makes up for it with various groupings of tables and chairs. I always see folks hanging out and talking - what I like to see at a coffee shop. No drive-thru, which is a let-down, though I like being forced to enjoy the full Starbucks experience sometimes. ...  ... What brings me back is location, my caffeine fix, quick service and a new trivia question on the whiteboard every week!  What is Philematology? The baristas here will know.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (450 chars)
If you don't know what Starbucks has to offer by now you've been living in a cave. If you're looking for something different Gold Bar is way better, and it's located in the same parking lot. I believe in supporting local joints first over huge corporations. If you want the same old thing Starbucks is great. But if you want something new, fresh, fun, and to support a local business, take your money to Gold Bar. I promise you wont be disappointed.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (297 chars)
Not my favorite location. Stopped in this evening and had to wait about 10 minutes with only one person ahead of me. The barista would take the order, go start on the drink, come back for payment, then finish the drink. Repeat routine for next customer. Inefficient. She was very friendly though.


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (575 chars)
This is not my favorite starbucks location. Most Starbucks staff are usually over the top bubbly, even in the morning (of course, I would be too if I had a constant flow of caffeine available to me at all times) For some reason at this location, it's like the baristas don't like coffee or something....just not very welcoming people as I have experienced in other stores.  ...  ... One time, they even served me my oatmeal raw.......that's how I know none of them actually drink coffee :/ caffeine wouldn't let you forget a thing like HOT WATER to go in your oatmeal.......


................................................................................
LOCATION #92:  address="420 S Mill Ave"  city="Tempe"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85281"  (32 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1101 chars)
I would typically never write a review for strbucks because it is all the same.  I mean that in the best possible way as i have come to expct a certain level of service and quality.  Starbucks is amazing for kids as my dzughter oly drinks warm milk and so anywhere i see a starbucks i can ge a kids milk.  I have had  great serive at this location.  Since i could not find the starbucks at the asu bookstore location, i am using this review too but really the five stars is for this location. I wanted to give the asu location one star.  My barista NOEl today was exceptionaaly rude. She did not know how to make nor ring up a kids drink and when it  came up wrong instead of offering to fix it told me that  is how it is done.  If my other experiences weren t so good with starbucks i would have switched over to petes.  If you happen to be the starbucks manager at the asu bookstore location too, NOEL definitely could use some more training in both drink preparation and customer service. ...  ... Sorry for the spelling areas but i am typing on my iphone and havent found the pellchck option yet.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (516 chars)
This is my favorite starbucks probably because I go here about 3 times a week. The staff are also super friendly and know me by name. You can tell they make a point to remember your name and your drink if you are a regular. And they always have a smile on your face and ask about your day. Now parking.. probably isnt the best for this location (wouldnt know because I always walk). There is plenty of seating and the bar is off to the side so you dont have to get your extras around a crowd of people. Keep it up!!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (441 chars)
Speedy service, great beverages and super friendly staff. I come here almost every day and I've never been disappointed. I looove the ham and cheese breakfast sandwich, the everything bagel and the caesar salad. The Tazo teas are delicious both iced and hot, and I love the coffee as well. One thing I might add is that I didn't particularly care for the cheese croissant because it was too sweet for me, but I've loved everything else.  :)


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (415 chars)
My morning ritual Monday through Friday is a trip to my local Starbucks.  The employees there are very friendly, knowledgeable and always treat me like family.  They make it a point to know your name and your drink preferences.  We often have our drinks waiting for us when we arrive because they've seen us across the street....now that's service.  What an awesome group of individuals, Starbucks should be proud.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (374 chars)
This is my favorite Starbucks location! Even when living miles down the road in Mesa, I would drive out of my way to frequent this location. The staff is very friendly and never misses a beat, they even have gotten my order memorized. There is always more than enough space to sit down and get any work or reading done and usually prime space around the electrical sockets.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (338 chars)
I work right by this location, so I'm in all the time at all hours of the day! They save my life! Often when I come in around 8:30am, the line is at least halfway down the store, but I don't think I've ever waited longer than 15 minutes to get up to the front. Woo! The employees are great and a couple of the guys even remember my name!


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (257 chars)
Best Starbucks ever!! They have every single evolution drink here and I really trust them with making my daily drinks. Staff is nice and efficient. I'm a regular and one time the barista took only a minute longer and presented me with a free drink coupon!!


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (181 chars)
One of my favorite Starbucks.  The service is awesome and there's always a good crowd.  it's great to spend the early morning on the patio which faces the corner of Mill and 5th...


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (756 chars)
I really like this location. Now, I generally stop by in the morning around 7:45 or so, so this review is probably more for the a.m., not so much how it is in the p.m. ...  ... Service is always fast and the employees are very friendly. Yesterday I ordered a coffee and a breakfast wrap. The coffee came fast, but apparently they had forgotten to warm my wrap. They gave me a voucher for a free drink for having forgotten (it's not like I waited that long, I just had to ask about it, I didn't even complain or anything) ...  ... Anyways, very happy with this location for my morning fix. ...  ... (oh yeah, parking is a problem though. But, usually that early in the morning, you can find parking on the street. The parking meters are free before 8 a.m.)


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (433 chars)
This is a very unique Starbucks location, and a lot of fun to be at. There is a very diverse crowd there, the layout has more seating than most locations (inside and out), and the feel is very comfortable and interesting. The only issue I have is that the lines are huge there and the way the counter is situated it created a big, awkward bottleneck where you pick up the drinks. If you can deal with that, though, it's a fun place!


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (429 chars)
yay, im a fan. Of course it's starbucks, but this one is good. They're quick and pretty friendly. Not overly strange barista types. At night it can be a good place to get some work done as it is decently empty at night. The crowd comes in at lunch and late morning. Early or late enough and you'll have a free spot to get a cup.  ...  ... I'd tell you what I had, but it's starbucks, if you don't know what to order...it's 2012.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (395 chars)
This probably some of the greatest service I have had to date from a Starbucks location. I really like the layout of this location. Its spacious. The employees are super friendly and my order was repeated several times instead of just being written on a plastic cup and sat down on the counter. I felt like a real customer. I will definitely be returning to this location for my caffeine needs.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (280 chars)
The one thing @Starbucks excels at is providing a comfortable environment to just "hang out". ...  ... Free WiFi, usually ample power outlets, air conditioned, comfy seating, and all the free water you can drink. ...  ... For these reasons I still go. ...  ... And I am grateful.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (150 chars)
Nice, big Starbuck's near ASU. Service appears faster than an average Starbuck's and there's an amazing amount of seating. Nice job on this location!


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (104 chars)
Morning crew is fantastic! Afternoon crew could use some smiles and customer service training. Grouchy!


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (51 chars)
Grab a cup, grab an outdoor chair, enjoy the show!


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (49 chars)
just about the only place to get coffee on Mill.


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (1822 chars)
Yeah, I'll admit it. I drink Starbucks. I even enjoy it. There goes my indie cred. ...  ... Whatevs. It's coffee, and with their new not-burned-to-oblivion roast, it's better than it used to be. It's also on the way to work and a lot faster than stopping by Cartel. Plus, I can stop in when I take the bus to work, which I can't do with Cartel.  ...  ... That's where the comparison ends, though. No matter how you slice it, Starbucks' coffee is nothing to write home about - it's bland. It's boring. It's...well...Starbucksy. But the baristas are perky, welcoming and efficient. They even make a point to ask about my morning.  ...  ... Why they insist on asking how I spell my name, however, I will never, ever know. ...  ... With an h, without an h, who gives a good goddamn? Will it make the lattes taste like they were made by a person and not a robot? Otherwise, I really don't give a shit what you write on my paper cup. You can call me Ted Kaczynski for all I care. Let me just put up the hood on this sweatshirt and grab my drink and I will be on my way back to my cabin in Montana.  ...  ... I've also been tempted to tell them my name is something ridiculous. Like, "It's Melanie, but with two ee's at the end and a circumflex on the a." Just to see if they'd do it. Or ask what a circumflex is.  ...  ... But you know what, I'm tired of hating on Starbucks. Sure, it's an easy target: too big, too corporate, too friendly. Sure, there's a lot of crappola for sale along with my coffee. And yeah, the pre-packaged food is overpriced. But in the world of corporate behemoths, I could be dealing with a lot worse - in terms of employment practices, environmental practices, trade practices, you name it.  ...  ... Plus, they compliment my outfit and tell me I look pretty. And at 7:30 a.m., I'm a fucking sucker.


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (627 chars)
I'm a fan of all coffee houses. I like the music, the smell, and the people who congregate at these locations. The best thing to me about this particular location, is the outside 'dining' - you see, I enjoy watching people on there way to things, or coming back from things...or even the few who have not-a-thing going on at all. The Mill Ave Starbucks provides a great venue (and even a good drink here or there). So, on the weekends you might find me sipping a drink and watching the people go by on Mill.  ...  ... P.S. for all those people watchers, the weekends are the best because that is when the real freaks come out!


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (490 chars)
Nice looking place and friendly staff. ...  ... My only complaint would be all of the non-paying customers that come in and are allowed to stay.  Lots of street people and bums take advantage of the free air conditioning, water, and restrooms but they take up seating and stay all day.  The inappropriate conversations take away from the coffee shop environment and make me uncomfortable at times.   ...  ... Starbucks needs to crack down and offer their services to paying customers only.


REVIEW #21:  3 stars  (175 chars)
This location is big, clean, and really nice. The staff isn't very friendly, and they were kinda slow too. But they do have city and state mugs if you're a collector like me!


REVIEW #22:  3 stars  (127 chars)
It's quite big for a starbucks.  Right across from the university so lots of students.  It does what starbucks do.  it's good.


REVIEW #23:  3 stars  (126 chars)
Only issue I have is there is typically no place to park if you drive. Oh and the bums taking up all the seats outside. WTF??


REVIEW #24:  3 stars  (110 chars)
Close proximity to the Tempe Mission hotel and very quick service. ... Nice table area, with lots of seating.


REVIEW #25:  2 stars  (1330 chars)
Starbucks, you evil little addiction. Before moving to AZ I wouldn't even touch the stuff (was a die hard Dunkies fan for my iced java).  Moved here and the dearth of Dunkies forced my hand to sip some S-bucks.  Fast fwd to today and I'm a balls-out addict.  Evil and odd how that happens. ...  ... I get my morning fix at the 7th St location (see my review here: http://www.yelp.com/biz/starbucks-coffee-phoenix-4#hrid:sO9RZ18XimUtEGPIWtbSwQ/src:self ) but as I work on Mill Ave I sometimes need an afternoon re-fill and patronize the Mill Ave location.  The product's the same as every other Starbucks in the world, so what differentiates one location from another?  The staff and service, and herein lies my issue. ...  ... Just about everyone who works here is great, but man alive you guys are so slow sometimes.   I walk 2 1/2 blocks from my office to come here and the entire round-trip affair is a painstaking half an hour!!  How can this be?  I understand that you're a high foot traffic location (right off campus and city hall), but I recommend you drink your own Kool-Ade, do a shot of espresso (Yes Virgina, there's NO "X" in espresso), and put some pep in your step!! ...  ... Again, I have to reiterate that the staff here is super friendly and accommodating, I just wish it didn't take so long to re-fuel my tank.


REVIEW #26:  2 stars  (606 chars)
If you ever imaged a Starbucks that smelled of sweat socks mixed with caramel and coffee, you've come to the right place.. ...  ... The Starbucks on Mill is easily the smelliest Starbucks in town.  The coffee is still decent because its a Starbucks, but the place just is not great.  I do enjoy the couches when people aren't living on them for 8 hours at a time.  The place is usually packed with people using laptops for the free wifi, and the smell comes from the people off the streets walking in and out of the place.  Dont forget.. t his is Mill Ave.. so all walks of life come here. ...  ... Enjoy!


REVIEW #27:  2 stars  (435 chars)
The Coffee was just okay.  We also ordered a red velvet and a vanilla bean cupcake.  Both had the thickest frosting ever!  Me and the bf looked at each other and asked, "does this cupcake have coffee in it?"  I am not sure if it did or not, but it sort of ruined the traditional flavors of both items.  The cashier was also a wee bit distracted and the barista was not overly-pleasant either.  I've certainly had better in other SBUX.


REVIEW #28:  1 stars  (587 chars)
This location suffers and benefits from the fact that it is located on Mill Ave. I am sure they appreciate the foot traffic from all the students and office workers but there biggest challenge is the homeless people that crowd the outdoor seating and on cold days interior seating with their dogs and backpacks. When we asked on cashier if dogs were allowed inside she side only service dogs. We have to assume they use the most liberal interpretation of the term service dog or are not willing to confront folks who bring dogs into the restaurant. Overall it in not the cleanest place.


REVIEW #29:  1 stars  (485 chars)
I came here with my girlfriend before a night on the town.  The clerk acted like a jerk the whole time we were ordering, asking questions with a put-off tone and eventually over charged us for our drinks.  Not only that, but both the drip coffees were clearly old, burnt and disgusting.  After receiving our drinks and taking the first sip, both the baristas started to laugh.  What was wrong with the coffee besides the burnt taste is beyond me but it was a joke I didn't find funny.


REVIEW #30:  1 stars  (483 chars)
This is the worst Starbucks I have ever gone to. They finally got rid of the disgusting couches that were a hang out spot for homeless people, but there is still a seedy crowd that hangs out around the store. The tables are always dirty, there are crumbs and litter all over the floor, the bathroom was gross.... I wish it was enjoyable, because the location would be great for studying. I didn't notice it being any quicker than any other Starbucks. I avoid this store from now on.


REVIEW #31:  1 stars  (258 chars)
While coffee is decent as Starbucks can be. The help has attitude. The place was burning up hot inside and when I asked if they had a/c I was told rudely by the barista " I burn up every shift. "  putting a much more sour taste than the coffee in my mouth .


REVIEW #32:  1 stars  (252 chars)
Wow! What a RUDE staff! We were the only ones at the counter and the staff ignored us. My husband then had to ask if they were still serving! RUDE RUDE RUDE!! Anyway, we got our coffee and will not return to this location. This was during the evening.


................................................................................
LOCATION #93:  address="4475 S Rural Rd"  city="Tempe"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85282"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (601 chars)
So far so good! I visit a couple times a week (okay...maybe several times a week), and they have gotten it right every time. Much better than the location by Whole Foods, which always smells like a sewer, and the location by Fry's that will charge you for every customization (I didn't say add, I said substitute!). I had asked about a custom drink that was displayed on a special sign that highlights employees' creations. Although those employees weren't working that day, the baristas on shift tried a couple experiments, giving us free samples - so awesome!!! This is my new spot - big thimbs up.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (445 chars)
Very close to home so thought I'd come here before church.  ...  ... The staff here are extremely nice and are very productive.  ...  ... The external environment does not do the building any justice as to how big it is inside. It's very modern inside with a touch of that old coffee house chic furniture.  ...  ... My order came out perfect. Great location but a little hard to get into.  ...  ... I would definitely come back to this location


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (298 chars)
My favorite starbucks! I drink starbucks everyday and this is the best one I go too. Dealing with drive though the line is always long but they are very fast here. ...  ... The customers are always very nice happy which is always a plus :) ...  ... I will continue to keep going to this starbucks!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (153 chars)
Usually pretty quick service.  ...  ... One time the chick in the drive thru asked me my name, just because she wanted to know it... so that was creepy.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (110 chars)
brand new starbucks, everything is very clean and new. typical starbucks decor. the coffee was great as usual


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (493 chars)
Seven workers in the morning at 8 a.m. And I still have to wait 3 minutes before being served - one person at the register in front of me. ...  ... Where does the line start where does it end I don't know.  In front of the cashier, or the other end of the treats.   ...  ... It's a small clean shop serving Starbucks fare with a drive thru a drive thru that's going to be prone to traffic jams for the people parking.   ...  ... It's a starbucks - oblivious to the dropping coffee bean prices


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (362 chars)
Beware of the freshly minted baristas not knowing the difference between leaving "room" in an Americano and throwing the already diluted Americano down the drain to make "room." I'm more interested in the flavor an extra shot will make with less water than the volume of a full cup. And then to remedy the "room" request by throwing it away defeats the purpose.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (235 chars)
I love the decor of this new Starbucks. The service is lacking though. There are a hand full of good employees but most are young and rude. I am not sure why. The one across the street is much better. This one is just more convenient.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (124 chars)
Trendy, small location who that mainly caters to drive-thru customers. The place is super clean and the restrooms are also.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (594 chars)
Went to this location for my usual iced tea before work and thought I'd beat the drive thru line and walked in. That was my mistake. I had one person in front of me, yet it took 5 minutes for them to take my order and somehow 15 minutes to pour my tea. I probably would've gotten through quicker if I'd chosen to be the tenth car in drive up. Not impressed with the inability to juggle the in store customers with the drive up especially considering it took a few minutes to even get the attention of the staff just to get one cashier. I'll definitely be going to the location down the street.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (103 chars)
Not efficient servicing both the front and drive thru in the busy morning hours. Poor service overall.


................................................................................
LOCATION #94:  address="5156 S Rural Rd"  city="Tempe"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85282"  (24 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (720 chars)
I normally don't write reviews for Starbucks but this one deserves some kuddos. I'm here a lot waiting for my wife to finish at ASU. I do all kinds of writing here...yeah I'm there a lot :) ...  ... If I want to go to Starbuck's, I try to make it this one. Especially if I want a frappuccino. For some reason, these people just know how to make it right. They are friendly here and quick. If you come there somewhat regularly they usually know your name and drink. Not to bad for a chain store. While I prefer local coffee houses, I found myself here a lot this semester. I was very pleased. Probably one of the best starbuck's I've been to in tempe. And they have a lot of comfortable seating...not just wooden chairs.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (572 chars)
This is one of my favorite starbucks. The people that work here are great! They work quickly and lines go by quick and their super sweet. I love the ample seating and tons and tons of plugs. tons. :D doesn't it make you disappointed when there's nowhere for you to plug in your lappy? well, not here! ...  ... I like to come here and study. keeps me focused and the coffee keeps me awake. Also, it's right in the shopping center with whole foods, jimmy johns, qdoba, pita shack, mcdonalds and it's across from smashburger and chipotle. something for every study buddy. :D


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (386 chars)
I'm not typically in this area but found myself in south Tempe after a morning appointment. With about 10 people ahead of me in line, I knew I had hit rush hour and figured I would be waiting quite a while. To my delight, I didn't wait in line more than a couple of minutes, was helped with a smile and my drinks were out within another 5 minutes. Wish I lived closer to this location!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (335 chars)
Free WiFi and a Carmel Macchiato are really two things you can't beat. Your bound to run into a friendly face or three here. The staff is always pleasant and remembers my name. If your writing a screenplay, editing your latest mix tape, showing off your apple products or just a general hipster, you know this is the place to be seen.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (325 chars)
Being a recent convert to the green empire, I've been enjoying the variety of drink selection and quality of product. The staff is beyond friendly, very prompt, and always delivers excellent service. Because of this and the clean, new redesign of the store this has definitely become my favorite Starbucks location in Tempe.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (245 chars)
My favorite Starbucks in the valley. The actual location is nice and big. The staff learned my name and order quickly and they always manage to work through the line in a timely manner (the way to this girl's heart at 7am on a weekday morning).


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (188 chars)
Hard to find, in Whole Food lot. All the great bakery items you'd expect from Starbucks. My sausage egg and cheese breakfast sandwich was hot, quick and tasty. Quick and friendly service.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (823 chars)
The staff here is very laid back and calm. My experience at some Starbucks is they are ran by crazy high strung people that try so hard to please you it comes off as forced or even creepy. These guys get your in get you out and no drama. I love it. I spend hours here reading and never have been bothered by the staff. There is another location just across the road.... go there if you like loud misbehaving misfits! I have no complaints here. Yes it can be busy.... but what place isn't anymore? I feel right at home here. The only reason I didn't give 5 stars is they recently changed the seating inside and to me it is less comfortable. They took away the nice leather seats and added a community style table top. They are probably trying to get people like me to leave sooner.... but they have to try harder than that!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (680 chars)
The barista that's there at 5:30 am is the best, she's always cheerful and reminds me to come back in a few hours for my .55 cent refill.  I try my damnedest to get back there but I get busy and forget.  She's really nice, I try to get in her line whenever possible.  There's another barista, that rolls their eyes at me when I order an "extra large" iced coffee and they go out of their way to tell me its a "trenta" or some bullshit like that.  Look, I know you like to give your sizes cute Italian names but I was born in the good ol U S of A and last time I check, you were born in Seattle, Starbucks.  So lets not act all hoity toity when someone places an order in English.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (404 chars)
I do not often go out to Coffee, but at times you just need to. In the Summer I only drink it in the morning.  Even then it makes me too hot. ... So I thought I would give a nice iced coffee a try since it was mid day. I like these things sweet. so I love that Starbucks had raw Sugar.  ... I like heavy cream and Raw Sugar, so that is what I like and they have it! ... Friendly staff, nice clean place.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (388 chars)
Went to this location with friends on the way to the NASCAR race and the employees here were fast and very accomodating. My friends no sooner ordered and their drink were RIGHT THERE! Speedy service, nice & clean shop. The only drawback I saw is there's not any signage telling you where the place is, as the location is set back in a shopping center and if you blink, you would miss it.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (226 chars)
I have been to this Starbucks a couple of times and have been satisfied every time. People seem bubbly, energetic and down to earth, even early in the morning!  Thanks guys! This makes it a lot easier to start off my day! : )


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (196 chars)
I go to this location just about every Sunday while my son is at Sunday school.  While it is a smaller location, they do a great job.  Great staff and they get you your drinks out pretty quickly.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (187 chars)
I love this Starbucks. We all know every Starbucks is expensive, so forget that. But these people have our drinks memorized, if you go there alot anyways, they're on top. Good Starbucks.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (100 chars)
This Starbucks always seems to have fun swag...more than that of it's surrounding Starbucks family.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (67 chars)
Great service, great coffee, and usually very quick with my order!


REVIEW #17:  3 stars  (378 chars)
The staff here is always very friendly and helpful. Unfortunately, they run out of things very quickly. Today they were out of bagels, regular cream cheese, and coffee stoppers before 11 am. It's never fun finding out AFTER you order and pay for something that it's unavailable. I wish their stock was as consistent as their service, but I'm not going in there for the service.


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (283 chars)
Friendly staff, overpriced coffee.  ...  ... The product is always consistent but with consistency at this level you are sure to experience a more expensive product that just isn't worth the price. But hey, who doesn't already know that? ...  ...  ... At least there's free Wi-Fi...


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (194 chars)
Returned here again after 2 years.   ...  ... The place hasn't changed.  The coffee hasn't changed. ...  ... The people working in it have changed for the better. ...  ... Upgrading the rating.


REVIEW #20:  2 stars  (1340 chars)
The beauty of Starbucks is their ability to custom make such a large variety, the downside is that they have such a large variety of possible permutations of coffee and tea drinks. I find this store gets the the order right about 50% of the time. ...  ... For the 3rd time this week they got it wrong today. A Quad Grande Americano with Room should result in a nice thick Americano with a robust taste. ...  ... Yesterday I only got three shots which is quite obvious and only discovered by me after merging onto the frwy and taking my 1st sip. Like on Monday, today there was no room - it was full to the top. That one or two ounces more water dilutes the taste.  ...  ... The barista offered to pour out the extra! Eh? I could have done that. I told him I was more concerned about the taste not the volume. If you pour some out I lose the extra espresso shot I paid for. ...  ... The system of noting what you want lacks for consistency. The person who took my order was busy trying to upsell me a lb of coffee to take home.  The cashier who I again repeated my order to ignored my plea to make sure that it had "room". As I look at my cup now, it has no notation on it at all so the barista was not the problem.  ...  ... Why do I still go there? Because it's less than a 1/4 mile from my house and when they get it right, it's so good.


REVIEW #21:  1 stars  (4598 chars)
***Kiddos, if you're reading this right now, take if from me, you're gonna want to go visit the Hannah Montana website or check out the new dirt on that Zoe 101 star who got knocked up by her producer or some such nonsense because that's a hell of a lot more wholesome that what's about to follow. But if you want to learn a new curse word or two to awe your peers on the playground, keep reading. Who am I kidding? Kids don't read any more. There aren't enough flashy graphics on this page to keep the interest of those ADHD spider monkeys. So with that in mind... ...  ... I don't usually write reviews about chain establishments, but I've got a big glass of hater-ade (venti nonfat whothefuckknows) at my side this morning and I just gotta unleash the fury before it implodes and consumes me.  ...  ... Ahem. ...  ... Fuck Starbucks. ...  ... Fuck them and the flea ridden ass they trotted in on.  ...  ... By some twist of fate, probably engineered by Loki, I ended up with forty dollars in gift cards to this black hole of mass consumerism and corporate greed. But far be it from me to let free money go to waste, so I've been dashing in the past few days to burn these credits as fast as plastic trees can burn. The past three visits have reinforced everything I've come to know and hate about this piss poor chain of mediocre, overpriced coffee, distilling my hatred into a seething mass of vile, putrid ichors that have accumulated somewhere in the region of my appendix. I'm in a dark, dark place right now folks. ...  ... Fuck the pretentious pidgin Italian that's the closest suburban soccer moms are ever going to get to that European vacation. Tall? Venti? Grande? I'll take a fucking medium, douchetard. ...  ... Fuck the burnt beans that leave the acrid taste of corporate semen in the back of your throat. Open up wide because they're about to unload right into your willing and waiting mouth, and you're going to pay them to do it. ...  ... Fuck the people that order a grande half-caf nonfat pumpkin spice cappuccino, dry, extra hot, two pumps white chocolate, one pump sugarfree hazelnut. Translation: You're an asshat and I'm late for work, so get your five hundred calorie monstrosity out of my fucking way before I "accidentally" knock it all over your god damn pumps, you frigid bitch. The amount of time it takes you to order your drink at Starbucks is proportionate to what a demanding, micromanaging cuntbucket you must be in real life. It's fucking coffee. Like fucking Taco Bell, there are only so many ingredients they can mix and match to create new and zany combinations. Add espresso, cut with a mixer, add syrup. Presto chango. You have an eight dollar cup of joe. ...  ... Fuck the people that hang out at Starbucks too. This morning the fucking place was packed wall to wall with affluent suburbanites in their business casual reading newspapers, playing on their laptops and sipping shitty coffee. You've gotta have some place better to be. No? Really? Your life is so dull and predictable that Starbucks is the hippest most happening place you can think of to waste an extra half an hour of prime snooze time? You know what, I can't even rip on you. That's depressing. You're spiraling downward in a haze of bitter java, suffocated by the oppressive blanket of corporate familiarity and clonelike oneness. I'll let you reside in your little coffee coffin a bit longer, free of ridicule. Unless you're the bastard with a ten part order. Then the gloves come back off.  ...  ... And fuck the stale baked goods and prepackaged luncheon fare at Starbucks. I had a bagel. It was hard as a rock and dryer than your mom's...I'm gonna censor that one. I had an overpriced fruit and cheese plate. Mealy apples and cheddar atop a bed of lettuce, with a wedge of brie to show you they're 'gourmet.' Suckfest. Breakfast sandwiches that I'm sure must have been display models because they bared an eerie resemblance to rubber, cardboard and sawdust. Industrial, mmm. I've also had the donuts. How on earth do you fuck up a donut?! Somehow they managed. Sensing a trend here? Cuz I'm just about beating you over the head with it. Everything offered at Starbucks is the same shit you can get at Circle K for half the price, except it's wrapped in a shiny plastic package and distributed en masse to the overweight gullets of Americans everywhere. ...  ... Know what the kicker is?  ...  ... I had to manually add this location.  ...  ... Five fucking pages of Starbucks locations in the Greater Phoenix Metro Area and I had to go and add another.  ...  ... So fuck Starbucks.


REVIEW #22:  1 stars  (564 chars)
The Coffee - standard starbucks. ...  ... The People that work here?  Zombies ...  ... I've been coming here for 6 months and order the exact same 'ordinary' thing, and NOT ONCE have that remembered what I order.  It's a friggin coffee - plain - same size every friggin time. ...  ... One visiting this location should not expect any "hospitality", "emotion", "intelligence", "warmth" or any normal service that one would get at a more personal cafe. ...  ... Get your coffee and leave - and remember, the coffee isn't THAT good anyway. ...  ... This place sucks.


REVIEW #23:  1 stars  (489 chars)
What a mess! I get it...its a coffee shop and not sure why they wouldnt be ready or more organized for morning rush. i walk in and order my drink. i checked and they showed that the Blonde roast was out but they could do a pour over.  no thanks...just dont show it available.  After waiting for second coffee to be made...i was wondering when i would get my regular brewed coffee and pastry.  i had to go back to the register for that becauae the window did not have anything else for me.


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (238 chars)
The only Starbucks I know that can screw up an Americano every time. I ask for room and they fill to within 1 mm of the lid then suggest that I pour the excess off when I complain. My goal is taste not volume, is that hard to understand?


................................................................................
LOCATION #95:  address="871 W University Dr"  city="Tempe"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85281"  (19 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (993 chars)
Ok, let's get this straight right off the bat.  I don't think Starbucks makes the best coffee around, but it's consistant and I really like that.  That was especially important when I used to travel constantly for work.  I knew what I liked and it would be the same no matter where I went.  Anyway, I drove through this Starbucks yesterday morning after dropping my sweet pea at akido because I had been up since 4:00 am and needed a little caffeine and sugar.  I ordered a iced soy mocha, a big treat for me because I'm trying to stay away from refined sugar and animal proteins, and waited my turn to make it around to the little window.  All in all I'd say I was inline for about five minutes.  Nothing unheard of for a Saturday morning.  When I got to the window the girl handed me my drink and said it was on them for the long wait!  That just made my day!  How considerate of them.  The mocha hit the spot and gave me enough energy to run the rest of my errands.  I'll be back for more.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (768 chars)
I love this mini Starbucks! It's right near my pad and it has a drive through that moves fast -- thankfully. And the people who work at this location are characters. Sometimes the baristas will sing to you before they take your order or they'll tell you a joke. This is seriously the wackiest group of people I've ever encountered at a Stabucks, but I love it. And the store manager happens to be the talented singer and keyboardist from hot up-and-coming AZ pop-rock act The Loveblisters. ...  ... I highly recommend the White Chocolate Frappachino if you need a jump start in the mornings. The Orange Creme Frap is nice in the afternoons when you need something refreshing in this triple-digit summer heat. And if you're hungry, the lemon loaf is out of this world.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (737 chars)
These guys are awesome - relentlessly polite, friendly, upbeat. My pup and I drive through each morning, and they know my drink order, and my dog's name, by heart. ...  ... This is a really busy location at certain times of day, so the car line can sometimes be long, but I always see them working as fast as they can, and they've given me a free coffee on several occasions when the wait was too long. ...  ... NOTE: There's a new Starbucks policy that you have to steam milk individually for each drink now (where relevant), you can't steam a pot in advance and pour it as needed. This makes for a fresher drink, but slows down the line. Not the fault of they guys on the front line... ...  ... Awesome Starbucks team here - love 'em.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1298 chars)
hmmm.....some interesting reviews for this location..... well, I have to put my two cents in because I actually would like to give this location some props! For some reason, today everyone decided to get coffee at *exactly* the same time, 11a.m. (weird time for a coffee break, in my opinion...then again, I was there too, wasn't I? humf....) The drive thru lane was looonnngggg.....even the walk up window looked crowded, tho to my surpirse, I didn't have to wait more then 5 minutes to actually order AND receive my drink! All this AND the guy at the window  (who was quite friendly, btw) told me that today they had a 21 personnel meeting at that location and they were also right in the middle of changing shifts. Bad timing for a coffee rush, but very well handled!! ...  ... On a side note, I've never had any problems with the drinks or food at this location. If anything, one time they gave us one too many oatmeals, which we were not charged for and got to keep. I will take that kind of mistake anytime! (even if I have no idea what to do with an extra oatmeal.....) ...  ... and yeah, it's in an oddly positioned spot in a small parking lot, but, hey, it just gives us all an opportunity to show off our manners and kindness to each other, right?? (well, AFTER we get our coffee.......)


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (710 chars)
This Starbucks seemed worthy of a review because it's not your normal Starbucks.  There is no inside.  It's all either walk up or drive through.   ...  ... And you know how Starbucks folks are generally nice, but can run that range from too busy to be more than polite to overly friendly?  Well - these folks are consistently SUPER friendly in the drive through.  It's kinda weird.  And a little too much on those "Just give me my caffeine before I jump through the speaker box" kind of mornings.  Ok, maybe on those mornings it's more me than them as they aren't ever really obnoxious.  But they are just so NICE.  And some mornings, you just don't have the patience for nice.  I'm sure that isn't just me...


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (412 chars)
I love the drive-through Starbucks! The baristas are always happy to give us whipped cream in espresso cups for our dogs as a treat! One time they even drizzled some caramel syrup over the whipped cream for them. The line usually goes pretty quickly and the staff tends to be REALLY peppy. So much so that I often think that they should lay off their own product :) Usually a nice, efficient experience overall!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (378 chars)
Perfect location for me to stop at on my way to ASU.  ...  ... I have had a few instances where my drink is not crafted according to my modifiers but the baristas have corrected it everytime with no hesitation. ...   ... The crew here is always upbeat and pleasant. The speed of service is superb! Do not pass this drive-thru by because of the line of cars, they are very fast.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (371 chars)
I go to this location a few times a week to pick up coffee for my coworkers. I usually have a large order and am in a hurry. The employees here always take care of me. There is almost always a line in the drive thru but I never feel like it takes too long. The employees are super friendly and fast. Watch out for people trying to steal your spot in the drive thru line!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (357 chars)
Not sure what all the fuss is with the negative reviews but I have always left with an excellent drink made right. ...  ... The drive thru for me has always been super quick but my tip would be to go here around 5:30 in the afternoon. There never seems to be a line or people lurking around.  ...  ... I will for sure be back here. The service is friendly!


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (340 chars)
I sometimes stop by this Starbucks on the way to work, and I'm always impressed by the chipperness of the employees.  The drive thru line moves pretty quickly, and they've always gotten my order just right.  Even with a 5 or 6 car line, I think it beats parking and ordering at the counter elsewhere - especially when it's 100 degrees out!


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (215 chars)
I like this starbucks for a few key reasons; the location is very close to my house, the service is always very fast, and the staff is ALWAYS so nice!  Im also addicted to those little artisan sandwiches they make.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (137 chars)
This is a good Starbucks if you don't want to have to walk in! You can either walk up or drive through, i'd rather just drive up and go.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (297 chars)
This Starbucks has a drive-thru...a definite perk. I've only been there a handful of times but twice they haven't made my iced tea correctly. When it was done right, it was delicious but it's not a hard order. I prefer my normal location on McClintock and Guadalupe but will come here in a pinch.


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (256 chars)
I agree with the reviews about the drive through being a pain, and that it took long, but I was very impressed that while we waited we were visited with and had very very friendly service.  The coffee also came our correct and very good.  It hit the spot.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (1039 chars)
The only reason I go to this location is because it's the closest/fastest drive thru by my house. ...  ... But the staff is rude. In the past 5 yrs Ive seen them go thru several baristas and it seems like their attitudes just keep getting worse and worse. ...  ... Ive had one or two tell me that the fact that i put soy in my mochas is "totally gross", ive had my food given to other walk up customers and been argued w? when i pointed it out, and just this morning my barista at the drive thru gave me my coffee, and card and then slammed the window shut and walked away w/ out giving me my receipt. I waved and finally the other girl saw me and made a face like "Ugh, what now. " (um, hi kids. Us customers, can see you thru your windows.) when the girl came back she said "What." I politely asked her for my receipt, she gave it to me and reslammed the window. ...  ... We get it, you think youre *awesome* just because youre a Starbucks barista.....well youre not. ...  ... For speed, this location gets 4 stars, customer service, 2.


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (272 chars)
Walk-up is faster and more efficient than drive-thru. I sat for 8 - yes, EIGHT minutes today with two cars ahead of me at 3:00 pm - hardly peak hours. When I got to the window it was another THREE minutes before I was acknowledged... drove away with the wrong drink. BAH.


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (1451 chars)
I'd like to begin this review with a warning...WARNING: Oscar the Grouch works at this location!  ...  ... I pull up to the drive-thru at 5am this morning to order a drink for me and my friend. Little miss Grouchy gets on the other end full of attitude and scorn. She asks for my order and interrupts me as I am in the middle of my statement saying "is that all?" with a snappy tone. Which completely throws me off, I finish my order but can't believe her tone the whole time she is talking with me. I drive around to the window and she got my drink wrong! (maybe she should have LISTENED to the whole thing...any ways I hand back my drink so she can make another one and she slams the drink into the trash and refuses to look at me. She maintains a permanent scorn on her face and when she finally hands me my corrected drink, I say, "thanks, have a good morning." she slams the window on me! I don't have the highest expectations for any drive-thru, but Starbucks always promotes their friendly service and my experiences at other Starbucks have always been pleasent; so I am shocked this Starbucks is still open. When those 100 odd stores closed a few years ago, this one should have been one of them. ...  ... This isn't the first time I have come to this location and had to correct my order at the window, in fact getting my order RIGHT is an exception! I can't believe a company like Starbucks would have stand for such low quality in service.


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (836 chars)
Well, compared to everyone else, I got a great person at the window, she was not only kind and sweet, but she made terrific conversation, never met anyone as nice. However, the hot chocolate was terrible, i mean, bitter, burnt, gross, and completely un-drinkable. How can you mess up hot chocolate? You have to TRY to get that wrong. More over, i asked for without whipped cream and got some anyways, I hate that. There was a particular reason i asked for without, I wouldn't go out  of my without reason.  ...  ... Also, this is mainly a get your coffee and go type place, only outdoor seating next to a large intersection. Not recommended for a relaxing place. And my experience doesn't mean all the Batistas are as nice as this one individual.  ...  ... Seriously, don't bother with this place though, the one on Mill is far better.


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (459 chars)
I hate this starbucks. They take FOREVER!!!!!! Who was the genus who designed this drive through? They can't do both at the same time or something. It always takes forever to get anything. The drive through is a bit quicker than getting out but I prefer not to idle and pollute phx more than it already is. So this place sucks balls and I am not going back again! Never had a really bad person but I did not really notice.  ... HATE THIS PLACE!!! HATE IT!!!!


................................................................................
LOCATION #96:  address="College of Business 1st Fl 300 E Lemon St"  city="Tempe"  state="AZ"  zip_code="85281"  (5 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (600 chars)
This Starbucks is always a magnificent last minute Caramel Macchiato spot!! The lines here get crazy long, but don't let that stop you from getting your caffeine or tea dose!! There is always plenty of friendly and attentive staff at this spot, knowing that most students in line might be cranky and/or inpatient.  ... You can't say much about Starbucks, other than they pretty much have the queue and processing time management down!! Plus, they offer yummy treats, Ethos water, amazing green, passion and black tea, and a terrific Starbucks Gold Rewards Program!! :)  ...           _   Way to go!!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (386 chars)
This is the Starbucks located on the 1st floor of the WP Carey School of Business at ASU. It's funny to think that we have our very own Starbucks, considering there is one in the MU which is the next building over. But when you need coffee, you need coffee!!  ...  ... Always quick friendly service. Try to stop by at non-peak times. Sometimes the line can get all the way to the door.


REVIEW #3:  1 stars  (978 chars)
Of all the Starbucks I've been to, the ones on this campus are terrible and this Starbucks is the worst. The wait is long because in addition to a line out the door, the staff is completely uncoordinated and generally only one register is open with one person making drinks.  ...  ... Another issue is the one person who IS making drinks is terrible at their job. A request for a splash of milk will result in half of the total volume of your drink being milk. To my knowledge, it is only at this location where 'splash' is equivalent to 'au lait.'  ...  ... Finally, their prices are higher by 5 to 15% of actual Starbucks locations, and they do not utilize any of the green or gold card rewards - so you cannot get your free coffee or free refills as you can at all other locations. ...  ... To quote another yelp review, "The convenience of the location being right on campus is NOT worth going to with services like this." If I could give this location zero stars, I would.


REVIEW #4:  1 stars  (686 chars)
This Starbucks is terrible. The wait is long which I do not mind being a patient person in this regard however after having waited so long in a line out the door you would expect a descent drink in compensation; this is not the case at all. Each time I've gone I have been disappointed with the quality of my orders. It is also frustrating when just about everyone after you in the line get their drinks before you and I can literally see the disarray and confusion on the employee's faces while they worked, not the place for me, these guys have really got to get their act together. The convenience of the location being right on campus is NOT worth going to with services like this.


REVIEW #5:  1 stars  (296 chars)
Ever wonder how there is a line out the door but only one of the four employees bothers to work.  I've watched most of them text and chat behind the counter more than make tasty beverages.  Good location but no surprise again today after waiting almost 18 minutes to place my order.  Good Grief!


................................................................................
LOCATION #97:  address="6080 W Badura Ave Spring Valley"  city="Enterprise"  state="NV"  zip_code="89118"  (27 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (721 chars)
love this Starbucks! It is my go to when I need a cuppa joe when on my way to work.  ... Close to work... bonus! ... Drive thru... bonus bonus!!!  ... But what is priceless.. and keeps me coming back... The Staff! ... Always friendly... and gotta say it is almost like cheers when you pull through the drive-thru and they say "Heya Sharr"  ... (secretly loves this)  ... They also got on board with my Make a Difference Monday! I drive through Monday morning and buy the car's order who is behind me.  ... They get super excited and tell me each week just how many cars bought for the other car behind them ...  ... Makes this location.. my favorite... and must visit . Even after I discover a way to I.V my caffeine in.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (617 chars)
a perfectly perfect starbucks.  :) ...  ... this starbucks is on my way to the office.  easy access from the freeway, and super fast service. ...  ... morning rushes for AM coffee create a wrap around in the drive through, but the staff is aware and works quickly.  Even if cars are coming out the end of the drive through, it takes about a minute a care.  Yes, i've timed it. ...  ... my toffee nut americano with non-fat milk is consistent in flavor and i always get a stopper in my drink.   ...  ... thanks starbucks for being sensitive to my AM time restraints...and for making me yummy drinks visit after visit!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (514 chars)
For some reason it's always a great Starbucks that gets me on a Yelping roll after a couple months hiatus.  ...  ... I am always impressed when a specific store of a large chain provides excellent customer service and this particular Starbucks has renewed my faith in Las Vegas Starbucks as a whole! All the employees have been super friendly and efficient and the drinks at this location just taste better and stronger. I'm glad that I have something to look forward to in the mornings before work again! Thanks!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (456 chars)
Between this one and the one on Rainbow and Warm Springs, this location is my favorite for when I'm heading to school or work. The drive-thru line tends to get long, but the service is much faster than the Rainbow location.  ...  ... Also, I feel like they have a magical green tea latte wizard at this location. This is the ONLY location that mixes my green tea lattes perfectly- they don't leave me with chunks of green tea that I accidentally choke on.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (356 chars)
They have a video drive thru order screen so that you can see the order taker and they can see you! I think it's weird but I like that they are embracing technology with a human element.  ...  ... Service is always consistently friendly and drinks are made right. What else can you ask for in the morning. Thanks much for my venti no water chai tea latte!


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (343 chars)
I Know Starbucks is a corporate machine but I like their chai tea mix and I think they use the brand Oregon chai. Forget the coffee, it's way too strong and gets me strung out like I took a no doz caffeine pill. More about the tea, I order a venti no water soy chai. It's rich and filling because the soy is protein, so it's healthy right! ;P


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (329 chars)
I don't normally review chains like Starbucks, but after today, I figured I needed to do so. Service is always fast and friendly. My drinks are always perfect. Today I overheard a manager telling the employees about how they keep everything clean and disinfected. So... Fast, friendly, and really really clean? My kind of place.


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (252 chars)
I love this Starbucks! The staff are down to Earth people and actually connect with their customers! Even though it's a busy place and sometimes hard to find a spot to plug in your laptop, the customer service and drink recommendations are worth it :]


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (193 chars)
This Starbuck's is friendly and fast. Everything is always made perfect and consistent. They know what they are doing here and are happy. You can tell when the staff are happy where they work.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (1191 chars)
The Starbucks on Rainbow and 215 use to be my go-to Starbucks before work.  I have switched over to this one because I found out this is on Jones and 215 which is closer to work.  I love meeting people here about half an hour to an hour earlier before work and just chill...  ...  ... This location is in a business/office plaza so it is quite busy during the weekdays; however, the weekends are not as crowded so I love it.  Sometimes it is quiet and cozy.  The area itself looks very clean and neat so that is a plus factor for me also.  Compared to Rainbow and 215 location, this location is definitely more isolated.  I love that. ...  ... Service-wise, I feel like it is a bit slow.  I always order Grande Iced Americano and it takes a little longer than most other Starbucks I go to.  I have only been here may be 10 times at most... But I guess I was there during busy hours?? I'm not sure.  Most staff are friendly... some seem cranky sometimes, but I don't mind very much.  I've had mostly neutral experiences so far so I'm not complaining. I will go here regardless because of its location. ...  ... So I would definitely recommend people to go to this location if you are nearby.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (980 chars)
After having my car serviced at Findlay Chevrolet or travelling from the vicinity of Rainbow at the 215, this is a Starbucks that I'll spend time in. Especially during rush hour. ...    In comparison to it's sister Starbucks, a mile southwest at Rainbow and Warm Springs, the environment is laid back. Regardless, it sits south of the 215 exit at Jones Boulevard, the surrounding area is not too congested. So access to and from the parking lot is not stressful. The parking lot, which is in back of the building is plentiful in spaces. This Starbucks also includes a drive thru. ...    The cafe is on the roomy side. The drawback is the tables are kind of small. Kind of annoying when I share my table with a notebook, diary, coffee, and glasses. ...     Being Christmas season, I go for the drip coffee with pumpkin spices. The egg nog beverages are likewise delicious. ...     I will be making my way to many more Starbucks (and McDonalds, walmarts, cafes, restaurants, etc.).


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (307 chars)
Extremely fast service even when there was a line in the morning. My drink was done within a minute after I was done paying at the register! I was impressed because other locations usually aren't this fast. Drinks are the same as any other Starbucks...overpriced but packed with delicious caffiene goodness


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (95 chars)
Bring a jacket if you intend on studying here. This place is an icebox even during the summer.


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (1183 chars)
This Starbucks has saved me for many countless Mondays, Thursdays ...or whenever I need a a kick in the pants so I can function properly at work. My usual is a tall Skinny Caramel Frappachino but it still has to come with the caramel and the whipped cream. I know ..I know it's self defeating but I need it. If I'm feeling extra rich I will get their Turkey Bacon Sandwich. It is a whole wheat English muffin, egg whites, turkey bacon and cheese. It's really good and it fills me up sometimes past lunch. That's not saying much since my lunch at work starts three hours after I get there. If I ever miss my morning coffee I will never attempt to go back to Starbucks around 9am. because it's like their rush hour. A co worker and I got stuck in the drive through line for our whole lunch break (30min) .When they finally got to us we had to leave back to work empty handed. The lesson here is when in doubt go inside especially if you are on a time schedule. It's better then being stuck in the drive through while your boss is wondering where you are at. That is my only gripe about this place overall they are really cheerful at 6am in the morning and have great customer service!


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (675 chars)
Good meeting spot for having coffee and networking with the people who work tirelessly to bring more additional business to the valley of a non-gaming nature. As Starbucks go this is an average size place but it brings together an interesting mix of tech people both from a programming as well as a physical infrastructure disciple. There are the people from the Bikram yoga studio, to the immigration folks, to the professionals that maintain the business park and let's not forget the business development professionals.  ...  ... Eclectic crowd where you will over hear very interesting and diverse conversations. I truly enjoy meeting my business friend here for coffee.


REVIEW #16:  3 stars  (279 chars)
Awesome customer service. Love the vibe in here. The guy at the register and the gal in the back are hella cool. Even the guy in taking the orders via drive thru is really cool.  ...  ... Its a small spot, but if you don't mind that its a nice spot for a meeting or hanging out.


REVIEW #17:  3 stars  (271 chars)
Dropped by for my venti hazelnut frap but pretty busy. The wait a little too long for my liking especially with a drive thru. It is about 130pm don't think it should take this long at this hour, staff friendly, first time here, I'll give them another chance another day.


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (202 chars)
I am not a big coffee gut, but time to time I'll stop in for a pastry and an Izzie drink. ...  ... It's a short review, but I'm not a coffee guy so I don't really have anything to say, it's a starbucks


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (127 chars)
Not a lot of outlets for charging your connectivity devices. Quick service, very clean. It is very busy and full all the time.


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (88 chars)
The drive thru can be lengthy at times but they are 98% accurate and always friendly!!!


REVIEW #21:  2 stars  (1295 chars)
Not really my most favorite Starbucks location. I have had waaaay better customer service at the one at Rainbow and Warm Springs. ...  ... The times I have gone there, it was via drive-thru. It was my dad and I ordering our drinks and for some reason, the barista just could not hear us! There were no cars behind or in front of us at one time and our radio was on the lowest level (we always turn down the volume whenever we go through a drive-thru). I had to tell the barista my order five times (caramel frappuccino with vanilla bean powder that she kept mistaking for a vanilla bean frap or just a plain caramel frap). She was confused with my order and she just wasn't listening! Either they need to get a new system or listen more carefully. ...  ... Another time I have gone, I didn't want to go through the mess of a drive-thru so I went inside. The vibe is nice and the baristas looked happy to be working and were chatting amongst themselves before I ordered. HOWEVER, when I ordered, the mood suddenly changed and the lady that took my order gave off this feeling that she didn't want to be bothered with my order. What's worse is that when I got my drink, it was all watered down but because I didn't want to be there any longer, I went about my business and left. NEVER GOING BACK.


REVIEW #22:  2 stars  (550 chars)
I feel like reviews for large chains like Starbucks can help people differentiate between the good and the bad. ...  ... I have noticed that this place in particular is pretty inconsistent with the drinks and service. There have been multiple times where I've received the wrong drink. 99% of the time I am going through the drive through, so by the time I realize the mistake, I am so far gone that I can't go back to correct it. ...  ... On the upside, the people here are friendly. I do not recall every encountering a grumpy or rude person here.


REVIEW #23:  2 stars  (381 chars)
The place doesn't give off the Starbucks feel... It's like they don't know how to provide great service.  I read one of the reviews stating that they consistently get his order mixed and I agree, I think the problem is that they do not listen.  I had to repeat my order 4 times to make sure that they don't mess it up.  Never again, I'll head out to the other Starbucks locations.


REVIEW #24:  2 stars  (265 chars)
I come to this location pretty much everyday~ staff is always friendly but the drink I order "venti iced stirred caramel macchiato" they repeat my order and yet again today I was handed "not stirred" and each day the wait at drive thru is getting longer and longer


REVIEW #25:  2 stars  (212 chars)
Rolled by Starbucks at 8:30am for breakfast, which was a tall steamed non-fat milk and an apple bran muffin.  I guess it was decent enough to rate a 3, but I have to subtract 1 star for the lack of organic milk.


REVIEW #26:  2 stars  (176 chars)
The barista charged my coffee on the credit card AND the Starbucks card when I gave him the credit card to transfer some funds onto my Starbucks card. Big no no my friend ....


REVIEW #27:  2 stars  (123 chars)
Slowest Starbucks ever! Was in the drive thru for over 20 mins... They can't hear you on the speaker so you have to scream


................................................................................
LOCATION #98:  address="2295 N Green Valley Pkwy"  city="Henderson"  state="NV"  zip_code="89014"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (674 chars)
Out of all the Starbucks in the Henderson area, this one is my favorite.  I have no problem with the parking but people in this city have terrible driving habits so I can understand how difficult and challenging it must be for them.  Bummer for those who don't like it that there is no drive through... evidently they haven't been inside a store that has one...those are absolutely filthy inside...don't believe me?  Go inside sometime and check it out!  The servers are friendly and courteous and accommodating... They go out of their way to fulfill any request.  I guess you could say they are old school.  Maybe I'm partial being a regular and all but that's my 2 cents.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (361 chars)
One of the best Starbucks in the valley.  Every time I go to this location I always get perfect service and drink.  The staff is very friendly and they always make my drink exactly how I want it.  When I walk in now they already know my order and begin making it before I get to the counter.  Never a disappointment and I wish all Starbucks were like this one.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (192 chars)
This place is crazy busy on the mornings. You need to beat the rush to get out and on your way to work.  ...  ... The staff is always friendly and have never had an issue with service. Enjoy!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (514 chars)
Being the closest Starbuck's to my apartment, I have been patronizing it the last four years.Up to this day, I never had a bad Starbuck's experience here. ...   At the crossroads of Green Valley Parkway and Warm Springs Road, and in the heart of Green Valley, it gets busy. There have been visits where I have had to wait on a line then wait on a table. ...         Despite the fact that the tables fill up, there is plenty of indoor and outdoor seating.  ...     A recent drawback is that they now close earlier.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (490 chars)
This is like any other Starbucks, so nothing major to report; but the fact that it's an out of town location. ...  ... I checked in on Four Square and noticed that the tip read that the people who worked here were horrible and snobby or something like that.  I saw two girls working there and I can kind of see how one of them could be seen that way, but she was nice to me.  Ordered our drinks and out the door we were. ...  ... Went there twice in a weekend and both times were pleasant.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (396 chars)
I know I am addicted.. I love the Starbucks.. They are pretty much everywhere now, and it is hard to write a review for just one store. Parking is tricky, watch yourself no need to run over a slow person (they need coffee) and don't think you will get out of there quickly. They are pretty good with my order just have to remind them ICE FIRST, says so in the manual.. I have google too people..


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (173 chars)
The location is a pain in the as*! The service is great, store is kinda old but clean. It is so hard to get in and out of the parking lot. Also -1 for having no drive thru.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (67 chars)
Same as it ever was... same as it ever was... same as it ever was.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (536 chars)
Starbucks is a Starbucks is a Starbucks . . . except, this is one of the most consistently slow Starbucks I've ever visited.   ...  ... Whether there are 3 people in line or 10, it always takes a long time to get a drink.  To be fair to the staff, most of the time I've been here, the customers are ordering multiple drinks.  And I've never seen the place empty.  So the staff seems to be doing the best they can.  But they never seem to catch up.   ...  ... So if you're looking to drop in and grab a quick coffee drink, go elsewhere.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (318 chars)
Color me unimpressed. I wanted Starbucks before work and decided to stop at a location I had never been to. No drive-thru, so I had to go inside to place my order.  ...  ... The workers weren't the chipper, friendly, polite baristas I come to expect when I am paying $5 for a cup of coffee.  ...  ... I won't be back.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (2882 chars)
This is the worst location in the history of Starbucks.  ...  ... 1- It has the most awkward parking. The lot is always an accident waiting to happen. Nobody seems to pay attention when pulling out of their tiny spots. ...  ... 2- HORRIBLE baristas. I give the benefit of the doubt here and there, but they're always rude and if you order anything other than pike they make you feel like your order is bothering them. ...  ... The last visit I had sealed the 1 star review for me. I was third in line of probably 9 people total . I was in line for about 8 minutes, not because they were busy but because the barista was having the longest conversation with her friend/customer. I felt rude doing it, but I HAD to ask then to speed it up because I wanted to go home so I could get ready for work.  ...  ... I obviously annoyed this bitter woman because she had THEEE worst attitude when I gave her my order. She didn't ask if I wanted a receipt and she nearly snapped my gold card in the machine. UGH! ...  ... At this point I could have just went home and brewed my own pot of coffee.... ...  ... After another few minutes of waiting for my drink, I couldn't believe it, but the barista was chatting it up again! I appreciate friendly people and a nice "Hello, how are you? etc." is more than welcome, but there's a time and place for extended "catching up". I was listening as the barista chatted with her friend, and to my surprise she wasn't JUST talking... she was making fun of the customer that was in front of me in line! SERIOUSLY STARBUCKS?... I felt soooo bad listening to this rotten woman making fun of the appearance and order of a customer that just paid $6.00 for your damn coffee! I was SO irritated. I HAD to say something again. I said "Excuse me but I've been here for well over 10 minutes now, you're not busy, you're not doing your job, all you've been doing is making fun of your customers!!!".. she sucked her teeth, muttered under her breath and .... ...  ... ...Needless to say my coffee was ready. She plopped it on the counter and said "here".  ...  ... Wow. thanks.  ...  ... I left (it was a 15 minute ordeal) with COLD coffee, the complete wrong order, and it was drowning in syrup.  ...  ...  ... I need good coffee to start my day. Since this subhuman decided it was OK to be mean to other customers, I figured I could give them a dose right back. I went to my favorite location (1 mile up the road, where I should have just went to begin with) and I told them what happened with my coffee in hand. They apoligized for the actions of the barista and gave me the email of their area supervisor, along with a replacement cup of perfect coffee. --A happy ending to a miserable start of the day.  ...  ... DO NOT BOTHER WITH THIS PLACE! Instead, go right up the road to the pebble marketplace (Smith's/Brooklyn Bagel and Pizzza hut are in the same mall)


................................................................................
LOCATION #99:  address="661 Marks St"  city="Henderson"  state="NV"  zip_code="89014"  (24 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (356 chars)
I give them 5 stars! The drive thru moves extremely fast! And my drink taste devine! The cashier was extra friendly and helped me fill my orders.   ... This is always a nice stop for my family & I. So, I will return as often as I can. Yes it's nice and clean and u will be glad u stopped in to visit. Wait did I add they have the best water on the planet!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (297 chars)
my go-to starbucks before work :-)  ...  ... always go in the drive-thru which gets really packed and busy at around 4:30pm.  they've never gotten my drink wrong, customer service is a hit or miss. i know they do get busy and overwhelmed. i have never gone inside so i can't do a review for that.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (198 chars)
Super friendly baristas. Quick service, even with being incredibly busy. Peppermint mocha was heaven. nice little patio area. Reprieve from shopping area. Plus, sample from Great Harvest next door!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (66 chars)
Espresso with friendly faces an a drive thru. What's not to love?


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (631 chars)
Not to be confused with the Galleria location, this is a Starbucks w/ drive-thru that's located in a strip mall near-ish to Best Buy. They've provided fairly consistent service when I've been here during the past several months, except today when the cashier handling the inside register during frappuccino happy hour had issues filling orders. Seems like the guy ahead of me had two orders but she had to ask for his name and a form of payment twice instead of just once. For mine, she grabbed the 30+ oz. cup instead of my venti and wrote my name on it, but the manager caught it and didn't give me a larger drink free. Dang it!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (480 chars)
Got to say, busy Starbucks!  ...  ... I tend to stop in here when I head to Costco.  Every time I come, always a long line.  Service is friendly and pleasing.  I noticed only a few tables available, but usually occupied by patrons.  Space is very tight; hardly any room to walk.  My drinks come out very well and I hardly feel like there was any errors. ...  ... I noticed the drive-thru outside.  Looks packed as well.  So if you are in a crunch, best to find another Starbucks.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (412 chars)
I don't know how my work mornings would look like without this Starbucks establishment. Probably like waking up after a hard night of partying and removing the beer goggles and rolling over and seeing a stranger watching you sleep. I would imagine. ...  ... Always pleasant, always cheery. They've gotten my order wrong only a handful of times, but their pleasantness always makes it a good start to my morning.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (345 chars)
This is hard to Find Start Bucks as the GPS was pointing to the one in casino across the street and it is hidden by the gas station infront. ...  ... once we found it - we got our caffeine and were on the way to Hoover Dam. Coming from Vegas it was nice to get things at a normal price - compared to double the prices in all shops on the Stripp


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (310 chars)
It's got a drive-thru, which is a great plus. Not as many tables as a lot of other Starbucks, but I really enjoyed getting some work done a few days ago here. Service was friendly and my drink was perfect with no mistakes. I also like that it's kind of tucked away from the rest of the Sunset commercial area!


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (219 chars)
Most days, I love the drive thru service.  The staff are friendly and helpful.  Generally, I prefer the morning staff.  I have problems with the later in the day staff getting my orders wrong.  I am a Starbucks addict.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (87 chars)
This is a lot like the other Starbucks' you have been to. Coffee: Yes, Drive thru: Yes


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (61 chars)
An afternoon must! The closest one w/a drive thru. Win, win!


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (239 chars)
Coffee cake ! If yelp wasnt lagging and would have let me check in, you would have gotten some eye candy....... But I ate it....Drive thrus, no matter which starbucks it is, are always crazy busy. The staff was quick, efficiant, and nice!


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (209 chars)
Decent starbucks. They've never gotten my order wrong and are usually pretty quick. (I usually go in around 7-8 which might be why) the only thing is that the tables always seem dirty or messy when I'm there.


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (69 chars)
I love starbucks but this location seems to always mess my order up.


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (564 chars)
I used to go to this location all the time, most of the baristas knew my order by heart.  However it seems that the entire staff changed to a not so friendly atmosphere. I also have noticed that it is always dirty, even when there are 5 employees there. No body can wipe down the bar or add-ins bar??? Not to mention that the barista who slid my drink did it with such force it fell off and splattered all over me! Sorry to say this location has gone way downhill. I'd rather drive a little extra to get the great service I know the company would want me to have.


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (465 chars)
I've given this place 3 chances now. And everytime it's the same crap. They are slow and make messes everywhere. I will not come here anymore. It takes 20 minutes MINIMUM to make one drink. This time the girl screwed up my order. I'm so done with this place. It's slow and messy. That's all I have to say. Even the drive thru gets backed up beyond belief. If you go at a slow time, then of course they are fast. I've gone different times of the day and still crap.


REVIEW #18:  2 stars  (428 chars)
A chain, so the items are still the same famous coffee we have all grown to love. The staff is very courteous, I don't know what it is though, no matter how small the order is, they ALWAYS mess up my order. ... ALWAYS. ...  ...  ... If I don't get to work on time this morning, because I had to come inside to fix an order I told them precisely in the drive through, today will be my last day here.  ...  ...  ... Happy trails!


REVIEW #19:  2 stars  (307 chars)
I'm giving them 2 stars, only because this is the closest Starbucks to my house. The service is slow, and many times I have seen baristas walking around while the line was out the door. Unfortunately many of the baristas seem more intent on having inappropriate conversations than taking care of customers.


REVIEW #20:  2 stars  (257 chars)
To the barista that made my drink I saw you drop my cup and didn't give me a new one. Luckily I don't drink off of my rim that I wont complain and mess up your long line of drinks. Which btw wouldn't be so long if all your partners were actually working!!!


REVIEW #21:  1 stars  (1014 chars)
I drink Starbucks every morning and 9/ 10 times I go to this Starbucks. Usually I have nothing to complain about bc usually I go through the drive-thru and they do great! But today the line was ridiculous so I decided it might be quicker to go inside... ... Everything was going fine until the girl started making my drink (Venti, iced, quad, non fat caramel macchiato) first she filled the cup almost to the rim with milk and ice, so much that when it came time to put in the espresso (which she had in a little paper cup- weird) she couldn't fit it all in so she dumped the rest of my espresso out and then spooned out some more that was at the top of the cup in order to fit the top on.... are you kidding me! When I pay $6.22 for my coffee I expect all my espresso to be in there... I don't pay for milk and ice! I just thought this was absolutely crazy... I will not go to this Starbucks anymore now that I know that they are not giving me my moneys worth! -I take my coffee very seriously in the morning- ;)


REVIEW #22:  1 stars  (754 chars)
First time here and the last time. Was greeted and promptly having our ordered started. In the middle of our order being taken someone else took over while the manager began to scold the employee that was first helping us right in front of us.  ... They ask for the name to call when order was ready. We went and sat down and I noticed people leaving with there orders that came in after us. My husband went up and our drinks were just sitting on the counter!!! ... I got the Strawberry & Crme frap and it had no Strawberry taste just a Crme taste.  ... It was dirty in there and HOT!! ... Will never go again. It was uncomfortable and rude to us to see an employee get scolded when the manager should have taken them to the back and talked with them!!!


REVIEW #23:  1 stars  (530 chars)
They took my order wrong. I had ordered and iced caramel latte, and i got an iced mocha with caramel drizzle... My bfs drink was so jam packed with java chips he could barely drink it. He spent most of his time chewing. And two people got their orders before I had received mine. Lastly the place was a mess! Like disgusting. The counters looked like a dish pit. Water ice and coffee every where. Not to mention workers were also a hot mess. Geez watching them work was like watching a train wreck. No sense of efficiency either.


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (275 chars)
Super busy Starbucks they take forever in the drive thru do I went inside and it took forever inside a few employees just standing around doing nothing while everyone else was running their butts off not very professional I will go back because it's the only one in the area


................................................................................
LOCATION #100:  address="695 S Green Valley Pkwy Anthem"  city="Henderson"  state="NV"  zip_code="89052"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (716 chars)
This location is located just inside of Target.   It was later in the evening that I was in need of my caffeine.   The girls working here were great!  They were quick to take my order and quick to make my drink.  I had noticed that their dessert case was a little more than half empty.  I wasn't in need of one but just in case someone wanted something, there was little to choose from. ...  ... In a previous review it was said they didn't accept their gift cards but I asked anyway.  There wasn't any issue taking it which made me happy.   I'm assuming they had updated their systems.   ...  ... Since I'm usually shopping at Target, it makes it really convenient for me for a quick stop on my way out.   Win Win!


REVIEW #2:  3 stars  (2040 chars)
No reviews for a busy Starbucks inside the Green Valley at Horizon Ridge Parkways Target? There is one now. ...  ...   Actually this review is overdue. I am such a Starbuck"s and coffee shop fan that the "S" in my profile name could stand for Starbucks.  This is one of a handful of Starbuck's that I regularly visit. It is in a relatively new and clean Target, and shares a shopping center with New York Chinese Restaurant and Petco which I patronize. Not to mention it is near my house.  ...  ...   In name this location is a Starbuck's. But in reality it is a glorified Target department. The Starbucks card is not accepted here. There are less pastries than the corporate owned stores. And I don't even think that the employees here are called baristas. I noticed that the dude who served my coffee later served my fountain soda at the snack bar. But whether it is Target or Starbuck's owned, they serve the same premium coffee based beverages at similar prices. ...  ...   The issue with this location is that it will get busy and one poor associate has to perform miracles to serve a long line of people. If it wasn't pumpkin spice season, I probably would have thrown in the towel and walked across the parking lot for a cup of coffee in Layer's Bakery. Anyway, I want to give a shout out to Maria for handling a long line of customers by herself and joking around with them. ...  ...  The advantage of this Starbuck's is the sundry of tables. What I appreciate is that some of the tables are large and there is sufficient lighting. Not once have I had to delay time for an available table. This makes me relaxed, and when I am in that state I might buy more things at Target. ...  ...   I so don't see myself buying a coffee machine soon. And forget about instant coffee. But I clearly see myself continuing to visit Starbuck's to perk up with caffeinated beverages in a relaxing environment. With that said,  my check-ins will continue in the Green Valley at Horizon Ridge Parkways Target Starbuck's and a grande number of others.


REVIEW #3:  2 stars  (1320 chars)
Probably in the top 3 worst Starbucks I've ever came across. I live across the street from Target and I love to get me some Starbucks when I go for a small shop, however every time I have ever came here my drink was made completely wrong. But that's honestly not the even the worst issue I've seen here. Their customer service skills are THEE worst I have ever seen. The girls who work there are so depressing to even approach. I don't know if they're not getting paid enough or what, but sheesh would it hurt to smile a little? Not a single employee has ever said "thank you" or "have a nice day". They don't personalize with you, along with never asking your name for your drink(s). There is one lady there who does have good personalizing skills, she's an older lady, with dark hair, she's a kind person. But she talks TOO long to the customers she's most familiar with. She ends up creating a long line due to her personalizing skills. But hey at least she smiles, unlike the other employee's (it's only because of her I rate them 2 stars). I've given this Starbucks multiple chances at redeeming themselves and I've simply had enough of me wasting money on drinks they can't even make correctly. I will no longer order from this pathetic excuse of a Starbucks unless they are retrained on how to make a cappuccino.


................................................................................
LOCATION #101:  address="Vons 45 E Horizon Ridge Pkwy"  city="Henderson"  state="NV"  zip_code="89002"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (183 chars)
Moving across the street and putting in a drive-through window was the best decision this Starbucks location ever made.  I love how convenient it is to get a great cup of coffee now.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (136 chars)
I was a total klutz and spilled my drink all over the floor in the checkout of Vons. They were super kind and replaced it at no charge!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (266 chars)
Starbucks is starbucks. I have always had great, quick, and friendly service at this location which inside the Vons on Horizon Ridge. It is located right by the door so I can quickly stop in and get a coffee even if I am not going in to shop. Keep up the good work!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (256 chars)
Staff is kind. For a bunch of teenagers, I'm impressed. ... They made my drink efficiently, even though I'm sure I heard some gossip  about "being thrown under the bus" and "quitting or getting fired"..... But, not bad. I'll be visiting when I am in Vons.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (207 chars)
This is a Starbuck's located inside Von's. It is owned and managed by Von's. ...   Plenty of help and seats. ...   Very convenient for a caffeine boost  when I patronize this Von's or I am headed southeast.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (167 chars)
An iced Cafe Mocha with an extra shot is the same in Topeka as it is here. This location gets 4 stars based on service. It's service that's fast and without attitude.


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (365 chars)
My girl friend and I are pretty much regulars at this Starbucks because it's convenient. Now that they have hired a new staff they continue to mess up on every coffee we get. Either it's too sweet to melted or tast like they pored a whole bag of chocolate powder in it. Absolutely disgusting. It's a waist of money and I would not suggest this Starbucks to anyone!


................................................................................
LOCATION #102:  address="10260 W Charleston Blvd Ste 1 Summerlin"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89135"  (20 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (772 chars)
This is always my go to Starbucks that I go to. I usually use the drive thru, but if the line is way too long, you can go inside yourself and usually get faster service since everyone is outside  ...  ... The staff here is usually always friendly and bubbly. I don't think there was ever a time I had bad service here.  ...  ... My favorites here is either the Seasonal Pumpkin Spice Frappucino, the Green Tea Frapp with strawberries or the Vanilla Bean frapp with caramel drizzle.  ...  ... This is the only store that makes my Green tea frappucino that makes it right. Its probably because I usually only order it here, but Other stores never blend my drinks all the way, so I get chunks of ice that block my straw.  ...  ... All in all, great service and great drinks.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (424 chars)
I asked a lot if questions, all were answered with a smile. ...  Clean, pretty, lots of sunlight. ...  Our order was perfect, and the Pumpkin Scones are to die for. ...  They have soy milk, for us nondairy folk. I think they have almond milk too, but not clear on that. ...  I really like the decor here. I will visit again! Haven't been here in years since a friend was in town and we got coffee and drive through RedRock.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (301 chars)
I have never thought to review a starbucks, since they are on every corner and I go so often. This Place deserves it. Whoever is hiring is right on. I am always greeted with a smile, and perfect service and my lattes always come out perfect. So, this is now my spot when my kids and I need a drink =)


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (232 chars)
The best Starbucks from LA to NYC. I have been to quite a few Starbucks. This location has the best staff, by far. It is a very busy location, yet you still get in and out in a reasonable amount of time. The staff is very friendly.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (32 chars)
Starbucks is always a favorite!


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (8 chars)
Awesome


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (2219 chars)
OK, since I'm the Duchess of this place (41 check-ins and counting...) I should probably write a review. ...  ... Yes, I have an addiction.  It's brutal.  However, I'm not looking to kick-it anytime soon, as my GOLD STARBUCKS CARD just arrived in the mail.  Yes, that is how addicted I am!  (yikes!) ...  ... You don't know about the GOLD card?  If you have a gift card, you can reload it.  When you use it, you gain "points" and then you get extras. ... Once you reach the Gold level you get the following: ... - A free beverage on your birthday ... - Free beverage customization ... - Free brewed coffee or tea refills with each visit ... - Free tall beverage with whole bean purchase ... - Free trial offers ... - Free drink every 15 stars ... - Personalized Offers and coupons ...  ... p.s. It's free to sign-up.  ...  ... Back on this location: ...  ... This drive-thru is INSANE in the mornings (7:30am-9:00am) and insane, I mean about a 15 minute wait. Although, you will get the random day that you can zip right through.  I blame the delays on people ordering the breakfast sandwiches. They are delicious; however, that is what makes it a 10-car backup (to McDonalds)! ...  ... But, I must admit I have NEVER been inside of this one!  I have always done the drive-thru and the time limit doesn't ALWAYS bother me, because I can check emails, etc. while waiting.  (haha!) ...  ... The Barista's are really nice and ALWAYS get my drink orders right.  Never had an issue with that and they have great recommendations on drinks. ...  ... Some of my favs: ... - Grande, Non-Fat, No Whip, White Chocolate Mocha, or make it a Venti with an extra shot of Espresso. ... - Venti, Iced, Non-Fat, No Whip, Unsweetened, Green Tea Latte (if its sweetened- its like crack!) ... - Grande, Non-Fat, No Whip, Green Tea Frappuccino, add Protein Powder ... - Venti Caramel Fraccuccino, No Whip ... - Cocoa Cappuccino: I like this, except its not strong enough for me. ...  ... The Matcha Green Tea (which is used in the Latte and Frappuccino) is what really got me hooked.  You either love it or hate it and I became OBSESSED! ...  ... I have been known to go to Starbucks twice in one day.  Don't hate the player- hate the game!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (751 chars)
This location is so busy and the staff is great. I was a little disappointed this morning when I went to go sit outside. They usually have plenty of outdoor seating, but I think someone went and stole all of the chairs last night. There were like 20 tables and 2 chairs. What the heck? This is not a joke. ...  ... I love that this drive thru is always packed. I love to pay for the car behind me. It always makes the cashiers smile and I know that the person behind me will smile. It happened to me once here and I thought it was such a cool thing to do. So now I try to do it as much as I can.  ...  ... You never know, maybe it will keep going like a chain and make people have a great day. Oh and the coffee is pretty good. I love my Chai Lattes.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (535 chars)
We were in the drive -thru for quite a while, but it was worth the service we received. During the duration of our order, two workers rotated because of the volume of the order. Everything was recorded exactly. By the time we rolled up to the window, this is where the fun begins. We had 3 separate transactions take place with the payment and they were very patient. The order execution was slacking slightly, but again it was made up with the service.  ...  ... Kudos goes out to Taylor for being patient and awesome through it all.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (465 chars)
This is a bit larger than the common Starbuck's store.  They always have plenty of pastries, a large number of tables indoors, and there's a patio outside that they share with the Tropical Smoothies store. ...  ... I have only been on the patio once.  There are enough pigeons to make any visit a painful stop unless you're into chasing them and trying to kick them in the ass.  But that fun grows tiresome quickly, so I just stay inside or take my coffee with me.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (417 chars)
Starbucks.  What can I say.   This one is pretty quick with the drive-thru service, although in general Starbucks drive-thrus are pretty darn slow no matter what time it is. ...  ... And on a hawt day, you just can't lay off those coffee frappacinos, ya know?   Just nom nom, frappe, nom nom. ...  ... That, and a cinammon swirl coffee cake, completes the taste bud madness.  Truly one of your coffee nom nom places.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (266 chars)
A pretty good Starbucks in it's own right. I go there when I need a pick me up or just to chill. Very clean and the staff is above average in helpfulness. The only drawback is that it's in a very busy part of summerlin so sometimes lines can get astronomically long


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (201 chars)
This store is always busy. They generally have the best employees in the morning hours, and lack good help in the evenings. So visit early and ask for Monica, Bree, Lauren for the friendliest service.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (163 chars)
Always busy but impecable staff they have a solid team and they all work together. Lots of attention to the guests and move people through as quickly as possible.


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (219 chars)
The location is nice but the staff can be annoying. There is a guy that works the nights that is very loud and annoying. One time I forgot my headphones and had to leave because he wouldn't stop singing and being loud.


REVIEW #16:  3 stars  (200 chars)
Not too many tables, coffee is good of course.  Baristas know what they are doing and how to make a special request.  Very busy place because of the location.  Seating outside.  Drive-thur available.


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (556 chars)
This location is not my favorite.  Coffee is good, seating on the covered outdoor patio is good, but always smokers...but 2 issues are caused by the drive-thru: parking and/or driving in/out is a death-trap (everyone is always and somehow confused by the setup), and if you are ordering inside...at least 8 people working behind the counter but minutes can go by before they acknowledge someone in line.  It's slow service for walk-ins. ...  ... This was my local store when I lived in Vegas, so I went here about 6 times before I decided to go elsewhere.


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (573 chars)
Worst service ever, I was in line while someone was getting an order and the guy who was at the cashier was giving a lot of attitude towards the customer. Especially since he was paying and taking out coins from his pocket. He practically threw the guy his straw after he picked up his drink. After drinking my drink and on my laptop that is connected to the plug and the cord was on the floor. One of their coworkers was mopping the floor and practically wiped my whole cord with his mop. Who knows where they've wiped their mop?! Isn't that disgusting and health hazard?


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (360 chars)
Came in on a Friday night eager to try the new app for the giftcard. Ordered 2 drinks, handed her my iPhone to scan the giftcard and I was told, "I can't take that!" with some blond attitude. Um... Didn't Starbucks launch that program? If she had been nice about it, I'd have no issue but she wants to give me attitude for what Starbucks had been advertising.


REVIEW #20:  1 stars  (205 chars)
Terrible service was ignored then panini wasn't even put in to heat until I asked about it then they sat it on the counter and didn't even call it out, rude staff!! And they weren't even busy at the time!


................................................................................
LOCATION #103:  address="10430 W Cheyenne Ave Summerlin"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89129"  (23 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (441 chars)
I have never had a bad experience at this particular location (unlike many other Starbucks I have been to).  ... The staff is uber friendly, knowledgable & helpful.  ... Fish was really helpful during my visit to the drive thru this afternoon, as was the other gentleman working... Sorry dude- I didn't catch your name, but you're equally awesome. ... Love this store & the staff. Won't be going to any others from now on, if I can help it!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (393 chars)
I have to go to the Walmart Neighborhood Market from time to time and can't believe I never new there was a Starbucks in the parking lot! ... I was stoked. I went inside and was greeted by the friendly staff.  ... I ordered a Venti White Mocha. It was spot on! ... The place was clean and upbeat. ... There is a drive-thru at this location which is a nice perk. ... I recommend this location!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (290 chars)
I am here almost every day, and I decided it's time to write a review.  Everyone is super friendly in this location (at least in the mornings).   ...  ... I just love a positive attitude, and that's what the staff have here.  So polite. ...  ... Inside is like any other starbucks I guess.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (267 chars)
This is one of the best locations in town!!! The staff is incredibly friendly, and always remembers my order! That's nice! The store is very clean! I drive across town, just to come to this location! I guarantee you won't be disappointed! From a long time regular :)


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (198 chars)
I love Starbucks! They have the BEST coffee! I love their food when I'm on the run. The company culture is fabulous. You can pretty much count on everyone being nice and friendly every time you go!


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (96 chars)
I love this Starbucks location. It's nice inside, never too packed, and the employees are nice.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (1863 chars)
My profile headline reads: "Yelp is my diary, and my reviews are the written pages of my life." This past Saturday, the Cheyenne Avenue at 215 Starbuck's was a part of my life for a good hour. ...  ...    After a workout hiking up Lone Mountain, I was up to relaxing and keeping awake with a grande Starbuck's drip with pumpkin spice syrup. This Starbuck's was a good choice.  ...  ...    This Starbuck's stands off the north side of Cheyenne Avenue immediately east of the 215. It is a pad in the Walmart Neighborhood Market Shopping Center. Parking is plentiful for Starbuck's customers that drink their beverage in the lobby. The drive thru is a convenience for the Starbuck's customers on the go. ...  ...   Inside is a plush Starbuck's that  makes for a fitting place to relax with a hot beverage. The layout is elongated, which creates a few relaxing  zones. On the east section of the lobby there are plush chairs and on the west section there is a separate room with a few seats. Throughout the lobby there is the standard seating arrangement with chairs and tables. With the counter in the middle, the sections at both ends of the lobby have a lower noise level. Reading the newspapers on my smart phone compliments of complimentary WiFi, I felt like I was in a lounge drinking coffee. ...  ...    The baristas that represent this Starbuck's are friendly. They took time out from what they were doing to talk to me. They gave me a tip that is worth passing on: "If you purchase a Starbuck's card, and have at least $5 on it, refills are free." When they were not helping customers, they were cleaning. This is a plush Starbuck's that was very clean on my visit. ...  ...   Because Yelp is my diary, and my reviews are the written pages of my life, I will write about the places that I visit. And it is guaranteed that I will write about more Starbuck's.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (749 chars)
Close to the Church I go to, this spot is nice with a huge lobby. Interior design is very similar to any other Starbucks, but with more lounge chairs and a huge comfortable couch.  The staff is aight except the one that always seems higggggggh, guy is super cool.  He likes to converse with me as if he knows me.  Next time i'll bring him a bag of chips and if he accepts, i'll conclude that he is high. ...  ... It's very quiet and rarely gets crowded.  I like chillin here to kill time or get some work done on my laptop.  It's located in a plaza surrounded by nice neighborhoods and the crowd are older than the norm of what we usually see chillin in coffee shops, your middle age class working citizens rather than your average college student.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (727 chars)
I come to this Starbucks usually when I'm on my way to Church or coming from Church.  This particular Starbucks is a little bit bigger than the other ones I've been to in the area.  The seating area is a little bigger and it has a big comfortable couch near the barista so as soon as you place your order, grab the couch! You'll fall asleep on it-- like Paul from the Diamond Center, I guarantee it! (I miss the 90s!) ...  ... We've held meetings here before and they never had a problem with it.  There's a little secluded area to the right of the entrance when you walk in so it gives some privacy if you do have a private meeting here.  The staff is pretty quick with your drinks and is almost never too busy. Check em out!


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (507 chars)
This is a great location and they always make my sweetened passion tea lemonade perfect! I've never gone inside, I'm a drive-thru-er and most if the time I have great service is fantastic, always chatting with me while I wait for my drink. Unless the guy with the long ponytail is working, he has this "I hate my job" mood it feels like and you get the vibe he doesn't want to be there. I try to be as cheery as possible with him, make him hate it less I guess. Ha. Overall I do enjoy this location though.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (441 chars)
It's a Starbucks and it has a drive-through and the baristas are friendly and perky (caffeine overload?).  I am a recent coffee convert, thanks to hubby, and really craved a coffee yesterday morning.  Since we just ran out of coffee beans the previous day, and since we were running late to church, we decided to grab some *bux to go....one sip, and I felt myself becoming more alert. ...  ... How sad that my mornings have come to this....


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (400 chars)
Conveniently located on the way to my Son's school, I stop by here on occasion in the morning to grab a cup of Joe.  I am simple and enjoy a half-caf Americano Grande.  I normally use the drive-thru here, but will go inside if the line is too long. ...  ... The staff here is friendly and always get my order right.  That's all I ask for at this Starbucks location. ...  ... Will I return?  Yeppers.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (296 chars)
Standard Starbucks with a drive-thru, friendly staff. Only ever had my order wrong once and I didn't throw it back in their face as other Starbucks patrons have been known to do. ...  ... Venti iced green tea with three pumps of classic. Best way to stay hydrated in this 105 degree weather! ^.^


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (236 chars)
One of my faves......the drive-through is usually pretty quick! The people are friendly and the drinks are perfect. There isn't ever much merchandise but this Starbucks is within walking distance to my house so I can't really complain.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (185 chars)
Really like this Starbucks as they have lots of room inside of the store and we come here for ASL lessons. Always have great service and drinks here. It's one of my favorite Starbucks.


REVIEW #16:  3 stars  (891 chars)
It is a starbucks so the results are limited here. I despise the concept of starbucks as it is clearly designed for people to get their drinks to go. I prefer the more traditional coffee houses with couches, games and music.  The limited seating at Starbucks is uncomfortable, there are not many outlets available for wifi and there is no warmth to the place.  I also don't drink cofee and the alternate selections are also limited. ...  ... That said, my favorite breakfast sandwich is the egg and gouda sandwich.  They always have madelaines for my daughter and although their boxed meals are a little on the pricey side of things, they have creative combinations including a cheese tray, turkey and hummus, etc...  The staff here is very friendly and I do like the smoothies. ...  ... Overall, this place gives an extra oomph to the product that everyone else in the world seems to love.


REVIEW #17:  3 stars  (419 chars)
This Starbucks has a huge lobby and extended lobby on the side. The area rug and couches bring warmth to the place. But the customer service is hit or miss. I come here a lot, and there are days when the staff look like zombies- maybe they need the coffee more than I do. And then they have their perky days.  Overall, it's a nice place to hang out and have some coffee but it's tragic that this location closes early.


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (236 chars)
I'm actually not a particularly big fan of Starbucks for their coffee. I find it kind of acidic and a bit strong for my liking. I am a fan of their frapachinos and pastries, but alas, far too many Calories for me to visit consistantly.


REVIEW #19:  2 stars  (337 chars)
Normally I'd give this location a 5 star rating. However, based upon my last 2 trips I'm giving them 2. I have ordered my drinks both times with no whip creme and both times they put it in anyways. The order on the cup even says, "no whip creme."  They just need to start paying attention again and checking their orders. Very annoying.


REVIEW #20:  2 stars  (173 chars)
I order the same drink every time and each time it's made differently. I never have trouble with my drink at most locations. They just don't listen to what you're ordering.


REVIEW #21:  1 stars  (1304 chars)
One of the worst Starbucks I've ever been to! First couple times I went, a black/white mixed girl rang me up. She's rude, never smiles, never says hi, never says thank you. I don't know how she can work in customer service. ... Went again this morning and ordered a pumpkin spice latte. When I was walking out to my car, I realized it was double cupped, which is unusual. Normally the only drinks that are double cupped are hot teas or coffee, as they are hotter than regular steamed milk drinks. I know because I worked at Starbucks for a few years. Anyway, I ignored it. When I got to my office, I checked to see why...here's why: ...  ... The cup the drink was in was a MESS! Pumpkin syrup EVERYwhere. Half the cup on the outside was covered in it making the whole thing a sticky mess. I was so shocked that they were too lazy to change the cup and decide to cover it up by putting it in another cup. I mean, who does this?! I know spills happen but clean up after yourselves and especially don't hand a customer a cup that's covered in syrup on the outside. What a bunch of idiots! ...  ... Disgusting service, disgusting preparation of drinks. Had my old district manager seen me or one of my coworkers do this back in the day, it's a write-up for sure. ...  ... This Starbucks is an embarrassment.


REVIEW #22:  1 stars  (306 chars)
We went to the drive-thru. We ordered 4 drinks. It took them 10 mins. for the drinks. They got 3 wrong and forgot about the other one. As we were waiting we saw the whip cream thing HANGING OFF THE TRASH CAN!!! After 20 mins they finally got our order right. After all of this they did not even say sorry.


REVIEW #23:  1 stars  (204 chars)
It's a Starbucks. The employees could really care less about you. Why should they have to care about customer service.  After all you came to them for a service, they will help you when it is convenient.


................................................................................
LOCATION #104:  address="10520 Southern Highlands Pkwy Southwest"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89141"  (26 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (128 chars)
The crew is the best! As soon as I walk in someone is already making my drink! Thank you guys for getting my day started right!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (108 chars)
I love Starbucks!!!! U can never go wrong with a good Starbucks coffee in the morning to start your day. :)


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (609 chars)
I enjoy coming to this Starbucks and never have had a real bad experience. I look forward to the greets & small talk of a retired group of biker men, who hang out every day for their morning cup of Joe. The staff is friendly, they pretty know my usual drinks of choice, and most of them know my name. My only main complaint is why bother having 2 cash registers if your only going to use one!!!! Even when the line is long...there is only one cashier taking and ringing up orders!!! Please have a 2nd cashier!!!It would make the line go so much faster!!! This is why I only gave 4 stars instead of 5 stars!!!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (247 chars)
I like the new decor and set up, except it will get too crowded with their center display by the register. ...  ... I purchased my typical hot caramel macchiatto with non fat milk.   ...  ... They did add more tables but removed the comfy chairs.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (206 chars)
Friendly staff, great coffee... The only drawback is even when it is slow there is always a wait for coffee. Other than that if you have a couple extra minutes stop in for a great cup of coffee of three...


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (186 chars)
I'm able to get a venti iced coffee with milk or green tea (unsweetened) for under $3 in this hot ass day. Free iced water too. Minus one star for long lines in the drive-thru. #winning


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (176 chars)
Always friendly and quick. I'm in and out within minutes no matter how crowded or time of day. They help find me vegan options and are always willing to alter my drinks. Whoo!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (160 chars)
Coffee always taste burned.......   Staff are really good and service is spot on every time!  They want you to leave happy and I like that in customer service!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (128 chars)
one of the good Starbucks in this area, good service, quick, if you don't feel like going inside, there's always the drive thru


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (116 chars)
Always a different experience I guess it just depends on whose working. Thank goodness for drive through Starbucks!


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (23 chars)
The staff is very nice


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (1273 chars)
When I first saw a drive-through Starbucks...I was ecstatic.  I think there is only one drive-through in Cali which I heard was in Livermore (which was very far from where I used to live so I never even knew) ... It sure made it very convenient esp for those with kids or if it's too hot to get out or if the weather is sucky...drive-through is the way to go.  ... But I have been very disappointed lately with the service at Starbucks. ... Maybe because there are new people there or they are just too wired to actually pay attention to my order to get it right. ... I will go to Starbucks in the am and order the same thing.  50% of the time they will get it right.  ... How hard is it to make a VENTI ICED AMERICANO WITH AN ADD SHOT, TOFFEE NUT SYRUP AND CREAM.   ... One time they used hazelnut...i know my syrups!!!.. ... One time it was too sweet ... One time they gave me someone else's drink ... One time it was almost like a latte - all milk ... One time I actually had to go back and got the right one.  ...  ... I love Starbucks...but come on now....aren't all the drinks supposed to be uniform according to how it is ordered???? ...  ... My drink is simple....I don't want to have to accuse of someone slippin some kahlua in the baristas drinks before shift!!!


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (352 chars)
I usually come here every morning on my way to work. The staff is friendly and when I go into the store it's always clean. The drive thru is 80% of the time very slow. I've waited 15 minutes for coffee stuck in the drive thru with a moderate/shorter line. I don't know what they do behind the scenes after you order, but they need to pick up the pace.


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (160 chars)
Typical Starbucks, even without a line it took a long time to get your coffee but then again I think there was a line around the building in the drive through.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (580 chars)
I come to this Starbucks every day, thru the drive thru. And everyday they can never hear me, so I'm always repeating at least twice. I order the same drink every day, 8 times out 10, it tastes different. Same drink just something is always off day after day. So frustrating. The other HUGE deal, the drive thru is a ridiculous wait! Whether it be 3 cars or 10, give yourself at least 10 min to get thru the line, at least!  ... Up here in southern Highlands there isn't a lot to choose from, with anything but I can guarantee if there was a coffee bean next store, I'd be there!


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (518 chars)
This is the closest location to my place so I go here often. Staff's normally pleasant. I've only gone inside once and they were pretty rude, so it's the drive thru for me now. Not much of a long wait. I'm weird so even during the summer I drink hot coffee. Never a problem there. I tried the treat receipt or whatever it is called and ordered a cold beverage (passion something?)  it was really watered down. Not refreshing at all. I'll stick with my white chocolate mocha, at least they know how to make that right.


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (450 chars)
OVERPRICED!!! What a rip off! ...  ... Regular coffee in a very well marketed logo cup. That is what Starbucks coffee is all about. Take a way the brand name and you might as well drink Sanka. What the hell is the deal with the tip cube???? You want your employees to make more money. Then raise your prices because I am not tipping someone just for selling me coffee. Make your own cup of coffee at home or go to a gas station. Not worth the $$$$$$


REVIEW #18:  2 stars  (134 chars)
This is the only Starbucks in my neighborhood so I go here by default. Friendly enough staff but they are consistently sooooo slow :(


REVIEW #19:  2 stars  (106 chars)
This frappuccino happy hour thing is lame. Get fat, and develop diabetes, between 3-5pm for half price!!!


REVIEW #20:  1 stars  (1432 chars)
If I could give NEGATIVE stars I would. I moved to this area over 5 years ago and this Starbucks has gone from awesome to dismal!  ...  ... Five years ago, their drive through was on point. The wait was no longer than five minutes - now the wait is upwards of fifteen to twenty minutes!  Really?!?!  Most people have places to go and if they want their coffee treat, they, like me, leave ten to fifteen minutes earlier so they can get their treat. This Starbucks will make you late EVERY SINGLE TIME! ...  ... Then you add the people. Five years ago, the staff was awesome!  They knew who I was, knew what I wanted and was very friendly. This new staff leaves a lot to be desired. They are rude and borderline mean. They screw up my order every time. Just last night I ordered a TRENTA iced tea and the barista said I ordered a VENTI. I think I know what I ordered as this is the SAME drink I order EVERY SINGLE DAY!!!!  Fix your damn ordering system or have the baristas clean their ears!! ...  ... And lastly, don't bother going there if they are near closing. They are so rude during that time that they will not cater to their customers. Tried to order a pastry and got told "we've already dumped our pastries for the night" - really?!?! I thought you cleaned up AFTER you closed the store??  Ridiculous! ...  ... Basically if you can, go to another Starbucks and don't bother with this place until they get their act together!


REVIEW #21:  1 stars  (1009 chars)
As a former Sbux barista, I know the job can be taxing especially when it's busy so I usually cut baristas some slack. That being said, this is the WORST sbux location I have EVER been too. Painfully slow, not friendly, lack of menu knowledge, forgetful...I could literally go on and on. You can tell the employees are not happy especially since this location has one of the highest turnover rates in the city! There is someone new there almost every week and there are always grossly undertrained. I know it's great to treat your regulars like family but if you are not one of the four men that go there every single day and sit there for hours, these baristas do not car about you. This location is walking distance from my home so I go there out of convenience (and fairly often I hate to admit) I order regular coffee and not one of them remembers my name or my drink. Just a bad experience overall every time I go there. I'm going to start driving the 10/15 minutes out my way just to go somewhere else.


REVIEW #22:  1 stars  (443 chars)
The most convenient Starbucks, but unfortunately, management needs to spend more time with their employees. Got my name name wrong after spelling out (MARTIN is not a difficult name to spell), asked for several pastries and got served one, and apparently a caramel macchiato doesn't have caramel at this location. On a positive note, I got a beautiful smile from one of the beautiful girls working there, which is the reason for the one star.


REVIEW #23:  1 stars  (366 chars)
I was there twice in the last three days. Encountered I think their manager who was frantically running around the place. I waited over 10 minutes for a simple ice tea. When I questioned that my drink was late and might have been forgotten she said, we're busy. Welcome to Starbucks! In an exasperated tone I would not drive out of my way for that experience again.


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (259 chars)
Apparently you cannot order the traveler through the drive-through even though it does not state that anywhere on the menu and if you go inside to order the traveler the clerks get upset and sigh as though your an inconvenience to them.  No customer service.


REVIEW #25:  1 stars  (141 chars)
I go to Starbucks all over and this one is super slow and super rude. This is def the worst starbucks in town!!! Avoid it like the plague!!!


REVIEW #26:  1 stars  (117 chars)
If you have to be somewhere this is one of the slowest drive thru lines ever , even the wait inside is pretty long .


................................................................................
LOCATION #105:  address="129 E Fremont St Downtown"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89101"  (26 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (220 chars)
Went to this Starbucks this morning (3/1/12) and frankly, it's subpar compared to other Starbucks.   When there are 8 or so employees, you'd think that the place would run like an efficient, well-oiled machine. Nope....


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (130 chars)
i luv this starbucks. the ladys here make sure they take good care of me. super nice and if i have a problem they always fix it..


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (2158 chars)
24 hour sratbucks - awesome. Fremont street people watching - awesome. Finding a seat - not so awesome. Plugs for laptop - non existent. Not even a plug inside. I guess they don't want me plugging in my amp for my one man band Fremont show. I'm suprised, because they let everyone else besides Starbucks customers chill here.  ...  ... Is it really that hard to put a sign up that reads "starbucks or hotel guests only". As much as I like quircky vagrants, I do not enjoy them asking me for cigarettes and change every 5 minutes. I'm trying to enjoy my chai frap and watch people take pictures with the big titty lady. People watching is a lot less amusing when you have the drunk guy who thinks he IS the Fremont street experience sitting next to you. Double fisting two natty ices. He definitely was not there to purchase a scone or double shot espresso. Out of the 11 full tables outside, I counted only 3 Starbucks products. In the freeloaders defense, there are no benches or chairs on Fremont street to sit down. I'm guessing zoning only allows zero benches and 60 vendor carts. Gotta make that money Vegas! ...  ... This Starbucks does not accept my Starbucks card. For a company that is not a franchise, why allow casino and rest area locations to have different rules and rediculous prices? I don't know who's at fault. Are these "special" locations gouging prices or is it Starbucks corp? If I find out its the latter, I'm turning in my Starbucks GOLD card. Gonna start my own mega-espresso empire with consistency at every location. Treating my loyal customers with the respect they deserve for keeping me in business. ...  ... I have been here for at least an hour and the sitting area looks like they started their own refuse collection. Nobody has come outside to clean up the place. I'm about to leave and some guy that looks like a meth addict starts clearing up the tables and the ground. Maybe OCD, or maybe he just wants to be a nice guy for using the tables without purchasing anything from starbucks. Who said meth addicts can't be contributing members of society? They are doing more than the starbucks/casino employees that work here.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1769 chars)
While walking along the Fremont Street Experience on my earlier jaunts to view the famed Fremont Street Experience Light Show years ago, I got thirsty for a nice, hot coffee. It was a cold October day. Lo and behold, this Starbucks Coffee Shop situated inside the Golden Nugget Casino Hotel in Downtown "Old Vegas" was the answer to my beverage thirst. ...  ... Oh, goodness: ... I recommend this not only for that great coffee Starbucks is known for but for the spectacular spectacle for any scenery-watching and sightseer like me is this location's relaxed seating on its outside patio. ...  ... Seatings and tables surrounded by a wrought iron fixture surround which wraps this patio right on the Fremont Street Experience pavement. I sat and watched the light show drinking my coffee and a pastry treat! Several visits followed thereafter, when friends and family is in the city to relish the spectacle of the Light Show and this place presents a seated outdoors "theatre experience".  ...  ... The staff service is attentive and prompt.  ...  ... A cozy little coffee shop with seatings inside the shop, too.  ...  ... Besides the coffee, I like their cheesecake, chocolate eclairs and fruit tarts all at a price between $2.95-3.95... a little on the above-average pricing.  ...  ... What, not tech-y? ... My most recent visit was this month to meet my Mom, I have found out that one thing that this Starbucks is not up-to-date for is the absence of "Free Wi-Fi" unlike other locations in the U.S.  ...  ... Note this: ... There are two locations of Starbucks in Golden Nugget. The other is in The South Tower but it opens only from 5a.m.-10p.m.  Best yet eversince with THIS LOCATION OVERLOOKS the Fremont Street Experience, this coffee shop stays OPEN 24 HOURS!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (707 chars)
I mean, yeah, right, it's a Starbucks. How different can they be? And, it's true. On the drink/food side- it's the same as just about any Starbucks.  ...  ... BUT- For some odd reason, there really aren't any restaurants that have a patio ON Fremont street. Starbucks does. So, it's worth the price of a cappuccino to be able to people watch from their lovely patio. And, to be honest, they don't seem to really police that you're a customer of theirs in order to be able to sit there. Dude next to me was drinking coffee from Dunkin' Donuts.  ...  ... Only negative is street performers and random salespeople (timeshares, etc.) can bug you from time to time. Whatev. Just pretend you don't speak English.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (415 chars)
This SB is located in the Golden Nugget downtown Las Vegas it's very small just like your typical stand in a Casino to get a quick drink. So happy that now you can use your SB card before you couldn't use it. They don't have the phone scanner don't know when that will happen. But I forgot the Golden Nugget has 2 SB the other one is located in the newer redone section. I'm just glad now they accept the SB cards.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (351 chars)
This Starbucks made THE BEST Cinnamon Dolce Latte that I have ever had! I was in Vegas in the middle of summer, and it was ridiculously hot but I still had to have my cinnamon dolce latte. The lady who filled my families orders was very friendly, and did an amazing job on all of our drinks. If only the baristas in Utah could take a lesson from her!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (178 chars)
A Sure Thing! I adore coffee, all kinds:  I am not too fussy. My coffee is very blond and very sweet:  more like dessert. Almost a meal, but not quite. Hope you enjoy yours too!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (134 chars)
Small but comfortable Starbucks inside the Golden Nugget casino, outdoor seating on the Fremont St pedestrian mall is a nice feature.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (943 chars)
This is a pretty small location, although that is to be expected since it is inside the Golden Nugget. There is an outdoor patio so you can enjoy your coffee while people watching on Fremont Street. The line can get long, but the staff is really nice and work fast. I got my coffee really fast despite how busy it was. ...  ... The  reason I had to take off a few stars is that they do not take the Starbucks card and do not give Starbucks rewards members any of the benefits. This was the only Starbucks I went to in Las Vegas that did that and the others I had gone to were in casinos as well. I can understand not wanting to be part of Starbucks rewards, but I don't see how hard it would be to take Starbucks cards since they already accept credit and debit cards. I could have gotten coffee somewhere else, but I made the effort to go here just because it was a Starbucks so I was disappointed that I couldn't pay with my Starbucks card.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (725 chars)
Here are the real facts about this sbux:  ...  ... It is a 24/7 coffee shop with pretty good customer service & fast drink making skills, but extremely average drinks. I got a Java Chip Frap and there was barely any coffee whatsoever! Though, it is in a pretty useful location when you decide to go exploring downtown Las Vegas!  ...  ... It's a tad more expensive because of the casino status. Also, don't ever eat food at starbucks--it's usually bland or dry, and you should really save your money for more coffee trips or alcohol later when you're trying to have some good times in the ol' DTLV.  ...  ... My suggestion: Grab your drink and walk around fremont @ night! It's worth the fun light show view~! At least once!


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (495 chars)
I made a stop here every single day while on a recent trip out to Las Vegas.  With its great location, it made it so convenient to get my Starbucks fix in daily.  Their baristas were all super friendly, no matter who was working when I stopped by.  ...  ... I still can't figure out why they would still be using their holiday/Christmas cups on February 8th but they were.  It didn't matter. My venti Sugar Free Cinnamon Dolce Soy Latte was out of this world and hit the spot every single time.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (126 chars)
Got to get your caffeine on to fuel your adventures on Fremont Street! Small seating area inside and a few seats outside too.


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (105 chars)
Watch out, this Starbucks is more expensive than normal Starbucks locations because its tourist central.


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (100 chars)
Hey starbucks! Same. as. always. Nothing great, nothing bad, but damn I love those Chai Tea Lattes!


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (1290 chars)
I don't think I've ever given a Starbucks a bad review.... because, well, they're Starbucks and they're the same the world over, right? ...  ... One would think. ...  ... The drinks are more money here, but that's because they're inside a casino and they can get away with gouging the tourists.  Fine, okay, I expect a certain level of that.  But... this is the ONLY Starbucks I have ever been to where they did NOT have any Wifi access.  And I mean none at all, not even a "paid" level.  Nothing.  I desperately needed a Wifi connection to upload an assignment for grad school - you would think I could do it here over a cup of coffee.   ...  ... That would be a negative.  Most likely because it would "compete" with the Wifi access that the casinos offer - which, of course, you have to pay for (at least, in my case, I did).  This is NOT COOL, folks. ...  ... I have NEVER seen a Starbucks without Wifi access before... but I have now.  I'm not likely to come back, especially when you can't even get a seat outside half the time because it's jam-packed.  And they sit for hours, hours, hours.  If you don't have Wifi access here, there is NO need to sit here for 12 hours taking up space - drink your overpriced lattes and LEAVE so someone else can sit down. ...  ... Not recommended.


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (600 chars)
What is great about this Starbucks just inside the Golden Nugget Casino on Fremont Street is... ...  ... What is really good about this Starbucks just inside the Golden Nugget Casino on Fremont Street is... ...  ... What is OK about this Starbucks just inside the Golden Nugget Casino on Fremont Street is... ...  ... What sucks about this Starbucks just inside the Golden Nugget Casino on Fremont Street is...it is expensive like airport Starbucks only even more so.  Like two tall (SMALL) drinks for about $8 bucks.  The service was not great and the place is grungier than your typical Starbucks.


REVIEW #18:  2 stars  (454 chars)
OK, 3 mornings in a row dealing with a nice cashier, but a grumpy sourpuss making our espresso drinks.  If you are going to work in the service industry, don't bring the bad attitude to work. ...  ... Additionally, why, as a paying customer, am I not getting a seat on the patio because the patio is full of bums and non-customers?  Seriously, Friday and Saturday morning the patio was full, but only 2 people had a Starbucks drink.   ...  ... Not good.


REVIEW #19:  2 stars  (445 chars)
One of the few places to get espressos and lattes in the downtown LV area. It's a small location with limited choices of pastries (at leasts the few times I have been there). It's on the Fremont side of the Golden Nugget which has another one on the Carson side. This one tends to be less crowded in the morning as the one on the Carson side is the near the place where people wait to hop back on their tour bus and take a coffee while waiting.


REVIEW #20:  2 stars  (298 chars)
Like previous reviews, the service sucks and not the greatest areas of town. I usually get the norm for me which is a jcf...this place is always busy and they do have a tendency to skip orders...not the best way to run a business. I guess I'll deal with crummy service vs waiting at a coffee shop.


REVIEW #21:  2 stars  (123 chars)
This location does not do reloads on your card, sorry, not all of us have smart phones with the app.  Also, no free wi-fi.


REVIEW #22:  2 stars  (87 chars)
They add $3 to every purchase just because they're inside the Golden Nugget. Not cool.


REVIEW #23:  1 stars  (367 chars)
Shitty service! I was staying at the Golden Nugget and while waiting on our husband to pull up the car we were parched from the 100+ degree heat and I asked for just a small cup of water. ... She actually wanted $1.20 for a tiny plastic cup with tap water! ... Insanely long lines every time I walked past, not enough seating, rude and not worth a penny of my money!


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (261 chars)
Wow. This is rare. The service, food and drink was so bad I had to write about it.  ...  ... Coffee tasted like flavored water.  ...  ... Muffin was rubbery.  ...  ... Service was horrendous. I paid 7 dollars and you're not giving me a free cup of water? Jeez.


REVIEW #25:  1 stars  (198 chars)
You pay 5 bucks for a cup of coffee you are expecting a certain level of quality.  It's coffee not to complicated.  Over the last 3 days this place has proven it makes crap coffee. It's very dirty.


REVIEW #26:  1 stars  (173 chars)
Does take sbux cards but doesnt honor reward drinks. Wish the barista told me before I bought a 5 dollar drink. place is inside the casino so it wreaked of cigarette smoke.


................................................................................
LOCATION #106:  address="145 E Harmon Ave Eastside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (4 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (335 chars)
I don't understand why this Starbucks has such bad reviews! I stayed at The Signature at MGM Grand in tower 3 for 5 days and visited this Starbucks for 3 of those 5 days and had 0 problems. Each time I went in there, no one else was in there and my drinks were made very promptly. The staff was friendly and my drink tasted very good.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (566 chars)
on day 4 of our trip I finally realized this Starbucks is here at the MGM  - dang! could have been enjoying my usual beverage everyday/ Oh, well, found it now.  Located in Tower 1 - this Starbucks doesn't have any lines to speak of compared to the one in the MGM food court area. I ordered a Venti Vanilla Macchiato with No Foam. It was great. The Baristas were very nice and I had no problem using my Starbucks phone app to pay for my drinks. It's not a cheap Starbucks. You're paying for convenience, don't like it, stand in line for an hour in the MGM Starbucks.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (183 chars)
Conveniently placed but their lines are crazy long and their items are over priced. A plain croissant costs more than my coffee. They do, however offer free hot water which is great!


REVIEW #4:  1 stars  (248 chars)
I thought I had been to the slowest Starbucks ever. This one is slower.   You know what I want to do in Las Vegas? Sit in Starbucks for half an hour waiting for a frappuccino. Luckily, it only took 3 times to get them to put espresso in the drink.


................................................................................
LOCATION #107:  address="160 E Flamingo Rd Eastside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (14 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (224 chars)
This Starbucks gets five stars just for being open 24 hours every day of the week. I was just recently told by someone that this location was inside the Westin and it was open 24/7. The staff is friendly and attentive also.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (141 chars)
@6:15PM, 6/28/12. Greeted by a  smile and jovial banter, made our feign for caffeine delightful and the Iced Caramel Macchiato was good too.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (1029 chars)
Sometimes craziness strikes me and I push myself to attend work out classes at 6am even though I went to bed late. Then their are times that I might be going completely insane and attend two classes. Unfortunately, they never fit back to back and I have a large lag time in between. The combination of lack of sleep and early wake up made it clear that I needed caffeine.  ...  ... At 8am, I was able to avoid the morning rush. The store was almost full, but I found a spot to sit and read the newspaper. A grande Americano will only set you back $2 and change while not ruining all the efforts of the gym. Passing up on those pastries prove to be difficult, but a sugar spike was not on my agenda. At this point, the cashier could guess that I was struggling to not give in. She didn't push it and I was in the clear.  ...  ... The staff members are efficient. A second after my money was in the register, my coffee was on the counter. With the mellow sounds of Seal drifting above, I was ready to pick up and head off to yoga.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (725 chars)
This location is located inside of the Westin hotel and is open 24 hours a day. Because that is the first thing I need in Vegas at 4am is caffeine.  ...  ... The location was not crowded and there were plenty of seats too. I think they also might have free wifi because there was a lot of laptop activity going on here.  ...  ... The oatmeal was good but they only filled it up about 2/3rd's...felt like a total rip off.  I put it on my list to never order again. The room had coffee in it, so I made my own every morning.  I did pick up breakfast here every morning. The turkey sandwich was good and I also liked the bluberry vanilla fiber bar.  This place also had the cold double shot...one of my favorite Starbuck items!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (440 chars)
Sometimes at the little places, like inside the hotel, these kind of Starbucks places are more like the red headed step child of the others. I can confidently say this location fits in with the rest of the family. ...  ... They have all the favorites and classics. And they are open 24 hours!  ...  ... If I am staying at the Westin again, I will certainly be stopping in for an overpriced, high caloric coffee that Starbucks is known for.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (434 chars)
I give this Starbucks four stars because it's considerably bigger than a usual Starbucks that you find in casinos - most of the ones around the Strip are the Target-sized Starbucks.  You know what I mean.  This one is almost normal-sized.  Also, the lady who worked behind the counter was nice and cheery and commiserated with me about the change in style of the 'You Are Here' mugs.. the old blue ones are definitely better, right??


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (211 chars)
This Vente iced latte really hit the spot on a 109 record-setting day where I was tired and needed to sit and rest. This location isn't too crowded and provides for a quiet, simple atmosphere within the Westin.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (115 chars)
I particularly like this Starbucks- the Barista was funny and friendly- always makes for a great start of the day!


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (659 chars)
This Starbucks is located inside of the Westin Causarina Hotel and Casino.  Since it's not a regular Starbucks it doesn't accept your Starbucks phone apps or give you stars.  Big bummer for me. ...  ... As far as service goes it's okay, they are not the fastest if there is a line building up, but they usually are friendly.  The selection of food items can be limited and that again can be a bummer for me too. ...  ... Overall, it's an okay Starbucks, nothing special.  It's not a legit Starbucks so you don't get your Gold card perks either. :(  Also I think it is slightly more expensive that a normal Starbucks too. ...  ... YELP REVIEW CHALLENGE #23/31


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (277 chars)
pretty much your typical starbuck's. It's in a casino so some mornings there were people sleeping at the tables, but I guess that is to be expected in vegas! When we arrived before 9 it was usually pretty quick, but 9 am or so the line started getting very long and very slow.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (268 chars)
It's a Starbucks, what more can you expect? The location is decent, inside the Westin hotel and it only gets crowded in the morning hours. There is comfy seating, you can also take your drink over to the bar area on the first floor or sit at one of the slot machines.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (79 chars)
Fast and friendly service, but the coffee in my latte tasted bitter and burnt.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (66 chars)
Coffee and smiles in the morning. A great start to the day ahead.


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (136 chars)
among the dirtiest i've seen...compliments the filthy target store that it's in...yuk!  let's not even talk abt the torn up parking lot


................................................................................
LOCATION #108:  address="1990 Village Center Cir Summerlin"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89134"  (28 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1306 chars)
Most Starbucks are marked with good quality drinks, snacks, and pastries. This locale in the Village Center definitely possesses such trusted qualities!  ...  ... What could set a Starbucks locale  apart are (1) interior/exterior space, (2) availability of drive-thru service; (3) adequacy of staffing; (4) maintenance of restrooms. ...  ... - I absolutely love its ATTRACTIVE, TIERED, SPACIOUS PATIOS, which are wheelchair friendly. ... - Its interior is not big, but adequate. Oh yes, it has free wifi.  ... - This place always has adequate, efficient, friendly, and PATIENT baristas.  ... - I have been coming over here for years, and I always find its men's room CLEAN and WELL MAINTAINED - a BIG Plus! This point is important to me, because baristas use the SAME restrooms. One can imagine, if... ...  ... By the way, this place is conveniently located near the Summerlin library, the Village Trail Park and baseball fields, Vons, eateries, and many other businesses. ...  ... The only drawback (to some) might be its lack of drive-thru service, although it does not bother me. ...  ... Peter May 2013 ... PS:  ... - I know this popular locale does not really need another review, especially from me, but Yelp keeps on reminding me to do that, probably because I Yelped out a TIP on this locale once?


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (1063 chars)
I just love having a nearby Starbucks! ...  ... There is no drive-thru at this location They have an outdoor patio and the landscape around it has nice lush trees and plants which makes it nice to kick back with a book or magazine and sip on your fav beverage and or snack. I love the service here too. It is nice when you walk in and they know you by name. I'm sure if I didn't order 1 of 5 different things depending on my mood, they would remember what I wanted too! ...  ... I long for when the Holidays arrive and the "Cranberry Bliss Bar" is on the menu! I stock up and buy the box of them :) ...  ... Even if coffee isn't your thing, they still have teas and fruit smoothies. The "Green Tea" here is good. I usually go with the "White Chocolate Mocha" (like I did this last visit) or "Caramel Frappuccino" with extra caramel lined inside the cup! ...  ... Don't forget to register your Starbucks card online to get freebies and earn rewards. I got a free coffee on my birthday and earn a star every time I purchase a coffee which helps towards my rewards.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (1027 chars)
This is the Starbucks at the Hillpoint center that was practically set up for Summerlin residents only. It's really well hidden, and it closes really early unlike other locations.  ...  ... This is probably my favorite Starbucks in the world. The workers here are really nice and always complement the clothes I'm wearing.  Also, they really know how to make a good Latte. The Starbucks which is closer to my house also has friendly workers but the coffee always tastes like it was made by a new hire. The workers here are all world class when it comes to making the perfect coffee-beverage. I don't mind the extra 5 minute drive to get to this location on account of the great service.  ...  ... I also like the lineup of unusual dogs that the Summerlin residents always bring here. Sure, the dog owners bring those dogs to Starbucks in an attempt to attract the attention of young girls, but unfortunately for them they get my attention instead. Today I got to play with a Shiba Inu and yesterday I got to pet a St. Bernard.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (396 chars)
My savior in the mornings, Being new to town I immediately sought out this nice corner spot!  What a great change from my old strip mall drive thru starbucks in the chicago suburbs, the atmosphere is cheery, the staff patient and so nice and the outside sitting area allows you to sit back relax and forget the hustle of everyday life. By far one of the best all around starbucks I have been to!


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (325 chars)
My favorite Starbucks that  I have EVER been to.  ... Drinks are made to perfection. ... This location is has super friendly service. The outdoor area is FABULOUS. It is so great that you can even bring your dog there. If you bring your dog, the staff brings them water. ... I look forward to returning here again and again.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (325 chars)
I wish this place had a drive through- but service is always quick and pleasant so I don't mind going in. The outdoor area is so charming. They never get the drinks wrong.  I can't say enough good things about the service- in particular there is one dark-haired woman that is so sweet, she makes me smile every time I go in.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (307 chars)
I liked the friendly service and the customers were a happy bunch. In decent weather, sitting on the patio is the best. I only found this particulate Starbucks because I was receiving medical treatment nearby. As a result, I was always in some pain, not medicated, except by this above average coffee shop.


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (202 chars)
I visit Summerlin a couple times a year for a week or so at a time and I go to this Sbux daily - they often remember my drink and my name even though I'm not local.  And they get both right every time!


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (202 chars)
By far the best Starbucks in Las Vegas. Super friendly and upbeat staff. I love grabbing a coffee and reading a book here on my lunch break. The staff is superb. Excellent service. Johnny is the best!!


REVIEW #10:  5 stars  (132 chars)
This location has HANDS DOWN the best starbucks staff!  Friendly and remembers my drink & name.  Nobody compares to them.  Love it!


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (645 chars)
This Starbucks is what my friend refers to as "The Pretty Starbucks".  It is in the Village Trails Center in Summerlin and has a very inviting, large patio.  Many people come sit on the patio with their dogs and just hang out.  Old, retired people come and shoot the ish with each other for hours out there. ...  ... Inside, they are pretty busy, but very quick with their service.  Their food display is always stocked if you're looking for pastries or their warm sandwiches (hello bacon, egg, and gouda sandwich), which is nice because some Starbucks, especially the ones inside grocery stores, are severly lacking in their cafe food options.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (636 chars)
I've been to about a dozen Starbucks in Las Vegas.  The large outdoor seating area is what makes this location my favorite.   ...  ... Unlike most Starbucks (and other coffee shops around town) there is ample outdoor seating here.  You can have your choice of a spot in the sun, or in the shade of the surrounding trees and architecture.  It's especially pleasant to sit outdoors in the fall and spring months. ...  ... The indoor seating area is also very nice, with a choice of table chairs or lounge chairs.   ...  ... I have no complaints with the baristas, who are always friendly and prepare my caffe americano the way I like it.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (590 chars)
Located in the heart of the original part of Summerlin, this Starbucks is one of my favorite locations.  Here's why: ...  ... - They have a large outdoor seating area.  With plenty of outdoor seats, this location is great to hang out during the Spring & Fall seasons when the weather is awesome in Vegas. ...  ... - FREE WiFi.  I know it's FREE at all Starbucks, but it's worth mentioning it anyway. ...  ... - Good service.  The employees here are always friendly and get my order right every time. ...  ... Overall, I always have a good experience here. ...  ... Will I return?  You bet.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (579 chars)
Super friendly staff here.  But no drive through.  They sell the hot sandwiches, which I always appreciate.  They also have a customer of the month... which is a little embarrassing.  This month it's a dog.  I'm sure the dog is cool with being customer of the month.  But personally, if my name popped up on that sign, I'd be mortified.  Don't tell the world about my sugar/caffeine addiction! ...  ... Summerlin folk seem to like to hang out here with their kids, so be prepared for that.  Also, it can get a little crowded - this is a popular spot, especially on the weekends.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (528 chars)
Pictures on my blog.. ...  ... This past Friday night I drove to Las Vegas for my goddaughter's first birthday party. Wow, I cannot believe it's been one year already. We totally rocked the house at Chuck E Cheese!  ...  ... While visiting I also stopped by my favorite Starbucks location in Summerlin for a walk down memory lane with my friend Brandy.  ...  ... I love this location because of the ample parking.. the familiar dog that has been going there for like 7 years, and all the other things near it.. plus, it's huge!


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (526 chars)
This is one of the best Starbucks in town.  The service is always friendly and fast.  In the mornings around 7 am, I am in and out with my drink within 5 minutes or less.  The inside is smaller compared to other Starbucks with about 8 small tables.  The best part of this Starbucks though is the outside patio, where people hang out and relax. ...  ... My only thing with this Starbucks is that around 10 am - 1 pm, all of the soccer moms with their army of kids like to visit at this time making the service a little slower.


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (427 chars)
This has to be one of the best Starbucks in the area.  There is a lot of seating outdoors when the temperature warrants.  The indoor seating area is a bit larger than most, bit it's the outside patio area where this Starbucks shines. ...  ... The staff here has always been very good.  The quantity of food on hand is ample to meet their high demand.  ...  ... It's a pleasure to come here. ...  ... There is no drive through.


REVIEW #18:  4 stars  (403 chars)
This is a cool Starbucks , great atmosphere , tons of seating inside and out . Staff are fine , they remember my name and I only go once a week. They've got a dog bowl for Ozzy , wifi works , they pick up the old newspapers and clear the tables . No drive thru so when I'm starting a road trip with the family I do the Lake Mead / Rampart Starbucks. Very popular with local hot moms so dress nice guys!


REVIEW #19:  4 stars  (361 chars)
The service here as always been prompt and the drinks were made appropriately. What I like about this location is the outdoor patio. The store is located on the corner with the patio out front surrounding the store. So there is a wide view with a lot of trees and greenery. The intersection is right there but it's not that busy. It's nice to sit outside here.


REVIEW #20:  4 stars  (291 chars)
Best Starbucks in the USA! ...  ... HUGE location, tons of outdoor seating, lots of indoor seating and tables.  The service is extra good, and quick at this Starbucks!  It's located in one of the nicest areas of Las Vegas, upscale clientele and nice looking girls (extra points given).  ;-)


REVIEW #21:  4 stars  (249 chars)
A good Starbucks to hang out. The WiFi is always up and the staff is friendly. While I love their coffee, I'm not a fan of the pastries. Next door is an Einsteins Bagels, and their pastries are pretty good. The seating is good indoors and outdoors.


REVIEW #22:  4 stars  (163 chars)
Like many others I assume, I'm just trying the new "add a review" feature from the app. That being said, it's Starbucks. Always consistent and at a premium price.


REVIEW #23:  4 stars  (85 chars)
Lots of outdoor and indoor seating.  Decent selection of snacks and Starbucks coffee


REVIEW #24:  3 stars  (1356 chars)
This could be a great Starbucks.  They sure have the potential:  great wi-fi, spacious interior, and the best patio space of any Starbucks for miles.  On this visit the staff was very friendly and helpful.  So why do I give it only three stars?? ...  ... BECAUSE THIS IS  VEGAS, BABY, AND THIS JOINT CLOSES AT 8:00 pm.  Make that on weekends, too.  Yeah, I know why, but I hardly believe it.  "Volume," said the guy at the register.  I was there at 7:45, and by the time my beans had been ground and I put all the stuff into my hot coffee, it was 8:00.  My "day" was just beginning.   ...  ... The door wasn't yet locked, but a customer coming in was told the store was closed.  He left.  A minute later another one came in who was obviously a regular and known to the staff.  He was not told the store was closed, and proceeded to place a large order, which was filled.  As soon as he left, a third customer was turned away.  Okay, so maybe they're not lining up out the door at 8:00 p.m., but it was a weeknight and there WERE customers.  I just don't get it.  I can walk to this store, but noooooo.  If it's 8:15 and I my caffeine addiction kicks in, I have to get in the car and drive.  Or stay home and make it in my handy Melitta one-cup manual drip cone.   ...  ... Double razzberry to this Starbucks location.  Howard Schultz, I could've loved it.


REVIEW #25:  3 stars  (139 chars)
Gorgeous patio seating!!  Cashiers were very nice and thorough although it did take a hot minute for our drinks and we were first in line.


REVIEW #26:  2 stars  (1809 chars)
This has gone from being the best Starbucks in Las Vegas to one of the worst.  ...  ... The service tends to be on the rude side these days.  ...  ... They close extremely early. While most Starbucks close at 10, this place closes like at 7 or 8.  ...  ... There is never any tables open if you want to use the wifi. The same people loiter here all day long, 24 hours a day, 7 days a week.  ...  ... My last drink here tasted like some guy  grabbed a stale cookie, crushed it in the palm of his hand, and dropped it into water mixed with chocolate syrup. It didn't even taste like coffee.  ...  ... There is no such thing as half n half here.  ...  ... It's so loud in here that you have to scream in order for the barista to hear you.  ...  ... It's so loud in here that you won't hear the barista scream your name when your drink is ready.  ...  ... There is a group  of middle-age men who sit outside with their puppies in order to get the attention of cutie-pie teenage girls. These guys have been doing this for so long that the puppies are now full grown dogs.  ...  ... Also remember how this is Summerlin so everyone acts like they are 11 years old. They will complain about every little thing. If you are standing in line, the guys behind you will constantly keep bitching about how they hate waiting in line. This happens at every Summerlin business I go to. Why are Summerlin folks so impatient?  ...  ... The parking lot in this particular area of the shopping center is very cramped. Either these people drive really bad or they are confused and think that this Starbucks has a drive-thru. I don't know how many times I narrowly avoided death in this parking lot.   ...  ... These days I go to the Starbucks in Centennial near Floyd Lamb Park. The internet is much quicker, and they close at 10.


REVIEW #27:  2 stars  (559 chars)
I love Starbucks but this one is not so great. It's strange when there isn't a line and it's so LOUD that it's impossible to relax and/or get any homework done. It's always full of annoying kids. The only reason I keep going back is because it's literally 3 mins away from my place and the staff is super friendly and they usually do a good job making my coffee. They also have a nice outdoor seating area but I can never use it because it's usually too hot outside and lately it has been unusually cold. I really wish they had a drive-thru at this location!


REVIEW #28:  2 stars  (342 chars)
This Starbucks is a great place to hang if you can get past the horrible workers!!! They have the worst customer service out of any location. Even if you mention this location to other Starbucks they even will tell you it has the worst service! They are so concerned with themselves and will be chatting away while the line is to the door!!!


................................................................................
LOCATION #109:  address="2120 N Rampart Blvd Summerlin"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89128"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (558 chars)
I love Starbucks.  I ingest it by IV permanently attached through a port under my chin.   ...  ... Most of the time I buy it by the pound and make it at home.  I always buy it at a Starbucks store, never at the supermarket, because that never tastes the same.   ...  ... Of all the Starbucks on all the corners near me, this one on Rampart has consistently been the friendliest and most helpful.  (The details shall remain a closely guarded secret, lest the employees there get into trouble, and then it won't necessarily be my favorite Starbucks any more).


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (364 chars)
Today is free coffee day for Earth Day. I bring my travel mug - a big one, of course. They're only brewing that Pike Place swill, since it's late afternoon. "Do you want me to brew Bold?  I can do that," the barista says. Other Starbucks wouldn't be so willing, especially since I won't be paying. That's what makes this location a 5-star joint in my book. Kudos.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (307 chars)
This is the second closest Starbucks to my home and I use it when I'm on the road because of the Drive-Thru.  ...  ... Always consistent and I feel it necessary to compliment Michelle who has worked here for many years and knows all the regulars including my dogs. And they have never even bought anything!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (279 chars)
This has got to be the coolest Starbucks I have been to. The drive thru offers a screen so you can see the person taking your order.  It is so personal and I love it!  Every time I go through the employees and super nice and accommodating as well. I love going to this location.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (1039 chars)
Let's put a Starbucks with a drive through right on your route to work... diabolical. I'm not a big coffee drinker but I am trying (and failing) to drink green tea so this is a good place to get my fix. So far I have been lucky and haven't encountered any super long drive through lines (I'm not going to get out of my car after all- I'll go to the gym if I want to work out) but maybe I just get there at super awesome times? Or maybe anytime I'm there it by definition becomes a super awesome time? Probably. ...  ... I also like the drive through because I can order a strawberries and cream frappacino and not have to go pick it up in front of everyone- feeling all those eyes on me, judging me, and the laughter- oh how they laugh... Real men drink pink drinks people- get used to it it's the 21st century and no it is not correlated with the decline of America as a super power.  ...  ... Anywhoo, sometimes I have 6-8 hours to kill so I come here with my macbook to work on my screenplay and order only water. Nice little Saturday.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (518 chars)
Came here to meet a colleague today for coffee.  It's a nice location with ample seating and of course FREE WiFi.  The staff here is friendly and the big bonus is that the other patrons are nice too.....I've been to some Starbucks in Vegas where I didn't care for the other customers as they were very rude and filthy. ...  ... There is also ample power outlets for your laptop and the spacing between tables is comfortable, not cramped. ...  ... Will I return?  I think I found my new hangout spot in the afternoons.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (247 chars)
Friendly staff and VERY near Labcorp so when I have blood work done, this is a small drive away to recharge my caffeine level. ...  ... I got my normal quad espresso over ice.  How can they make that wrong?  Tasty--you bet! ...  ... I'll be back!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (202 chars)
This location is good. The service is friendly! The establishment needs trash cans on the outside, one for convenience, secondly to help prevent the trash being strewn on the ground in the parking-lot.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (443 chars)
Drive thru coffee is an interesting game.  ...  ... Each experience is always different, one time the line is long and it takes forever and sometimes It has zero lines and still take forever. ...  ... The drive thru at this Starbucks on average is pretty good. Most my experiences here are through the drive thru. A lot of the time they have a nice line but it seems as they have it together with quick service and pretty prompt great coffee.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (2063 chars)
Being an ex Starbucks partner, I know the rules and regulations, and after so many times of going to this Starbucks, the last few have not been so pleasant. My first complaint is that when I try to order my items, I feel completely rushed and barely able to finish a sentence before I am interrupted and told my total. I usually order more then one thing. So it becomes a bit frustrating. The second complaint that I have is.. When did white mochas stop coming with whip cream? I could have sworn it is regulation to put whip cream on it unless the customer asks for no whip. After this happening a few times, I started asking for it In my order. It still would come out without the whip. So then it's been having to take a few steps back and add the whip but that one is pretty petty and easily fixed, so I'm not too worried about it. My last complaint is the customer service I have received today. This was kind of the cherry on top. Yesterday I got a ham and cheese artisan and it was wrong. I took it anyways because I was already on the way to work, and I understand we are all human and make mistakes. So today when I ordered, I double checked it at the window. Thank god I did because it wasn't even a ham and cheese artisan. It was bacon Gouda. After letting the drive through know, Robert and the other partner just kind of looked at me in aw and stared for two minutes. Robert finally was like we are out of ham. That should have been stated when I was ordering. Let me mind you it was not busy. So now I'm sitting in my car holding it, telling them I don't want it, and they were acting like it was my fault and that I was stuck with it. Finally he offered me a refund and I was already going to be late for work. So I asked for a experience card instead of the refund so I could get on my way, and he said no we cannot do that, and insisted the refund. I'm extremely disappointed because I feel like the whole situation was just plain off rude, and I know it's pretty unacceptable partner behavior. That will be the last time I go to that Starbucks.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (427 chars)
I lived in the northwest for a while and am use to my Big Foot coffee or my Woods coffee. This is Garbage coffee I mean DD or MCD does better. I ordered a carmel ice coffee and I don't know why I tasted it but it was burn't tasting either over roasting the beans or something. I could only do about to sips. I should of went with my orig idea on drove a little further down on mead to the tulley place at least there its good.


................................................................................
LOCATION #110:  address="2233 Paradise Rd Downtown"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89104"  (19 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (282 chars)
Fast and efficient Starbucks. Very clean too.  ...  ... Great service, friendly staff. The one associate and I had an entire conversation about whipped cream. Oh and GASP my drink order was correct.  ...  ... Great place. I wish all my Starbucks experiences were as lovely as this!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (1014 chars)
My girl and I stopped here for some java just after eating lunch at India Oven (read the review) and this Starbucks seemed moderately busy but not too crowded. ...  ... The Java was great; I had the Pumpkin Spice Latte as I have had for about 4 days straight. My girl stated that I would soon be getting withdraw symptoms once the seasonal items change....zomg. My girl had the new Salted Caramel Hot Chocolate but she had hers iced, which she feels it would after having it that way taste better hot. ...  ... The only thing negative about this one today was the rest room was a bit dirty with black grim all over the floors in the men's bathroom. It was not so busy I feel that they should have been checking the bathroom regularly. ...  ... On a side note, I saw a homeless person come in and ask for some water, which they promptly gave him with no hassles. (Yes I know they legally have to but it lets me forgive them about the bathroom. ;p) ...  ...  ... Best Regards, ... James "Culinary Schmooze" Williams


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (781 chars)
Looking to get away from douchebags, drunks and addicted gamblers?  Tired of sorority girls holding back the hair while their sister pukes in a trash can?  Ditch the casinos and lounges and slip into this Starbucks if you need to recharge.  I am not really a fan of Starbucks, but I needed some power, and a place to just chill out and work and this one is perfect for that. ...  ... Usually when you get off the strip you'll encounter all those people that the numerous billboards in Vegas seem to be targeting - you know the ones that say "DUI?!" or "Need to get clean?" ...  ... Well none of those people are in this Starbucks either! ...  ... It's just a nice, clean, mellow spot to feel like you are in any other suburban coffee shop even though you are actually in Sin City!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (340 chars)
I came here to telecommute and do some work. The CES expo is happening right down the street, so I expected it to be totally slammed. It's not! Plenty of room. Fast service. Friendly staff.  ...  ... If you want a "Starbucks experience", the location on Paradise is no exception (even for being this close to the strip). No surprises here.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (181 chars)
This is a typical Starbucks outlet with the free wifi and plenty of seating.  Competent staff.  Good beverage.  I'm making my way slowly to every Starbucks in the Las Vegas Valley.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (113 chars)
Close to home. Drive through. Yeah it's starbucks, but you get what you pay for. Coffee - Caps are always yummy!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (88 chars)
Small little starbucks...delish croissant-wich and of course coffee after a long night.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (1598 chars)
I came here with Don the other night around 8pm to study. The location is pretty good since it's right next to the strip, but the area isn't so great. The second Don stepped out of his car, some homeless man approached him and started talking about how his brake lights are out. Then that little comment turned into a whole talk about how his wife is pregnant and sick, blah blah blah. Of course, it all ended with the guy asking Don for some money. Once he walked away, we checked the brake lights and they were fine. I guess it's just another tactic people are using so it could seem like they're helping you out, so you should give them something in return.  ...  ... Anyways, about this Starbucks. The location is okay. I didn't have any problem with traffic at all or getting into the parking lot. Since there were only a few customers there, we were able to find a table right away. It wasn't just any table either, it was one right next to a couple outlets for us to use! Woohoo. I ordered the Awake hot tea and Don ordered Calm hot tea. At other Starbucks locations, the Awake that I'd get would have me feeling pretty cracked out and unable to sleep, but it didn't do anything for me at all here. I actually felt like I was getting more tired. I don't see how that could be their fault though since the tea comes in containers and they don't have to do any sort of ingredients mixing at all to make it.  ...  ... Tips: ... *If you have the option, come at night. It's way more chill ... *Make sure you lock the top lock in the bathroom!! I walked in one some lady pulling down her pants!!


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (887 chars)
This Starbucks is ok in a pinch. Ive gone here countless times and they usually ALWAYS mess up! Lately though, its been pretty ok! The cashiers in the DT are pretty decent, but the DT itself is a shit show. If you dont enter from the Sahara side and try to go in from the Paradise side youre pretty much screwed. Stupid ppl, including myself on occasion, think they can enter and do a u turn to get into the dt line. IT DOESNT WORK IF THERE ARE PPL IN THE DT PPL! I WILL NOT LET YOU GET IN FRONT OF ME BC YOU DIDNT TAKE AN EXTRA MINUTE TO DRIVE DOWN SAHARA AND COME IN THE CORRECT WAY LIKE I DID! ...  ... Like I said, in a pinch! The inside is large and spacious and the workers inside are pretty nice as well. They have the assortment of mech on display/for sale and the couches are super comfy! ...  ... Im sure Ill continue putting myself through the punishment for my iced coffees!


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (687 chars)
This Starbucks Gold Card holder is not impressed with this location.  ... It's a pain to get in and out of most of the time.  ... An iced caffe mocha, no whip, extra shot always seems to get messed up when ordering it from here.  ... Service was aloof and kinda had a I don't give a dang about you, just let me get through with my shift and get the heck out of here attitude.  ...  ... If you need caffeine this place will suffice. Barely.  ...  ... One plus...it's a short walk from the Sahara Monorail Station so if you are wanting a break from say being stuck at the Convention Center and have a Monorail pass it's worth taking a ride to get to. That's why it gets 3 stars and not 2.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (635 chars)
A Starbucks is a Starbucks, right? Well, yeah.  But no.  This place has become my go-to for morning coffee/soy latte because A) the one that was actually right on my way to work closed, B) they have a drive-thru, and C) .... that's about it. ...  ... This place is always PACKED.  It's insane to try and get in/out of the parking lot.  But on the bright side, they have the friendliest drive thru people ever.  So, it's a +1/-1 star on that.  ...  ... This one is pretty small on the inside with a limited amount of seating, but the drive-thru line usually moves pretty fast.  Good option if you're in the neighborhood and in a hurry.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (302 chars)
Quick service but not full Starbucks products available. They had a limited number of drinks - I guess thats ok, as they were located inside the convention center. ...  ... Long lines all the time -the best time to go was early morning  a little after they opened when there wasn't too much of a wait.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (153 chars)
It's like any other SB, but this one has a Drive-Thru. Only downside...it's a pain in the butt to get here unless you're driving in the right direction.


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (32 chars)
Nice and cozy! Loved the place.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (480 chars)
I come here quite a bit because of its proximity to my office, and honestly it has the potential to be a great Starbucks, but for some reason they put the guy with the least customer service at the counter! The short bald/almost bald guy there every weekday morning just ruins the entire transaction consistently, by his rudeness and screwed up orders, but I guess there's got to be some good reason he's at the counter?  I prefer the Starbucks  down the street in Howard Hughes.


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (87 chars)
When it's open, it's cool.  When it's endlessly closed most times?  How I loathe thee!


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (1761 chars)
I've been a loyal Starbucks customer since 2006. This is the worst Starbucks location I've ever been to. I've never gone inside this location. I've gotten coffee from this location three times. And not a single time was I happy with their service. The only reason I went to this location was because they have a drive-thru and it makes it more convinient for me (most of the ones in the area doesn't have a drive-thru). I've given this location three shots and that is it! I am done... I am never, ever, ever coming back to this location ever again! The last time I was there was Wednesday, April 17th. I was on my way to my dentist appointment and since it was still early I would love to get coffee and just kill some time. There was at least 5 cars in front of me, which is fine because I don't care about the wait for I have an hour to kill anyway. So I ordered my usual Venti iced caramel macchiato with extra caramel. There is no screen where you can see your order and this guy on the register didn't bother repeating if my order was correct. So I went ahead and drive up and when I got to the window he was handing me a "grande". So I told him I ordered a venti. Then he asked if I don't mind if it's stirred or not. Right when I said I don't mind if it's stirred, I just knew it! I knew they would just pour the grande drink in the venti cup and add lots of ice. And that's exactly what happened! That's not how you do business and definitely not how you keep your business! This location is an embarrasment to Starbucks! I've gone to other locations in another city, state and even another country for Starbucks and never was I this disappointed to Starbucks. This location gives Starbucks the worst reputation. It doesn't deserve to carry it's name!


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (469 chars)
This location has been the worst starbucks experience I've had. Customer service there is horrible, they also had to remake my favorite drink 3 times because it didn't taste right! The drive thru is the worst as well, it seems like the person taking care of the orders, don't know what he's doing. I had to wait at least 5 mins to be helped. In other words, it's been a horrible experience for me, I wouldn't recommend anybody to come here at all. It's a nightmare!!!!


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (426 chars)
Don't go to this Starbucks unless you want your drink to taste like booty and your bagel to crack your teeth. I work around the corner and would much rather drive to Sahara and Decatur because I am just so sick of them constantly giving me old food and bitter coffee. Literally worst location in Vegas, it made me so upset today that I signed up on yelp just to write this review. So annoying. And the customer service sucks!


................................................................................
LOCATION #111:  address="2412 E Desert Inn Rd Eastside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89121"  (12 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (87 chars)
I've had great service here during the morning when I use the drive thru specifically.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (654 chars)
When I first started visiting this Starbucks, my morning Yelp checkin tips were complaints about slowness. But not anymore. I have NO major complaints about this location. In fact the DI and Eastern location runs circles around the one at Flamingo and Eastern. I get consistent service with a smile, my drinks are made correctly, and my order is for the most part accurate 99% of the time. Once in a while they are out of stuff like brown sugar for their "not-so-perfect" oatmeal, but beyond that this location just consistently kicks it.  ...  ... 4 Strong Stars. There's nothing like caffeine handed to you with a smile to start the morning off right.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (582 chars)
They are generally pretty quick here. I make frequent stops for my chai tea latte's. As usual Starbucks can get quite busy in the morning hours as everyone is going to work. This is a high-traffic intersection so expect there to be people in line. ...  ... if you plan to stop by in the morning on your way to work be sure to leave a few minutes earlier so you can get your fix!  ...  ... I have been here in the afternoons and it is generally pretty clean inside. There are a couple of seats outside but it's right on the corner so you will have a lot of traffic noise. Free Wi-Fi


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (543 chars)
I am not a huge Starbucks fan and refuse to become a Starbucks Whore but since the wife and I started the low carb lifestyle this has been a savior to us on those Saturday afternoons.... My order is as follows: Venti Iced Coffee with a squirt of sugar free vanilla and half and half... SO GOOD!! This is our go to location right now for work and we get it about 1 time a week and it id always spot on.. You cant really screw up iced coffee so I am happy with it for now. It was in my frappacino days that I was slowly turned off by Starbucks!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (454 chars)
After an 8 mile bike ride along the Flamingo Wash, I used Yelp to find the nearest Starbucks and this was it.  I don't generally do drive throughs so I parked in their small lot and went inside the store. ...  ... I ordered my drink, it was ready quickly, and I enjoyed part of it while checking my email on their free wifi.   ...  ... The staff was very pleasant and on the ball.  I can't say I'll be stopping here often, but it fit my needs yesterday!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (147 chars)
Friendly staff. The parking lot is kinda small. And the inside is small too. But the WIFI is fast. Nothing is wrong with the area like others say.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (902 chars)
*Looks around a corner, Starbucks Appears* ...  ... !!! ...  ... *Looks around another corner, another Starbucks Appears* ...  ... !!!!! ...  ... So many Starbucks', so little time to review each and every single Starbucks that I come across.  This is what you expect, good service, nice feel, and overpriced drinks.  No More, No less.  ...  ... But what the hell is up with the parking situation?  It's about 600 square feet on a corner to fit 2 dozen cars while exiting out on two different streets and a path that leads to the drive-thru. ...  ... That is almost a legit reason NOT to come here, I feel a possible insurance rate increase is not worth the $4.75 double chocolate chip Frappichino.  ...  ... But it's a Starbucks, I can't really hate them outside of their sheetty parking. ...  ... #DemolitionDerbyParkingLot ... #ImGonnaPutOnHipsterGlassesAndWriteArticlesOnMyLaptop ... #TryingToHard


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (409 chars)
It was a grey, rainy and very windy morning in Las Vegas which is unusual. I needed a latte before heading to the NAB convention at LVCC and I stopped here. I don't know if it's the weather but there was a very long line a the drive-in window but no one waiting inside. Because of that, my latte was served in no time and I was on my way. There are a few tables and free wifi if you care to stay longer here.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (399 chars)
This is a Starbucks. It doesn't need a review, and I wish Yelp would quit harassing me to review it just because I check in here a lot! ...  ... It's pretty hard to fuck up a coffee, and if they do, they replace it right away. :P ...  ... The parking here can be a bit of a nightmare, though, since it's on the north side of Desert Inn and the east side of Eastern. Very hard to maneuver sometimes.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (365 chars)
I usually make my own coffee every morning.  Because "Coffee is too expensive."  But this morning I was in a bit of a hurry and I made a quick stop here, at Starbucks.  I am not big on specialty drinks so I just ordered a regular drip.  It was exactly what I expected, friendly and quick service and I was gone.   ...  ... So, no complaints... but no expectations.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (480 chars)
I travel to other Starbucks locations whenever possible even though this one is closest to my It is okay but there locations that have firendlier staff and just look cleaner. They were willing to brew bold which some other locations won't do after 12 noon. There are times when they would not brew a tank but would offer a pour over which I don't want as much as I don't want Pike Place. I will drink McDonald's coffee before I drink Pike Place. Parking is hard at this location.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (158 chars)
Really? Two cars and it's a 10 min wait, And how in the world did they manage to mess up a vanilla blonde? Vanilla + blonde roast.. Worst location I been too


................................................................................
LOCATION #112:  address="2430 E Flamingo Rd Ste 100 Eastside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89121"  (2 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (43 chars)
Always a good cup of espresso iced coffee.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (106 chars)
Drive in is good use a releasable cArd so you can get stuff for just doing what you do friendly and fast.


................................................................................
LOCATION #113:  address="2430 East Flamingo Rd Store 8991 Southeast"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89119"  (10 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (371 chars)
I love this Starbucks!  It's like being a contestant on a game show every time you order something!  Go thru the drive thru and you'll experience how fun it is!  My favorite woman is the one with wild blonde hard and sparkly eye shadow.  She's a riot!  The other employees are super friendly here too.  If you're in the neighborhood, this is the best Starbucks location.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (124 chars)
Long Drive thru line. But its easy in and out of there. What else can i say about star bucks that you dont already know. :)


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (1192 chars)
When a Starbucks is run right it's a thing of beauty for those of us who suffer from chronic caffeine deficiency. But when it's not it can get ugly. And this Starbucks is ugly at 7 am when the staff wouldn't know how to hurry even if you took a cattle prod to them to get them moving. They also have an annoying tendency to mess up orders. And I don't mind service with a smile when the smile is directed towards customers and I understand the need to have a light and fun work place environment. But when you have a line almost out the door, that's not the time to turn this into the local Starbucks employee social hour. I have a limited amount of time to get in, get what I need and get out. I can handle equipment problems and minor delays, but it does not take 7 minutes to get my order done. The Starbucks at DI and Eastern kicks this location's butt on speed and order accuracy.  ...  ... In short, if you're heading West on Flamingo or North on Eastern and need your fix it works. Unless you're in a hurry. And then you might as well forget about it.  ...  ... 3 Stars: Because even though the service has issues, it still takes care of those caffeine withdrawal issues quite nicely.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (462 chars)
After the Great Santa Run, I needed a quick fix of caffeine.  I was on my way downtown to see a play at Theatre7, so this was a good stop.  The staff was pleasant albeit not quite with it.  After charging me for the gingerbread loaf I wanted, they discovered they were out of it.  Asking for a refund on my Starbucks card seemed out of the question, so I got a replacement. ...  ... The drink was good and I was on my way after checking some email and FB posts.


REVIEW #5:  2 stars  (363 chars)
I love Starbucks but these place is something else. They have way too many workers doing god knows what. The cashier doesn't look up or smile when taking your order. I always order the same drink cinnamon dolce but it taste funny when I order it twice here. I would not waste my time coming to this place keep driving go to the Starbucks on Flamingo and sandhill


REVIEW #6:  1 stars  (1942 chars)
Hello, Starbucks Corporate? I've got a complaint, several in fact.  ... How hard is it to make oatmeal? And how hard is it to keep track of your inventory? Surely your company can hire people who are capable of counting boxes, fruit cups, sugar packets and the like and can tap on a keyboard and place an order for things when supplies run low. Is it asking too much to have your employees to do that? I'm starting to wonder as one of the slowest drive-thrus your company operates at Flamingo and Eastern in Las Vegas can't seem to figure out how to make oatmeal, and to have the toppings needed for it. I ended up driving away without it this morning because of your Chatty Cathy social butterfly at the window getting me distracted by trying to hijack my Starbucks Card. When I called the store to say something about this I got attitude and basically a F'off, we can't help you comment back. And I was told no refunds for my Starbucks Card even though I didn't get my order unless I came back into the store. Uh, that's not how things get done and that won't fly.  ...  ... My expectations are simple. Prompt service. I like fast but I'll lower my expectations to a drive thru wait of under 5 min if there are only 3 cars (trying to be reasonable here). If it's on the menu have it in stock, or tell me up front as I'm ordering that you're out and offer me an alternative. If my order gets messed up apologize and make it right. I don't want to be a grumpy Yelp reviewer, I want to be a happy and loyal Starbucks customer. And one last thing, quit trying to take my super cool retro style Starbucks card. No you can't have it even though it's pretty rare. I have a habit of losing things but I've had my card for many, many years and I don't wanna part with it.  ...  ... 1 Star? Really? Yes, really. I'm hungry. And being hungry due to someone else not doing their basic job duties trumps being nice and diplomatic when writing a review.


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (1522 chars)
You can't make stuff like this up so let's lead off with today's events. Yesterday I went to this Starbucks and I didn't get my "Perfect Oatmeal" that I ordered. I got a hassle and attitude when I called them about it, so this morning I roll through the drive-thru and tell the lady what happened. She agrees to comp my oatmeal and I add a piece of pumpkin bread to my typical drink order. I pull forward and pay...I had to reload my Starbucks card too so during all this I get my oatmeal and my bread. Then I get my card back and the Southern Belle lady (if you go here you'll know) working the window is like have a nice day. I sit there and she looks back out and is like, What? Why are you still here? I'm like aren't you forgetting something? She looks around and says Oh Crap! when she realizes she never gave me my drink! ...  ... So when I write on here that anyone who visits this Starbucks needs to doublecheck their order to make sure you get what you paid for, will you believe me now? ...  ... 1 Star? Really? Absolutely. Can you think of a reason why I should bump them up? Oh and it took 7 minutes to get that container of oatmeal, a piece of pumpkin bread, and an iced mocha, no whip, extra shot. The location at Eastern and Desert Inn can do it in 4 minutes, with 3 cars in front of me when I order to boot. ...  ... One last thing. Still no fruit toppings for the oatmeal. I guess re-supplying the store is not all that important here.  ...  ... (For the backstory on this read yesterday's review below)


REVIEW #8:  1 stars  (814 chars)
Yet again I get more morning craziness at this Starbucks. It's been a week since I was told they were out of some of their oatmeal toppings and that they would order some in. And in that week's time this Starbucks can't seem to get things done. I can get a package from a friend in Kiev, Ukraine sent halfway around the world in 4 days yet Starbucks can't seem to get basic inventory from a warehouse that's less than 500 miles away, if not less in an entire WEEK! I don't get it. So I said so this morning when placing my order. When I get to the main window to pay, the cash register mysteriously went on the fritz, and my entire order got comped. While I love free coffee and breakfast, what I really want is the items I requested.  ...  ... Still 1 Star. I can't reward bad inventory control with extra stars.


REVIEW #9:  1 stars  (778 chars)
This Starbucks sucks. Let me repeat, this Starbucks sucks. I had a bad experience the whole time that I was there. The barista who was at the register didn't look up or acknowledge me when I went up to her. After awhile, she just gave a rude, "What do you want?" and then turned around to laugh with her coworkers. I had to repeat myself. I ordered my drink and asked for a bagel with cream cheese. It took this woman a whole minute to find where the bagels were placed in their display case. She took my payment, put my bagged bagel on the counter and walked away without saying another word. My drink was made wrong, but I was already tired of dealing with them so I just left. I wish I didn't even have to give them a star, but I guess it is alright since my bagel was good.


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (769 chars)
I go to Starbucks everyday & am a gold card member & I would definantly drive to another Starbucks than go to this location even though it is right by my mom's house. I am from California & when i viisit this location to get my latte, they ALWAYS mess it up, even after I had to repeat my order 1, 2, 3 times!!! The last time i purchased here was Saturday & the next time I am in Vegas, I will NOT go to this location! By the way, after messing up my drink 3 times the guy at the window didn't appologize & my drink was spilling over & he was VERY RUDE! I wish i got his name but I really wanted to get the heck out of there! He had dark hair & wore glasses!  The staff SUCKS! I never complain on yelp, but this location deserves it by their horrible customer service!


................................................................................
LOCATION #114:  address="2530 S Decatur Blvd Westside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89102"  (22 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (694 chars)
I love this Starbucks location! They have the best customer service and teamwork. When I went in this morning, I was helped out by many different people including the manager. He said he wanted to make sure I wasn't being neglected. I was FAR from being neglected. I was greeted by everyone, asked if I needed help picking something out by one guy, put my order in with another guy, paid a third guy, then checked up on by the manager at the end. I was actually pretty blown away by the service. Surprisingly, there were also a lot of tables and seats available to sit at. I was able to snag a spot in the corner next to an outlet to plug my laptop into. I will be coming back here more often!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (404 chars)
Their drive-thru service is totally awesome. Even if there's a line of car, they're efficient enough for the wait to be reasonable every time I go. My order is made correctly, they always make a suggestive sell, like those damn delicious coffee cakes I can't resist. And most importantly, every employee I've encountered has been friendly and personable. ...  ... I love this location. 5 stars for sure!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (356 chars)
It's coffee.  ... There's a drive thru. (I think all, if not most Vegas locations have drive thrus huh?) LA didn't have many drive thru Starbucks so I'm being spoiled over here. ...  I usually get a tall iced caramel macchiato with non fat milk or a tall iced green tea latte with two pumps of peppermint. Yum! =) ...  ... I just freakin LOVE starbucks!!!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (312 chars)
Seriously the best Starbucks in town the people here are great you're drink always comes out perfectly the other great thing is that they remember you and so you don't have to repeat your drink every single day which is such a plus. Thanks for always making me smile through the drive thru you guys are the best


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (191 chars)
I had the best frappucino I have ever tasted. It was smooth and creamy and the whipped cream was lightly whipped just perfectly. I was delicious. The customer service was fast and courteous.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (182 chars)
Always awesome drive thru, and though the seating inside is sparse, its a great store, with great staff and the drinks are always right.  AND they still have maple scones here. YAY!


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (81 chars)
Awesome drive in lady. Smiling and the drink was waiting for me. Awesome service


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (80 chars)
Always friendly staff. Never too busy. Probably my favorite Starbucks in Vegas.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (668 chars)
This is my new go-to Starbucks location. ...  ... Their drive-thru is usually lightening fast and my order is always correct! ...  ... The barista's working the window like to chit-chat with you if your drink is still being made.  The only down side- I'm here everyday (Monday-Friday) and the one guy asks me the same question every time he's working "going to work?"  Some of the other locations recognize you and know your drinks.  This dude doesn't pay attention, obviously, otherwise he would know, yes- I'm going to work. ...  ... Overall, the everyone is really nice and I always enjoy my grande, iced, caramel macchiato with extra caramel on my way to work. :)


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (471 chars)
One of the better locations around town, this one has a drive thru and a patio! While the patio is nothing major as it looks out over the parking lot (typical Las Vegas views), it does provide a nice option to enjoy the nice weather that graces us for a total of three months out of the year. ...  ... They're very speedy here, and customer service has always been top notch! The employees are patient and take their time with you, and the drinks are fabulous as always.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (323 chars)
After discovering that the Border's across the highway got rid of their cafe, I stumbled upon this Starbuck's. As a first-time customer, I am impressed. The staff is friendly. There is plenty of indoor and outdoor seating. And there is a diversity of patrons. ...  Overall this cafe provides a great Starbuck's experience.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (277 chars)
The drive-thru here is super quick and I would recommend it over going inside. For most other Starbucks locations it is the direct opposite, but for some reason the drive-thru is never too crowded here. Most people seem to go inside to order and then sit on the patio outside.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (249 chars)
Fast service and consistent Starbucks taste but the exterior needs some work and not too pleased with some of the people who hang out in the parking lot so best to go in, get your drink, and leave.  Not a location I'd spend any time hanging out at.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (116 chars)
The Coffee was hot and the  Breakfast Cake was good and moist.  The place were packed with people.  I will go back.


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (1490 chars)
Although I prefer meat and potatoes, I don't much prefer foo foo sweet coffee drinks.  Don't get me wrong, I will drink it when my lady buys say...a seasonal peppermint frappe or mocha with cream...might be making some of these up which goes to show my lack of knowledge on the sweet coffee variety. ...  ... I am a simple man, same order all the time, more or less... Tall Pike's, top it off with no room for cream or sugar please.  That's my thing yo!  Occasionally, I will mess with the bold of the day or some of the seasonal flavors, but ultimately, I do not stray too far from the coffee black pack.  Call me old fashioned, but there is something about the natural flavors from coffee from different regions and so forth.   ...  ... I would love to see Starbucks offer a Hawaiian Kona Coffee and surprised they haven't done so already.  But oh well.   ...  ... The breakfast sandwiches are not all that bad also.  I like the artisan sandwiches, lemon loaf, old fashioned donut or a napple.  The environment is always pleasant as well.  Don't tell Starbucks, but if I am out and looking for a rest room, the first place I look for is a Starbucks, only cause I can bank on it being clean and a dime a dozen when out and about.  ...  ... Wasn't too pleased with the up in price at the beginning of the year, but fluctuation is expected.  hard to go wrong with Starbucks.  Oh yeah, did I mention my man Magic Johnson has his share of business with s-bucks too...not that it matters. LOL.


REVIEW #16:  3 stars  (371 chars)
I just came in to order an iced green tea, which was great.. but the facility looked like it had been drug through the bush backwards. And the restrooms looked like an episode of breaking bad had taken place in them..So good drinks bad building lol The only other issue I had was the lack of hair restraints being used by the staff. Though they themselves were friendly.


REVIEW #17:  3 stars  (276 chars)
Not the cleanest or fastest Starbucks around.  Have been in here several times now.  This location seems to be frequented by the people that panhandled the large intersection by the store.  I am approached almost every time.  There is a drive through. Not my fav location....


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (230 chars)
Ok, nothing special.  There was nothing wrong with this location, it was clean and friendly enough.  My drink was made so sweet that I almost couldn't drink it though, and some of the decorations were in a little bit of disarray.


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (60 chars)
It's a starbuck, but sadly I couldn't find a place to sit..


REVIEW #20:  2 stars  (242 chars)
This Starbucks is pretty disorganized.  Every time I've been in this place I wait much much longer in line than I would've if I would've gone through the drive thru.  So frustrating.  This Starbucks needs some management and better cleaners.


REVIEW #21:  1 stars  (1252 chars)
I used to work for a training store for Starbucks so I know that the company does know how to make delicious drinks.  ...  ... But this Barista needs a lesson how to make a real latte.  ...  ... All she did was pull the shots of espresso directly into the cup, stuck the steam wand into the milk pitcher and just let it sit there! Then poured the heated up milk over the espresso which had been sitting there now "dead" and proceeded to put the lid on and handed it out. YUCK!  ...  ... After watching the barista make it incorrectly I immediately said I need this remade with foam and no don't just froth some foam and top my drink off. Lattes need to be made with care. Froth the milk and dont let it sit because the foam separates from the milk. In order to have a creamy delicious latte pour right after frothing no need for a spoon to scoop up foam! Not that hard people.  ...  ... That was just my boyfriends drink, mine was super simple. Iced grande vanilla latte. Vanilla, espresso, milk then ice. Easy right? Well apparently not since the barista couldn't even put the proper amount of milk in my cup which left me with a half inch of empty space in my cup. Hmm $4.05 for a non full cup, time to move on and buy my own espresso/steam machine!


REVIEW #22:  1 stars  (49 chars)
The staff is rude.  never get the order correct.


................................................................................
LOCATION #115:  address="300 S 4th St Downtown"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89101"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (290 chars)
Although it is position in a business building and it's not your typical bucks, it's the best in town! The employees are always welcoming and even remember our drinks. We work in this area so we don't mind the business. Although busy they are super fast! My favorite Starbucks in the city!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (1282 chars)
It was literally a fast interaction.  Working downtown one day, a couple of us needed a cup of joe to help us wake.  I, just needed a refresher.   ...  ... This location is in some big government building on 4th and Bridger downtown.  Right up the steps, you'll find a very busy location!  Government officials, hipsters, tourists, everyone is there.  When we arrived, there was a long line and I thought, gosh, I'm never going to get my drink.  I was proved wrong very quickly.  The staff is efficient, personable and on point!   ...  ... I ordered a venti Very Berry Hibiscus refresher and the reduced-fat Turkey Bacon & White Cheddar Breakfast Sandwich for around $7.50 including tip.  The sandwich was awesome.  Although premade, they did an amazing job heating it up upon order.  The dish is literally a turkey, egg and cheddar sandwich on multigrain English muffin but the 320g of calories says it's worth eating!  The refresher is one of my favorite summer drinks!  It's filled with blackberry and hibiscus extract, sweetened.  The huge whole blackberries brings a great texture to the drink.  As cliche as it sounds, it really is super refreshing! ...  ... I work one block away from this location.  FOR SURE, I will be back!  If you decide to go, maybe I'll see you there!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (559 chars)
This is my place for a pick me up after spending time at the RJC (courthouse).  The staff are super friendly.  The orders are processed fast.  It is in the Bank of America building that also hold Social Security Office of Disability Adjudication and Review (ODAR).  It is a prime location and the staff still work it.  Even in the afternoon, they have goodies if you have not had a chance to eat and were working too hard.  There is not a lot of setting here, but I rarely stay.  I am usually walking in and back out to my office with my coffee and/or snack.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (494 chars)
This Starbucks location is downtown near the court house on Lewis St. With that being said many people may automatically assume that his location is a dump. Its actually not! Great baristas who are jolly and excited to get you up and running with your Starbucks fix. It's definitely smaller than normal Starbucks locations but thay because its located on the main floor of the corporate Bank of America building. Very clean environment, still offers wi-fi, could have more space for customers.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (227 chars)
Had jury duty for a week and a half. I doubt I would have been able to survive without this place. It's a Starbucks, it serves what I need. Service was great, although the line was a little bit long, but that's to be expected.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (769 chars)
This Starbuck's is in downtown Las Vegas, in the first floor of a hi-rise building. Sometimes it is hard to find street parking, so if you go into the building's parking lot and come out in a hurry, like 10 minutes, they won't charge you.  ...  ... Inside is nice, like you would expect in a hi-rise building, with  most of the customers working in the building or running errands to and from the building. This is not that far from the County Courthouse, which is a huge architectural behemoth across the street a few blocks. ...  ... And if you go in the early morning, there is usually a line winding out of the corner down the street at 330 4th street, where the Mexican Consulate is located, and people are waiting to get paperwork from there as soon as it opens.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (649 chars)
Sure you come to Starbucks for the coffee. That's the excuse you use to come here, but for me it's only half the reason I enjoy it. The other half is to grab a seat and crush some work, read a paper or just clickity clack on the phone in a chill atmosphere. That part of the 'bucks is completely lost here. Stuffed in an office building lobby, this is more of a walk-thru Starbucks than anything. A few tables and a bathroom is all there is here. Waiting for your coffee is a bit of a pain as well, as there isn't a ton of room to stand around. The coffee is standard 'bucks, so if you need your fix stop by, just don't plan on staying for a while.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (583 chars)
A lot of Starbucks reviews this week.  I must be tired.  This is my other Starbucks and the closest one to the courthouses, federal or state.  It's inside the Bank of America building on the first floor.  The Starbucks can only validate before 10am and only for 20 minutes so it's better just to park elsewhere. ...  ... The line gets crazy long at this Starbucks and there isn't much room by the pick up counter so I hope you aren't claustrophobic!  The staff here is nice, although not as nice as my neighborhood location, and they do make the hot English muffin sandwiches.  Yay!


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (92 chars)
It's a small Starbucks but is inside the Bank of American building.  No pluses, no minuses.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (715 chars)
I am not a real big fan of fast-food type coffee houses. I think they are overpriced and I prefer the taste of my coffee at home. Nonetheless, there are times when you are out and you need caffeine fix and all there is is Starbucks.  ...  ... I always order a latte. It is the simplest, cheapest option besides regular coffee, which for me always tastes kind burnt. When I was younger, and did not care about calorie count, I would order the mocha Frappuccino. Alas, I prefer to eat my calories.  ...  ... This location has been renovated, and it is much nicer and airier that before. They also have a nice patio outside for people watching (and to laugh at people going the wrong way, 4th street is one way guys).


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (547 chars)
Oh dear. Listen ladies, I know that working at Starbucks isn't the greatest job in the world but at the very least represent your brand appropriately. Telling me you "don't have" 1% milk and then getting snarky with me when I suggest mixing nonfat and 2% is no way to treat a paying guest. I have been in your barista-shoes before and I don't appreciate your piss poor interpretation of service. I'm exhausted and in the middle of working a double-back shift right now so, the next time I order a latte, you can hold the side of attitude. Thanks.


................................................................................
LOCATION #116:  address="3150 Paradise Rd Eastside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (56 chars)
Great if you need coffee on the north end of the strip!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (253 chars)
Coffee in the morning.  ...  ... Ideal spot after a hang over.  ...  ... Delicious veggie panini with Monterey cheese.  ...  ... Elegantly looking coffee place.  ...  ... Menu was at the big flat screen wall-mounted TVs.  ...  ... Staff needs to smile.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (948 chars)
This Starbucks is in the convention center in Vegas. And they have you all to themselves as there is no one else that you can go to. So, they have a very limited menu of drinks, because the wait times during a conference can take 15-20 minutes just to get to the front of the line to place your order. I understand why they have a limited menu, it allows them to push the coffee out the door as quickly as possible. However when you were born in the coffee capital and have experience a great coffee shop before, you will see the glaring miss in a full compliment establishment. ...  ... The staff was very efficient, again due to the smaller menu size, however the baked goods left something to be desired. They were mostly out of everything by the time I got to the front of the line and that was at 9AM. The line was 30 deep past me and growing. Better planning should have taken place knowing a huge conference was going to be in the building.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (920 chars)
Small Starbucks location located right inside the convention center. Good in a pinch if you really really really must get in your caffeine fix. Usually there are long ass lines here that will suck the life out of you, especially in the morning and worse during large attendance trade shows. Late in the day it's not that bad though but it closes at 5pm. ...  ... Very limited menu here for coffee drinks and pastries. I guess to keep it simple with all the crowds. There is also no seating inside except for a few counter stools, but there are a few tables and chairs in the lobby outside the place. Be prepared to fight for one, or do the hover until someone leaves. ...  ... I have to hand it to the counter staff here as they are pretty friendly and even keeled. It can get really obnoxious with the non-stop long lines and grumpy people. ...  ... One bad thing here is that they do not accept Starbucks cards. Fail!


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (770 chars)
This Starbucks is located in South Lower Hall - next to FedEx Office. Basically, if you need Starbucks, it's here.  ...  ... When ordering coffee - keep it very, very simple. Don't expect the staff here to be of the regular Starbucks, such as based in Seattle proper. They've made mistakes in my orders, because it's too complicated to process, such as missing additional shots of espresso, or missing secondary options to drinks for my crew.  ...  ... So, when I order coffee here, I usually just order the most simplistic request, such as "Soy Latte" and keep it like that. Though, one time I did order a drink, and they gave me regular milk. There goes my stomach. :-/ ...  ... Also, their hours are not consistent and can vary based upon expected tradeshow traffic.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (494 chars)
Yes - another starbucks ! ...  ... This one is located in the convention, and thank god for that! When days at tradeshows here start early, I need my coffee to keep me going. ...  ... Lines are always long due to the overwhelming amount of people - you can expect a good 15 minute wait. ...  ... Their menu is limited since they have to serve so many people.  ...  ... I am glad they are there and have what I like in the morning - white mocha a venti non fat, no whip, extra hot, white mocha!


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (413 chars)
You're stuck in a convention and need your coffee, latte fix. This is the only spot unless you can drink black brewed with creme that tastes burnt form the vendors inside the hall. Basically, this is the only option. There's an incredibly long line that moves - just barely, but at least it moves.  ...  ... For a Starbucks, it's slightly below average. The redeeming quality - it's the only caffeine fix around.


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (335 chars)
You don't come here unless you have no alternatives... and not much alternatives is the situation you get into when you come to large conventions at the LVCC. Figure it will take you about half an hour to get your fix so it's better to come here with friends and chat in line or better yet a friend willing to get your coffee for you!


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (214 chars)
Just your average Starbucks.  Nothing special.  The breakfast sandwiches are so hot and burn my mouth on every occassion.  I have told the sales people but they say they have to cook them at a certain temperature.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (213 chars)
I only stop here when I have to. No drive thru. It is usually packed with all the taxi drivers from the strip. They often mess up your order, and it seems like you either wait too long in line, or for your drink.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (54 chars)
This is the slowest Starbucks ever... I hate it !!!!!


................................................................................
LOCATION #117:  address="3370 S Hualapai Way South Summerlin"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89117"  (14 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (594 chars)
I have always been a big fan of Starbucks. We're talking about years! Love this location that's just minutes from my house. The main thing I like about it is it is very cozy, intimate and never too slammed. Although I haven't yet, I can see a few Sundays in here just hanging out, drinking my Skinny Vanilla Latte (until the fall flavors come. Mmmmm.....Egg Nog and Pumpkin Spice Latte!!!) while surfing the net on my iPad or Macbook. The employees here are super cool as well. Always nice....always! And lastly, the aroma once you walk into the door is just hypnotizing! Yup....I'm an addict!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (142 chars)
My first stop in the morning when I work day shift. They know my name, they make my drink right and they are always happy. Cant ask for more.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (106 chars)
Finally got the staff trained, and they're great! If u have a pooch, ask for a pup-accino. Mine loves it!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1114 chars)
Yelp is real reviews by real people. This real person is a fan of coffee. When it is hot! A slight dilemma at this Starbucks was that the coffee was not hot. After they brewed new coffee, it still wasn't hot. By the time of the refill the coffee was hot.  ...  ...   Despite the fact that the first two cups of coffee were not hot, this is a charming Starbucks. It is in a part of Las Vegas that isn't hyper busy. Because the shopping center it anchors is small it is not challenging to find a parking space. Without a drive thru and featuring soft lighting, this is a cozy Starbucks. It looks like it was remodeled with an emphases on comfort. The baristas are personable and fast. An example of friendly service is when the barista let a customer use their phone. ...  ...    A closing time of 7 p.m., seems kind of early on a Saturday. But it makes business sense considering this Starbucks does most of its business in the morning (this is what the barista told the customer). ...  ...   This real person could return to this Starbucks if he is in the area. Most likely it will be for an ice blended beverage.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (850 chars)
This is my favorite Starbucks location in North Las Vegas/Las Vegas/Henderson (and I want to say that I have been to 90% of them.  Yes, I have an addition!) ...  ... When I walk into this location, the staff knows my drink.  Ben, is probably the best "barista" that I have ever seen!  He is FAST and makes the best drinks.  The rest of the staff are really nice too.  But Ben has got to be my favorite. ...  ... I am giving it 4 stars because this location does not have a drive-thru, which would be fantastic.  And a couple of the staff like to talk to my ear off BEFORE they give me my coffee. (don't most people know that people don't like to have deep conversations before coffee or caffeine? haha!)  Luckily, I see those staff members maybe every two weeks. ...  ... Thank you, Ben, for being a hard-worker and giving fabulous customer service!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (447 chars)
You know what to expect at Starbucks, so not many surprises. No drive thru - don't care. They don't seem to keep the place quite as clean as my local Starbucks and pastries are in shorter supply than other Starbucks the afternoon I was there.  ...  ... i always feel a little inadequate in Starbucks because I don't order a stupidly complicated drink, but it's an extremely safe option for coffee, always consistent, cool vibe and New York Times.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (250 chars)
This is a normal Starbuck's outlet.  It does not have a drive through which makes it somewhat quaint. The pace is a bit laid back because you have to park and actually walk inside. ...  ... I have always found the staff to be pleasant and efficient.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (164 chars)
Great service. Just went in for a pound of Italian roast, and left with that plus the new tribute blend. I love when baristas can talk coffee and not just fake it.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (824 chars)
I use several Starbucks to hold quick business meetings. Of course I always order coffee.  However, I generally purchase Starbuck's beans at the supermarket.  Many people do not know that if you bring the bag into Starbucks they give you a FREE tall coffee.  I have atleast 20 of these bags sitting in my car.  Well, I decided to use two of these on the same day at this location (I had two meetings), well the Cashier (who looked like a manager) gave me this furrowed brow look speaking "Really, cheapo?"   and when  she gave me my coffee she said "here".   Where was the Thank you? ...  ... As she wants, I probably won't be coming here anymore.  Besides, the inside doesn't have much table seating, the music is too loud, and the parking lot is a nightmare due to some very popular restaurants along with this Starbucks.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (563 chars)
I'm not a huge fan of Starbucks, never have been. But I was given a giftcard and that's fine. I do have 1 or 2 drinks from there that I like.  I typically enjoy their iced green tea latte with soy milk.  Their prices are typical for a coffee shop. (I personally believe they are a little over priced but they are in comparible to other places)  Service is good and typically not a problem on their rare times that I go.  They definitely need to expand their food products and lower their prices on them.  A muffin to go with a coffee should never be more then $2


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (326 chars)
I like this Starbucks. The staff is very friendly and it has a welcoming feel to the shop. I think not having a drive up window is a blessing.  ... I would give this shop a 5 star if they were ever open when I want them to be. They close at 6, and I'm always looking for a coffee after dinner, or on my way out for the night.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (253 chars)
Pretty typical Starbucks.  While I'm a fan of the company, the one thing about this place is that the parking in the morning is kind of meh and there's no drive-thru.  The couple times I've gone to this one, the service has been quick so that was good.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (211 chars)
This location is ok. The level of service and overall attentiveness to the guest could be dramatically improved. The drink was made properly. The vibe in this store was very low as if they didnt want customers.


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (403 chars)
Well this rating is going down. This location is always out of breakfast sandwiches. Like they had the classic sausage and cheddar sandwich literally once the last ten times I tried to buy it. ... The frustrating part is that I drive less than a mike to the much busier location next to LVAC and they have have never been out.  ... So whoever is doing your ordering. You are losing sales and customers.


................................................................................
LOCATION #118:  address="340 E Flamingo Rd Eastside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89169"  (10 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1074 chars)
I go to Starbucks every day.  This was my first time at this new location on East Flamingo in the Howard Hughes Center. ...  ... The shop is roomy, it has lots of product (juices, pastries, and sandwiches--typical Starbucks stuff.  The wifi is free and it's fast--faster since Starbucks converted from AT&T to Google for their wifi.  There are two areas to sit outside.  There are some tables along the front and there's a patio on the east side.  Since the building is quite tall, it gives you shade in the afternoon. ...  ... There are plenty of chairs and one long table with stools where you can work with a laptop or just use your smartphone.  It's far enough away from UNLV that students won't walk here to hang, study, and otherwise be their normal pains in the butt as they are across Maryland Parkway from that Bucky.  This will just be a place where the adults come to use Bucky's wifi so they can conduct their businesses from their "office." ...  ... The staff was on the ball today and it was a good stop.  I'll be back again now that I know the store is open.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (458 chars)
This is my favorite Starbucks.   It is a standalone building and it is quite modern.  Yes, the drive thru can be a bit hectic but that is because of its prime location, right off Flamingo.  That is not only great for the Starbucks believers but for the business itself.   Sharon typically works during the AM hours and it is amazing how one person along with a great cup of 'whatever you order' can enhance your day.  She is always pleasant and so friendly.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (228 chars)
This has got to be my fave Starbucks to-date. Love the interior design. It's so spacious, modern and trendy inside. Service is friendly and fast. The drive-thru is convenient! If you're in Vegas, def check this Starbucks out :)


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (226 chars)
I always go through the drive thru and they are so efficient and always so warm and friendly early in the morning. Love the new building and little drive thru. They are sooo efficient and have the process down like clockwork.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (1734 chars)
Re-locating from the location at 395 Hughes Center Drive where Starbucks hold the memories to remember and recall.  My favorite Starbucks Coffee Shop that just melts me like butter on pancakes, like whipped cream over hot chocolate is now in a newer, bigger location transferring from 395 Hughes Center Dr. to this location by the corner of Hughes Center Parkway, on E. Flamingo Road. So it is a welcoming place as it is a stand-alone building that's newly-built. Wide, panoramic windows lets in the light for a brighter feel with roadside views. Oh, to just people-watch or rather vehicles-passing-by-watch for the watcher in you! As expected, the effervescence of hot brewed coffee permeates the air and lingers to my nostrils' delight! Jazz music adds to the vibe, allowing my senses to relax and imbibe on a beverage of my choice. Take a pick from nice brewed green hot tea, decaffeinated coffee, cool iced tea, delicious coffee, and  various beverages. Choices of baked goods from bagels, to cakes as well as sandwiches and an assortment of desserts, bagels, chips, nuts, meal wraps, dried fruit to whet your appetite. Imbibe, linger, socialize over delicious beverages indoors or outdoors on its small patio under green umbrellas for delighting in the fresh air. Also a breeze of a gain from getting feet off the ground just to obtain the beverage while on-the-run via its Drive-Thru service. Starbucks looks like a little castle surrounded by spaceousness. Ample parking surrounds the new contemporary building. Coffee Hours are from Mondays - Sundays at 4:30 AM - 12:00 AM...that's great hours for the owls and early risers. Coffee servers are ever attentive and happy to serve. Sip your favorite beverages or Coffee, anyone?


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (911 chars)
Busy place every time I've gone. So many offerings and combinations , it must drive the staff bonkers. They are about as friendly and efficient as they can be though. ... I have to order a "clover made" coffee now that SBUX only offers blends, which I don't like at all. Makes me spend more which I don't like either. ... I do like the clover coffees, but I don't like the thought that in order for ME to get what I like, I cannot simply order the regularly brewed coffee ( since it's always blended with coffees I dislike).  ... I've been to several SBUX in LV, and this IMHO, had the most outside seats, friendliest staff, and best choices.  ... Of all the chain stores in the world , ... SBUX is the only one I consistently ... seek out. However, their switch to "blended coffees"  as well as the consistently weak WiFi (I usually switch to my carrier's LTE) is causing me to re-evaluate my loyalty to SBUX.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (595 chars)
Seems this particular SBUX thrives on a crowd. The bigger the crowd, the more efficient the staff becomes. Gotta love that! I was maybe 15th in line- but it moved surprisingly quickly. The outside table clean-up is, at best, meh.  ... You get yer caffeine buzz AND yer crowd buzz at this joint. ... However, if you order an espresso, and ur eligible for a free re, you gotta get one of their blended coffees- no free re on anything else. To me, their blended coffees are ehh, no good. If you like ur coffee foo-foo'd up, mbe they're alright. I like mine like I like the night-black. No foo-foo.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (418 chars)
Only 4 weeks old and a brand new building including a drive through. This is one of the largest Starbucks I've visited. What a difference compared to the original location in Seattle which opened in 1971 ...  ... The driveways from Howard Hughes weren't paved yet it's so new. The service was solid and selection of coffee and brew paraphernalia was impressive.  ...  ... This will be a regular stop when I'm in town!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (397 chars)
The baristas w/o the Jeremy Piven headsets are the most customer service oriented. (IMHO). I guess the headsets are an attempt to be efficient, hip, and techie. But plain ole customer service is dipping slightly. I guess SBUX, once the Pike Place Market of the world, is trying to be the Tiffany/Prada of the world.  ... Still, when I travel, I seek out the chain because it is fairly consistent.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (339 chars)
I think this location is pretty uncomfortable inside. Lots of army style metal chairs, and only 3 armless upholstered chairs clustered around a small table. Also, the new "boulangerie" pastries are tiny and unappetizing in appearance. The good news for old timer Starbucks customers like myself, is that I can still get a good cappuccino.


................................................................................
LOCATION #119:  address="340 E Flemingo rd Eastside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89169"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (615 chars)
This location is legendary in Las Vegas. Now closes at midnight but used to be the spot when open 24 hours. Attached to the FedEx Office so makes a great office away from the office. I used to get a lot of work done there. Spot where I've seen many celebrities if that is your thing. Crew very professional. At least two of the team members I have seen there for about 10 years. Attitudes are still great at this location and you can get bold drip day and night. A g0od amount of seating inside and outdoor patio too. Great people watching location due to many office buildings, high rise condos and Stirp visitors


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (486 chars)
The amount of money that I have spent here over the past couple years is probably equivalent to a down payment of a new house. Addict? Yes!!  This location is always my first stop on the way to a busy day on campus. The baristas are always smiling, very courteous and remember my drink every single time I am in. They always make it strong just the way I like it. Now if only they would establish a frequent buyer program this world would be a better place for all of us coffee hounds.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (297 chars)
I second the opinion of best Starbucks in town.  Drinks are always great, service is fantastic (Sharon is the best) and they always remember people's drinks.  Gets busy between 8:30 and 9:30 am because it's right next to the Howard Hughes offices but they always handle it well.  Love this place.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1344 chars)
Located just northwest  of the Paradise at Flamingo Road intersection in the southeast  corner of the Howard Hugh's Business Park on Paradise Road I have usually seen this Starbucks busy. A good amount of the business are people  staying at the Paradise Road hotels, working in the Howard Hugh's Business Park and local establishments, UNLV students, and locals like myself. ...    In my opinion, the drawback to this Starbucks  is the heavy traffic on the two connecting  roads: Paradise and Flamingo Roads. First off it is illegal for northbound Paradise Road motorists  to make a left turn from the parking lot. This  requires driving into the business park to get to the traffic signal. Second, waiting to make a right turn onto southbound Paradise Road from the parking lot before  sitting through a few relight cycles during peak traffic has made me more steamed than my coffee. ...    Regardless of getting in and out of this Starbuck's, I regard this as a good  Starbuck's. It is currently open from 4:30 to 12:30 AM. What is unique, at least in the Vegas area  is that attached inside to a Fed Ex Office Store. There is sufficient indoor and outdoor seating. And the baristas are friendly. ...  Will I return? Maybe if I am in the area or get an urge to go to this Starbucks.  I Know for sure that I will avoid it during peak traffic.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (333 chars)
This Starbucks location was located near my hotel so it super convenient and it's busy in the am. I tried the reduced fat turkey bacon with egg whites on a English muffin, I had to get my caffeine fix and went with a Cafe Latte -extra hot.  ...  ... Great service, quality and good variety of products will have me coming back here.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (56 chars)
One of my favorite locations.  Always friendly service.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (448 chars)
Nice busy location next to FedEx.  They are fast with preparing drinks.  I was actually offered a sample of the Iced Chai Tea  the last time I came in.  I was shocked.  The sample was quite a nice size too.  Tasty too I might add.  So I did step out of my normal drink and ordered a glass! ...  ... The few times that I have sat inside, the dining area needed cleaning from crumbly table tops to empty cups on the tables and wrappers on the floor.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (375 chars)
I'm not a huge fan of Starbucks food but enjoy their coffee and it's  a convenient break from Hotel food & beverage, especially when traveling on business.  ...  ... I tried the eggs rancheros wrap with a grande coffee for breakfast. The  ... wrap was tasty but I thought was on the small side and the coffee was tasty as norm.  ...  ... I was wired for hours!  Buzzzzzzzzz.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (543 chars)
only giving a two  because it's 247. drinks.. blah. espresso.. Bleh! someone walked off with my phone there too when i went to the bathroom. wtf!!! employees were extremely unhelpful when asked if they noticed anyone walk up to where i was sitting (plain view of the counter). i canceled the phone 30minutes later when i got home, six international calls made from it from the time it was walked off with.  don't bother trying to call this place either the phone doesn't get answered. or at least didn't. did I mention the espresso is BLEeh??


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (249 chars)
Starbucks coffee is the same everywhere. I love it. This location though, not one of my favorites. There is never any parking because all the cab drivers from the strip are always there. Maybe I just come there at a bad time, but that is my review.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (212 chars)
It's coffee. I'm more or less giving the rating for it's "crowd". The location can't get beat. However, having to fight for parking and having to fight for a seat between cabbies and bums outside is a nightmare.


................................................................................
LOCATION #120:  address="340 East Flamingo Eastside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89169"  (4 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (551 chars)
This one replaced the location on Howard Hughes (inside FedEx). It is very bright from the floor to ceiling windows. The lobby is spacious and there are plenty of tables. This location has a drive thru and features the new Clover coffee brew machine. The Clover is a specialty machine that brews Starbucks reserve and exotic coffees by the cup. The price of the Clover brewed coffee is a little higher but the coffee is of a higher quality.  Although I'll miss the old location on Howard Hughes from YEARS of being a customer, this one is much nicer.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (113 chars)
Great location. Modern free-standing location with great service, friendly people, comfy seating & good parking.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (103 chars)
They have the nicest and most friendly staff at this location. I'll go out of my way just to go there.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (528 chars)
Not sure what other reviewers mean by comfortable seating. Compared to older Starbucks, the seating in here stinks. There are plenty of army type metal chairs and stools, and only three armless, stiff upholstered chairs clustered around a teeny tiny table. Very ultra industrial, with a very, very high ceiling so noise echoes like crazy. Also, the new "boulangerie" pastries are pathetic. Everything is tiny and sad looking. But the good news is, for old timer Starbucks customers like me, I can still get a decent cappuccino.


................................................................................
LOCATION #121:  address="3667 Las Vegas Blvd S The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (8 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (636 chars)
Starbucks is pretty consistent around the country.  Service was fast, staff friendly, tables and chairs were a little disorganized and dirty compared to the typical Starbucks I visit.  The taste of the coffee was great and they made it exactly as I ordered.  Price is twice as much as I normally pay so it is a bit pricey.  They accept and honor the rewards program but will not accept free drink rewards.  So they will grant you a star for their rewards program and offer the free refills, but will not honor the free drink rewards.  Perhaps that's in the fine print somewhere on Starbucks' rewards agreement.  Overall I am satisfied.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (247 chars)
Fast, friendly efficient service. Polite baristas. The usual SB fare, yet the ambiance of the casino gives it a bit more flair. Appreciate the cleanliness and how quick everyone moves. Please give the servers quicker access to the card system SB!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (187 chars)
Everytime I come to this Starbucks they make my frappe or Valencia orange PERFECT! Other places don't compare to the perfect Valencia orange. They don't make it watery at this Starbucks.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1084 chars)
Here in Vegas, not much sleep the night before, and I needed some coffee to wake up and enjoy our day's outing.  Bellagio was not any help at all - the dessert place there wanted $9.50 for a frappuccino-like coffee - a price I refused to pay no matter how zombie-like I was. ...  ... Stumbled next door to Planet Hollywood's Miracle Mile shops, and there was a Starbucks - salvation was mine!  Had their special Salted Caramel Mocha frap; perfectly made (no leftover slush near the bottom), it hit the spot and did the wake up job nicely. ...  ... A comment on pricing.  Another reviewer commented they thought Starbucks' Strip prices were double vs. elsewhere.  Not sure of their point of reference, but I find Strip frap prices about $1 more than the San Francisco area.  Certainly more, but definitely not double for me.  And lower than some other coffee shops on the Strip. ...  ... This Starbucks is on the edge of Planet Hollywood's casino, and is open 24 hours.  Look for it near the casino floor immediately upon entering the Miracle Mile Shops entrance off N Las Vegas Blvd.


REVIEW #5:  2 stars  (341 chars)
Great coffee and service. Unfortunately this locations free wi-fi is a cruel joke as are all the other free Wi-Fi spots within Planet Hollywood.  Either get your wi-fi up and going with enough spectrum to service your few customers or put up a sign notifying the patrons your wi-fi doesn't really work. Doing otherwise is false advertising.


REVIEW #6:  2 stars  (242 chars)
Registers were down so I had to wait 5 mins til they re booted I was told to take a seat and I would be thr first customer helped. The line built back up and I was told to go to the end of the line.... so I walked to the roasted bean in Aria


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (284 chars)
No stars! Horrible I just wanted tap water after my husband bought a $4 coffee. Crystal refused and laughed and said come back with your own cup so I did and they all laughed l. I asked for a manager and she gave me a card that said "princess rippy" (702) 497-9598  horrible horrible


REVIEW #8:  1 stars  (282 chars)
I asked for a couple of paper cups (just cups) and the employee shook his head. No apology, no polite refusal. I responded with a "what? Really?" and he shook his head again. Aghasted, I walked away.  ...  ... I used to work at a Starbucks and I know for sure this is not an issue.


................................................................................
LOCATION #122:  address="3700 W Flamingo Rd"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89103"  (12 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (360 chars)
The Rio actually provides fresh pastries to Starbuck in their hotel!! The scones are the best ever. I like how the Rio is smart and has a seperate line when its busy for Pastries and drip coffee only. I have seen late at night that some of the pastires go on sale for a buck each. Also to people who didnt know, there is a huge 2nd SB which is quiet and huge.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (355 chars)
ECLAIR! ...  ... That is all. ...  ... No seriously though. It's the best eclair ever and I always make sure to stop by Rio every Vegas trip to get an eclair from either one of their Starbucks. I think the Rio Starbucks has the BEST pastry case in comparison to any of the other million Starbucks. Everything is always different and super fresh and good!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (128 chars)
Ordered 3 coffees. For a Sunday night, the service was great and the girl behind the counter was friendly and helpful! Awesome!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (51 chars)
What can I say!  I love me some starbucks...period


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (829 chars)
This Starbucks is located inside the Rio and actually there are two in the hotel. One by the elevators in the Ipanema Tower and one by the convention hall and spa. I visited both and found the one by the Ipanema towers were always packed but the one by the spa was always quiet and had no line. It's a little bit of a walk but I preferred this location better. Not only was it not busy but it also had a lot more seating and was away from all the chaos of the casinos and a bit less smokey too.  ...  ... Service at both locations I found were great and employees were nice and friendly. Prepare for the higher prices though. Comparable to airport prices but I suppose that's the price you pay for convenience. And since you're ok with paying $15 for mixed drinks in Vegas, I suppose $5.50 for an iced coffee is about right. lol


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (276 chars)
Pretty good... Probably the only Starbucks in Rio. Prices are a tad expensive, but then again, it's Vegas. My only complaint would be the limited table space and the lack of free wifi that most Starbucks offer! Other than that, it's just like any other Starbucks you'll find!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (145 chars)
This is for the quickserve Starbucks at Flamingo. ...  ... Quick service all 4 mornings I was there, no complaints.  The apple muffin is a must!


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (367 chars)
it's a prime spot, right next to the elevators. which also makes it a bad spot because everyone comes here. they had 2 lines when we came by for the mornings. 1 for regular drips and 1 for all the shmancy shit. the shmancy shit line took FOREVER! but, at least the baristas were very nice.  ...  ... if you are just looking for coffee, try the sports book cafeteria.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (328 chars)
Every time I passed by this place, there was only 1 person working. She made the coffee, served the pastry, worked the cash register. So there was a long line. But the eclair looked so good, I gave in. Stood in the long line. The server was very nice in spite of being overworked. The eclair was very good; the coffee was good.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (104 chars)
standard starbucks ... long line bc its next to convention center ... star trek convention-  super long


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (91 chars)
Limited table space. ... No wifi. ... Slow service. ... All that for a venti bold. Can do.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (654 chars)
I like Starbucks, I like the big green giant coffee house. My sister in law orders 2 Americana and the lady screws up the order and then said's to her, "You ordered that!" with a attitude ... "Hmmmm" I know customer service and the customer is always right. They also over charged her and owed her money, and she said, "Well i have to call the manager to open the register. " Dang !!! go get manager and get the $. Must be a full moon ???? All i have to say is many Starbucks stay away from this one. Go to a Starbucks that has customer service. No Wifi, small and horrible service. I don't like writing bad reviews but i can't let go through this pain.


................................................................................
LOCATION #123:  address="3720 S Las Vegas Blvd Crystals Mall at City Center The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (912 chars)
City Center on the Vegas Strip is a beautiful example of modern design, almost a Modern Art Museum masquerading as several hotels. So you would expect nothing less that the Crystals Mall Starbucks would reflect this impressive design - and it delivers.  A beautiful, modern-architected Starbucks, near the state-of-the-art Aria Hotel, that will have you constantly looking up and around  to soak in your surroundings. Oh, and by the way - the coffee is great, as usual!  Also, the Crystal Mall website reports: "In addition to the standard Starbucks menu items, this location will carry special items hand prepared by Aria's culinary team every day, all for under $10." What more could you want? ...  ... Entrance to Crystal Mall off S Las Vegas Blvd is the easiest entrance to find this Starbucks.  Just a short walk straight thru mall from that entrance.  It's on the mezzanine level near the Grand Staircase.


REVIEW #2:  1 stars  (1155 chars)
There's honestly no reason for me to review yet another Starbucks, but I think this location earns the distinction of being the most expensive Starbucks location. ...  ... I understand that in this changing market, Starbucks are getting more expensive. I get that. ...  ... Nestled in the Crystals Mall, this Starbucks has some of the most interesting decor. I mean, it is Vegas on the Strip. With a convenient location right in the center of many hotels, I can see why this would be a go-to place to grab a coffee after a long night out. ...  ... Frankly, it's not worth it. ...  ... I ordered two grande drinks, and the cost totaled to over $12. Seriously? I wasn't ordering any fancy frappuccinos with the works or anything like that. I was simply ordering normal hot lattes and stuff, and lo and behold, I'm paying like $6 each for coffee. ...  ... If I wanted expensive coffee, I'd hit up a brand name coffee shop elsewhere. ...  ... There are other Starbucks locations on the Strip, and while I don't know the prices there, I recommend trying those instead. ...  ... They also did not have a scanner for the app. Seriously? ...  ... TIP: Seriously?


REVIEW #3:  1 stars  (134 chars)
Way overpriced Starbucks in a stinky mall.  ...  ... Gross.  ...  ... And this is from someone with a Starbucks addiction. Certified.


................................................................................
LOCATION #124:  address="3752 Las Vegas Blvd S The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (321 chars)
Holy heavens this place was expensive. Im from seattle so I am used to a 4-5 ice hazelnut machiatto or however you spell it, but i spent over $6 for my grande hazelnut mach. dam. the store was absolutely beautiful and stunning and the staff was so friendly and cool. Will come again when I want to splurge on my drink...


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (304 chars)
Perfect location,perfect atmosphere,perfect view.Nice sofa , nice chair position setup with huge Starbucks LOGO on the wall. It's awesome Starbucks store that I have been^^ l love to hangout at here whole days . Back yard is Mandarin hotel . At left side opposite of the street is Crystals GUCCI store .


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (71 chars)
This place was not busy when I stepped in. Quick and friendly service.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (379 chars)
It is a brand new location on the Strip, so it is clean, nice and spacious, but SO overpriced! $4.55 for a tall cappuccino - are you kidding me?! And no free refills with the gold card membership - now, that's just sacrilegious.  ...  ... I paid $10.17 for a cup of coffee and a toasted bagel and my fingers just wouldn't let go of my credit card :) I guess this is Vegas, baby!


REVIEW #5:  2 stars  (933 chars)
Walked over from the Cosmo to pick up some much needed coffee and breakfast for Hubs and I. ...  ... The staff was very friendly, area was clean and organized and prices were very high.  ...  ... I ordered 1 skinny grande mocha ($5.85) 1 grande pumpkin spice latte ($5.85 with soy milk extra charge of $0.75 added) small fruit bowl ($5.95), oatmeal ($5.) and a yogurt parfait ($5.95) The total was $31.73.  ...  ... The coffees weren't good. My mocha didn't have much flavor and Hubs said his wasn't as good as he has had in the past. The fruit and yogurt were fresh and good. The oatmeal portion was pretty small. When I removed the lid it was less than half full. After 4-5 bites it was gone. The packet that came with it had brown sugar, nuts and raisins.  ...  ... Next time I would pass on this Starbuck's. I will go to Va Bene (at the Cosmo) or to a restaurant for the same amount of money and get a real meal and good coffee.


REVIEW #6:  2 stars  (446 chars)
Most Starbucks are welcoming and friendly.  The manager at this on this am was not.  I asked for a drink with the fixings (2 splenda and 2 shots of cream).  I was rudely told I can do it myself by the manager to the self serve bar.  I have been to various Starbucks and have never been directed to make my iwn drink.  Isn't part of the price the aervice?  Also the membership system was down.  The two stars are for the great decor of the store.


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (145 chars)
An $8 grande soy vanilla latte is INSANE.  ... I understand the need to make a profit and the space is beautiful, but the prices are exorbitant.


................................................................................
LOCATION #125:  address="3752 S Las Vegas Blvd The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89158"  (4 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (1222 chars)
This Starbucks, located next to Pinkberry and the Mandarin Oriental Hotel on S. Las Vegas Blvd, is a relatively new addition to the CityCenter family of Starbucks. Having opened in March of this year, it sports a beautiful dark wood interior and some fancy display of technology. ...  ... The front entrance is dominated by a large wood plaque naming Starbucks coffee blends offered here, and an oversized Starbucks icon. The combination is visually unique and dramatic, and keeping with CityCenter's artistic flair. ...  ... Seating is varied, with a back collection of comfortable couches, and a front set of stools and counter, a combo perfect for Vegas people watching.  Outside seating on Las Vegas Blvd. is also available. ...  ... Opposite the front stools is an engaging digital display of a tweet feed, #starbucksvegas.  Although a bit repetitive because there's not a high-volume of tweets at this point, we found it fairly addictive to watch while enjoying our coffee. This is the first I've seen of this new Starbucks technology, but I have a feeling it will be coming to more new stores in the future. ...  ... Coffee lovers powerwalking down S Las Vegas Blvd. now have a new option for a quick caffeine fix!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (346 chars)
This is one of the better Starbucks I have been to.  It is large and open.  The decor is clean and more upscale than most.  The staff is friendly. ...  ... The most important positive is the fact there are almost no leaches that have set up shop for the day, to mooch off the internet.  Real patrons can actually sit down and enjoy their coffee.


REVIEW #3:  1 stars  (330 chars)
If there's zero star I would have put that. I only asked for ice for my puppy after buying a gazillion value of drinks and they told me to pay.  ... Amazing... ... I never thought I would give a 1 star for any starbucks as I have always gotten a great service, but this is taking stingy to a different level.  ... No thanks to u.


REVIEW #4:  1 stars  (151 chars)
Get ready to pay 2 times any normal Starbuck.  Drip coffee grande (med) was $4.20.  I like my Starbucks, and I do drink it daily, but give me a break.


................................................................................
LOCATION #126:  address="3755 Spring Mountain Rd Chinatown"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89103"  (25 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (816 chars)
This is a pretty efficient Starbucks. I often use the drive through and they get me on my way quickly. I'm not a fan that you aren't supposed to U-turn into the parking lot when going South on Valley View.  ... Helpful tip: when driving East on Spring Mountain turn left at Polaris and follow around (2 Rights) it will take you to Valley View and you can turn right into the parking lot. Sometimes I just do the U-turn, don't tell my mom!  ...  ... Staff is always friendly! Today the girl recommended I try vanilla with my Gem Tea Latte. She said since I already use Soy milk that is vanilla flavored it will complement it quite nicely. She was definetly right. It was yummy!  ...  ... I sure wish Starbucks would offer Almond Milk! They need to figure that ish out before I get lured away by another coffee house.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (777 chars)
A Starbucks is a Starbucks, right? But this location really stands out from the rest! ...  ... -friendly employees (especially the early morning crew) ... -fast drive thru ... -rarely makes mistakes ... -I don't have to ask for napkins if I order food ... -I don't have to ask for a stopper when I order a hot drink. Either they give me one automatically or THEY ask if I want one. ... -they give out coupons when there are promotions going on.  ...  ... Sometimes I go to other Starbucks in the area, but service is not as good as it is here. I have experienced longer wait times, employees who don't say thank you, and wrong orders. This location is convenient for me because I can stop by before going to work. Also, I believe this is the only Starbucks on Spring Mountain.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (525 chars)
I can't believe this Starbucks isn't listed on YELP?!?!! ... I come to this one all the time it's right on the corner of Spring Mountain and Valley View...Near the Chinatown area and next to Pho Kim Long Restaurant (Also reviews on yelp). ...  ... Anyhow, This one is never overly busy has a drive through... ... It isn't the largest Starbucks but for the clientele it gets at varioius times of the day that I've been here over and over again it is just right. ...  ... Always clean not far from the strip and great service.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (405 chars)
I have never gone in to this store but always gone through the drive through and i must day they are the quickest drive through i have been to. They can have cars wrapped around their store and still get customers right through. Traffic on the other may cause a little back up, but hey what do you expect its China town. The partners are always friendly whenever i pass through. Awesome location to visit


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (357 chars)
I had a gift card I got my my sister so decided to come in one day. Very clean and I have to say out of all the Starbucks I've been to the people working here are extremely nice. Sue recommended a sweetener I should get with my regular green tea frap and it was delish! They welcomed everyone who came in and passed out samples. Excellent customer service.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (261 chars)
This star bucks is honestly different from the rest! Wonderful smiles on the employees faces they know my drink when I walk in the door and they really do make your day start off better! Having to wake up at 8 am is hard but this starbucks is by far aweomse!!!


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (260 chars)
I'm very particular about how I like my Caramel Frappaccino (xxxxtra caramel) and I don't mind Starbucks charging extra for all that caramel but more often than not , I don't get the amt of caramel I paid extra for.  This Starbucks gives the exact amt I need.


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (226 chars)
As a daily consumer of Starbucks for years, I can honestly say I've never seen one like this! They are so on-top-of-it and QUICK! Even when there is a long line, it still moves so quickly...and all with very friendly service.


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (120 chars)
Nicest crew in town. Nearby but I go out of my way to only shop this location Closes too early, easily a midnight store


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (474 chars)
Consistency will always be on Starbucks' side. It is hard to mess up something as simple as an Iced Coffee with no sweetener or milk. Maybe  it is best to keep it as basic as possible. ...  ... The drive thru moves at a quick pace and I can easily get my order in and ready within minutes. If I do not have time to just sit back and enjoy the ambiance than Starbucks is good. If you don't have to be anywhere, go to one of the local own shops and just enjoy the atmosphere.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (404 chars)
The selling points for this location are they have a drive thru and they are conveniently located in Chinatown, just off the 15. I pass this location coming from many different locations and it's often a nice little spot to stop when I'm in need of a caffeine fix. I don't frequent Starbucks or any drink spots in town since I'm not much of a caffeine addict, but it's a good spot when the mood strikes.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (258 chars)
they have these great lounge chairs, which helped pass 1.5 hours after lunch waiting for our ride. and this is the first place i saw a treinte size. i had an iced coffee so i don't know if they are skilled, but it was done quick and they didn't kick us out.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (199 chars)
This was a quick stop last night to a later open Starbuck's that the neighborhood stores.  It was clean, service was quick, and the drink was exactly right.  I've been here before, and I'll be back.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (175 chars)
Fast, friendly service. Consistent on the drinks. Drive thru is convenient and fairly quick. ...  ... Starbucks isn't my first choice in coffee but their iced teas are great!


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (149 chars)
I like this location because it's not too busy and they always has tables outside the store so I can enjoy the latte and cigarettes with my friends.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (147 chars)
Who doesn't like spending $5 on a cup of coffee? It's about the ambiance. Hahaha. But for real though, give me my coffee fix and no one gets hurt.


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (101 chars)
One of the best Starbucks locations in Vegas! I love the ambiance and it's always clean! Keep going!


REVIEW #18:  4 stars  (60 chars)
Just like almost every other Starbucks, quick and friendly.


REVIEW #19:  4 stars  (25 chars)
Standard; friendly staff


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (2220 chars)
As someone who once upon a time was employed by Starbucks, frequents Starbucks to the point of owning a Gold Card which is frequently used, and can list off their new products by quarters, I have a pretty solid grasp of the company, their standard, and some of the finer details that the company keeps. ...  ... Service here is generally pretty decent in terms of drink turn around time, well-trained, friendly baristas, and I frankly love the location and appearance of this particular Starbucks: The Pagoda style roof/building is charming.   ...  ... The GM is super cute and friendly, super chatty about the company, and has done some pretty awesome things such as helped me condense and transfer all of my funds around from one gift card, an old Gold Card that would store but not "Read" money, and my new Gold Card and put it all into one card.  Horray! ...  ... Not only that, but the crowd here is fun.  Since it's in China Town, it only stands to reason that you would have a lot of Asians: Chinese, Japanese, Koreans, and even Vietnamese.  So it's a great spot to go and people watch.  (I drive a Honda and parked in the middle of a 7-long row of Honda vehicles in the parking lot, hahahaha.) And an occasional drag queen pops up here, to boot.  Yeah, interesting crowd! ...  ... So anyway, my main issue with this place is the fact that over the last four years that I've been dropping by, the DM or someone has been a little too overzealous with the state of employment in this store.  Every time my co-workers and I get to know a barista at this location, they're GONE!  They've been transferred off, or just "let go" at the drop of a hat, with no warning or notice to us.  As a company that just dreams of becoming a frequent habit in your lifestyle, it's a little offputting for this to happen not just once or twice but ALL the time!  One of the reasons why I love the Starbucks by me at Tenaya/Crag is because the individuals who are up there have been there for some time and haven't been transferred out - I know them, they know my drink preferences, and so on.   ...  ... So yeah, it's a decent Starbucks but don't get too attached to any of the staff, they never seem to be there more than year.  :|


REVIEW #21:  3 stars  (488 chars)
Eh, Starbucks does not have the best coffee in the world, but its every where, on every corner, in every state, in every town. I do believe that they over price some of the extras, like using soy milk, $.60....adds up fast.  And in the airports and hotels they OVERCHARGE by a lot.  This location was clean and they have a drive through which is great when you don't want to get out of the car!!!  Only problem, they don't give you a receipt unless you ask...Don't forget to ask for one!


REVIEW #22:  3 stars  (374 chars)
They make a super huge Treinte size now?! Holy cow.  ...  ... I haven't been to a Starbucks in forever as I just cant drink all these caffeinated, rich drinks.  ...  ... I did stop in for a passion ice tea on a hot day and it did the trick. The lady at the register was nice and my drink is super easy as they just pour some tea on ice so there really isn't anything to it.


REVIEW #23:  3 stars  (196 chars)
Useful! Sat down here after the trade show I attended did close and before dinner to write a blog entry. It was quiet, service was nice and the wifi was free! Near the Las Vegas "chinatown" area.


REVIEW #24:  2 stars  (117 chars)
2 stars because of terrible customer service.. EILEEN rolled her eyes at me for adding on to my order at the window.


REVIEW #25:  1 stars  (1476 chars)
as a loyal customer of starbucks, i was highly disappointed by this location's service. ...  ... here's the story:  i ordered a skinny caramel macchiato at the blue diamond location (near my house) and asked for a little extra caramel sauce (i know that no longer makes the drink skinny, but i had a sweet tooth :).  instead of topping me off with extra sauce, they gave me an extra pump of caramel syrup (yuck!).  since i was headed to a store in chinatown, i stopped at the startbucks right off the spring mountain exit, explained my issh and asked for a little extra sauce.  the guy at the window said he couldn't alter my drink, but could make me a new one.  i took out a dollar to tip him for his kindness.  we exchanged goods, i thanked him dearly and drove off.  when i looked at the new drink he'd made me............ it was crap!  in asking for a little extra sauce, he flooded it with sauce!  1/8 of the drink was sauce.  there was a layer of sauce at the bottom of the cup... a layer on the top.  the drink was so full, it overflowed when i poked the straw in it and spilled all over my car!  ...  ... mind that i am normally not "one of those" customers... if ever i feel that i'm swaying that way, i'm overly apologetic and thankful.  mind that i pay for a $5 drink everyday, so it better taste the way i want and expect it to.  above all, mind that every starbucks i've been to has said: if you're ever unsatisfied with your drink, they'd be happy to remake it.


................................................................................
LOCATION #127:  address="4469 W Flamingo Rd"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89103"  (18 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (893 chars)
This is by far my favorite Starbucks store.   ...  ... What separate this place from the others?  CUSTOMER SERVICE!  I have been here twice this week to do some studying and the barista's greet each customers that walks in to the store with a huge "hello/hi".  Another thing, they remember their regular customers by name and their favorite drinks.  Even at their busiest time when a line is forming, their regulars would already have their drink ready by the time they reach the cashier.  They do it all without missing a beat!   ...  ... We all know Starbucks isn't the best when it comes to coffee, but this Starbucks knows how to make a person feel like he/she is drinking the best coffee ever.  Very impressive indeed! ...  ... P.S.  I don't really like to study at Starbucks or any coffee shops for that matter because it's usually very LOUD, but this place isn't as loud as the others.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (892 chars)
Starbucks is always perfect for me when it comes to service and quality as I have never had a bad experience other than the one time at this location. I had ordered a venti sized white chocolate latte in which the cup was not filled, there was a gap from the top of the cup by a few inches. I understand the price as I am ok with that but at least fill my damn cup! I called this location and spoke with a Manager who informed me that I could stop back by for a replacement coffee and from now on I should inform when I order "filled to the top". Ok so now on I inform them whenever I order anything to fill it to the top and that has prevented this from happening again. ...  ... Lately I have been craving the java chip frap, mmmm I love those chocolate coffee bits! ...  ... Thank you Starbucks for all of the tasty caffeine indulgences you have provided me with! I will be back for more!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (167 chars)
They always make my coffee rite, the workers really pay real attention on the order, great store! Also the sea salt chocolate is sooo good, can't stop eating them! ;)


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1202 chars)
I go to a lot of Starbucks but this one i have to comment on because of the customer service i received. ...  ... I recently downloaded the Starbucks app. for their rewards program.  I went to a different Starbucks a week and a half ago went in and asked the guy at the counter exactly how it works as i was a little confused on the process.  He pretty much shrugged his shoulders at me.  He didnt ask anyone else if they knew nor did he apologize that he didnt.  So i went ahead and paid for my coffee with my cash not my reward app. so i didnt get a 'gold' star which after 5 or so drinks i would get a free one.... ...  ... Anyways, today i was out by a different Starbucks and went in and was greeted by Maria, who not only took the time to explain to me how everything works, she even walked me through the step by step on my phone, and even showed me a lot of stuff i had no clue the program offered.  It took five min. and now im an old pro lol.....i appreciate more then anything when an employee knows about all aspects of their job.  She was sweet and kind and it was a great experience. ...  ... Oh and my venti pumpkin spice frapp. was AMAZING also !!! ...  ...  ... Thanks again Maria !!!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (406 chars)
Friendly staff, close to the gym and my work. All of that meets the criteria for Starbucks, but the coffee is not as good as the local shops around Vegas.  ...  ... The store is small and does not offer much space to lounge when it gets busy. Most of the people that come in look like they are in the midst of a jammed pack day anyways. I tend to have large gaps in my day, so comfort is highly important.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (306 chars)
I'm not a super-huge Starbucks fan like my wife but I thought I'd comment... ...  ... One of the friendlier Starbucks around.  I've been here a few times over the years and the staff has always been great. ...  ... The store is clean and roomy. ...  ... Local celebrities have been known to hang out here.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (201 chars)
Good atmosphere. Clean and not too crowded. Only complaint would be the bathroom (womens) had no seat covers except for a couple folded ones on top of the baby changing station. ...mmm ill just use tp


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (58 chars)
Good attitudes, super fast drink service.  Normal prices.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (37 chars)
Friendly staff, and very busy store.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (1706 chars)
I go to this starbucks every single morning because it is convenient on the way to work.  I struggle because I'm super lazy and just wished it had a drive thru however I can't rate it lower for that.   ... At first they seemed to know folks around me which I thought was frustrating because why don't you know who I am since I come in every morning at the same time.  Then one day I complained about my drink because it was so wrong.  I order the same thing every single morning.  Since then when three certain ladies are working they are outstanding just great.  Before I even get to the counter my drink is ready and they know my name.  I love them for them five stars. ...  ... The reason it drops is because of mornings like today which I would say are few and far between but they are not.   ... I go in, I wait in a stupid long line.  I get to the front the lady says can I help you, I order my drink and she asks me what kind of milk I want.  Well I asked for skinny so I say the kind you get with skinny but I have never been asked that.  (sometimes they ask me how many pumps of syrup I want, how the heck am I suppose to know) ...  ... Then I wait I finally get my drink and the guy says nothing so I say, well have a good day.  Then I take a sip.  I ask if the drink is right, he says yes, I know something is missing (like the syrup) he says he did it right, and I'm too exhausted to argue so I just leave.  Somedays the only thing I need is to just have my consistent starbucks coffee, that will make my day start right.  That is all I want.  If I didn't like consistency or service then I would go to coffee bean or brew my own...I like that I can count on starbucks, well sometimes that is.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (427 chars)
I totally agree with some of the reviews on here.  There is something about this spot that just sucks.  Maybe all those people hanging outside and inside of this Starbucks.  They give you the dirty stare with you go in and out.  This is close to the strip, which is awesome but..definitely can't get over the uncomfortable feeling of being at this location.   ...  ... They made my drink correctly, so that's 3 stars for them!


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (390 chars)
This Starbucks is just ok. I'm spoiled by ones with drive-thrus so having to get my lazy butt off the car to order a beverage isn't my favorite, but it's conveniently located and it does the trick when you're in need of a serious caffeine fix like we were on our most recent visit. Service was relatively quick and it was pretty standard fare as far as Starbucks go. ...  ... Overall A-Ok.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (1535 chars)
Not as busy as I thought it would be 8am-10am as far as the sit ins.  It's quite spacey, I really like the layout plus they have several patio tables under shade and Einstein Bagels next door.  The staff were cool, the girl at the register took my order and asked for my name and kudos to her for actually writing my name correctly which never happens BUT when it was ready the other girl just yelled  out the order once and I wasn't sure if it was mine until it was all alone at the pick up counter waiting to be last picked for  a PE team :(.  I found a table to sit at but it wasn't wiped down SO I did it myself, one of my pet peeves at any restaurant/cafe which I didn't mind at first.  I then went to the restroom after an hour and they were out of toilet seat covers!  It breaks my heart  when that happens so I improvised  haha.  There were a total of 5 people behind the counter, not one I saw come out to wipe down tables. Again, it wasn't as busy but had several walkin orders and they were out, it was nice BUT the little things do count like toiletries  and clean tables.  So -minus 2 stars for this location. ... Ok -minus 1 more star because 30min after using the restroom, a worker went to the restroom after I did and not yet have I seen anyone go to the ladies room (except for customers) and fill the seat covers and I guess she was on break because she was chilin for little bit like a customer.  Obviously she didn't let anyone know.  If you didn't know I like to people watch, it's a great stress reliever hahah.


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (472 chars)
Been to many locations and this is NOT MY FAVORITE.  Something about this place, the ambiance sucks.  I live close to this one but I avoid this one as much as possible.  I'm from Cali but live in Vegas now.   ...  ... I purchased a bag of coffee, had them grind it but the lady handed it to me without a bag.  Did we forget coffee particles/grinds falling out during a drive?  It was all over my car seat & the smell wasn't easy to get rid of.  Didn't like the service. .


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (266 chars)
I love this location but the inside was crowded and other customers bumped me as they walked by. I'm used to the Baristas asking for my name after I place an order and this time they didn't ask for my name and someone almost walked off with my drink. Oh~~ hell nah!


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (166 chars)
The coffee was great but the downfall was the limited pastries and things to eat. I've haven't seen it this low at any Starbucks location so I was pretty turned off.


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (326 chars)
stopped by here because i didnt have time to make it to my regular shop.. the cashier bella was not friendly.. when my drink was ready she sat it at the pick up station where i had to REACH to get it then she walked away..chinatown is the best gor friendly staff.. my green tea is alright.. wont return or recommend to anyone


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (156 chars)
Their new pastry line is gross! Now that Starbucks has decided to get all political on us with their anti-second amendment position, we are not going back.


................................................................................
LOCATION #128:  address="4626 S Maryland Pkwy University"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89119"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (276 chars)
Great customer service, especially from the night crew! They have never messed up on me. Great for eating healthy on campus! However, during certain times of the day it can get 25 deep. If there are at least 3 people working, the line goes by fast. If its only two...give up.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (125 chars)
Typically there is a line but it's a campus.the manager is my favorite person he doesn't take any bull. Never had a problem.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (768 chars)
It's not the greatest Starbucks to ever come into existence but it was my go-to and the fact that it was an on-campus location made it better. ...  ... Yes the lines are VERY long. The longest wait I had on the line was 20 minutes and an extra 10 minutes waiting for my drink. But what did you expect? People are wanting their caffeine and they don't want to walk out of campus to go to the other one. Because so many students and staff go there, there is always room for mistakes because they get so many people getting their drinks! So I don't condemn them for that. ...  ... Seeing that I just finished my first year of college, this Starbucks location helped me stay awake during my classes and helped me during the days where I'm running on three hours of sleep.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (733 chars)
THERE IS ALWAYS A LINE HERE....usually.  The peak times of this Starbucks is around 11 am - 4 pm.   ...  ... Try to avoid at all costs the times of: 9:45 am - 10 am, 11:15 am - 11:30, 12:45 pm - 1:00 pm, 2:15 pm - 2:30 pm, and 3:45 pm - 4:00 pm.   ...  ... These are times in between classes, so it's kind of common sense to avoid the hoards of students trying to get their caffeine fix between classes.  Usually after 5 pm, most students are heading home and the line should be fairly short.  The drinks are fair, but for some reason other Starbucks always taste better and move a lot faster too.  If you are desperate and looking for a quick caffeine fix, I would recommend getting a cup of coffee at the POD in the Student Union.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (415 chars)
Look... ...  ... This Starbucks is at UNLV, a commuter campus with few halfway edible options for food (not to mention the atrocity that is the library's Coffee Bean). It can get crowded in the morning, sure. But it's a freaking coffee shop. ...  ... The staff here is really nice as of this semester. Previous baristas have been rude, but I like these new folks. ...  ... They even draw a smiley face on your cup!


REVIEW #6:  2 stars  (495 chars)
I love Starbucks and I'm a big fan but wow. WOW. They always mess up my order, every single time and they gave me the wrong change once. My last time there, they burnt my two bagel and I nicely asked for another one and I didn't mind paying for it either. They were nice enough to make another one. But just one when I bought two. It wasn't even toasted either, it was still cold on the inside. Worst Starbucks ever. I wasn't even in the mood to ask again, I just left and angrily ate my bagel.


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (418 chars)
The service is always friendly however I was overcharged and she didn't realize it. I pointed it out and she still thought it was right.  She tried to explain that it was tax, which it wasn't because the base price was $4.55 instead of $4.15.  She asked me to speak to her manager so she could explain it to me.  The manager acknowledged it was wrong but said that they don't set the prices so they can't help.  Wow!!


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (413 chars)
Located in the food court/student union at UNLV, this Starbucks is my least favorite location. ...  ... Every time I have gone there is a line. It ranges from 5-30 people, and moves slowly. ...  ... They won't redeem the free drinks and food items I have earned on my Starbucks card. I get that this location is on a campus, but it's still annoying. ...  ... They've been out of ingredients on several occasions.


REVIEW #9:  1 stars  (474 chars)
I am an avid customer at Starbucks, although this one located at the UNLV campus never fails to disappoint me. I usually order a black tea unsweetened, and almost every time they add the sweetener and have to remake it. The other day, the messed up not once, but twice. ...  ... As for the ingredients, they never seem to order correctly. I have asked for a Peppermint Mocha on multiple occasions, with them being out of the Peppermint. ...  ... Nothing but disappointment.


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (424 chars)
The worst Starbucks I have ever visited. Twice this week they were out of stuff. On Monday, December 10 I ordered a soy peppermint mocha and they were out of peppermint. On Wednesday, December 12 I decided to give them a second try. I ordered a soy peppermint mocha and this time they were out of soy milk and peppermint. I'm afraid if I try them a third time they will be out of everything and just give me a cup of water.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (291 chars)
Starbucks at the student union is a continuous disappointment. Their cup stock is often low, they only have Grande size. Not to mention, they don't post a sign to tell you this, so after waiting in line for 15 minutes, the cashier gladly informs you that you have wasted your valuable time.


................................................................................
LOCATION #129:  address="475 E Windmill Ln Southeast"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89123"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (423 chars)
Kristal might be the barista to make me take back all I have said about every Starbucks being the same. She made my Venti Iced Americano exactly the way I like. It was strong, dark, and had a generous amount of ice which would melt down when the espresso hit it. Instead of just loading my drink with water and a little ice, she did it the right way for beverage with the strength to keep me going for the rest of the day.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (226 chars)
This is a Starbuck's concession in Von's. Similar to all the Von's Starbuck's it is a conducive spot to relax. Never a problem waiting on a table. The tables are spacious. And the Starbuck's coffee on the table hits the spot.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (13 chars)
always great


................................................................................
LOCATION #130:  address="4780 S Maryland Pkwy University"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89119"  (31 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (704 chars)
I like Starbucks. I like that they have good coffee, good drinks not coffee, and some good stuff to eat, too. It doesn't hurt that there is usually one cute girl who works there, and cute girls who are customers, too.  ...  ... I come to this location when I'm at school and want to get away for a minute. It's good to kinda relax here when you have time between classes, or even when you just don't feel like going to class. I should also mention that I like coming here because, as stated in a previous post, it's a great place to people-watch! ...  ... They have free WiFi, which is extra awesome as I like to spend time here reading/studying/trying not to get on Facebook and Yelp! all the the time.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (658 chars)
I go here for Raychelle!!  I am a Starbucks freak! I went to Seattle just to visit the original one, as well as the gift shop at the corporate offices. I will stop at least one time a day to get my Frappachino fix, and I go to a few of them around town.  ...  ... The other day I went with my mom and husband. My husband was so surprised when I started ordering at the drive through and I recognized Raychelle's voice and SHE RECOGNIZED MINE!!! She is my little Starbuck's Angel, and she always makes my visit feel special.  ...  ... My favorite drinks are Caramel Frapp light and Green Tea Frapp without added sugar. Just typing this is making me want one!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (615 chars)
These guys are awesome! We were visiting from Southern California and had less than desirable visits to the Starbucks in the hotels. As a former Starbucks partner I can say that the service here was perfect. On the way out my friend tripped in the parking lot and dropped his drink. I went back in to see if they could remake his drink the first thing the barista asked was if my friend was ok, and remade his drink without hesitation. After spending a week here in LV and receiving lackluster service at the hotels and casinos this Starbucks location was a much needed breath if fresh air. Keep up the great work!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (539 chars)
This Starbucks location is awesome! The employees are friendly. They have never messed up a drink of mine. It is next to campus (UNLV), but still feels like a getaway coffee shop. The wi-fi works great and it is right next to my girlfriend Kalila's house! It is surrounded by other great places to eat and I just can't think of anything negative to say about this Starbucks location. ...  ... Kalila likes to invent her own drinks. Her Vanilla bean frapp with banana & caramel is delicious! Bananas foster in a cup! Well.... almost. HAHA.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (491 chars)
Well i was curious cause they have a lot of good reviews & badd. I bought skinny ice  Carmel Mac quad ex-carmel. Im in the drive wait time was about 3-5. im great with that as long as you  make my time go by. Not Only did donna fill me in on whats going this edc weekend she gave me All the 411 . . . . these ladies work really hard i can tell when someone is trying to be just a doosh(ASKING FOR FREE SHIT ALL THE TIME)  & they see it too. Keep it up U GuyS. . . . ...  ... MEL. A REGULAR.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (333 chars)
Ok so here is the thing, for me almost all Starbucks are the same the only thing that will distinguish it, is if it is terrible. This one is not terrible just the contrary it has a great outside area. So if you are in the neighborhood and in need of a caffeine jolt, stop on by. Live it up, you are in Las Vegas for cryin' out loud!


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (305 chars)
So in the last four months, I have been coming to this Starbucks to look for a job. I love this Starbucks. Why - because they leave you alone for hours on end, it's close to UNLV so you get some good people watching, and there are a lot of places to sit. ...  ... It's also clean as a mofo. See you here.


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (204 chars)
Thank you SB Team Ryan in my Sun burst yellow tiburon always get a friendly person with a smile and a cold drink to cool me off during the summer as I slave away at http://www.hotelplanner.com/?sc=twitte


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (1637 chars)
Located across the street from UNLV, there's this Starbucks. Located within UNLV, there's another Starbucks. A couple more blocks down the road, there's another Starbucks. They're not too hard to find. Their coffee is exactly what you'd get at any other location. ...  ... I am reviewing this place as a means of a place to study. Say what you must about Starbucks coffee, but when I need to study, I'm not too picky on flavor or quality. I just want my caffeine, a somewhat relaxed ambiance, and music mellow enough for me to drown out, yet enjoy. This Starbucks tends to pull that off. I tried studying at the nearby Coffee Bean & Tea Leaf, but their choice of music is too upbeat for me to focus, like a mainstream radio station. ...  ... This Starbucks is a quaint little place. There are 4 tables inside that can seat 2 people, 1 table that can seat 4, and one large table that can seat around 6. There are a few lounging chairs about, if that's what you're looking for. Outside are many more tables, which are practically unusable during the summer because of the heat. Each table should have an outlet somewhere nearby if you have a laptop that needs juice. Plus, you do get free Wi-Fi here nowadays. ...  ... Be aware, that this place does fill up during peak hours. You might not be able to get a table at this time. I tend to go to this place whenever I'm tired of sitting in the Lied Library to study. I practically live in that library during a heavy semester, so I do need an occasional change of scenery. ...  ... Staff is friendly, caffeine is present, and the music is good. I can't complain about this place. I'm a fan.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (1549 chars)
Honestly, who does not know about Starbucks? I bet the whole world could write a review about it.  ...  ... However, mine is not focused on the coffee that everyone loves. People and their coffee right? Well I am not a coffee drinker, and trust me I have tried. Again and again and again. I just cannot get past the taste.  ...  ... Those of you who join me in sticking out our tongues to coffee can still go to Starbucks. They have so much more than coffee. I am in love with their shaken green tea. Usually I hate ice tea, but their green tea is amazing to me. I cannot find anything that tastes like it. I have tried other green teas' but not like Starbucks. They also have a lemonade tea concoction, passion fruit, etc. Try something that is not coffee and you may find a new drug in the Starbucks world.  ...  ... I also enjoy their new bistro boxes. The protein one is pretty healthy and fills me up. It helps me to keep going sometimes. Who needs energy drinks when you have protein and green tea! ...  ... I always enjoy that I can sit in a big comfy chair and just take a breather before class, work, internship, etc. Whatever it is that I have, I can hang out in the corner and just breathe, bobbin my head to the house music playing at just the right volume.  ...  ... Bottom line, Starbucks is way way more than just coffee. If you haven't tried it because you hate coffee (one person I know) please try something  else, different, and if your eyes go wide do to your taste buds jumping for joy, I will indeed tell you, "I told you so."


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (667 chars)
I frequent this particular store because of its convenient location. It's across the street from UNLV, so you know they are used to students that need a place to grab a drink and chill/study. The staff has gone through a few changes, but they all remain friendly and helpful.  ...  ... My only gripe is that the drive thru is slow. And it's always slow. When I stop by, it's pretty early in the morning, around 7am. I think they are staffed minimally (I think only 2 people) so there is a little bit of a wait, even if I am the only person in line. ...  ... Now if only they accepted my Starbucks card payments off my iphone through the drive thru, then I'll be set!


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (502 chars)
A Starbucks is a Starbucks, no different then any other. Pro's: The employees are always nice and polite. One even gave me extra scones because they were just going to get tossed out anyways. Con's: Because its near UNLV there always seems to be student's taking up all the seats for long periods of time. They never seem to be fully stocked up on food like the sandwiches and pastry's. But then again I am always coming late in the evening so I can't blame them if all the food got bought up earlier.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (438 chars)
i go to this one when im early for school and dont wanna deal with the crowd at the on campus one ...  ... drive thru is actually decent. we actually had time to sit inside and eat once, but the barista forgot one of our sandwiches. they dont take long, but when you have one and you're waiting for another one it feels like forever. ...  ... all in all, i like this place because there really isnt too much of a wait, or no wait at all.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (281 chars)
This Starbucks is near UNLV on Maryland Parkway.  The baristas are quite competent, and their supply of pastries was good even for it being 1 in the afternoon.  The free wifi is really handy, but it's harder getting a table because so many people have made Starbucks their office.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (210 chars)
Favorite location! Convenient drive-thru which is often busy but the line moves quickly.  ...  ... Friendly staff who have never messed up my order.  ...  ... Inside is nice and spacious. My favorite location.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (197 chars)
This Starbucks location helps.  The school usually gets very crowded.  They always get my drink correct.  Wifi is free, there's indoor and outdoor seating.  Parking is fair and the place is clean.


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (75 chars)
Friendly staff,and always seems to be packed. Great place to people watch!


REVIEW #18:  4 stars  (73 chars)
Nice and roomy inside, conveinent location, what else could you ask for?


REVIEW #19:  4 stars  (13 chars)
Good service


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (1511 chars)
Starbucks Rewards program changes:  Gold Level, you get a free drink at 12 stars -- not 15 like before. ... No more postcards you used get in the mail telling you about your free drink. You get an email instead.  ... You no longer get a free tall beverage when you buy your pound of coffee. ...  Also, you'll no longer be able to add a syrup or soy milk for free.  ... Now you get to choose if you want to use your reward on food or drinks.... ...  ... Give me free soy back! Yes I know, it's sounds like I'm whining for something free, well, I am!  ...  ... This is the Starbucks location I frequent the most as its on my way to work, so I'm here 3 days a week. I've  seen many people come and go here, I had my favorites and my not so favorites. I feel bad for not knowing the young lad at the drive thru, who has gotten to know me over the drive thru, my drink and food order is always 100% correct with him, he's always friendly. Now, there is a new employee, she's been there a couple months, middle aged with an accent, she is grumpy, never cracks a smile, usually gets my drink order wrong along with my food order, and she gets an attitude if I ask for something, when you're ordering a breakfast sandwich, do I need to ask for a napkin?? Or if I want the green stopper, can I get it without a fowl look? Starbucks is my reward to myself for going to work, yes I realize how pathetic that sounds, but I reward myself a lot with food and drinks. So get a different job if customer service isn't for you!


REVIEW #21:  3 stars  (281 chars)
I love Starbucks but this is not my favorite location. The area is a bit run down and that translates into the store. The coffee is as good as any other Starbucks and the WiFi works. And of course, a Starbucks that's a little run down is always better than Dunkin Donuts anywhere.


REVIEW #22:  3 stars  (117 chars)
Their green tea smoothie is good and they are my go to coffee place if I want something really strong to wake me up.


REVIEW #23:  3 stars  (41 chars)
Can be very full at times! Be careful!!!


REVIEW #24:  3 stars  (35 chars)
They get me my coffee. Good stuff!


REVIEW #25:  2 stars  (212 chars)
This is the second time at the drive thru Starbucks.  The girls working talk more to their co-workers then helping and paying attention to customers. I wish management would secret shop them and improve service.


REVIEW #26:  1 stars  (1045 chars)
This is probably the worse Starbucks I've ever been to. The bf and I just finished grocery shopping and needed a caffeine pick-me-up since it was only 7 pm. We walked in and it was pretty packed. No line or anything, but all the tables were occupied with people on their laptops. The trash was full and the sugar station was pretty dirty. I ordered a tall iced coffee with a splash of nonfat milk and the bf ordered a venti vanilla iced coffee with no milk. Pretty easy compared to drinks they usually make. They messed up the lady's order before us so they had to remake it, hence longer wait. All we ordered was a simple iced coffee but we waited about a good 8 minutes. And when our drinks were finally ready, the bf's drink was wrong because they put milk when he said no milk. So they had to remake that one as well. And the barista acted like we were such an inconvenience to her. Never again will I come to this one.  ...  ... P.S. Note to management; teach your employees some people skills. You can start by teaching them how to smile.


REVIEW #27:  1 stars  (429 chars)
Customer service is a given:(... If someone is telling you what another Starbucks charges them just do it. We are curing cancer here, it's coffee! To upset someone that much over a dam price of a drink at 9am, really (Lynn) was her name, come on!!! She didn't even apologize after I had to get the store manager to be charges correctly! Luckily for Lynn her store manager knows customer service well & gave me my drink for free!


REVIEW #28:  1 stars  (386 chars)
Taking this time at 7 in the morning to say that I'm very disappointed with their customer service. Their cashier, Donna, needs a little more orientation time to say the least. It's 7 am on a Monday morning. I get it. Put a smile on your face and fake it till you make, you know what I'm saying?!  Maybe a desk job hidden away from people would better suit her.  ...  ... Happy Monday!


REVIEW #29:  1 stars  (203 chars)
Yuck. It's been a while since having starbux and I really haven't been missing anything. The aftertaste of their espresso drinks are the worst. Passion iced tea lemonade is the only saving grace for me.


REVIEW #30:  1 stars  (182 chars)
I ordered iced americano and sat here for longest time and went to check on my drink. My coffee was sitting there half way melted. Do they not call out when the order is ready? SMH.


REVIEW #31:  1 stars  (72 chars)
Staff is not well trained. Had to pay 2,69$ for a small cold kids milk.


................................................................................
LOCATION #131:  address="4949 N Rancho Dr 89130 Northwest"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89130"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (567 chars)
Try their triple shot expresso with a splash of soy milk! Extremlly strong, but never too bitter! Truly blissful once you add the soy to your drink. Another plus is the ambiance is very relaxed, and I found this to be one of the "lesser" pretensious Starbucks locations that I've visited in the Southern Nevada area. Check it out! ... btw, Skip the cake pops! They are sinfully delightful, but shockingly horrible for you! I looked up the caloric content and found that it would be better for you to eat a table spoon of butter over one of their cake pops! - UCKERS!


REVIEW #2:  2 stars  (675 chars)
I have been here numerous times and don't really have an issue with the inflated prices. I knew going in that I would pay a little more solely based on the fact this SB is located inside of a casino. $3.50 for an iced tea is a little much, but it was good, and the prices are posted. I do have a problem with the customer service, however. On my latest visit the cashier seemed to just be going through the motions and her demeanor was as if I was bothering her. The barista was slow to get my drink ready, but at least he had some personality. The product is good here, as Starbucks usually is, but the customer service is in need of an overhaul, at least during my visits.


REVIEW #3:  1 stars  (802 chars)
I was so excited to see my Hotel had a Starbucks inside. I love my Starbucks and coffee in the morning. Went to get coffee and the staff here is rather rude. I wasn't greeted when we walked up to the counter and one employee was stalking the cold case and couldn't be bothered to acknowledge that they had customers. I have been a faithful customer for years and have never been treated the way I was this morning. I am not sure if this is an actual Starbucks or just licensed to sell Starbucks products. It gives the company a bad name if they allow for this store to continue this way with their rude, horrific, and mean customer service. There are many people that travel in and out of the Santa Fe Hotel and Casino, too bad Starbucks is ruining the coffee going experience for all those travelers.


................................................................................
LOCATION #132:  address="4985 W Tropicana Ave"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89103"  (38 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (343 chars)
Coffee...... What can I say? They are great at their jobs and at 2AM  I NEED COFFEE.. I am spoiled and cant drink the Circle K Crap, so a 24 hour Starbucks is what I need.  I have been going here for over 7 years. I have seen staff change, managers change, but they always make my drink right and are pleasant to see when I go into the store.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (193 chars)
Fast drive through.....awesome customer service.....great pumpkin spice frapp.....this Starbucks is on a very busy corner was very impressed with there quick service....will def. stop by again


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (161 chars)
I like this place because there are lots of people here. The internet connection is pretty good. I like to come here and work on my business. Thank you starbuck


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (132 chars)
There is a lot of Asian over here ;) always a lot of plp overs here 24/7 ;) love it anyway service are good plp r nice, great store


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (71 chars)
Love my Starbucks, but it sucks sitting outside, to many pan handlers.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (67 chars)
Great crew at grave yard shift! The rest are ok they get a 4 star.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (2275 chars)
Ok I know thinking what is there really too add too another Starbucks review. It not as though its major chain and seen one seen them all. It not often that you find ones that stay open 24 hours. I did notice that they do close from one hour in day 3:30-4:30. I still remember the first time heard them staying open 24/7 like YES Frappuccino urge good too go! Naturally I had too order one. I went with one of the newer (on my menu brought it back) ones Mocha Cookie Crumble. Good. Honestly think next time would stick with the safe or my favorite just straight up Mocha or Caramel. I never got much of hint of Cookie in it, Mocha definitely had nice flavor, and Crumble no idea where that was in it. Still any Frappuccino on hot Vegas day is a beautiful thing.  ...  ... The interior design talk about completely updated or really has been years since the last time stopped by this location. It felt like night and day for me. Now you have whole deli section with sandwiches, other drinks besides coffee (bottle water, fruit juices, and lot of different selection can choose) can purchase, and like the fact its separate rather then in front of the register area. Still have nice display of baked goodies like normal. Instead of all stand up tables or tables. They still do but have one long rectangle table more like family table can sit down with lap top get stuff done and have your coffee. The artwork hanging all around the walls really modern too the lighting fixtures. All creating great ambience too kick back with coffee chill do some reading, talking stories with friends, or going on lap top do whatever. The only negative is this location is pretty busy all the time.. I go too the gym all the time in the same shopping plaza and always people going in and out or hanging outside little patio area.  ...  ... The service was great! I did find it odd that she never mention about HH price on Frappuccino from 3-5. I was wondering why my grande was so cheap. Unfortunately only promotion till next week.  ...  ... If looking for a laid back Starbucks one that nice size, great place too people watch too since so busy, great ambience, and relax with friends. I would recommend coming too this location. Hopefully able too find spot too sit down can be a drawback.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (1219 chars)
Sniff sniff  ... Aahh nothing like the smell of coffee. I'm not really crazy about     starbucks, but I am a caffeine addict, and now that I took the first step on accepting my Addiction is time to take the second step...... I'll have a  medium caramel frappuccino with an extra  shot of espresso please! ( guess my nationality).  ...    This location is open 24 hours and has a drive thru. the place is very spacious, it has a few couches and tables. People using their lap tops taking advantage of free wi fi, talking to friends, enjoying their pimped up cup of joe. Only a few blocks away from the strip it gets a little busy. ...   My coffee was good, can't complain, the secret is in the coffee. Anything with coffee tastes good. Service was also good, the Batista was fast and attentive. It may seem like an easy job to do but is very hard to deal with customers going through withdrawals and in need of their quick fix. The only problem I had was that  I ordered a medium and got the grande, (lost in translation) no big deal, other than that it was a great experience! I'm sure I'll be back for more! ...                 p.s. Always tip the barista. They're in control of the caffeine. If you know what I mean.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (1096 chars)
This is the closest starbucks to my work,  so its where i head for my last minute hot chocolate in the morning or if my boss wants one.  This location is great if your on the go because of he drive-thru featured at this location.  ...  ... Because it is on Tropicana, you are gonna have a small wait in a cramped location. The staff is super knowledgeable and pretty quick, but since it's on a main drag, visible from Tropicana, next to about 10 store's and the gym, and across the street from the park..it is constantly backed up. Because of the small layout and limited seating, this is not the ideal location to sit and just enjoy yourself with your friends-if you would like that type of scenario you should probably get your coffee to go.  ...  ... The staff makes good small talk if there not too busy, but it seems like the staff is always changing. They always make my order correctly, but I don't have a very challenging order - Hot Chocolate most of the time.  ...  ... Sometimes pan-handlers can take away from the experience, but eh whatcha gonna do? ...  ... Cheers! ...  ... ~MikeB


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (1037 chars)
24 HOUR STARBUCKS! Not too far from the Vegas strip. Plenty of seating, plenty of plugs for laptops, etc. They even have plugs under the long couch/bench thing. This place is busy all night, which is probably the reason why its not the cleanest of Starbucks. Easy fix, hire more barista's, or ones that do not think they are too good to come out behind the counter and wipe down a table or two. In their defense, I could not see how the 3 working could find time to clean or stock the display case. Needs at least 4 people on staff at all times. Upper management needs to pay more attention to this location. Right now @ 12:30am, the line is 10 deep. Who knows how many in the drive through. ...  ... Nice mix of characters walking through. If your looking for an asian girlfriend or boyfriend, this is the place to be.  Kris Kristofferson walked in while I was there. If it was not him, he has a twin.  ...  ... Chris D. - 70 year olds on laptops talking about breast implants is WHY I WANT TO BE HERE. I love quirky, different people.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (821 chars)
One of the only Starbucks I actually LIKE to drink at. They're very consistent, most likely due to the huge number of customers they get on a daily basis. This place is always packed.  ...  ... Aside from the consistent drinks, the abundance of outlets, its close proximity to my house, and 24 hour opening hours make it a great place to study.  ...  ... However, it's often TOO packed. The outside seating is always full of taxi drivers and Asian international students. It's impossible to walk into this Starbucks without wading through a thick cloud of cigarette smoke.  ...  ... The seating indoors is pretty abundant, but the number of single patrons taking up tables that fit 2-4 people are equally abundant. ...  ... I try to come here after midnight for late night studying if I really can't concentrate at home.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (695 chars)
I try not to review every single Starbucks and Coffee bean that I go to because probably it will be about 80% of my reviews, but I came to this one this morning for my regular coffee and this place is very nice. Nice location and parking. The place is large (or maybe because I am used to the ones in Los Angeles, which are very small) and has a lot of chairs and sofas, so even when they have a lot of customers , the place doesnt feel that crowded. The staff is very friendly (again, probably because I come from LA so I am not used to that). Free wifi (although you get that everywhere nowadays). So nothing else to add..just enjoying my Cinnamon dulce latte and writing reviews!! Enjoy.....


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (556 chars)
Some people go to coffee shops to study, work, socialize, whatever...  I go to them get some caffeine, and it is usually when I am headed to work. So for me, the faster I can get in and out, the better...  ...  ... This is why a Starbucks with a drive-thru will almost always get more stars from me then ones without. And this location has a drive-thru. This location also has cheerful employees.  ...  ... If you do want to go inside, as other reviewers mentioned parking can be rough if you try to park up front... There is ample parking in back though.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (526 chars)
This has to be the busiest Starbuck's in the Southwest Valley. This cafe has been hyper-jumping both times I have been here. It feels more like being in a party than a cafe.  ...  It also looks like it was recently refurbished. There are.various seating arrangements. The neatest seating are the three stools at the counter. ...  This Starbucks is the Southwest version of the Eastern at I-215 Starbuck's. It is hyper jumping. Open 24 hours, with thr exception that it closes 1-4 on Mondays. And adjacent to a Fitness center.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (311 chars)
I LOVE that this Starbucks is open 24 hours AND it has a drive thru.  Definitely needed in Vegas.  The staff was friendly, efficient, and timely and that was at 11pm.  It was refreshing to see such hardworkers that enjoy their jobs.  Nothing is wrong with having fun as long as you're working at the same time.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (246 chars)
This is 1 of 2 24 hour locations (not in a casino). The other is on Eastern. I love going here on my way to the strip. This is a very busy, but very efficient location. Great friendly service and my favorite drinks all night long. Free wifi too!


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (230 chars)
Needed to kill some time one Saturday afternoon. Found this on the map. Rather roomy with multiple spots for electronics, but it may be full. Oh, and if the bathroom is locked make sure someone didn't just lock it on the way out.


REVIEW #18:  4 stars  (213 chars)
Always full and crowded but the EMPLOYEES are AWESOME! Always full of energy and friendliness no matter what time of the day it is. I've been here as early as 5am and as late as 1am and YES they are just AWESOME!


REVIEW #19:  4 stars  (164 chars)
It is a Starbucks. Enough said! ... well, kind of  - this is a super high volume - 24 hour - non-stop machine!   Good service, good employees, but still Starbucks.


REVIEW #20:  4 stars  (121 chars)
The coffee was hot and it was right around the corner from the condo. Grande bold every morning and didn't have to wait.


REVIEW #21:  4 stars  (77 chars)
Great service and very friendly. The gal from Yakima, WA was fun to talk to.


REVIEW #22:  4 stars  (44 chars)
The only 24-hour location in the SouthWest.


REVIEW #23:  3 stars  (872 chars)
excellent barristers, great clientelle, all Asian and Ethiopean customers, a few Arab nation people, at midnight all the young Japanese and Chinese girls with beach blonde hair come in wearing spike heels and the latest fashions, many of my fellow students from UNLV also. Homeless people and meth-addicts have a bad habit of using and holding up the rest-rooms., coffee could be better (stronger) some of the barristers have a habit of brewing it rather weak to their liking. All the employees are the best instead of the short fat guy that is rude with no personality on the later shift. dont go for the free wi-Fi..its the slowest in the world, One big problem they have is homeless people sleeping in the recliners and snoring loud. The employees never wake them up or are too busy to go over and shake them. Lots of free sleepers. so you wont be able to get a chair.


REVIEW #24:  3 stars  (840 chars)
1 star by default for being a mostly reliable chain cafe ... 1 star for great wifi and chill atmosphere ... 1 star for being open 24 hrs ...  ... Minus 2 stars for rude baristas who don't understand the first thing about customer service. Customer service tips for the baristas: Acknowledge your patrons, especially when there is a long line forming instead of having a prolonged conversation with your friend/coworker. Make eye contact with customers (etiquette 101). Don't act like customers are impinging on your time and everything they ask for is a nuisance. You are there to serve not be served on.   ...  ... We all understand that this is a busy location and that you have to deal with a lot of people. However, it's no excuse for dropping the level of customer service. If you want decent tips, then raise the bar of your service.


REVIEW #25:  3 stars  (707 chars)
One of the few Starbucks that are open 24hrs.  No matter what time you come here, it's always filled with people.  This is not a place where you can study unless you're one that can study in an active and noisy setting.   ...  ... I came here at 3am and there were still a good amount people.  Free WiFi but more of the concern is finding a seat where you can use your laptop.  Would have given this a 2 star but I kinda have a crush on one of the barista in this joint. She's cute, cool funny personality...oh i better shut up, i'm going off the subject.  ...  ... So yea, this place is very active and crowded so I recommend another place if you go during the early hours because this place gets crowded.


REVIEW #26:  3 stars  (704 chars)
Well what kinda stinks about this place is made up for with really great tasting drinks. Most starbucks I go to, I engage in a chat with the baristas. As busy as this one is, you can forget about chatter and just watch your drink become another cog in the machine. Speaking of machines, this starbucks uses that nifty label printer that makes a sticker on the side of your cup. Kinda cool, depending on your mood. ...  ... This location has long waits too and it is a happening spot. You probably will have to go into "stalker status" just to get a seat.  ...  ... 3 stars simply because it has goods and bads. Good tasting drinks. Bad place to engage in random chatter or meet with someone to catch up.


REVIEW #27:  3 stars  (508 chars)
I like the interior and location of this Starbucks.  I used to work at the Home Depot across the street -- so I got used to this place before work.  Anyway, besides applying here and not even getting called for an interview, lol,  I liked this place...pretty large and comfortable seating inside.  Fast and friendly service...and with a drive-thru.  Parking is horrible though...as it shares it with like 4 other businesses...and there is also a Dennys right there.  Oh well...nice Starbucks never-the-less.


REVIEW #28:  3 stars  (293 chars)
This Starbucks gets my order wrong at least 1 of 4 times. This is the closest one to my office so I go here often. My biggest gripe is that I don't want to have to check everything I got before I leave the store, if I get stuff for co-workers I am sure they don't want my gems in their drink.


REVIEW #29:  3 stars  (248 chars)
On Saturday morning, at 10:00, there was only one person in line in front of me. The building was packed, however. I ordered my usual Vanilla Latte, but it tasted slightly burnt and under flavored. I was in a hurry, so I didn't ask them to fix it.


REVIEW #30:  3 stars  (156 chars)
Usually less busy at 8am than the other Starbucks locations in Spring Valley and the drive thru is open again! Free wifi as usual and lots of place to sit.


REVIEW #31:  2 stars  (907 chars)
I had just arrived to Vegas when I got to this Starbucks. I needed to get online and do some stuff before hitting the town. Much to my dismay, this place was really busy and packed! I couldn't believe how crazy it was in there. I didn't have a choice though, I had to wait it out until someone got up from their seat. There's a good amount of room to sit...if you can find a seat! So if you're looking for somewhere to go and get some work done, find a different Starbucks. I went here on two different occasions and it was the same both times.  ...  ... That said, the guy who took my order was cool, but the baristas looked like they wanted to shoot themselves. No personality, no interaction. I don't know if I blame them though because they must be going non-stop in that place. The guy dropped my panini on the floor, but he got me a new one no problem. Just the icing on the cake for this experience.


REVIEW #32:  2 stars  (156 chars)
Drive-thru, good, customer service, good. However, i always order one type of coffee and they never taste same. It shows me that the training is very poor.


REVIEW #33:  1 stars  (1217 chars)
I can't believe I am giving a Starbucks a 1 star review. ...  ... That being said, I stopped in at this Starbucks after a meeting with my photographer for my wedding and before I had to be at work. It was convenient for me and in the area. There's a drive-thru, but because I had plenty of time before I had to be at work I figured I would just go in. ...  ... The place was full of people, but there were some free seats. I walked right up and put in my order. Mocha, iced, non fat, no whip. Doo doo doo.... So I figure I'll go sit down at a table and wait. Surely I will hear them call my drink. NOPE. ...  ... Not once did I hear my drink called. NOPE. DIDN'T CALL MY DRINK. So I walk up to the bar (mind you, it's really only been about 4 minutes, but there was ONLY 2 people who ordered after me) and I see my drink, just effing sitting there. As I see it, the barista starts to take it away and gives me this "WTF do you want?" look. And then he snottily says, "Are you waiting for a drink?" And I said, "YES" and he says, "Well we've been calling this one out for awhile." ...  ... YEA. CUZ I TOTALLY DIDN'T HEAR YOU CALL MY DRINK IN THE QUIET, SMALL AREA WE'RE ALL IN RIGHT NOW. ...  ... What a little bitch.


REVIEW #34:  1 stars  (992 chars)
I really don't like leaving bad reviews but this place has horrible service, dirty bathrooms, always out of paper towels and the heavier set lady who's name i forgot is always in a bad mood and giving me dirty looks every time. She either hates her job or is so well established in this place that she could care less about the service she provides.  ...  ... I go in the restroom and it is pretty filthy. Dirty floors, no paper towels, it didn't seemed like they were under staffed but maybe they are if they can't get around to it enough in such a busy location. I could easily cope with all that if the service was good but the employees here need an attitude adjustment. It wasn't just her, it was also one of the darker skin gentlemen who's name I also can't remember. I guess it's for the better but next time I will get my coffee in town square where the energy is good and employees treat you like a real guest. You can even taste their bad attitude by the burnt coffee they're make.


REVIEW #35:  1 stars  (757 chars)
This place is probably one of the busier Starbucks in town wing open 24/7. ...  ... Although I love the fun personality of the baristas at Starbucks.. ...  ... Asking me if I wanted a hot or cold frapp and proceeding to get annoyed with my response is definitely not funny. ...  ... "I'd like a grande pumpkin spice frappucino." ...  ... "do you want that hot or cold?" ...  ... "I'd like the pumpkin spice frappucino please?" ...  ... "I heard you the first time do you want it hot or cold?" ...  ... "... Cold?" ...  ... "ugh next window please, you have no sense of humor" ...  ... And no I don't have a bad sense of humor, you have a bad way of earning tips. ...  ... Insulting your customers, not apologizing, and having an attitude= bad for business.


REVIEW #36:  1 stars  (579 chars)
Terrible drive through experience.  Terrible service.  We were prepared for a long wait the line at the drive-in was crazy but we weren't prepared for every food item we ordered to be out, after specifically asking if it was available. To top that off the substitutions we were offered were also out.  Insult to injury this is the second Las Vegas Starbucks I have been to that refused to make items off the secret menu. Really?? Every other city I have been to will serve a grasshopper frapachino... I will not be back to this store and I am filling a complaint with corporate.


REVIEW #37:  1 stars  (325 chars)
Super slow service. Don't come here. They had five people working on a Sunday morning. Zero people in the drive thru. Only one person was working the dine-in customers with 8 people in line. Three workers were waiting for the drive thru line just talking and doing nothing. The exact same thing happened on Saturday as well.


REVIEW #38:  1 stars  (288 chars)
Here's the thing: I love Starbucks. I get at least 3 lattes everyday and use the Internet access. At this Starbucks the Internet wasn't working, the electrical outlets didn't work, and it was so dirty I didn't wanna sit down. I went to the starbucks down the street and was much happier.


................................................................................
LOCATION #133:  address="5181 W Charleston Blvd Westside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89146"  (4 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (54 chars)
Nice location. Nice People. No mistakes in the order.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (339 chars)
I read the reviews but decided to stop anyway.  I actually stopped on three occasions and noticed that they were busy on all three stops.  Despite being overwhelmed, the baristas were very friendly and got me my drink within a few minutes of ordering.  No complaints; except they may be too good and too busy, but they still do just fine.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (1393 chars)
This will be a moderate review or in Starbuck's terminology, a grande review. The best way to summarize the Starbuck's at the southeast corner of Decatur and Charleston Boulevards is BIG ON CONVENIENCE AND SHORT ON COMFORT. ...  ...   The location sits at the corner of two hyper-busy Las Vegas highways in a Super Walmart Shopping Center surrounded by fast food places. If you are shopping, eating out, or cruising along eastbound Charleston and north and southbound Decatur (Decatur entrance controlled by a traffic signal) this is a convenient Starbuck's for a caffeine boost. ...  ...   This has to be one of the tiniest Las Vegas Starbucks that I have visited. It just isn't very conducive to relaxing. There are only four tables, five counter stools, and a couch; which can fill up quickly in a hyper-busy area. The standard handicap table is nonexistent. On another note, a password combo is necessary to access the rest room. Forget about a drive-thru. It is attached to a Panda Express and Jamba Juice. ...  ...   This Starbuck's needs some work to be the third place that it is supposed to be. I would not be surprised if Starbuck's rebuilds this location nearby as a modern third place with a drive-thru. ...  ... *This Starbuck's is shown in an incorrect location. I checked into a Decatur Boulevard location that shows this store. Oh well. ...  ... The 2013 Yelp 100. Review #160


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (159 chars)
I was in the area and needed some caffeine.  The baristas were friendly and quick, and I was on my way in a short time.  There's  not a whole lot more to say.


................................................................................
LOCATION #134:  address="5576 Boulder Hwy"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89122"  (14 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (390 chars)
This is a Great Location,Its Fast on the Drive Thru and the Barristas onthe Inside are all nice and friendly.Compared to the Location at Galleria, this place is Speedy Gonzales fast.I live right next to this location,If needing Caffeine,I hit before I go anywhere else,other location can not B trusted to do as great a Job or as fast!All five stars and two thumbs up!Keep up the good work!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (164 chars)
I stopped going for awhile and the people there totally remembered me AND my drink.  Sometimes it's even ready before I get up to pay.  Talk about great service!!!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (455 chars)
I agree with Mike G, this location has pleasant barista's.  I've been hit on by two of them.  One played for the other team.  Still flattering in my book. ...  ... Once my wife was with me.  She was amused.  Really. ...  ... Seriously, though, I do like this location.  I've probably been here 10 times and had good service every time.  I often get a Mocha, extra hot.  Actually scalding.  They'll make it that way for me.  No waiver to sign or anything!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (180 chars)
Their drive through is hit or miss....sometimes it's super long and other times it's crazy fast.  You just never know.  ... But the coffee is consistent and the staff is friendly.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (176 chars)
I stopped here to meet a friend from out of town that I was taking on a hike at Lake Mead.  Excellent service.  Very pleasant baristas.  Quad espresso over ice.  It was great!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (145 chars)
Good, solid Starbucks location.  I have been here a handful of times.  They have been fast and get the orders right.  What else can you ask for?


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (103 chars)
customer service is always great here :-) never too busy and there always fast so thats perfect to me.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (498 chars)
this is a good store , they make good drinks and the people are very nice. the workers from the restaurant next store are always sitting at the tables outside the entrance by the pick up counter making it so other guests can not relax at the tables. would have given another star but every time i get my drink there is whip cream on it even thou i tell them no whip. i see them taking it off for people at drive up  also so they are just like robots and put the drink together like Starbucks says.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (436 chars)
My experiences with this location are all drive thru. I cannot attest to the barrista's or the inside of the place but they are pretty fast and friendly here. ...  ... It's your standard starbucks. It doesn't have the people that I love at my old location near my old house so maybe that's why I am lacking a little luster in this review.  ...  ... But they are good with the drinks and have not messed up anything I have ever ordered.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (410 chars)
I've cut back on my caffeine intake ever since I peaked at 10 cups a day and started getting heart palpitations - erm not so pleasant - but I'm still up for coffee every once in a blue moon. ...  ... The new Pikes Peak Roast is strong and not too bitter - amazing, a good basic coffee at Starbucks, what's this place coming to.  This location has pleasant baristas, never a line, a little off the beaten path.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (386 chars)
I've been generally satisfied with this place except for one incident today when they screwed up the syrup on my cinnamon dolce frappuccino. I've had this particular flavor every other day for frappuccino happy hour, and when this came out tasting like a caramel or possibly a coffee frappuccino, I was fairly disappointed. I expect consistency from chains, and it didn't happen today.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (299 chars)
Basic Starbucks. Busy drivethru. ...  ... No "I'll be with you in a few". or " Just a minute". ...  ... We sat there and waited a few minutes before anyone came over the speaker. ... Odd, because the drive thru was not empty. ...  ... Ordered our drinks, they tasted decent..and we went on our way.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (56 chars)
Starbucks....need I say more? Caffeine...Im good to go!


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (175 chars)
Slow. Slow. Slow. Slow. Slow. Is the slowest moving group of employees a live!  If you want to age while you wait for coffee come here!!!!!   Remember Slow. Slow. Slow. Slow!


................................................................................
LOCATION #135:  address="5715 S Eastern Ave Southeast"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89119"  (20 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (760 chars)
Love,Love,Love this particular Location.It has a great outdoor seating area and the inside is nice and new.I got a Venti Caramel Ribbon Crunch Frappucino,Extra crunch.The Frap wwas only okay-Maybe coz I got a Venti, am a Grande Kinda Girl.So it was too too much but tasted fine.The Staff is busy and efficient,its possible if U get bad service, coffee or tea its bcoz they are steadily busy-Drive thru is busy too(patience).They offered(previously) 2remake or substitute my drink if I didn't like what I ordered?All good in my book and I recommend it Highly.Plus Free Wi-Fi and comfortable seating, Oh yeah A/C works great so great place to get a cool drink and escape the 120degree weather.Would strongly suggest it for 1st coffee dates or business meetings.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (480 chars)
This is my favorite Starbucks! I stop here often, I like the fresh coffee, food and pastries! The employees are kind and efficient (especially the drive through (Michael) he always has a great smile and willing to answer questions on different selections and is knowledgeable about the different coffees for sale at the moment, which is nice because I don't have to go in and look, I can trust his judgement because I know he has studied the coffee of the month! The best for me!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (289 chars)
Yippee, a real Starbucks! So many of those Casino hotels have Starbucks in them but I just cannot think if those as real locations.  ...  ... We found two nice comfy chairs to relax and enjoy our lattes, which were as expected and not as high priced as some of the Starbucks on the strip!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1072 chars)
Though I'm not a coffee drinker, I like this place. ... They have a large variety of breads, cakes, buns, etc., all of which I've sampled. ... I imagine that they all go very well with hot coffee. ... I've tried some of their cold coffee drinks and their pretty good. ... There is ample parking and seating. ... The bathroom is clean, the whole place in general is clean. ... Here's something unique...I've been their every week for the past month, and I've seen the bug exterminator there twice (he sprayed the outside of the building). ... Some of you might think that this is a negative but I view it as a positive. ... They are obviously taking precautions to avoid a potential infestation. ... I think that's commendable, whether they've had past problems or not. ... They don't pressure people to buy something, so you can just work on your laptop, or relax for a while (but people always order coffee). ... The service is good, and they even bring your order to the table if they're not swamped. ... It's a nice, quiet place to get out of the sun and grab a snack.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (446 chars)
We went there early (6:30 am or so) on a Tuesday morning. We were staying near Main Street Station, and this was a convenient location that was easier to access than some of the Starbucks in the Fremont area.  ...  ... Staff was friendly and efficient and our drinks were good. Everything including the bathrooms were cleaned and stocked. At that time of day plenty of room to work and reliable wifi. Exactly what I expect and like at Starbucks.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (307 chars)
This is a much overlooked Starbucks at the eastern edge of McCarran by Russell and Eastern. ...  ... There is a drive through which can present a problem when it's busy.  The drive through cars waiting can sometimes block the parking spots. ...  ... The inside has many tables and it's laid out quite well.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (269 chars)
Normal Starbucks. Nothing special about it. They always make my drinks the way I want it. Friendly staff & their drive thru is quick. If you're going to park & go inside make sure you don't park near the drive thru because the line gets long & you will get blocked in.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (216 chars)
My go to starbucks when im in dire need of my iced cafe americano. There service is pretty good most of the times. They have this one male worker that seems like he hates his job and doesn't want to be there though.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (128 chars)
Nice and clean location. Service is friendly but, a little slow. This specific location seems a little under staffed sometimes.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (89 chars)
Really nice staff, just a little tricky to get to if you are not familiar with the area.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (542 chars)
It's a Starbucks just like all other Starbucks, only this one is constantly busy.  It always seems to be near impossible to find somewhere to sit down and enjoy the cup of coffee you just ordered.  With that said the employees always seem to get my drink right and out to me quickly.  They are well trained and friendly. ...  ... The drive thru is difficult to maneuver into, especially if you are in a large vehicle.  Also, the shopping center is difficult to get into and get out of especially if you want to make a left turn when leaving.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (273 chars)
This is a no frills Starbucks. It's a drive-thru so that's handy, but the parking lot is so cramped it can get really backed up and cause a problem when they're busy. Service was standard. They are pretty quick and I don't have to wait too long when I'm waiting in my car.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (37 chars)
Lots of seating inside and on patio.


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (452 chars)
Disappointed in Starbucks today. My Venti quad caramel macchiato was horrible.  ...  ... I looked on the outside of the cup to see what They gave me and there was no white paper or writing on the cup.  ...  ... Whatever they made me wasn't what I ordered . I can't say they were busy at 0530 on a Sunday with me and one other car in the drive thru.  ...  ... Disappointing Starbucks. The staff at the drive thru was friendly that's why u have 2 stars.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (316 chars)
The process at this store is really slow and disorganized. No one really looks like they know what they are doing, and the service is extremely slow. The trash was overflowing and the cafe tables were dirty. They did clean them partially once while I was here, but after about 30 min, not the required every 10 min.


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (278 chars)
Terrible customer service.  I think they burned my drink because I sent it back.  I said no ice and it felt like everyone rolled their eyes.  Starbucks should have a laid back feel, not a diva feel.  Wanna be a diva?  Drink rockstar and quit Starbucks.  Love lattes though.  :)


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (29 chars)
worst drive thru design ever


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (813 chars)
Horrible.  I am a strict vegan.  I ordered a latte with soy milk at the drive trying thru and drove off.  Halfway to work & 6 sips in I realized something tastes off.  I opened the cup to discover whipped cream at the top of my cup.  I am enraged!  Obviously if someone orders soy they are either vegan or lactose intolerant so adding whipped cream defeats the purpose & makes no sense.  I called to complain & the manager offered to make me a new drink (too late, I was already at work for my 7am shift) or I could come back later for a free coffee voucher.  No thanks, I dont want your mediocre coffee.  Do yourself a favor and drive down the street to Sunrise Coffee on Sunset, east of Eastern.  They have an amazing,  competent staff, & the quality of their coffee is 100% better than Starbucks burnt coffee.


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (553 chars)
Will never come here again.  Ordered a Cafe Vanilla Cappuccino at 8:45pm, along with 2 other drinks for some employees at the business where I work at.  I came back to the business and realized that this drink was all whipped cream (which has since melted) and barely any drink.  I came back to the store around 9:01pm, and asked politely if they would either get me a new drink or refund the money I paid since I know they cant make another one.  They basically told me to F-Off, we're closed, come back tomorrow.  Avoid this location like the plague.


REVIEW #20:  1 stars  (506 chars)
Ok this is suppose to be Starbucks, where we pay an arm and a leg for coffee and SERVICE! If this place wasn't so close to my house, we'd avoid it. ... They are the worst! The server Greg doesn't know what are in the drinks and doesn't ask for your name so other people get to pick up your drinks. ... The other workers aren't much better. In fact while I'm sitting here writing this review there's another customer asking for a manager-lol! The guy responded we're all assistants here, what a load of bs.


................................................................................
LOCATION #136:  address="591 N Eastern Ave Ste 110"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89101"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (154 chars)
I liked the convenience of the drive through. They kind of took their time but other then that they gave me what I asked for and they were nice doing it!


REVIEW #2:  3 stars  (5058 chars)
STARBUCKS (Part I) ...  ... Being a quasi-Starbucks junkie pretty much gives me an irrevocable consumer right and reasonable amount of credibility to throw in my $50 worth of opinion.  Why $50? because that's how much my automatic SB gold card reload is worth every month.   ...  ... I grew up in the PNW, mostly in the Seattle area where Starbucks was born, and where locals, ironically and deliberately avoid Starbucks and patronize other local and smaller coffee shops, where my friends and I frequented Vivace Coffee on Broadway in Capitol Hill.  I didn't turn to Starbucks until after I left the US and was stationed overseas.  It was one of those things I did whenever I felt homesick and wanted to touch base with the motherland and felt the need to re-enforce my being an American. Then, it grew on me. My drink of choice:   (Summer/Spring) Venti Iced Mocha, light whip or (Fall/Winter) Extra Hot Venti Mocha, no whip.   ...  ... My all time favorite Starbucks has to be the one in Rhodes, Decadence, Greece (my review will be forthcoming).  My least favorite has to be this 24/7 Starbucks with drive Thur. ...  ... Starbucks is Starbucks wherever you go. You'll get the very same mediocre pricey coffee drink they're famous for, but the only way one sets apart from the other is the degree of customer service, the ambience and the way the general interior areas conducive to enjoying a cup of joe.  As expected in any Starbucks, you will get the customary greetings albeit superficial.  The staff is trained and programmed to say and do that accompanied by their banal smiles and trite perkiness.  Once your order is rung,  you're nothing but a tall, grande or a venti cup of coffee :).  I've spent numerous hours here almost on a daily basis.  I've  come to know some of the regulars and have become oblivious to everything not so good about this place. I have to admit, however,  that sometimes it does get under my skin.  It's like going to a reputable Chinese restaurant where you know and what you only care about is the excellent food, and will keep on coming back despite the fact (and you being fully aware) that "good customer service" is something that is not and will never be on the menu.  The only difference is that I come here not for their excellent drinks but because  of its proximity to where I live (accessibility) and it being open 24/7 (convenience). ...  ... This Starbucks is, most often than not, packed with students during school seasons btwn noon and midnight (especially towards the evening) who are studying (?) hours on end.  Some with just an order of one drink and multiple free refills of iced water, some bringing with them lunch bags, dinner boxes, veggies in Ziploc bags, bottles of soda pop, munchies and snacks in small plastic containers, or food ordered from nearby restaurants (pizza, rice bowls, wraps), and thermos bottles.  I've seen some bring their blankets, extra sweatshirts, and some even show up in their PJ's.   The campers are pretty much the same faces and same group of students just about every day!. Good luck if you're thinking about coming here during midterms or final exams. This Starbucks is the unofficial library/group study room of the various Las Vegas academes.   ...  ... Busier than your typical Starbucks, this location's staff (or understaff) gets so busy(overworked), to the point of being overwhelmed, that their bathrooms are hardly checked and cleaned.  And since there are always cramming students camping in, the actual lounge is hardly kept cleaned and kept in order.  More often than not, you'll have to ask and remind the staff that they're out of  tissue paper in the bathroom, or out of napkins, milk or sugar.  I can only assume that they do all their organizing and cleaning up when the flow of customers slows down (during wee hours).  I also noticed how fast their staff turnover is.  It seems like they have new baristas/staff every other month or so (unless they rotate their shifts).  Their wi-fi connection's reliability is mediocre at best. There was even a time when it was literally down for over a month.  The staff knew about it but there were no signs saying that they were having wifi issues, and if you asked the staff,  their response was : "Yeah, we know!".  (it was during those times when I didn't see any campers, and the tables and chairs were for the taking).     ...  ... Don't get me wrong.  You'll get your drink alright but you have to pay special attention (or literally stand by the pick up counter) or you will never know that your name/order has been called and your drink has been sitting on the counter!  Had they ever gotten my drink wrong?  Yes, on more than one occasion.  Sometimes it didn't bother me and didn't ask for a replacement and sometimes I did (contingent upon my mood, or how busy the barista was).  Besides, the staff can be genuinely friendly and chatty, when not busy.   ...  ... This may be my least favorite Starbucks and yet it's the one place I always choose to go to and go back to.......over and over again.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (414 chars)
This Starbucks location isn't much different than any other Starbucks.  ... The staff here are friendly enough and it's never really been packed anytime I've been there, and I am usually there about 4-5 days a week. ... The facility is usually pretty clean. The parking situation here isn't the best, but it's not terrible. ... You can get the same over-priced, mediocre coffee we're all used to here, no problem.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (200 chars)
Not much to say friendly sometimes I've gotten my orders mixed up like 4 times already longest I've waited would be 15 mins for mines but this is the closest starbucks so gotta get used to it for now


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (141 chars)
Across from Walgreen's. ...  ... Average as far as Starbucks go. Service wasn't outstanding. ...  ...  Not much to write about, so I'm done.


REVIEW #6:  2 stars  (308 chars)
Service was awful my brothers and I went in to Starbucks today we weren't even line and were looking at the menu the older lady at the cashier kept rolling her eyes at us and seemed annoyed that we weren't ready to Order her nasty attitude and impatientness helped determine that we aren't coming here again


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (274 chars)
If you ever need the secret to crafting a cappuccino without any espresso, this is the place to go. I can forgive one honest mistake. Repeating it, then not offering to make it right is just embarrassing. ...  ... Only go here if you don't care that you get what you order.


................................................................................
LOCATION #137:  address="600 E Warm Springs Rd Southeast"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89119"  (15 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (740 chars)
Superior motivation, stable crew.  ...  ... WARNING: This location primarily serves local businesses and the employees who work there who are regulars at this store. There are over  600 oeople within walking distance of this cramped, standing-room only, non-drive-thru location. ...  ... You have been warned. ...  ... If you are a tourist toting a rolling suit case, spoiled by drive thru's, or dwelling for the wi-fi or smoking lounge, this isn't your destination...pick another zoo to visit and break out your GPS and look both ways on your way out. ...  ... Those of us regulars who 'live' in the neighborhood appreciate this team for their wonderful motivation, lickity-split quickness, and mild (but weak) attempt to keep prices low.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (216 chars)
Great service, great chai drink (made just like it should be! )...and THANK YOU for having butter for the pumpkin bread. ...  ... The restroom, beverage prep area, and general seating areas were clean too...BONUS!!!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (14 chars)
fast service.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (883 chars)
I used to come to this location all the time, as I work around the corner.  ... Every employee here knew my name, and knew my drink when I would walk in.   ...  ... I stopped going for a while, just cutting back my spending and my coffee intake... ...  ... The staff has completely changed, which made me sad...I always got such great service from the other girls.  But...everyone here now is super nice as well.  I've been in a time or two since the change over and have never had bad service.  ...  ... This location is very small, and is usually pretty busy, but I've been known to set up shop with my laptop on one of the smaller tables early in the morning before the rush.  Its crowded and loud, so I recommend headphones if you don't want to hear all the noise. ...  ... Drinks are standard, like every other Starbucks.  What sets them apart is their friendly staff.   ... :D


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (745 chars)
The layout is a little whacky but it's in a great location and it's a lifesaver!  I remember my first time in Vegas a few years ago waking up with a killer headache and wanting to eat the coffee grounds in the hotel room because I needed a jolt and a migraine cure.  That's when I first found this Starbucks and it was my savior.  Pretty sure I stuck a straw in a Venti and sucked away while I chewed Advil LiquiGels like they were Skittles.  Anyways, I was just back a couple months ago and frequented it again for a few days.  Customer service has always been friendly for as busy as they are.  Nothing bad to say about them!  Make sure you locate this one the night before so you can crawl over there whenever you wake up the next afternoon.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (655 chars)
No Drive Thru, outdoor seating and indoor seating is limited and the entire place seemed a bit cramped. I came in relay quick, ordered my tea, used to the restroom and took off since I was in a bit of a hurry but even to get to the restroom was strange from the design of the place.  ...  ... The parking lot is shared with a few other businesses including some large building, whatever Aristocrat is... The parking lot was pretty busy, lots of people coming and going.  ...  ... I just stopped in because I was in the area... It's just a place to come in, get a drink and go. I personally wouldn't come in here to study or anything. Good for what it is.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (374 chars)
You would think that Starbucks would get 5 stars no matter what the location.  This one doesnt.  No drive thru, so you must go in, it's cramped in there, there are very few chairs to sit and enjoy your beverage and there is almost always a line in there!  The drinks are pretty consistent, and its 4 blocks from home , so those are the only things that keep me going there.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (349 chars)
I frequent this Starbucks on a daily basis (sometimes more than once a day!) Monday thru Friday.  They have a great staff, always friendly and just an overall great team!  I must say that this Starbucks is frequently busy, but they do such a great job with the amount of people that are in there at once, definitely a good experience.  Great store!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (349 chars)
Well, what to say.. It is Starbucks! Always good, still have to remind staff, ICE FIRST! It's like, "Laces out people!" I can read the manual too I have google. ...  ... Every one here is friendly, professional and they seem pretty happy to be honest... ...  ... People watching here is good, a bit cramped, but still it's Starbucks, coffee, yummz!


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (163 chars)
Small but busy Starbucks, no drive thru, indoor and outdoor seating.  Busy all day because of huge number of nearby business offices.  Free wi-fi, treat receipts.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (145 chars)
Pretty good, a majority of the time it's really busy inside. Drinks wise just taste like any other starbucks. Very good customer service though.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (131 chars)
Not real quick but everyone was so damn friendly! This goes for all of the area Starbucks BTW but we frequented this one the most.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (975 chars)
Small Starbucks in a business park. It's surrounded by offices so it caters to the people who work in those office buildings. It's much smaller than your normal Starbucks, so don't expect to come here and lay out your laptop, papers, food, and spend a few hours here doing work or relaxing.  ...  ... I'm not giving 3 stars for the place, but for the drinks I've gotten from here thus far. Compared to the Starbucks on my side of town, where my drinks always come out pretty much perfect, and the Starbucks on the Air Force Base, where I also frequent, this Starbucks gave me "okay" drinks. ...  ... For instance yesterday I ordered my typical Non-Fat Ice White Mocha with no whip and I left with it. When I got in my car and was going down the road, I took a sip and thought it tasted way, way too bitter. It almost had a sour undertone to it.  ...  ... I understand not every drink is going to come out perfect, but I've yet to receive a perfect drink from this Starbucks.


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (785 chars)
It's a Starbucks, so usually it should get a 4-star rating to just begin.  HOWEVER.... ...  ... The seating area is crowded and to navigate your way to the cashier to order is a mess.  The place where you get your drinks from the barista is also right against the door which means if there is a drink line, then that blocks incoming and outgoing traffic.  Along with the crowded seating area, trying to get coffee here is like trying to navigate an accident where it goes from 4 lanes to 1. ...  ... Drinks wise, it's typical after Starbucks had their worldwide shutdown training.   Consistent drinks across the board.   But the whole having to navigate through a sea of people is not really my taste in store layout.  It'd be a lot better to have pick-up on the far end of the store.


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (236 chars)
When I'm in serious need of a caffeine fix, this place does the trick. It doesn't have a drive thru, so not as convenient as some but sometimes cravings can't be thwarted by a little detail like that. Service is standard and efficient.


................................................................................
LOCATION #138:  address="6105 S Fort Apache Rd Ste 300 Spring Valley"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89148"  (36 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (483 chars)
Customer service is great, just as you expect at any other Starbucks location. Restrooms are pretty clean and they have an average sized indoor seating area. ...  ... My favorite part,... So I hate the sun but love sitting outdoors, sounds dumb right? lol Well that's me, I like to sit out in the shade, not in direct sunlight and this location has exactly what I look for in a coffee shop as far as outdoor seating is concerned, covered seating area and not umbrellas to rely on :)


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (482 chars)
The best Starbucks in the southwest for the mornings. My roommate and I live right in between this one and the one on flamingo and we prefer this one. Karen is such a joy in the morning she always has a happy presence and is very very sweet! The drive thru is quick, I've waited max time about 10 minutes at 830am on a weekday. They all work very well as a team with efficiency and precision. Everyone always has a smile on their face and it's just a very happy Starbucks to visit.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (113 chars)
Great location and the staff is super helpful and friendly!!  Had a list and they took it in stride.  Great job.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (77 chars)
Marty the manager is always super friendly and makes a mean Carmel Macchiato


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (66 chars)
Best Starbucks location in Vegas. I've been a customer for years.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (35 chars)
Best Starbucks on the west side!!!


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (33 chars)
iced green tea... all year long!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (547 chars)
My go-to Starbucks near my office. It's just 55 seconds away. The drive thru line can really get out of hand but it moves along pretty fast. They never mess up on my order. And nothing negative to say about the staff. Usually they are eager to help.  ...  ... Coming out of Starbucks to turn left Onto Fort Apache again can get pretty crazy. The 2 way stop is ridiculous. If you're there during a pretty busy time you'll be waiting at that stop for a while. I suggest putting a 4 way stop. But that has nothing to do with Starbucks. Just ranting.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (382 chars)
The drive thru can be a bit of a wait in the mornings, but it is on my way to work! Service has always been outstanding and who can beat a Caramel Frap or an iced Green Tea for a hot or cold day? I do have to say that 3-5 bucks for Starbucks definitely adds up and if you decide to get a banana nut bread or something you can go broke eventually. It's a chain, but a good chain. =)


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (329 chars)
I made a quick stop here after visiting a neighbor in Southern Hills Hospital.  The staff was great - very personable, quick, and competent.  I had no pastry, but they had a nice selection. ...  ... This is out of my way for stopping more often, but if I'm in the neighborhood, I certainly wouldn't drive by without stopping in.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (293 chars)
This location is very busy but the staff was very attentive and the service was very fast. Internet was free at this location and the speeds were fast enough for me to upload some pics from my phone to Facebook in less than a  minute.  ...  ... You have to try out their cool lime refreshers.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (280 chars)
Great as always. I love the PSL.... ...  ... This location has lots of seating inside and out.  ...  ... Drive thru is always super busy ...  ... Great location! ...  ... Only issue is the music is much too loud for a coffee shop. It should just be background music. Not so loud.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (181 chars)
Easy 4 stars. ... Have never had a problem at this location. ... Clean shop with good service. ... Venti Soy Carmel Macchiato No Whip. ... Grab your drink and keep the line moving!


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (180 chars)
Good Starbucks. They know my unique order almost every time. They are friendly most of the time. Faster then normal drive thru. Karen is the best in the drive thru! No complaints.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (178 chars)
been here several times people are nice pastries are good except brown sugar walnut cookies   service is fast  never had a mistake on my order   only based on my 30 or so visits


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (123 chars)
The staff was great - very personable, quick, and competent. It's Starbucks- I got exactly what I expected. No complaints.


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (121 chars)
Drive Thru can get a little long (like with all Starbucks...) but the inside is pretty quick. Everyone is very friendly!


REVIEW #18:  4 stars  (55 chars)
Much quicker to go in and order than wait in your car.


REVIEW #19:  4 stars  (27 chars)
Fast service. Great drinks


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (963 chars)
I love Starbucks but not particularly this location. ...  ... I frequent this location because it's closest to my home, but there are so many things that bother me about it. ...  ... 1) It's always freezing here, bring a jacket. I've complained to the staff and they tell me their thermostat has never worked properly. At least they are nice about it, but not much they can do. ...  ... 2) There's a crazy man who frequents here. He talks to himself and talks about other customers under his breath. It's rude and he talks loud enough that everyone around can hear what he's saying. I've come close to punching him out a few times.. Thank God it hasn't come to that yet. ...  ... 3) I've been coming here 5 or more days a week for nearly a year now. I'm happy to say the staff has recently learned my name. ...  ... The drinks are good, the staff is helpful, and they have a drive thru. But I wouldn't recommend stopping if there's another Starbucks on your way.


REVIEW #21:  3 stars  (680 chars)
I am not an adventurous coffee or tea drinker. I like it strong and black. Do not alter or dilute the flavor of a good coffee or tea with additives. Starbucks does not have the best coffee. They tend to always have that over roasted, almost burnt flavor to their blend.  ...  ... What I do like about this location is the seating. Time to recuperate was a necessity after a rough brunch. A chill in the air during mini golf helped the process, but a hot drink with a punch was needed to sober us all up. We spent almost three hours camping out at a table discussing various matter and never felt like we needed to get up. When a coffee shop can accommodate campers, it is a plus.


REVIEW #22:  3 stars  (624 chars)
Came for sobering Yelperazzi after brunch at DW.  ...  ... I ordered a soy vanilla rooibos tea latte which was pretty good and not too sweet at all. My only thing is it would have been nice if they put more soy in it than they did.  ...  ... Customer service was fast enough. The seats were plenty enough and standard. It served us well for chatting though. When among friends 3 hours can just zoom.  ...  ... There wasn't really anything that "stood out" for this experience compared to other Starbucks. That's a good or bad thing depending on the person that it's the same everywhere. ...  ... (Yelp 100 Challenge 20/100)


REVIEW #23:  3 stars  (543 chars)
I tried coming here at 7am on a weekday which was bad, huge line made me come back on a Saturday at which time I ordered a cookie crunch machiatto frap, I was interested in a Cap'N Crunch Frap, but I didn't have the recipe on-hand since it's from the secret menu so I opted out of that order since the girl didn't know it off the top of her head since she said alot of people come in with new secret menu orders, so it wasn't a big deal but the cookie frap I got wasnt bad, but a little too much ice blended in so it lost a bit of the flavor.


REVIEW #24:  3 stars  (444 chars)
First time I went:  Meh.  Not great, not bad.  Just okay. ...  ... Second time I went:  Really? We were standing there waiting and you didn't tell us our drinks were ready.  Bad customer service mojo. ...  ... Third time I went:  Meh again.  At least this time I was told when my drink was ready and the cashier was nice enough. ...  ... There's a better one up the street on Ft. Apache & Tropicana.  Just a few blocks away.  Go there instead.


REVIEW #25:  3 stars  (354 chars)
This location is a hit or miss, which can be said about all Starbucks locations. And I'm talking about my drink accuracy really. I frequent this one because it's the closest to my house and my pit stop before I hit the freeway. Service is, okay.The baristas taking my order through the drive-thru usually sound rushed, but at least with a friendly tone.


REVIEW #26:  2 stars  (1250 chars)
Unfortunately, as much as I L O V E Starbucks, I can not give this particular one more than two stars. Actually Id like to give it one but thats somewhat contradictory to my love for Starbucks in general. So its a two. And why you might ask.... well I have written another Starbucks accolade here on Yelp and it is in regards to the use of venti or trenta cups for something other than a venti or trenta drink. I love green tea, but have you ever gotten the really dark color one that looks like they made it last night and are now serving it to you today? Tea that is so dark and strong I dont like very much. If I did I would order black instead if green. Anyways, so I always order a grande green tea in a Trenta cup (at my starbucks on Rainbow). However, the Fort Apache Starbucks complained about how expensive the cups are for the Trenta (may I remind you that the refills are 50 cents and I do bring my own cup in most of the time) and told me I could not have a grande in a trenta for this reason. Somehow this doesnt seem logical to me. They want to charge me 2.90 something for water and ice ----- however you can get a trenta sized ice water for free??? excuse me? Nevermind, Rainbow said theyd give it to me in a trenta anytime I want ;)


REVIEW #27:  2 stars  (952 chars)
I've been going to this Starbucks for years and have never had a complaint until now. I ordered the vanilla machaito, but I wanted it blended. The girl told me that I couldn't have it that way. Ummm, why not? There's a sign right behind you that says, "Make It You Way", or something like that. So why couldn't I get a blended vanilla machaito? I don't know if the girl was just being lazy or what, and I was on my way to work so I didn't bother to argue this out with her. Instead I ordered a vanilla bean frap with two shots.  I finally got it, after more than five minutes of waiting when there was only one person before me.  I tasted it as I walked out and it was disgustingly sweet.  Too sweet. So not only was I disappointed for the second during this visit, now I'm just annoyed by the whole experience overall. I'm hoping my next visit will be better. I'm giving them one more shot before I head down to the one at Ft Apache and Trop instead.


REVIEW #28:  2 stars  (529 chars)
This location constantly messes up my order. When I do ask them to fix it, they do it with an attitude. Actually, they take my order with an attitude as well. I'm never satisfied with the location. I went today and Michael was the guy in the drive thru. Did not smile once and gave me a sluggish attitude no matter how cheerful I was to him. If you don't want to work there, don't. Or step it up Michael. People like happy people. ... Another thing; they never apologize or offer any kind of sympathy for making the wrong order.


REVIEW #29:  2 stars  (520 chars)
I like Starbucks. This one let me down. My bf got me my favorite drink and sandwich as a surprise breakfast. The drink is good. Iced passion tea with apple juice and no sweetener. But the sandwich... Wtf. It's supposed to be a roasted tomato, spinach, & mozzarella panino. It's 90% bread. And although the bread is fine... The sandwich itself is disappointing. I've had better from starbeezy. I would add my own cheese and spinach to it if I could but because we just moved, I don't think I have either anymore. Bummer.


REVIEW #30:  2 stars  (499 chars)
I come here everyday, order the SAME drink and they still don't know my name and act confused with my drink at times getting it wrong. It's very annoying. Also when I come with family or friends they ask "is that it" after every drink, when they should say "what else can I get for u?" Which opens opportunity for up selling and is polite. Manage should know this... I used to be a supervisor there. The baristas make no effort for small talk, I would def be nicer and tip if they were nicer to me.


REVIEW #31:  2 stars  (185 chars)
Staff at this location don't seem to be friendly at all.  Been to this location few times and stopped going.  They just seem cold heartless robots so we stopped going to this location.


REVIEW #32:  1 stars  (1258 chars)
I'm writing this bad review on principle. ...  ... We were in the area for DW Bistro and decided to spend our 30-minute wait at Starbucks. I ordered some sort of passion iced tea and then stood aside as I patiently waited. A couple who ordered after me seemed to be good friends with the barista and they got both of their drinks ahead of me. OK not a big deal. But then another customer also received his drink before mine showed up. At that point, I decided to get closer to the counter. Finally, the barista puts down some sort of iced drink in front of me. I didn't catch the name, but it looked like it could be mine, so I grabbed it and took a few sips. At that point, the barista asks the next customer if he was waiting for a drink. It turns out that I had grabbed his. I put it back down and tell her I've been waiting for my drink for a while. She then promptly hands me my iced tea. Where was that 5-10 minutes ago? ...  ... I apologize for the long journey with no payoff. I'm not sure why my drink took so long, but they didn't seem to care and offered no apologies. Similarly, I felt no remorse about taking someone else's drink and forcing them to make him another. ...  ... I also feel no remorse for giving this Starbucks a one-star review.


REVIEW #33:  1 stars  (906 chars)
I've never had my drink orders messed up more often that I do at this particular location.  I'm not ordering complex things either, just simple menu items with either non-fat or soy milk.  But so often I get handed something that's a bit off.   ...  ... They also don't seem to prepare enough pastries in the morning, because 90% of the time by the time I arrive around 9ish the few items that I usually like are long gone.  Whereas every other location still has an ample supply.  So that is pretty annoying. ...  ... Also the drive-thru line's construction is pretty short, thou the line can get so long it winds into the parking lot blocking off the normal traffic flow.  Sucks because this location is the closest one to my house, but with all the mistakes, lack of pastries, and the ridiculous lines, I have been driving a few miles further one direction or another in order to hit a different store.


REVIEW #34:  1 stars  (832 chars)
I would give this place no stars.  ...  ... Yesterday, I came to order a hot marble mocha machiatto in the morning just before going into work. They repeated my order twice and even said it again when handing me my machiatto. When I got to work, it was completely dark and it read mocha. I just left it sitting for hours and then after my shift, I went back and complained about the mess up. They quickly fixed it and it had tasted great. ...  ... Today, I ordered the same marble mocha machiatto again. It read " white mocha " so I figured it was correct, since sometimes they ring it up like that. I got home and it was completely dark again and tasted just like mocha.  ...  ... Just because they say its the right order, do they even know what exactly they are giving us? I am very disappointed and have just wasted more money.


REVIEW #35:  1 stars  (528 chars)
If I could give zero stars I would!! My husband and I both got food poisoning from this location!!! We both ate breakfast sandwiches and both suffered greatly, to the point that I had to miss work and go to the hospital! We called and got an " I'm ... Sorry" then wrote in and got offered a $20 GC, ( no thanks) and now am waiting on a regional director for further details. It's really awful what there lack of care put us through!!! ...  ... Update: regional offered us another gift certificate to Starbucks.... Um no thanks.


REVIEW #36:  1 stars  (509 chars)
I will give this FApache location zero star . I use Starbucks 5 times a week,   I went this morning to order toll mocha n baked cake. I requested to make ex ex ex hot, they didn't make hot enough.  I check my receipt when I was waiting my coffee , they charge me grande size which is $1 overcharge . I ask sever but she told me to go cashier, so I need wait another 5 min after I got coffee. Almost I gave up n leave the store he open 2nd register for me.  ... Service is very bad compare to other Starbucks.


................................................................................
LOCATION #139:  address="6365 S Rainbow Blvd Spring Valley"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89118"  (26 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (447 chars)
I'm a Starbucks freak, however had had horrible experiences at some locations. But this location is great. I would stop in on the way to church or work. The drive they is always quick and they have never messed up an order. Recently the price they have me for my drink was high, so I questioned them about it. For the inconvenience they gave me my drink for free! Great customer service and the baristas are down to earth! Try this Starbucks out!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (381 chars)
I love Starbucks in general but this is one of my go to places, the staff here is always so nice, expecially Kyle.  Today I'm trying a "new to me" drink. It's a Chai tea latte with soy, no water with vanilla, so creamy, sweet and hot just the way I wanted it. My usual is boring latte with nonfat milk... lol. Today is in the 60s and my yummy drink is exactly what I needed today.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (231 chars)
Very reliable and consistent service at this location...team always greets me with a smile in the morning (very important to someone that needs their java early in the a.m.) and the coffee prep area is always stocked and clean....


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (193 chars)
Best Starbucks ever! Every time I go my drink is always made to perfection :) this time I ordered an iced coffee, with white mocha and vanilla with cream, shaken and light ice. It was perfect!


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (140 chars)
I love this Starbucks. It is walking distance from my office, so I come here often. Friendly staff and they rarely ever get anything wrong!


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (92 chars)
Good location. ...  ... Quality good. ...  ... Staff is friendly. ...  ... It is Starbucks.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (2406 chars)
"Kentucky Fried Inbred" ...  ... The following is how I spent my half hour at Starbucks today:  ...  ... "Dat yer car out dare?" ...  ... I looked up from my magazine. Beside me stood a gap-toothed midget hillbilly with hat pulled low and jeans pulled high. I looked out the window. Roughly fifteen vehicles sat parked in the lot. I sighed. This was going to be a long conversation. ...  ... "Which car?" I said. ...  ... "Da Crown Vic! Da blue one!" He pointed excitedly out the window like a four-year-old who'd just seen a bird. ...  ... "Yes," I said, assuming he'd just dented it with a pick-up truck. ...  ... "FER REALS???!!! I HAD A CROWN VIC BEFORE!!!!!"  ...  ... Small world. ...  ... He looked at me with narrowed, trailer park eyes. "Jew a cop?" ...  ... "No," I said. "I'm not a cop." ...  ... He looked relieved. "I don't mean to bodder ya none but did da cops ever pull y'over fer yer license plate?" ...  ... I mentally added an hour to my earlier estimate of a long conversation.  ...  ... "Why would I get pulled over for my license plate?" I asked. ...  ... "'Cuz it's all faded. Don't reflect none at night. I gotta teakit fer mine." ...  ... "No," I said. "I never got a ticket. But I might now since you mentioned it." ...  ... "HAW HAW HAW HAW HAWWWWWW!!!! Din't mean to jinx ya none! HAW HAW ... HAW HAWWWWWW!!!!" ...  ... God, I thought. I must have been a real MF'er in my past life. ...  ... "What year is dat car a yers?" ...  ... "2005," I said. ...  ... "DANG IT ALL!!!! MINE WAS A 2005 TOOOOOOOO!!!!" He cackled uncontrollably. Wiping spittle from his cracked lips he said, "How long ya had it?" ...  ... "I bought it new in 2005." ...  ... "Dat dare's right nice."  ...  ... And with that he walked off to join his pal--a taller, fatter version of himself.  ...  ... I returned my attention to my magazine and coffee, sipping the fine Pikes Place warmth as I read an article about what Mexico's richest man was doing to help the poor. I like this Starbucks because there are plenty of clean, comfortable places to sit, AND the fact it is close to THE 215--the road I take to work. The $2.43 for a venti coffee agrees with me too.  ...  ... Finally, this is my go-to Starbucks because the music is rarely on when I'm there at 6:00 AM. Nothing is worse than loud singing at that hour. Unless, of course, you meet a Kentucky Fried Inbred. ...  ... HAW HAW HAW HAW HAW!!!!!!!!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (1511 chars)
Use too come to this location every week on my days off but like too mix things up so been while since got my coffee and read my book (the True Blood series). I never had bad experience at this Starbucks. I know Starbucks is Starbucks so hard too compare between one store too another? At this location whats nice is theres few seats can choose from plus few more outside. Depending on the weather enjoy kicking it outside having my coffee and reading a good book. Sure there not much of a view just the parking lot but if reading good book not about the view. Inside they do have two nice leather seats besides regular tables. They have ample outlets all around too plug in laptops or electronic devices most part right next too the tables. They use too have couple board games in the store could play but no more. =( ...  ... The service is great! I never look at the chalkboard with the holiday special or specials running at the time. They were nice enough too point out that it was buy one get one free at the time. Customer service liked that fact plus their always greet you with warm welcome when place your order.   ...  ... I order the holiday special creme brulee latte. I never had before. Love it! It taste just like creme brulee (without the sugar crust on top) blended nice Hot! They serve pastries, ready made food, different bottle drinks, and all coffee equipment one would need.  ...  ... Always been fan of Starbucks still am always will be. Two grande Starbucks overload for one. Soo good!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (674 chars)
For me, a Starbucks isn't a proper Starbucks if it doesn't have a drive thru. This Starbucks has a drive thru, and for me that is a big plus. It  also seems to be less busy compared to the others in the area, it's rare for me to see more then one car in line when I am there...  ...  ... On my most recent visit, the employee taking my order didn't hear it correctly,  so when I got to the window, it was the wrong size... Not only did she remake my drink very quickly but she was an absolute sweetheart while she did so.  ...  ... I don't go to Starbucks as much these days as I did in the past, but when I do need a jolt of caffeine, this is one of my favorites to go to.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (583 chars)
We were headed to the Silverton and I looked on Bucky's website to find a new stop.  I'm glad I picked this one.  It's right on the flight path for McCarran and my friends know I'm an airplane nut.  Sitting on the patio sipping my quad iced espresso was heaven watching the planes coming in for a landing at the airport. ...  ... Our drinks were made perfectly and there is a large patio area.  That was good yesterday because someone had the inside thermostat set for keeping meat frozen.  Damn it was cold inside. ...  ... The staff was polite and friendly and it was a good stop.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (514 chars)
This Starbucks has some of the nicest baristas of any location I've ever been to.  They've always been very friendly each time I've been.  And they don't lolly-gag and take forever with the orders like you'll find at some locations too.  It's also never super busy at this location, unlike a few of the other locations in the area. ...  ... They offer a drive-thru,ample indoor and outdoor seating, all the drinks and goodies you could possibly want, and great customer service.  That's a complete package for me!


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (419 chars)
This is probably my favorite Starbucks, location- and service-wise. I've never seen it get too busy, and there is plenty of indoor and outdoor seating. The employees are super cool and nice. They don't waste time getting your drink order to you like some stores do. ...  ... There is nothing outstanding about this Starbucks (some are open 24/7, have rooftop plants or two stories, etc.) but it's an excellent standby.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (324 chars)
This Starbucks is great! ...  ... Some Key Points that make this location that make it so wonderful: ... 1)  Smiling, helpful, and pleasant staff. ... 2)  Drive-thru, that typically isn't slammed. ... 3)  Clean interior, with tables in the front when the weather is nice. ...  ... As far as Starbucks go, this one is solid.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (310 chars)
My regular location before work or to hang out with my friend who lives near by.  It's usually quite and the staff is very friendly.  They have a small corner next to the barista area(?) and that is my favorite spot.  It is near the restroom and I can sit there with my laptop because power outlets are there.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (250 chars)
Honestly you can't really go wrong with coffee. I'm working in a industry where sleep is not a pleasure often permitted and naps are a limited delicacy... Thank GOD there is a Starbucks at ever corner to give you that extra boost desperately needed!


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (128 chars)
I buy Starbucks all over town for my clients and like this one very much.  The baristas are very fast, efficient and courteous.


REVIEW #17:  3 stars  (830 chars)
I pulled up to the drive thru and the girl greeted me with something like, "Hey how are you doing?" ...followed by a "what do you want?" what the...?? I ordered a tall non fat vanilla latte. I don't think it's hard to mess up on it. The drive thru wait seemed pretty long as there were only two cars in front of me. When I got to the window I asked the girl if it was a non fat vanilla latte and she confirmed yes it was. I drove off taking her word for it but when I took the first sip...UGH totally disgusting and not anything near a vanilla latte. I check to see if there were any stickers or writings on the cup describing the coffee but I didn't find anything. I already drove down a mile and I didn't want to return back to deal with it. Pretty disappointed, should have stuck with the Starbucks on rainbow and warmsprings.


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (497 chars)
So, drive thru starbacks on a saturday. Freaking circus. ...  ... The woman who takes my order, doesn't even wait for me to pull up to the speaker. The car in front of me is still closer to the speaker than I am. So, I scream my order to her. She informs me that the drink I want is "seasonal" but they can still make it, minus the topping.  ...  ... Drink was blended well, but there is confusion upon pickup. I was asked at the window what I had ordered. I think they are a little disorganized.


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (261 chars)
They close at 8:30 PM on Friday night, yeaa... ...  ... Drinks are Starbucks consistent, most of the staff were friendly people, but one employee was less than tasteful and definitely irritating. ...  ... Note: drive through is usually fast, never a long line.


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (234 chars)
Friendly folks, good coffee (although they were out of salt for the Salted Caramel Mocha). Plenty of parking & seating... Only gave 3 stars because all the chairs are uncomfortable wooden chairs, no comfy chairs. Otherwise, all good.


REVIEW #21:  2 stars  (589 chars)
Rude Barista. ...  ... It's absolutely appalling when a cashier gives you attitude and appears annoyed that you have a large order. This is the only Starbucks where the barista at the cash register- Jessie was her name - actually gave me attitude and was annoyed that I had an $85 order of 6 drinks and breakfast items. Isn't the point of being in business to actually GET business? You'd think you'd be appreciative that businesses (such as mine) were always spending large amounts at your establishment in one order. I'll be going to the Coffee Bean next door from now on. Unbelievable.


REVIEW #22:  2 stars  (414 chars)
I barely come to this Starbucks, but I rather not come to be hit on while getting my drink. And they always mess up my orders and they're not complicated. (Green tea latte w/ soy and hazelnut drizzle or PTL light ice) ...  ... I asked for them to redo my order, they ADDED more ice and they just changed the cup. They did nothing different to my drink. And there is always an attitude when I tell them to redo it.


REVIEW #23:  2 stars  (14 chars)
Rude service.


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (1366 chars)
I go to this Starbucks because it's on my way to work. No more. I ordered a trenta green tea sweetened which is what I normally order. A tall male barista with glasses prepared a black tea sweetened and placed it on the bar yelling out that it's a black tea. Seeing that I am the only customer in the store waiting to get a drink, I advise the person at the counter that I ordered a green tea. They take the black tea  from me and the same tall kid made a new drink out of the same container of black liquid that he just declared was black tea. He then put it on the bar but this time he says it's green tea. I taste it and it clearly tastes like black tea.  I then bring it to the attention of the cashier who offered to give me my money back or make a new one and the kid who made the black tea tried to argue with me by telling me it's green tea when the liquid is obviously black and the same smart ass kid made it from the same container which he earlier declared was black tea. He then tried to tell me that they changed tea leaves which is the reason why it's so dark. (I'm assuming this must be the institutionalized BS line to pacify disgruntled customers). What annoys me was there was no manager there to set that turd straight. The cashier was very nice and tried to fix the situation but you can't fix arrogance. I won't be back to that Starbucks ever.


REVIEW #25:  1 stars  (373 chars)
NEGATIVE 2 STARS!!! So when I think of starbucks I think of friendly quality service. Well u wont geit that here. Their Drive threw took FOREVER. longest wait time ever. And then on top if the Long wait they gave me the wrong thing. I was royally pissed. There is a starbucks Drive right down the street passed the freeway. And they are excellent. But this location sucks!


REVIEW #26:  1 stars  (157 chars)
Drive thru is always about a ten min wait. That's not why people take the drive thru... Seems likes the woman at the window hate their lives.. Not very nice


................................................................................
LOCATION #140:  address="651 N Rainbow Blvd Ste 110 Westside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89107"  (18 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (887 chars)
Ok, I LOVE Starbucks! Well, wait- I love it by DEFAULT because before I am a coffee and tea junkie, I am a wi-fi junkie. That said, this chain could easily be my kryptonite, except for the fact that I do some of my best work here! So it's actually more of a safe haven for me. I like the air of familiarity in any of the locations and especially this one. It's got a kind of a funky location. The kind where if it weren't a Starbucks, it would probably be vacant commercial property. Parking is odd, the drive-thru is too, and there's only "one way in & one way out." But I assure you, once you get over those little hurdles, there is a very nice staff that is there to assist you with your favorite thing on the menu! I think all of these things make it my special, cozy, safe haven. Oh, it also seems to be a fun stop for police officers too... which is neither here nor there. Enjoy!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (756 chars)
I never used to go to Starbuck's because I don't drink coffee but I started tutoring someone for a class and that is where we would meet. So now I get there on the regular. I usually get the biggest Green Ice Tea Sweeten they carry or the Apple Cinnamon drink..wow nothing better.  ... Yesterday I was working in an office across the street from this location and walk over for my Ice Tea and asked if I can come back for a refill as I had to go back to the office to meet a customer. They Manager said "Sure We Can Do That". I thought that was great customer service! I bounce back two hours later get my refill and they even say "You are back" when I walk in. The small things can make all the difference... By the way the student I tutored got an "A"..


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (380 chars)
This Starbucks location is easily the best of any I've ever been to. The staff here is always friendly, the drinks are consist and well made, the service is speedy and the place is always clean. We're all familiar with Starbucks products so I won't bore you with what my drink preferences are but I will tell you that you won't have a bad experience at this location. Guaranteed!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (314 chars)
The staff here are amazingly nice.  I watched a disabled customer come in with crutches who they greeted by name and even helped him back out to his car with his ordered.  When my husband spilled his coffee,  not only did they quickly come to clean it up,  they also gave him another drink for free.  Great staff!


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (151 chars)
I love this Starbucks for its convenience. It's right next to the 95 for my commute to Hendertucky and the drive thru is not ever that busy when I go.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (33 chars)
White Chocolate Mocha delicious.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (844 chars)
Have you ever been to Starbucks and wondered... Hmmm If only I could order a  half of a gallon of my favorite $5 treat. Well now you can, It is called the Trenta. This monstrosity will have you buzzing all day long, I order a simple Iced Coffee with sugar free vanilla I am definitely not the Venti iced half-skinny half-1 percent, split quad shot (Two poured over the top, other two mixed) with 2 pumps of Carmel, one scoop of vanilla bean powder, stirred, no whip, double cupped guy.  ...  ... This place is always spot on my order since it is quite easy to pour some Pre-made coffee into a cup that is packed full of ice and hand it out the drive thru window with a smile on your face. Starbucks is your modern day crack dealer... Not that we don't have enough of those in Vegas already. Here is to a great Starbucks started Friday morning.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (811 chars)
Yes, all Starbucks stores are the same. BUT, I have found that with my signature drink (Trenta Caramel Soy Iced Coffee) there are several things to get wrong. The soy to coffee ratio has to be right and if they pour the soy after the coffee the blend is all off. Also, I have paid several different prices for my drink. Sometimes, its an Iced Coffee with Soy and others it's an Iced Coffee with Milk and there is no extra charge for the soy. This location gets it right every time. I live around the corner and opt to walk the few blocks each morning. The team there has become very familiar very quickly and always gives me a pep in my step to start my day. Everyone is all smiles whenever I come in and are always efficient with the service. When they start remembering my name, I'll give 'em the fifth star.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (459 chars)
Drive thru here is quick. Most of the time they make the drinks great, but sometimes you can tell they're moving at the speed of sound making it cause there's syrup all over the side of the cup. ...  ... The people that work here are great. Sometimes the cashier, the older woman, has a bad day and she's pretty grouchy, but nothing offensive, for me anyway. I'm sure the overweight businessman behind me will bust out off his shirt from her tartness though.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (440 chars)
I've stopped at this outlet a few times and I enjoy it quite a bit.  There's a good amount of table space and the wifi is available as it is at all Starbucks. ...  ... The only drawback to this location is its location.  It's a pain to get in and out sometimes because you have to cross traffic on Rainbow Boulevard.  You also have to know to come out a different driveway if you're going north on Rainbow.  Once you know, though, it's OK.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (146 chars)
I've only been through the drive thru here, but they are super fast and friendly which is helpful when your driving to work!  Always good coffee!


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (1145 chars)
Sometimes the drive thru is not the fastest, but often times I am the only car so it's a fifty fifty shot. So if you like to gamble this is the drive thru for you!  ... The same thing has to be said for the cafe... Sometimes they have it together, while other days they don't even know you exists! One day I waited 10 minutes for a Venti 10 pump chai latte and they weren't even busy! I was beginning to think the barista forgot to write my cup out! Come on guys, chai lattes don't get any easier! You don't even have to pull any shots! 10 minutes was a bit ridiculous!  ... I was in there just last night and the young blond barista didn't even acknowledge me with a hello or even a smilie, although she looked at me about three times as I was waiting for someone to come to the counter. I get that she was busy, but all she had to do was acknowledge my presence, not act like her life as a barista was so ruff!  ... 95% of the time I only order a Grande Pike Place anyway, so it's not like I am putting them out, which is their job by the way!  ... Customer service is a MUST with me. I can forgive slow but not rude and thus the three stars.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (543 chars)
I love this location. It is one of the bigger ones and they have a huge outside seating area, with umbrellas for the sun. ...  ... The lady taking our order could have been friendlier.. She could have at least smiled? Usually I just get an iced caramel macchiato, but this time I was hungry. ...  ... I ordered an asiago & cheddar pretzel, which was okay. I also got a cheesecake brownie. I took two bites and threw it away. I've learned that when coming to Starbucks I should just stick to the coffee. The pastries always seem to disappoint.


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (369 chars)
I come here almost everyday before I go to work. The staff is very friendly and the drive thru goes by pretty quick.The only thing which I wasn't too happy about is a staff member here. Every time she makes my drink there is always something wrong with my drink, I don't want to make a complaint about my drink when she's already giving me a hard time taking my order!


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (296 chars)
Been here twice and both times they've failed to understand what non-fat milk means. I'm not calling it a venti skinny blah bah blah, just give me a large non-fat coffee and take my money. ...  ... You bunch of retards. ...  ... I kid. A little. But we need some additional training at this one.


REVIEW #16:  3 stars  (164 chars)
A iced caffe mocha no whip extra shot made here is just the same as it is at the Starbucks down the street, or across town. 3 stars for the homogenized experience.


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (236 chars)
I ordered a cappuccino! It felt a little light! It was too light. I believe the barista poured a sip into my cup and topped the rest off with foam. Not happy. I guess a few bucks does not go a long way these days. Try harder Starbucks!


REVIEW #18:  2 stars  (116 chars)
This store has become dirty, tagged up bathrooms, and overall crappy moody female service. Drink was made properly.


................................................................................
LOCATION #141:  address="6572 N Decatur Blvd"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89131"  (16 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (640 chars)
They are just always friendly here!! ... I have never waited more than a couple minutes to order and/or be served my drink. ...  ... I like it, you might too...  ...  ... Parking can be tough, as the shopping center is not very well designed, but that is by no means Starbucks' fault. ...  ... I read the bad reviews below and trust me, I have never had a bad experience as described. The employees are often chatty and take a genuine interest in what the customers are talking about. I say this because I frequently talk to strangers and have become involved in intense conversation with other customers and baristas waiting in line here.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (625 chars)
This is a spacious coffee house location without a drive thu..  Friendly staff and my order is made right consistently.  Recently added more umbrellas outside which is great but its very hard to move them around so what's the point?  Also, the outdoor tables need to be dusted off more often.  Other than that I have very good experiences. The recent remodelling is an upgrade.  Careful when backing out of the parking spaces as many others will fly in right behind you, seen many close calls. ... FYI this Starbucks is within the city limits of North Las Vegas not Las Vegas itself.  The other side of Decatur is Las Vegas.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (232 chars)
I been coming to this location for over 3 years. The staff were all nice and attentive. Especially Danny; he is the best. He remembers my drink and my name. Whenever I walk in, everyone says hello to me. I really enjoy coming here.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (92 chars)
Always fast friendly service at this location. If it had a drive-thru, it would be 6 Stars.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (856 chars)
The only downside to this joint is that they don't have a drive-thru.  That's the downside if you're in a rush. ...  ... The upside, when you go inside, is that they don't have a drive-thru...so that means that you have a better idea how long the wait will be. ...  ... I go there to work remotely sometimes...so I don't have to do it at home.  I think it's great. It's usually rather quiet because most people are reading or working on laptops, so we're all uber-focused.  I like the barstool tables along the window, and they have outlets all along the window so I can charge up my laptop as I work.  Pretty snazzy. ...  ... Drinks are very good.  As good as any other Starbucks, and the staff is usually friendly.  Even when the line is long, I don't wait as long as I do at other locations, so that's a huge plus (likely because there's no drive-thru)


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (271 chars)
This location is always busy and usually you will have a short wait.  However staff are always pleasant and friendly, and there white chocolate mocha is perfect!  Due to the traffic this is a great place to people watch and relax on a weekend morning with your beverage.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (37 chars)
Wonderful crew, a daily stop of mine


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (343 chars)
Stopped in to grab a cup of joe while doing some early morning errands. Fiona greeted me with a smile and quickly took my order and got my coffee. The new Thanksgiving blend was my bean of choice and it was pretty tasty. I added a piece of cinnamon coffee cake for good measure. The only drawback to this location is the lack of a drive thru.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (301 chars)
I come here because it's close to my house. No other reason. The staff is super friendly and really know their customers. However service is slow and the quality of drinks are unpredictable. A dirty soy chai might be spot on one day and the next day by the very same person taste absolutely terrible.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (948 chars)
I'll give them credit for being in a nice area and decent size place for a Starbucks.  But of course I probably won't come here again, after my experience.   ...  ... The Batista that was at the counter, didn't really seem like being there.  I'm sure it was a long day, but at least still do service with a smile.  Ordering 2 venti ice mocha, one with soy milk.  You would think they would ask if I wanted whip cream with the soy milk.  Now I know other Batista's at other Starbucks actually ask if I want whip cream.  Unfortunately this one didn't.  Being lactose intolerant and having whip cream with my ice mocha, kind of ruins the whole thing.   ...  ... My overall thoughts, if you're not lactose intolerant, this may be a great place to grab a coffee.  But if you are lactose intolerant, make sure you specify no whip cream, if they don't ask.  Which I believe they should cause every other Starbucks I been too were courteous enough to ask.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (749 chars)
Honestly, I've had a pretty crapping morning but I still go out with a smile. The cashier who worked here this morning was completely unpleasant. I explained to her that I wanted to try a neopolitan (a drink off of their secret menu) she had no idea what I was talking about and she just gave me the most, "you must be stupid" look. I told her that it would be alright I'll just get my regular. She was so short and cut me off when I was about to explain if I wanted it hot or cold. Luckily she guessed correctly and ordered it cold. I would have given this place 1 star but thankfully the young lady making my drink was the absolute opposite, bubbly and sweet. They need to fix the staffing here because mornings are very important business hours.


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (569 chars)
Probably the longest it's ever taken to get a drip coffee. Simplest order ever, and I'm fine with waiting my turn but every other Starbucks I've ever been in the cashier will just turn around and pour a drop coffee because it takes literally 2 seconds so I don't have I wait for all the 'mocha-frappa-caramel-soy-chai-blended-extrahot-grande-lattes' that take forever to make in front of me. But not this one. It gets 2 stars instead of one for having lots of comfy chair and couch seating, which I only got to sit in for 5 mins after the 25 it took to get the coffee.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (309 chars)
Compared to other Starbucks in the area, this is one I usually avoid unless I need to get on the freeway right after. Pretty slow service, drinks are mediocre... But what does it for me is that it's never a welcoming experience here and the employees make me want to leave quicker than they can serve coffee!


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (290 chars)
The service wasn't bad. Had to ask twice for a receipt. The ladies room was horrendous! Had not been cleaned for some time. No toilet tissue or paper towels. Had to dry hands on the seat covers. The floor needs to be power washed. Obvious no one has really given it the attention it needs.


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (453 chars)
Ugh! My breaking point has been reached. I said no foam, it's on the cup. I had a quarter of a cup of foam that I had to scoop out! Pay attention. I've been visiting this Starbucks for nearly two years. The drinks are terrible! The lady working the cash register in the morning is so slow, she slows everything down. I've seen other regulars walk out when they see her working. I'm over this location. I'll wait till I get to work to grab a cup of Joe.


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (194 chars)
Just waited 7 minutes for an iced latte even though there was no one in front of me! Chic started talking to her friends and totally forgot about me! Epic fail. I guess my $1 tip wasn't enough.


................................................................................
LOCATION #142:  address="7101 W Craig Rd Northwest"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89129"  (9 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (881 chars)
This is my "go to" Starbucks and I am usually here at least twice a week. Sarah is a great GM and very personable.  Sadly, John M. no longer works here and has moved on to a new career and greener pastures in CO. ...  ... I agree that this place gets a bit crowded & I have chosen to sit outside on marginal weather days.  There are a dozen or so seats outside with umbrellas for the tables not under the awning/breezeway.  Drinks are consistent though & they know what extra-dry actually means.  ...  ... I have been here right when they open, when it is busy, and just before close and service is fabulous.  What else can you say about the most widely visited coffee chain in the US? ...  ... Starbucks tips: ... 1) Use a registered card in order to get free items for every 12 purchases ... 2) Buy & use a reusable cup (save on the landfills) ... 3) Get to know your barista(s)


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (1304 chars)
My biggest issue with this place is that an employee, the GM, is the current Duke of this place!  Unfair, checking into a place you work!  D:   ...  ... ANYWAY, Aside from that grumble - This place has bomb staff.  The GM Sarah and Jon in particular are two powerhouses that remember names, drinks, and current events in their customers lives.  Starting the morning off here is nice as you get a great view of the sun light scraping across the sky and some great conversation.   ...  ... It's also a great location as it's right before you take off down the 95 highway.  I usually stop by here on my way to/from the Tenaya Barkin' Basin Dogpark with my Golden Retrievers, who are very popular with the morning staff.  :) ...  ... But the place is clean, efficient, although small so this is not a great Starbucks to lounge and study in the middle of the day due to how crowded it gets.  One small group of book club or Republican Wives or whatever who meets every so often here just swallows the place whole with a mere twelve people.   ...  ... Also - WiFi is kinda slow here.  I suggest heading East to the Craig in the plaza with the Lowes.  They have a larger Starbucks with a slightly faster WiFi.  Doesn't quite has the warm social aspect of this location, but great to get work and projects done.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (486 chars)
My Girl and I have been going to this Starbucks location the last few mornings, I have also been here many times myself and I have to say the staff is great. One man especially stands out and always seems to know many people's names even their children's names.  ...  ... As with any Starbucks the coffee is good and the flavors are all same being that it's a chain, but this location is nice with outside seating, and plenty of seating inside. ...  ... If you are in the area, try it.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (470 chars)
This is my favorite Starbucks! I live all the way out on 215 and Trop, but I will drive across town to visit this place! The barristas are out of this world! I've always gotten the same drink, but after spending some time at this Starbucks, I have been encouraged by the associates to venture out. They'll keep making drinks until you are 100% satisfied! I'm always welcomed with a smile and warm hello! I wish it was closer to home, but it's worth the drive everytime!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (420 chars)
Bring a sweater! They keep it coooold in here. I think all Starbucks are cold in order to get you to buy some hot coffee.  This Starbucks was clean, had friendly staff,  and had outlets for me to use- always a plus. Of course, I was lucky they weren't crowed on Saturday afternoon.  There's a nice covered outdoor area to relax and enjoy your purchase as well. If I lived closer, I'd frequent this particular Starbucks.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (268 chars)
I stopped here after breakfast this morning following a hike at Mount Charleston.  I've been here numerous times in the past, but today was the first in a fairly long time. ...  ... Service was quick and pleasant.  When I'm in the area, I won't hesitate to come here.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (184 chars)
Pumpkin Spice Frappuccino! A great day gets better. Came here with my daughter. We both enjoyed really quick and friendly service from the staff. Nothing less than good 'ol starbucks.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (423 chars)
Hello Starbucks my old friend. It's nice to see that you are still filled with pretentious hipsters toiling away on their MacBooks and baristas who look like they want to be anywhere but where they currently are in life. Aside from the odd mix of depression and shame that comes with a Starbucks franchise the food and coffee is always delicious. I just can't help but troll Starbucks and their silly culture at any point.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (1534 chars)
Decided to give this location a try as it is on my way to work, and I drink Starbucks 2x daily. Was disappointed that there was no drive thru but that is no ones fault. I would say that my 2 stars are only for the outcome of my drinks. The rest of my experience was a total service failure. I came here two weeks ago and then again last week. Neither experience was positive. Both times I felt like I was a hassle to both the barista and the woman at the register. Both times, the women taking my order apologized to me because they were carrying on conversations with their coworkers while I was ordering. Is it that hard to focus on a customer for 30 seconds. I wrote this off the first time but twice!? Come on ladies. Additionally, during my second trip no employee made eye contact with me. Not while taking my order nor when handing me my drink. She then apologized for talking to her coworker while not looking at me!  ... I manage a VIP services department in a strip casino, so I deal with guests and customers every day. I know what they're going through but I also would expect to be treated as if I'm not invisible. I'd rather pay the inflated casino prices for my Starbucks and be treated kindly than simply be ignored. Additionally, they were more than happy to chat over the the separator with regular guests. Apparently new customers are not as valuable at this location. I was so angry I took the store mangers card on my way out but decided it just wasn't worth my time. Ill continue to frequent any other location.


................................................................................
LOCATION #143:  address="7280 S Rainbow Blvd Southwest"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89118"  (44 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (535 chars)
My Starbucks of Choice.  ... Jericho is my regular drive thru barista. It only took him two days to realize im a reg and start pouring on that Vegas friendliness I have been so blessed to enjoy since I moved here. I told him about how Fort Apache and my old San Diego Starbucks told me no more grande in a trenta even though I show my patronage to the Starbucks most usually 2-4 times a day. He has assured me that Rainbow does it in a Trenta Cup all day long. So.... I'm hooked. Rainbow is my reg starbucks no matter where Im headed.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (450 chars)
This is a GREAT Starbucks. I always use the drive through and I LOVE that you can see the barrista on the camera when you order. Most of the time the barrista is very smiley and happy. Makes ordering through drive through much more personal. I have always had great service. One time my order took a long time and they were proactive to give me a coupon for a future complimentary drink due to the delay. I won't go to any other location in my area.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (386 chars)
Awesome people, service is fast. They have their days when they get slammed, but the service is as good as you'll get from any starbucks from any busy metro in the US (New York, LA, Chicago). The staff is always friendly and makes an effort in getting to know their regulars.  ...  ... Best of all, there's drive thru! Just don't for the lane to be easy for your gas guzzling behemoth.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (348 chars)
The staff here are all very upbeat, friendly and professional. The store is clean and well organized. The drinks are consistently good! We always hit this Starbucks on our way out of town. So you can thank these fine baristas for keeping me caffeinated and awake, preventing me from being a menace on the road...well, more of a menace on the road.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (255 chars)
This is the best starbucks in town....lets just say I go through the drive through and just say my name and when I get to the window and my drink is made perfect and sometimes I even get a lil note on my cup! love the staff and come on its Starbucks! lol


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (238 chars)
Friendly, quick, clean, consistent. Everything I look for in Starbucks. The drive-through has always been friendly and helpful and on occasion, hilariously funny (which helps on those mornings when I don't want to drag myself into work).


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (106 chars)
Grande non fat late. Venti Caramel frap light. Grande iced with skim. Always consistent. Thanks Starbucks


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (68 chars)
grande skinny caramel macchiato.... only 140-calories!!! amazing :)


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (48 chars)
Who doesnt love starbucks! Any place, any time!


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (279 chars)
It is a convenient location for me being that I pass it every time I go anywhere. The staff is very friendly and they do offer free wifi. Always expect the drive thru to be long and timely. So if you're in a rush, definitely set aside some extra time if you intended to stop by.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (228 chars)
Convenient location and there's a drive thru, which is obviously a plus. Service was incredibly fast and friendly. The staff was incredibly friendly as well. Smile on their faces as they assist me with my order, which is great.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (217 chars)
Great store, my home ... They are the best during the week in the AM. Their weekend team needs to learn from the A-Team but it's still better than some other stores. I mean it's Starbucks after all... Yeah I'll wait.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (33 chars)
Drive thru is always pretty fast


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (796 chars)
Yeah, it's one of your typical Starbies.  And I know there's better coffee out there.  Writing a review on this may be construed as lame.  But there's a reason why it garnered my attention: It's a drive-through! ... Realize the significance and beauty of it: ... Hung over.  Tired.  Unable to stand for long periods of time.  Need caffeine.  Not a problem at the drive-through. ... Starbs:  How may I help you? ... Me: caaaarghhhh ummmmmm ... Starbs: I'm sorry.  Could you repeat that order? ... Me: uuuhhhh oooohhhhhheeee ... Starbs: One more time, sir? ... Me: Coooofffeeee ... Starbs:  Okay, what size? ... SILENCE ... Starbs:  That's okay sir.  Just drive up to the first window. ... SILENCE ... A CAR HONKS ... IT HONKS AGAIN ... I wake up.   ... Me: Coooofffeeee ...  ... Sorry about that.


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (593 chars)
The coffee gets the typical three stars, the service here loses the other stars.  I am a recent transport from CA and maybe its different out here but it takes forever to get your drinks here.  The last time I was in the drive thru there were three cars and it took me 20 minutes to just get to the window to pay and another 5 to get my drink.  I normally go inside in the mornings, there are only one or two other people there and it still takes ten minutes.  Its the closest Starbucks store so I will continue going there but I really think they need to change the management of this store.


REVIEW #16:  3 stars  (509 chars)
It is starbucks so you know what to expect from the beverages and food served. I am giving this place a 3 because of the baristas. There was one chick in the window one morning and she was so rude I almost had to walk inside to complain. I saw her again and I had to drive my car around and get out to get a straw for my cold drink because the girl wouldn't come back to the window. I don't really like this location. I only go there if I'm close and don't feel like driving any further for my starbucks fix.


REVIEW #17:  3 stars  (303 chars)
No wonder this place has such a bad rating. The cashier with the non-uniform pink apron has the most sour puss face I've ever seen at a Starbucks. Listen, I have purchased several thousand drinks from Starbucks in my life and I don't think I've ever been served by someone so unpleasant looking. Yikes.


REVIEW #18:  3 stars  (112 chars)
I enjoyed the house brewed coffee!  The servers are very slow and they seemed to visit with each other way to !


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (105 chars)
Friendly staff I must say but drive thru is a pain in the morning. Better off going inside. A lot faster


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (75 chars)
Drive thru entrance is a little hard to find, it's behind Bank of America.


REVIEW #21:  2 stars  (2071 chars)
Typical Starbucks... Service and drinks are okay.  Could be better, but could also be worse. ...  ... Reason for the two star rating is the staffs' disregard for health codes regarding animals.  The ONLY reason an animal would be allowed in the restaurant is if it's a service animal.  This morning multiple employees were oooing and ahing a tiny dog brought in by a customer.  This is not the first time I've seen this here.  When I questioned the cashier about it, she told me it was okay as long as it didn't touch the floor.  WRONG.  Cuteness does not justify violating health code.  And before you start to think I'm an animal hater, I have two dogs.  Guess where I do not take them... Any and all restaurants.  Pets should stay home. ...  ... Here is what health code says: ... NAC 446.625  Animals on premises prohibited; exceptions. (NRS 439.150, 439.200, 446.940) ... 1.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, live animals, including birds and turtles, are not allowed on the premises of a food establishment or on adjacent areas under the control of the holder of the permit for the operation of the food establishment. Edible fish or decorative fish in aquariums, shellfish or crustacea on ice or under refrigeration, and shellfish and crustacea in a display tank may be present on the premises of a food establishment if food, equipment, utensils, linens or unwrapped articles designed for a single service or a single use are not contaminated. ... 2.  Dogs accompanying security or police officers are permitted in offices, storage areas and dining areas. Sentry dogs may be permitted to run loose in outside fenced areas for security reasons. Guide dogs accompanying persons with a visual, aural or physical disability or trainers who are training guide dogs are permitted in dining or sales areas. Such dogs are not allowed on the seats or tables of a food establishment. ... 3.  Food handlers must not care for or handle any pets while on duty. ... 4.  Live or dead fish bait must be stored separately from food or food products in retail stores.


REVIEW #22:  2 stars  (927 chars)
I live right down the street from this Starbucks, so I've visited frequently. The speed of the drive through isn't really an issue, but the quality of the drinks I've received the last three times I've been there have been a bit less than satisfactory.  ...  ... I ordered a green tea lemonade that came out to me still warm with three ice cubes floating in it, an iced coffee in which I requested classic syrup with no syrup and not nearly the amount of extra cream requested, and today an iced coffee with the exact same issue.  ...  ... I wasn't able to request correction the first two times, but I did on the third and was met with short attitude, despite me being the last car in line - there wasn't a reason for the rushed tone.  ...  ... The location is convenient, however I will go out of my way to Jones/Badura or Rainbow/Sunset going forward. I suggest the same to avoid a terrible drink that's already overpriced.


REVIEW #23:  2 stars  (284 chars)
Slowest Starbucks I've been to.... Unfortunate because this one is a convenient location to where I live but the drive through always takes 10-15 minutes whether there's 2 people in line or 12.  People very nice and friendly but not effect enough for how quick Starbucks is elsewhere


REVIEW #24:  2 stars  (205 chars)
Not a very nice group of employees.  I say thank you and they walk away.  Not used to such abrasive employees at a Starbucks.  It might be time for management to review customer service expectations here.


REVIEW #25:  2 stars  (190 chars)
Drive thru is super slow. No one in front of us had an order more than 2 drinks. They need to get it together. Go to the Starbucks down the street inside the smiths on windmill and rainbow.


REVIEW #26:  1 stars  (1418 chars)
The worst Starbucks service and most inept employees ever! Yesterday was officially my last visit to this shitty location ever. ...  ... Of course the line inside is out the ass, but I'm fiending so oh well. Many minutes later I finally place my order. But I also wanted to recharge my Starbucks card with $100. It seems like any business would be happy to get $100 these days right. I guess not. The rude ass woman at the register tried to swipe my card once and it didn't go thru. So she says in a very bitch manner "It won't swipe, I don't know what you want me to do with this" and just hands me back the card. Well how about you try a second time. And if that fails too, how about you take 14 seconds to punch the numbers in. You are an employee on the clock right?  ...  ... Well I guess doing her job was just so out of line because she was unwilling to do either one. So no money or business for you. I'll gladly drive to a different location that actually values my money and presence.  ...  ... Which is what I did, I went down the street and got my card recharged. And after complaining to the manager there about what had happened, she apologized and said she'd contact the manager of this store, and then comped me my drink as a token of good will.  ...  ... So with other much better and friendlier locations a mile or so away I will take my business there, and I encourage everyone else to do the same.


REVIEW #27:  1 stars  (1349 chars)
This is, by far, the WORST Corporate Starbucks I've ever been to. The service is horrible, it takes longer than necessary to receive my drinks and everything is always so messy. The only reason why I keep coming back here is the convenience because I live right down the street. ... I work at the Starbucks in the Mandalay Bay next to the House of Blues, and even though it's not a corporate Starbucks, we still hold all the same procedures and values.  ... Whenever I go into this particular Starbucks, it takes forever to be acknowledged if it's not busy. When my order is being taken, they're usually very rude or preoccupied with things other than their actual job- for example they're talking to eachother about their personal lives or how their shift has been going. If I just order one drink it will take around 5 - 10 minutes, depending on how distracted by conversation the baristas are. If I need milk from the condiment bar, it's usually expired already or there is no milk at all. ... Forget it if I'm going through the drive thru. I have about three different rewards accumulated on my Starbucks cards because when I let them know that I have a reward, I just get ignored and they charge me the full price anyway. ... Long story short, the workers give off a nasty, snarky attitude and they take forever to make the simplest of things.


REVIEW #28:  1 stars  (1109 chars)
Stopped in here with the family and was not happy. I ordered 3 small frappuccinos. The problem that I had was when mine and my son's frappuccino came out they were wrong. Even though we had ordered the same kind we never even put a straw into them. We knew it wasn't right and I told the barrista they were wrong. She acted like I slapped her in the face! She grabbed them up and dumped them out and started over using the same plastic cups she just rinsed out in the damn sink! When she slapped them on the counter my son took his and went to sit outside. I went to get a straw and a napkin to wipe the side of the cup off because in her shitty haste the bitchy barrista didn't care that she slopped my $5.00 drink down the side. To my surprise the cup was actually cracked down the side. So, I go back and show it to the barrista. I swear she looked like she wanted to slap me! She swiftly grabbed the cup up, poured it into another cup, put a lid on it and slammed it on the counter again. ... I will not EVER come back to this Starbucks again!!! Your customer service and shitty attitude assures this!!!!


REVIEW #29:  1 stars  (923 chars)
This is CONSISTENTLY the slowest and worst customer service of all the 50+ locations I've been too!! Anyone who follows my checkin's know's I can't start my day without a coffee. I also travel quite a bit for many reason so I have been to more than my fair share of coffee houses around the world. I hate to say it, but the Service at this location would be rated the very worst of them all. The drive thru is ridiculously slow!! There is always at least 2 or 3 cars, and takes about the same amount of time as 6+. The staff ignores you when you walk up to the register half the time while they talk about their weekend or shift or whatever. I could go on and on....  ...  ... But the coffee is still a good Starbucks coffee like I'm used to, there's still free WiFi, it's close to my house and has outdoor seating. So for those reasons I keep coming back. I just know I have to have a lot of extra patience on those days.


REVIEW #30:  1 stars  (906 chars)
This was the worst experience I have ever had in a Starbucks. Very unfriendly staff.  First Starbucks I felt that everyone had an attitude.  The cashier took my order and didn't even smile or thanked me after I ordered. I paid with my rechargeable Starbucks card and asked to see if I had any load in there. She just threw my other card that had zero balance without even asking if I wanted to reload it. Handed me my receipt and walked away without telling me that she got my order or thank you. To top it off, I ordered a donut and didn't give it to me until I asked for it 10mins later. The crew memeber didn't even apologize for forgetting to give me my order as if that's ok to just go ahead and give it to me without any explanation or at least apologize for the mistake or delay.  They need to change the crew inside that Starbucks. I would now have 2nd thoughts going in that particular Starbucks.


REVIEW #31:  1 stars  (705 chars)
Wow this place is in need of some customer service training. I came in on a Saturday night a little past 8pm and had a 3 drink orders and a request for a coffee travel pack. Now I usually order travel packs and know it takes 15-20 min to set up if you don't call ahead. Well the guy at the counter says you can't order travel packs because those have to be called ahead of time. I was like really? Well I'll wait and he proceeded to sigh, grin, roll his eyes...clearly not wanting to do the work.  So I told him to cancel the order and went down the street with no problems. I've never had this happen to me before since I've been going to Starbucks for several years and disappointed by this experience.


REVIEW #32:  1 stars  (576 chars)
Worst service at any Starbucks I've ever been to. I try to avoid coming to this location at all costs, but it's the closest to me and sometimes I think the service just might be better this next time. Every time I order a cooked good item, every time, I wait for over ten minutes and have to remind them that I ordered it. They have 10 people working behind the counter and it is the slowest service ever! And my drink, absolutely garbage compared to every other Starbucks, including the ones inside the grocery stores. Amazing how this place is allowed to operate like this.


REVIEW #33:  1 stars  (549 chars)
I absolutely hate that this is the closest Starbucks to my house. It has to be the worst Starbucks in Vegas. Only a handful of the staff are actually pleasant. I've actually seen employees fighting while I'm waiting in line for my coffee, they swear at each other, and are completely rude to customers. Also prepare to wait FOREVER in the drive through line. And they do not care whatsoever if they get your order wrong or you wait for a century. Worst Starbucks in Vegas. I literally drive out of the way to go to the other Starbucks over the 215.


REVIEW #34:  1 stars  (545 chars)
These employees appear to be poorly trained and aggressively unfriendly, a deadly combination. ...  ... I would never think to write a review for a Starbucks, because they are so consistent in their quality of beverages and presentation skills.  ...  ... In addition to attitude and demeanor problems of the staff, my beverage and the subsequent refill were both prepared incorrectly, adding to my initial negative impression.   ...  ... The corrections were made, but with an attitude. ...  ... This is the worst Starbucks I have ever been to.


REVIEW #35:  1 stars  (462 chars)
I ALWAYS regret coming to this Starbucks location. I've currently been standing here waiting for my simple iced coffee for 5 minutes and they're not even busy. I only stop here occasionally because it happens to be on my way to run errands.  ...  ... The cream/sugar stand is always unkept and the workers are super rude.  ...  ... Go to the one on Jones (Badura). For real. ...  ... Okay if you must go here go through drive-thru because it seems to be faster.


REVIEW #36:  1 stars  (418 chars)
By far worst Starbucks EVER!! waited in the drive thru yesterday for 30mins?!? Really? Only because I couldn't escape from the line. Haha. Then to get my java chip frap that was the worst one I've ever had.. So waisted 30mins of my day to get a drink I couldn't even drink. Thanks but no thanks. I will not return. For being such a huge corporate place. They should have enough people that can do there job correctly.


REVIEW #37:  1 stars  (286 chars)
Slowest Starbucks ever !! Consistently slow and I'm not sure why because they are never much busier than any other location . Drive through takes FOREVER and they never even offer an apology or to buy your drink for the inconvenience . Maybe they need to drink more coffee to wake up !


REVIEW #38:  1 stars  (284 chars)
Always mixing up my order and they aren't friendly about fixing it either. I actually drive farther to avoid this Starbucks even though it's on my way to the freeway. It used to be good but I think the good employees moved on. The Starbucks north of the 215 on Rainbow is way better.


REVIEW #39:  1 stars  (272 chars)
My daily routine is to drive to Starbucks to work everyday. I usually go to the one on towns center and charleston. I happened to stop by this one 2day and waited 25 min @ the drive thru before I got my drink. Not even an apology or comp drink. Horrible customer service!


REVIEW #40:  1 stars  (214 chars)
Slowest Starbucks ever. I still cannot fathom why an ice coffee literally takes 15 minutes to order and receive every single time. They never mix my order up but they always do apologize for the unreasonable wait.


REVIEW #41:  1 stars  (189 chars)
The drink service has gotten better recently, but the wifi is still so unreliable I have started going to the other starbucks down the street across 215. The staff is much nicer there too.


REVIEW #42:  1 stars  (174 chars)
This location is just a faux SB, it's run by the supermarket it's located in and you can tell.  THey don't take SB gift cards and the staff is rude and make terrible drinks.


REVIEW #43:  1 stars  (154 chars)
SLOOOOOOOWEST Starbucks ever! Never waited so long for a drink ever! I sat in the drive thru so long I wanted to run over the curb to get out of there!!!


REVIEW #44:  1 stars  (145 chars)
The worst Starbucks in LasVegas!!!!!! Drive the extra miles to get the service u deserve!!!!! Always out of everything service is the worst ever


................................................................................
LOCATION #144:  address="751 N Rancho Dr Ste 110"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89106"  (12 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (865 chars)
This Starbucks is the closest one to my work so it's super convenient. Of course, the drive-thru is perfect for me since I'm usually running down here to get a drink on my down-time or my lunch break. ...  ... Been inside as well and the place is typically clean, not super busy. The manager has left his business card out on the area where there are creamers/sugars, so props to that person for being up-front to your customers. ...  ... Also, my car once stalled in the drive-thru here and the barista working the window was kind enough to actually come out and push my car into the parking lot. Of course, I guess he was kind of obligated to since my car would be impeding the drive-thru had he not. But, very nice individual working there for sure. ...  ... Overall, no complaints and I've never received a weird/funky drink here either, so definitely 5 Stars.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (370 chars)
This Starbucks is very close to work so very convenient. I absolutely adore this English lady with her even more adorable English accent!!! I love it when she takes my order. Every once in a great while I get a drink that's not mine but they offer a replacement and if I want a free one for next time. Friendly, clean and great service. "Can't get that with satellite!"


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (73 chars)
The coffee is always a great afternoon help! The staff is very friendly.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (368 chars)
This is the starbucks that is on my way to work.  They have never gotten my order wrong, even if I went off the rails.  The staff is super friendly.  I like the girl with the glitter blue eye liner.  She always takes the time to chat while we are waiting for my coffee in the drive thru.   ...  ... Generally, I think management has done an excellent job with hiring!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (367 chars)
I've been to this Starbuck's several times but didn't realize no one had ever entered it on Yelp. ...  ... The staff here has always been pleasant and competent.  There's a lot of room for working inside and the patio has some tables for sitting out when the temperatures permit.  The free wifi is always welcome! ...  ... When I'm in the area, this is where I stop.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (225 chars)
Everyone loves Starbucks, but what could make a Starbucks experience even more awesome? ??? ...  ...  An amazing staff that is always on top of there game friendly funny up beat helpful and fast compared to others in town !!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (61 chars)
Not much to say it Starbucks $5 coffee and friendly service.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (1185 chars)
How apropos my 100th official review on Yelp is a Stabucks, as I live and breathe by the caffeniated wonder known as joe, java, mud, brew or other fancy nickname of your choosing. I used to frequent this location so it is very familiar to me. The service here is like the Katy Perry song "Hot and Cold" and I'm not talking about the temperature of your favorite beverage. One visit is outstanding, the next is mediocre. This location is ultra convenient if you are headed for the freeway, as it is located near Rancho and Bonanza with easy access to both the 15 and the 95. My latest visit found me waiting in the drive-thru for what seemed like an eternity with only four cars ahead of me. Granted, some of the delay could have been attributed to those in front of me trying to figure out exactly what it is they want or describing for the poor soul working the drive-thru what their favorite beverage consist of. In the end, the drink was to my liking and the service was more friendly than not. Nothing to jump up down over, just your basic run of the mill Starbucks saga with a bit of a wait. I'm quite sure my next visit to this location will be hot, as this one was rather cold.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (641 chars)
Being a full-time grad student, I frequent coffee houses frequently. This Starbucks was pleasant enough overall, but the lady taking my order had the personality of a lima bean. This location should put heir friendly staff as the first point of contact and leave the grumpy smurfs behind the counter, where they can make some coffee magic and not have to interact with humans.  ...  ... Also, the place was relatively empty, yet not one of the three ladies behind the counter thought to take a broom to the place. Not very clean and no effort to correct that.  ...  ... Our breakfast and coffees were delicious, though. No complaints there!


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (30 chars)
Pleasant staffs. yummy drinks


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (429 chars)
2 stars for being sooooo slow! Yes the staff are nice but being the 6th person in line , and waiting 15 minutes to order my drink?! That is crazy! Even the drive threw is slow! I almost went crazy a few days ago, because one of the girls decided to have a full conversation with the customer and her life!  ...   ... I've been to this location 3 times already and all 3 have been a wait time of 20 minutes! Who waits that long?!


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (127 chars)
Slowest Starbucks drive-thru in Las Vegas SMH...ordered 1 medium frap and took 30 min to get it and only 2 cars ahead of me...


................................................................................
LOCATION #145:  address="80 E Harmon Ave Eastside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1036 chars)
This "hidden" Starbucks is located at the Elara Hilton Grand Vacations hotel. However, I stumbled on it by finding an entrance in a far corner of Planet Hollywood's Miracle Mile Shops (to find it in Miracle Mile, look for and follow the Elara signs). ...  ... From first glance this Starbucks caught me eye; it's visually stunning.  The walls on both sides are all glass, floor to ceiling, it just grabs you and makes you want to take a closer look.  Inside, the other all glass wall faces the beautiful Elara pool environs, a calming sight for caffeine contemplation.  The glass front and rear walls make for an arresting see-through effect. ...  ... Another bonus: this site shares a contiguous space with an Elara bar.  When I was there on a weekday morning, the bar was closed, but all the bar seating was available for spillover Starbucks seating!  Also, according to the Starbucks website, this Starbucks is open 24 hours. ...  ... Hard to beat an attractive, always open Starbucks - it's worth the extra effort tracking it down.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (179 chars)
Excellent service, quick coffeeaking, and our coffees/pastries were perfectly made.  For our first morning in Vegas (and the Elara), we will be making this our ritual while here!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (1827 chars)
i still like to refer to this location as the PH Westgate Towers, but this place is one of the new additions since the Hilton changing of the guards that i really enjoyed.  ...  ... i absolutely must start every morning with coffee. an iced coffee. from Starbucks. call it marketing, call it conditioning, whatever. many times before, whenever i'd come to vegas, i'd always stay at the Westgate Towers (see pending review as to why) and unfortunately i would have to get my morning started with a very below-average iced coffee prepared at one of the side bars near the front desk, close to where this Starbucks location now stands. it was severely over-priced, and was basically just front loaded with a gang of creamer and vanilla syrup. ...  ... the location of this Starbucks is perfect. whether you're staying at the hotel or just cruising through the Miracle Mile shops, this shop is sitting in prime real estate. it's floor-to-ceiling windows on both sides make it look very inviting, and the inside is laid out like a people watcher's dream: you can sip your morning latte or cappuccino while sitting at one of their desks which are adorned with modern (and comfy) chairs or relax on one of their faux-leather armchairs off to the side. that plot of land transitions seamlessly from hotel front desk and lobby area, to hotel bar, to Starbucks. and the automatic sliding window-doors is the outlet onto the Miracle Mile shops. ...  ... it's a serene feeling to be able to sit and enjoy your drink inside while looking at the hustle and bustle of shoppers passing through the shops outside, and then to look through the facing ceiling-to-floor windows which look at the Westgate's mini beach club: a sea of poolside beach chairs, large swimming pool, jacuzzis, and bar areas, and canopied day beds. ...  ... -civilities.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (694 chars)
I really hate to give any Starbucks lower than 5 stars but this gets a 4 for the high prices and the fact that they gave the person in line in front of me a discount because he was staying at the hotel. Also I am ultra sensitive to the taste of soy or bad milk for that matter, and my grande caramel macchiato, that I drink daily, was slightly off.  ...  ... However, my hubby's whole milk vanilla latte was perfect, and this is probably one of the best places to people watch (and I don't mean facing out to the pool, although you might enjoy that too). ...  ... There are so many Starbucks near here, I think this will be my last time at this one unless I find myself in need of a quick fix.


REVIEW #5:  2 stars  (649 chars)
Located in the Elara Hilton Grand Vacations hotel where I was staying, I decided to grab my normal cup of fancy coffee that I usually get.  The line was pretty long and it did take a while to get my drink b/c of that but I am an addict so I will wait!  As someone else mentioned, this Starbucks is extremely pricey!  Boy was there some sticker shock for me!  What normally costs me about $4 at another hotel near where I live was now $5.41.    If this was the price I had to pay every morning, I think my addiction may just go away.   I had no problems with the customer service and found them friendly.  I just wish my coffee was not so expensive!


REVIEW #6:  1 stars  (2040 chars)
Most expensive Starbucks in the nation?? Store is located inside Elara Hilton Grand Vacations hotel and by the Miracle Mile Shops. ...  ... I normally don't complain about costs if I get mediocre service. I just don't come back.  I believe this store is capturing all the tourists who is vacationing so they are willing to spend the extra costs. ...  ... I'm a huge Starbucks fan however this was about my experience at this store.  Starbucks should be wise to see who should be in front of their registers.  I understand some of these stores can get very busy and stressed.   ...  ... This time though very easy late morning, no lines, (hmm I wonder why) my wife and I decided to stop by to get a cup of coffee.  I paid $10 for a tall decaf coffee and a skinny latte.  I thought it was a little high however the very young girl in front of the register seemed agitated when I asked about the price.  I then promptly took out my phone to scan my starbucks card and all of a sudden she sarcastically puts a smile on her face and says 'We don't accept those here'.  I said oh ok how about my rewards coupon I received from starbucks?  Again, she gives this big smile bobbin her head and said, ' We don't accept that either'!   ...  ... She was very happy to say NO to us.  A little more respect for your customers goes a long way.  I never thought Starbucks hired 12 year old's.  Maybe this is a new trend? Maybe it's because they didn't have decaf and she knew she had to do a pour-over (which requires manual labor)?  Which I know many store employee's sulk when I ask for a pour-over.  Not sure why when I do tip them every time... some say thank you.. some just... "Whatever"! ...  ... I think some of these stores seriously need to look into adding iPad's at the registers so that we can order ourselves without the sarcasm's or any frustrations.  I believe Starbucks customers who spends the extra dough for a cup a joe deserves a better experience.  As for me, this is a store I'm not interested in coming back to pay the extra dough.


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (153 chars)
What a bunch of pretentious coffee snobs. If they are going to charge almost double the normal price of non-casino Starbucks, at least give good service


................................................................................
LOCATION #146:  address="8150 S Maryland Pkwy Ste D-1 Southeast"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89123"  (26 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (212 chars)
Wait time is minimal, they're open earlier than my fav. coffee shop on the weekends and drinks are good. Even the drive through wait time is minimal, I've never waited more than a couple minutes in a 6 car line.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (202 chars)
I come here all the time & my drinks always taste the same! Love the customer service & it's always clean :) theres no drive thru which means all you lazy people have to walk your slow ass's in! Hahaha


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (110 chars)
Inside the Albertsons store. Very friendly staff and fast. My Pumpkin Spice Blended Crme Frap was awesome!!!!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (97 chars)
This place is very busy till about mid nite then you have a good shot at getting a place to sit.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (81 chars)
My favorite Starbucks, the staff here is awesome! Brennan's my favorite barista!


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (80 chars)
Very friendly staff, never too crazy busy.  Just wish they had a drive through.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (51 chars)
Great spot and friendly staff. Highly recommended!


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (15 chars)
Great service!


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (14 chars)
Quick service


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (816 chars)
If you want a laid-back Starbuck's in the Southeast valley, I recommend this cafe. Everytime I hang out here, I never wait on a line or table. The music is Starbuck's radio playing at just the right volume. The atmosphere is the opposite of the nearby hyper-jumping Eastern at I-215 Starbuck's. Whenever I am exhausted I'll hang out here. I leave the cafe more relaxed. ...    This Starbucks with drive-thru service is convenient to travellers along I-215, Windmill Road, and Maryland Parkway. However it blends in with a relatively vacant shopping center and Chevron along Maryland Parkway just south of Windmill, making it hard to see. ...    Overall if you want a laid-back Starbucks experience in the Southeast valley, or are in the vicinity of I-215, Maryland Parkway, or Windmill, this is a one I recommemend.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (703 chars)
I came here this morning for a meeting. The place is a little hidden, so I passed it the first time, but as long as you know it's in the same plaza as the Chevron, you'll be good. The line was pretty long when we walked in (one lady even walked out), but it actually went by pretty fast. I really only had to wait a few minutes. The staff were very nice and fast with their service. The place doesn't have too many tables that seat more than two people, so we ended up sitting at the couch area with a small table in the corner. I definitely plan on coming here again soon. It's a great central meeting spot for when I have to meet someone living on the East side, since I live all the way in the West.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (475 chars)
The Only reason I'm giving this Starbucks a "4 Star" is Because Of the employee who helped me. "Haley" was the first Starbucks employee here who actually tried to understand my order and made it right. (My drink is very easy) a grande java chip frap with 5 pumps of frap roast and easy ice. I know not hard at all but no matter which Starbucks I go to it is never made right. TERRIBLE!!! She took my order, made my Drink and was super Friendly!!! Thanks Haley! Your Awesome.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (395 chars)
Good location, always clean, and drinks are made well pretty much every time. Because of the location, the wait can be awhile during "rush hour", but they are pretty good about getting through the line as fast as they can. They don't always have some of the products (mugs, tumblers, etc.) you're looking for and might be a lil moody around closing time, but overall I still like this location!


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (387 chars)
On a road trip 1300 miles from home and having had hit and miss experiences at indie coffee joints across 4 states (and counting), I admit the uniformity of a chain coffee shop was deeply appreciated.  ...  ... This particular location offered winning service, plenty of wall outlets for laptops, and a damn fine decaf mocha. Perfect except for the A/C--you could've hung meat in there!


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (333 chars)
This particular Starbucks is superb in customer service in the Drive-Thru and inside the cafe. The location is also great since it's near the freeway.  ...  ... I was in town visiting and didn't want to go to my "original" Starbucks because of the busy parking lot, However I guess since Verizon closed down, this lot isn't as busy.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (263 chars)
Good place. I like to go here sometimes to work and study. It's a Starbucks, so much is the same as the others. Though, nice layout and seating despite being small. I like it. Great service and fast. If you come enough, they recognize you and know what you want.


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (234 chars)
The staff is always outstanding and the environment in this location is not busy and loud like some of the other locations in the area. The only downside is that the drive thru is repeatedly slower than most starbucks I have been to.


REVIEW #18:  4 stars  (220 chars)
This Starbucks is great. It's usually pretty busy because the location but it has a drive thru which is very convenient. It's also close to my home and it's a few cents cheaper then the Starbucks in Von's up the street.


REVIEW #19:  4 stars  (157 chars)
A nicer than average Starbucks that is in a weird location. I wish the one on Eastern was this clean and friendly. I just wish these guys were closer to me!


REVIEW #20:  4 stars  (104 chars)
I love Starbucks!  Great service and coffee. ...  ... The Holiday pumpkin and peppermint are solo good.


REVIEW #21:  4 stars  (64 chars)
Business as usual here, but you just cant beat that it's 24hrs.


REVIEW #22:  3 stars  (655 chars)
ive been going to this starbucks 3-4 ams a week for the last 2 years and 8 times out of 10 they mess the order up. this coming from a girl that orders the same thing every time. its either the wrong milk (which i use soy) or it vanilla not mocha or the wrong size. its a busy location but its so frustrating esp when you go through the drive thru and dont think to taste it until you drive off. then again shame on me after all this time. thats another thing, the drive thru. if youre in a rush in the am the drive thru is always a good 8-10 min wait. if it wasnt on my way to work and i wasnt addicted i prob would never go to this location. sorry guys.


REVIEW #23:  3 stars  (447 chars)
It's Starbucks. Chances are you've had it, so I won't go into details about how amazing my Passion Tea tasted. I frequent this location, as it is located conveniently off of the 215.  The service is friendly and fast most days. I will caution you to avoid the drive-thru if you see more than 7 cars. I have waited 20+ minutes on more than one occasion. If it's backed up, I usually head two blocks down to Grouchy John's. Really good alternative.


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (693 chars)
Terrible customer service!! ...  ... I came in on a Monday afternoon (April 15th, 2013 at 2:30 PM) and was not greeted as I walked in. I brushed it off and stepped up to order. The three employees behind the counter continued their conversation instead of assisting me even after I made eye contact and a smile. One of them even said good-bye to another employee that just started walking into his peripheral vision instead of helping a customer who has been in his line of sight the whole time. I looked at my phone and I had been standing there for about 4 minutes, with no one saying a word or offering me assistance. ...  ... I ended up walking out, what kind of BS establishment is this?


REVIEW #25:  1 stars  (656 chars)
Okay, I love Starbucks and am a gold card member.. But this location is my absolute least favorite.. Which totally stinks since it's the closest to my house. The drive thru wait is always forever long. They mess up my order more times than they get it right. I was just there, went inside, long line and they were not putting names on orders. This caused a cluster of drinks and confusion at the pickup window. I'm pretty sure I got the wrong drink and it tastes terrible. That or they messed up my order again. I'm making the switch to Grouchy Johns which is just as close. I'll save my Starbucks fix for the location by my work which is always on point.


REVIEW #26:  1 stars  (405 chars)
I admit, I have a coffee addiction and I frequent Starbucks daily.  I recently started going to this store when my job moved to this side of town. I only went here for a week because I almost always received the most unfriendly service at this store. There are a couple baristas here that are amazing, but the attitude from others is enough for me to have started going to the Warm Springs and 215 store.


................................................................................
LOCATION #147:  address="8164 S Las Vegas Blvd Ste 100 Southeast"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89123"  (34 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (638 chars)
This Starbucks is near my workplace so I'm always here. The staff is always friendly, the quality is always where it should be, and the service is very prompt and accurate. Most Starbucks around the city can get rather packed but this one isn't that bad. 90% of the time I find a place to sit and play with my iPad. The manager, Adam, is very attentive to what's going on in his store and when something doesn't go the customer's way, he will try fix it so the customer leaves happy. I'll keep coming to this Starbucks for a looong time for my good ol' green tea latte's. PS. I asked my Lovely girlfriend out at this special coffee shop.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (284 chars)
Fast and clean service and outside seating is perfect to snob it up like a preppie and fresh air and clean area.... Great place for a cup coffee any time of the day.....! Cause I said so...... And never tell a guy with out a neck that he's wrong .....;) lol have a great day !!!!! Yo


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (250 chars)
I LOVE this place! The people that are at the drive through are always so friendly with a huge smile on their faces! Really brightens up your day when you see a smile on their faces & hear the enthusiasm in their voices! Best Starbucks in Las Vegas!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (226 chars)
This is a really fast Starbucks with a drive thru. The baristas are really friendly and even gave me directions, as I am new in town. Make you sure you try the seasonal blend. It tastes really good. My new favorite Starbucks.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (163 chars)
Wow this store is a top stop for my family. The staff is always super nice and very quick to make your drink. We are Starbucks lovers and this store is top notch.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (143 chars)
I'm a regular here, and its a good location, clean, nice service and overall leaves me wanting more Starbucks.  ...  ... Mission accomplished.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (121 chars)
The Baristas rock here! I stop in on my way to work and they are always so happy and caffeinated.  Super friendly staff!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (474 chars)
Some companies perfect their products and deliver the best consistently. This is the company. There are other large key competitors, but I think Starbucks set the standard in the industry. ...  ... This particular location is just a few miles from the strip so it's not that busy. Service was quick and the coffee was great. ...  ... They have limited seating here, but also have a drive through. Not to mention, you'll see some "interesting" people come in and go out!  ;P


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (465 chars)
It's a Starbucks...what more can I say about it???  I got their Shaken Ice Tea with the passion fruit.  Very tasty.  It's a really good summer drink.  You can't go wrong with coffee from Starbucks...they've got it down to a science...consistent drinks, average prices and fast service.  This is a really good location...and has a drive thru for added convenience.   ...  ... Has outdoor seating and is close to my house...I'm sure we'll be back here with our dogs!


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (401 chars)
This Starbucks is great!! It can get quite packed, both drive thru and in store, but they have such a great team which seems to have it down to a method so that they get you in and out as fast as they can and with great drinks! Definitely a great team of people, they are always kind and friendly.  I love this location since it is so close to my home, as well as on my way to work and anywhere else!


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (358 chars)
I visit this location almost every single day, and have noticed over the last few weeks they have really picked up the pace. I swear for five months straight I would have to wait ten minutes in the drive through each time. But they have really sped things up. With that being said my order is always correct and all the baristas have great customer service.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (357 chars)
Generally friendly baristas and pretty generous with the "extra whip".  Drinks are made well for the most part, not weighing too much on the occasionally watery chai tea. They are pretty quick, even during a rush, but once in awhile they give me the wrong kind of scone. Overall though, they get it right, make it tasty, and are always smiling. *thumbs up*


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (307 chars)
Hilarious drive thru girls. They were making party line jokes and cracked us up.  Refreshing when tired road tripping. ...  ... Even though it was busy it moved quickly and our drinks were exactly as ordered.  ...  ... I'd give them one more star if they had a double drive thru so it would go even faster.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (263 chars)
This was my first stop at this Starbucks.  It was very busy but orders moved along quickly.  Friendly, efficient baristas and cashier staff made the experience a good one.  This is one less Starbucks I need to visit to get to all of them in the Las Vegas Valley.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (231 chars)
The baristas are friendly and I usually have a table to study at for hours though it can get busy around noon. The music is loud and not to my taste, and sometimes they don't have the panini I prefer, but all in all, a good place.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (230 chars)
Great starbucks location located south of the strip right on LV Blvd. Conveniently located next to a CVS and other fast food. Good service, quick turnaround... the coffee seemed better here somehow... maybe 'cause it's Vegas. ;-)


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (215 chars)
This is my neighborhood Starbucks. I usually stop by a few times a week on my way to work. ... Drive thru is pretty quick except for the occasional busy morning, and then it is faster to run in. ... Friendly staff.


REVIEW #18:  4 stars  (124 chars)
Coffee's good, but super expensive since its on the strip.  They do make a delish iced white chocolate nonfat mocha though.


REVIEW #19:  3 stars  (1974 chars)
I would normally give Starbuck's 5 stars, I mean c'mon, it's Starbucks. But this location REALLY needs to work on its "Food with beverage" system. TWICE now they've made me late for work because they got me my coffee but forgot my goddamn croissant. They ask if you want it warmed up, and I always say yes. Usually takes just a couple minutes. Once I sat in the drive-thru for 10 minutes while they tried to find it and then had to make a new one. I'm sure the 6 cars behind me LOVED that. I mean WTF, people. It's a goddamn croissant, stick it in the oven for a minute and hand it over, or if that's too difficult just put it in a bag and I'll microwave it at work. ...  ... I'm fuming as I write this because I HATE being late for work. The line today for both drive-thru and inside were at least 10 people deep. I ordered regular coffee instead of a latte because I knew it would take forever. Got the croissant as a last-minute whim (What? I love croissants and having it stare at me from the case while I waited to place an order made it impossible to resist) and he asked if I wanted it warm. I asked how long, and he said just a minute. So I got my regular coffee and went over to put cream in it thinking I'm making good time. 5 minutes go by, I'm starting to pace because now I have to rush to work. Another 5 and then the people after me with 3 kids gets their breakfast sandwiches. WHAT THE $*%&. The guy goes, are you waiting for something? I said, YES a croissant for like 10 minutes. I'm in a  goddamn hurry. JESUS. I see him go back there and stick it in the oven for 15 seconds and stick it in a bag and bring it over, which just PISSES me off even more KNOWING I've been wasting 10 minutes for a stupid effing croissant. ...  ... I get to work 2 minutes late. Granted that doesn't seem like a big deal to most people but that's not the case for where I work. Late is late and it is NOT okay. $&*(^#%#*(&^$* EFF YOU Starbucks for the shitty start to my day!


REVIEW #20:  3 stars  (522 chars)
I've been here maybe twice since living on this side of town.  I've never been a huge Starbucks person even though I spent half of my life in Seattle lol oh well.  I got .10 off for bringing my own coffee cup, but I like just paying a flat .99 for a refill where I usually go.  There's not much I can elaborate on since I'm more of the house coffee type or black coffee in general without all the loaded sugars and syrups, but I will indulge every once in awhile.  Ooops back to my review..it's in a good location for me.


REVIEW #21:  3 stars  (392 chars)
Ran in here with my friend right before closing so she could use their free wi-fi. We didn't buy anything and they practically swept us out so overall I can only base it on my 5 minute experience and it was satisfactory. I'm not a fan of any Starbucks but it was nice that they were open late and let us sit in there using their wi-fi without buying anything...or maybe they didn't notice =/


REVIEW #22:  3 stars  (328 chars)
I'm waiting for my drink but I can't believe this location is full of flies! At around 2pm on a Monday not even crazy busy, this Starbucks location was a bit messy attracting flies. So if your planning to sit down and enjoy a cup of your fav beverage be ware of company!  ...  ... Other than that. Ok beverages! It's Starbucks.


REVIEW #23:  3 stars  (263 chars)
As I was heading home to LA, I wanted some coffee. This Starbucks is convenient and just south of the Strip. However, they have the world's slowest service here! I don't know if it was because of the crazy drinks people were ordering or if it was the hired help.


REVIEW #24:  3 stars  (209 chars)
Ok service. This store is still obviously confused by the corporate mandated changes in their internal process. There was a line the whole time. The service was rushed and I couldn't say that it was friendly.


REVIEW #25:  3 stars  (114 chars)
Starbucks is Starbucks.  Place was clean and my drink was made correctly.  Stopped by because is was next to CVS.


REVIEW #26:  2 stars  (497 chars)
Well i try to avoid this starbucks at all possible but its the one closest to my house so i dont really have a choice.  ...  ... I will say that morning crew is better than the evening crew. Esp going thru the drive thru.  ...  ... I say this because this past evening there was an episode where they took soo long with the order that alot of ppl were also complaining. granted there was only 3 ppl working from what i saw. Shouldnt Starbuck know how to staff ppl at appropriate hours of the day?


REVIEW #27:  2 stars  (202 chars)
SLOWEST STARBUCKS EVER. I can't stand that this is the closest location to my house. I'm a former partner so I totally understand lines and wait times and I always end up waiting for way too long here.


REVIEW #28:  1 stars  (961 chars)
Nothing bugs me more than paying for an expensive coffee and it not being made right!!! I gave this Starbucks more than 3 chances and they failed me.  I just moved to Vegas and I was happy to see a drive thru Starbucks right up the street but I now drive the extra mile up the road to the walkin Starbucks, because this place is HORRIBLE.  ... MY drink had tasted like straight sugar even when I ask for extra Coffee.  When I called the first time to explain that I wanted a replacement the manager insisted I bring the drink back even if I go the next day. WHAAAAT? ummm ridiculous!!!  Bring the same drink back a day later???? Yes!!! Crazy. My wait in line is always 15 minutes or more.  ... And when I get to the window they are not friendly or welcoming, never say hello just ask for the total.  ... Oh and they always look very social inside. Maybe they should focus on making a proper drink!!! I would rather have McDonalds coffee then go here again!!!!!


REVIEW #29:  1 stars  (690 chars)
I always give this Starbucks the benefit of the doubt! Its my go-to when I need to go to work but today I stopped by on my day off around 8:30AM. The drive thru's are always ridiculously long (up to 15 min wait sometimes) so I decided to order inside. I order a grande light white mocha/hot and they give me a small mocha frappe. Mistakes happen sure- but they made it seem like it was my fault they messed up. Plus not one of the 5 people working there today  apologize for the length of time I had been waiting. Once the barista gave me my correct drink, I said Thank You and barely even looked at me. Way to go on your customer service Starbucks. Never ever going to this location EVER!


REVIEW #30:  1 stars  (677 chars)
I went there today to order the green tea latte. I got it recommend by my friends. The taste is pretty good, but I don't like the customer service. It was the worst one ever. The guy who took my order his name is Louie. My husband ask " can I have a green tea latte" and he said " green tea frappuccino?" Then I told my husband that I think it not that kind, because I wasn't sure it's the right flavor. Then he said "ok thank you, I wait for you at the window" I was so surprise. We haven't finished the order yet, and he didn't ask the size for my drink. Later, we gotta pay for the large one. It piss me off. Such a bad customer service here. I never gonna come back again.


REVIEW #31:  1 stars  (480 chars)
This is by far the WORST Starbucks that I kno of... I've never sat in a line so long before just got a coffee.... I was in line for over 20 mins a few times and they never say thanks for waiting how may I take your order they just go straight into ordering.. So I said when I approached the window what's the hold up...?? And the guy said well we only have three people working..... If it's busy then just hire more people you kno???? My gosh it's horrible horrible horrible.....


REVIEW #32:  1 stars  (324 chars)
The worse drive through ever. If you want to wait 20 mins in line come here. I can see this maybe happening here and there. But out of 8 times I've been here only one time in which  I did not have to wait less then 5 mins. Just got to the screen 14 mins after waiting. So another 5 mins and hopefully I will be out of here.


REVIEW #33:  1 stars  (317 chars)
Why do I even bother coming back here? Their green tea latte tastes gritty from the  powder they refuse to blend. Keep forgetting that this is the one location I have to order a chai latte instead since they have no clue on how to blend the free tea latte. Seriously if you can't make it right, take it off the menu.


REVIEW #34:  1 stars  (316 chars)
Fourth visit and fourth time they get my order wrong.  I can't wait to use up this gift card.  Expressso seems so weak, almost watered down.  Light ice here must mean 3/4 cup filled.   I'm about to give this gift card away.  One star for at least the server smiles and apologizes for the numerous mistakes they make


................................................................................
LOCATION #148:  address="8440 Farm Rd Centennial"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89131"  (12 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (272 chars)
I have frequented this Starbucks for five years, as it is the closest one to where I work.  They are always polite and fun and they deal well with the fact that my "preferred" drink changes by the day.  I actually tip at this Starbucks!  (Wow, I sound like a cheap turd.)


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (29 chars)
Friendly and energetic crew!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (721 chars)
I visit this location every morning before I go to work. The drive Thur is usually nuts, but I don't mind going inside because the line moves quickly, if there even is a line inside. The staff is always nice and friendly too which is a must!  ... I have to say that I am not really a fan of the new remodel though. If you are looking to sit  down at a table with a friend the new layout doesn't really allow for that. Although it does look very similar to the original Starbucks on Pike Street in Seattle, maybe that's what they were going for, a retro coffee house vibe.  ... Either way I love this location and I am thankful they are there for my morning coffee before work and my treats on the weekends! Yay for Sbux!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (501 chars)
I usually go through the drive thru, but if there is a huge line, I will go inside. The drive thru service is nice. Staff quite friendly. When you go inside, they are not quite as friendly. Kinda odd since its the same people. I suppose it is easier to be friendly over an intercom than in person? Other than that this is your typical Starbucks. Parking near the store is tight. My only real gripe is they have a limited food menu since most of the items are gone unless you are there in the morning.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (433 chars)
Service has gotten a lot better and more consistent the last couple months I've been by here. It's still the most convenient Starbucks for me since it's right around the corner from my house, so I come here a lot. Would defnitely still recommend going inside because the drive thru line here is always out of control. Either way, once you order, your drink should come out pretty fast...the issue is just waiting your turn to order!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (390 chars)
I love caffeine and you are sure to find a Starbucks within a mile of any location in this town. The lattes are good I recommend the White Mocha with one pump raspberry, pumpkin latte, or the white peppermint mocha. The reason they don't get five stars is the prices are ridiculous and the beans always taste overcooked, Illy and Lavazza have smoother tasting beans if that matters to you.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (273 chars)
Its starbucks, I dont even know what to say about it that hasn't been said.  ... I like this location because its mad close to my house and beyond the early morning super crunch they usually have a pretty quick easy breezy drive through! ... Staff is nice... i'll be back!


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (236 chars)
I stopped in here yesterday because I was in the area.  The staff was absolutely the best!  Great service and good beverage.   ...  ... This is off my normal path by quite a bit, and I was glad I made the stop here for my daily coffee.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (189 chars)
I love this Starbucks simply because it is easy off, and easy on the 95 as I head to work or downtown. They have always given me my order fast and accurate. Love the Pumpkin Spice Frapps!!


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (103 chars)
This location had friendly staff on this visit! Had plenty of seating and still had comfortable chairs


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (1538 chars)
Normally I would give this location 4 stars, however, they've really gone downhill the last few times I visited since something has gone wrong with my order each time. I frequent this location all time time since it's right down the street from my house, so it's easy to hit it up on the way to work. If you go inside it's usually empty since everyone piles up in the drive thru in the mornings. If you wait in the drive thru line you might have to wait behind 5-6 cars, sometimes more! ...  ... I am a regular at Starbucks so of course I have gold status. However at this location they frequently forget when you tell them you're redeeming a drink reward and I have gotten charged the last few times even after telling them that I was trying to redeem my free drink. They also seem to have a lot of employee turnover here because there has been someone different at the register lately and some of them don't know what they're doing. Today after ordering a breakfast sandwich, I sat down for 10-15 min and never had my name called. I went back to the cashier to inquire about my sandwich, telling them I never got it and all he said was "really? what kind was it again?" Then 2 min later I magically got my sandwich with no apologies or acknowledgement that I had been waiting forever and was now running late for work. ...  ... In the future I will try to frequent other Starbucks locations instead of this one, but this one is just too close to my house to avoid. Hopefully they begin training their staff better and fix these issues.


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (1341 chars)
Went in with the Mrs. while doing the weekend thing and was disappointed they didn't have any pumpkin spice. The kicker here is the reason we were given. We were told that they would not have anymore until next year because pumpkin spice was only for the fall and it was now winter. What? Where did they get their calendar? The seasonally challenged clerk then asked the Mrs. what "other" holiday drinks she liked. If pumpkin spice is only for the fall and they stop offering it prior to Thanksgiving because it is now "winter", what "holiday" was she referring to? Halloween? Labor Day? I have been to numerous Starbucks since this visit and they ALL were able to proudly offer pumpkin spice. Even Mickey D's is offering pumpkin spice now. It is obviously a favorite flavor of many and in high demand. How can the mother of all coffee places drop the ball and not have pumpkin spice at the ready the week leading up to Thanksgiving? The poor clerk was obviously just trying to cover somebody's ordering blunder with her feable attempt at explaining why they did not have any pumpkin spice, but made herself look a little foolish in the process. I will, however, be back, as it is Starbucks and I love my cup of joe. The Mrs. will have to find a new location, though, until next year when this location gets a new shipment of pumpkin spice.


................................................................................
LOCATION #149:  address="855 S Grand Central Pkwy Downtown"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89106"  (14 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (849 chars)
5 stars for service!  Read on : ...  ... So we were walking in the Outlet mall with a friend.  I DON'T drink coffee at all...so you can see why I stay away from Starbucks in general...not much for me to see or do here LOL. ...  ... But my friend wanted some coffee, so I obliged.  I was looking at the menu behind her, and she offered to buy me something.  I kindly said no to my friend...but the cashier overheard us and INSISTED I try something.  I told him I don't drink coffee, only a little tea, but that I just didn't need anything.  He took the initiative, and said he was going to make me a Passion Fruit Tazo Tea or some crap like that.  He didn't charge us...just made us a drink lol! ...  ... It was good, and of course I threw in a few bucks for tip on the principal alone.  But the effort was what made the impression....Great service!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (439 chars)
LOVE this Starbucks! After having gone to MULTIPLE locations on the strip and having my Starbucks Double shot made incorrectly every time, coming to this location and having my drink not only just made correctly but made very fuhreakin well; I'm in heaven. Oh yeah and the 2 baristas working were very interactive and friendly, which made it twice as nice. Nothing like your favorite drink made great with a side of friendly conversation.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (210 chars)
this is a popular place.  We came here after a day of shopping and freezing our butts off.  Hot chocolate is perfect for days like this.  lots of places to sit but it's very busy. Not exactly a place to relax.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (14 chars)
always 5 star


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (841 chars)
Everyone and their mom has been to a Starbucks. They have coffee, tea, snacks and other miscellaneous coffee accessories. And for that reason, I will not be reviewing their products. This is strictly on their service. They are located in the center of the outlets. No matter what time of day it is, there is ALWAYS a line that wraps around. They see a lot customers, especially all the tourists!!! Language is a huge barrier at times and it can be difficult to understand orders. The employees here have always been so friendly. They are all calm and composed, even with their 20 cups lined up with drinks to make. They are fast, which I appreciate since I only have a short time to grab my drink (grande vanilla iced coffee with a splash of nonfat milk) before heading back to work. And hats off to the cashiers who spell MARIE correctly!!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (656 chars)
This has to be one of the busiest ones in a mall setting, in the city. The line is always super long. It's always crowded in here. This place makes bank. Great location, I suppose, right across from the food court (just ok). ...  ... We've probably been to this one the most, together. We usually split a Mocha Chip Frap if we need a little pick-me-up. I don't usually drink coffee (or soda for that matter), but I am a regular tea drinker. So by splitting it, I don't feel as if I am bouncing off the walls. Service is pretty good considering how busy this place is- feels like bumper to bumper. Clean. Lots of seating but like I said, it's a busy place.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (446 chars)
You gotta hand it to them. The constant line of people snaking through this Starbucks in day could probably wrap around the Earth. And they manage it. ...  ... Located inside the always busy (I'm groping through my mental thesaurus for a word that's busy x10... frenetic? insect-like infestation?) Premium Outlets, this Starbucks handles enormous crowds with a reasonable wait given the givens and very few errors. ...  ... Plus the a/c is boss.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (337 chars)
You had to know I would rock out the Starbucks visits in Vegas too and in combination with Outlet shopping, now you're saying my name! ...  ... Great Starbucks with friendly barista's and my drink was made perfectly just how I like it.  What more could I ask for.  Some caffeine and I'm good to go. ...  ... Love my Bucks wherever I go.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (307 chars)
If you get to the outlet too early, stop here for a drink. This place gets crowded during the day, but its a "real" starbucks not a fake one at the casino... so you can use your card, get points, and not pay over inflated casino prices. ...  ... Staff are pretty friendly, and they try their best to hurry.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (231 chars)
good Starbucks, busy because it's inside the outlet mall. (i should know, i work in a Starbucks inside a mall) ... i had a very light lunch, which was just the egg salad sandwich and iced caramel macchiato.  ... good job partners!


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (186 chars)
Lines were extremely long during Black Friday event. ...  ... Ordered a few of the holiday blend to share between my crowd and the server was very quick and efficient to take our order.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (503 chars)
Since this Starbucks is located in the busy Premium Outlets, expect long wait times...both in line to place your order and when waiting for your drink. The dining area is also always super packed as well and there is nowhere to sit. This is a coffee shop where you need to grab your drinks and go. The baristas are friendly and patient, even though they're probably running around, making drinks like maniacs. I only come here when I really need a coffee/drink while at the mall, which isn't very often


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (453 chars)
I will start with the fact that waiting 20 minutes for any sort of coffee is not worth it when you are spoiled with the Las Vegas environment. ...  ... It is worth it if you prefer getting an ice water with any of your Starbucks orders though. Be sure to order water when you are here. Dehydration, exhaustion, and soreness occurs when you are in an outdoor mall! ...  ... Expect long waits, possible mistakes on custom orders, and no tables to sit at.


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (525 chars)
The line is always long, but they are staffed well to deal with the overabundance of out of towners. The people who are working behind the bar are friendly, but I am sure they are all singing the same song about their annoying patrons once they get home. Although entertaining, save your job and do not place it on Youtube. ...  ... I tend to stick to an Iced Americano. Instead of cold water, espresso, and ice, hot water was added. It melted the ice too quickly. The coffee was strong enough preserve a bold flavor though.


................................................................................
LOCATION #150:  address="8975 S Eastern Ave Southeast"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89123"  (48 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1087 chars)
Provided the Yelp gods don't strike me down for reviewing a Starbucks I will always view this Starbucks as the model for what they all should be. Friendly, fast, accurate and masters of the bean-inspired beverage.  ...  ... Trust me when I say I go to Starbucks a lot. Every day. My day is screwy if I don't visit one of these glorious kingdoms of coffee. This location is just great at what they do. A high traffic area they probably see hundreds of customers every morning and still remember my drink, even when I'm just talking to a speaker at the drive thru! Go inside and it's like watching a well oiled machine. Don't let the lines scare you because these people know you have somewhere to be, even if it is their couches a few feet away. I'm not going to bore you with the choices cause everyone has been to a Starbucks (venti iced coffee with 4 pumps toffee nut and whipped cream for me, a-thank you) but I think the fact they're so busy keeps their coffee fresh and great tasting.  ...  ... As a self proclaimed Starbucks addict, this is the absolute best one to feed my beast.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (974 chars)
There's nothing better than a staff that remembers a regular's name and drink....this staff has it down... ...  ... Not that that's critical but it is one of those extra touches that customers appreciate.  It makes it painful to go to other locations with lesser quality employees.  I've found that some Starbucks have either the smiling faced, happy to give you your fix staff, or the ultra granola that smirks at your because you aren't driving a Prius and destroying the earth. ...  ... This one is full of the smiling staff and extremely friendly and helpful.  They get SLAMMED at the drive-thru more than any other Starbucks or business I've ever seen.  Sometimes when it gets so bad they surprise you after a looong wait with an apology and FREE DRINK.  Without prompting they say, "sorry for the wait, it's on us today!"...No complaining needed they just get that you were waiting too long and make sure you leave with a smile. ...  ... See ya guys 5 times a day!!!!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (360 chars)
Ally took our order and I have to type she knows her stuff!!!  I had several questions and WOW she gave me an education on coffee!  Who knew?  I strongly recommend your next trip here ask for her and ask her about the way coffee is made... ...  ... The new remodel here is exceptional.  They have literately doubled the space.  Great out door seating as well!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (341 chars)
24 hour starbucks, free wi-fi, EXCELLENT and friendly staff...what more is there to ask?  well, other than more seating. ...  ... im rating solely on the place.  in regards to their coffee, no comment bcs i dont drink coffee.  however, the passion iced tea/lemonade is a must! so refreshing and so cheap compared to glorified coffee drinks!


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (266 chars)
Miss this place! I have lived in many different cities over the years and this is the only city that never sleeps and of course has a 24 hour Starbucks! I enjoy the customer service and the team that works here and no matter when I come I get a great cup of Coffee!


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (250 chars)
This is my favorite Starbucks, when the drive thru line is too backed up they will normally give me a free coffee to say sorry. If you are in a hurry and the drive thru is long I would recommend going inside. You will get your drink faster that way.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (208 chars)
My new local coffee spot to do the following: ...  ... -Read ... -write ... -grade papers ... -blog ... -and just handle stuff ...  ... Did I mention it is 24 hours?! ...  ... Also, ample seating and tables!


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (197 chars)
They recently renovated and the place is brighter, warmer, and more spacious. The only place in town (that I kind of) that is open late enough for me to get work done. It's the perfect study spot!


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (151 chars)
Great Service and they are always busy - everyone is super nice and orders have always been outstanding.  They know my name and order every time I go!


REVIEW #10:  5 stars  (57 chars)
Out of all the starbucks they made the best caffe mocha!


REVIEW #11:  5 stars  (50 chars)
Always quick, accurate, and flavorful! Great job!


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (1699 chars)
Starbucks....What can I say about starbucks....For the taste...I guess its alright.  I happen to like quite a few other places over it for taste but by the same token, I gave this place four stars for the following reasons... ...  ...       **********************  Pro's ******************* ... 1) Open 24 hours ...  ... 2) Always makes my drink right even though I have pretty complicated taste buds (2-3 shots of expresso over ice, 3 pumps of toffee nut and 1 pump of sugar free hazelnut all over ice) The good thing is if you have a registered card, they don't charge you for the flavor.  Since I ask for two different flavors, they could very well charge me for one but they never do.  ... You also get one free refill if you order Ice coffee, regular coffee or their passion ice tea. Can't beat that now can you? ...  ... 3) Close to my saigon 8 which has awesome vietnamese food for vegas, yogurtland to quench my frozen yogurt urges and right off the freeway. ...  ...   **********  Now for the con's :(  ********* ... 1) Way too cold all the time, I leave a blanket, and a sweater in the car just in case i head here to study. ...   ... 2) The music is way loud.  Even with awesome earplugs, I can hear the music clearly....no bueno. ...  ... 3) The seats are super uncomfy.  I have a seat cushion in the car if i come here. ( Hardcore studier here! )  Hence, I sometimes opt for the Trop and Decatur location even though I live on the outskirts of henderson, takes me 40 mins to get there...They have booth seating and its not going to cause me frostbite toes. :) ...  ...    All in all though...great place for students to study late night, just make sure to bring earplugs and a sweater.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (1578 chars)
This is a Starbuck's that never sleeps. It is the 24 Hour Starbuck's serving the Southeast Valley. ...  ...     This is my go-to Starbuck's very late at night or very early in the morning. When I suffer from insomnia or I work very early shifts, I come here for my caffeine fix. This Starbuck's is testimony that there is nightlife at Starbuck's. For crying out loud, at three in the morning it is happening.   ...  ...   When I come here in the very early morning I feel safe. There is plenty of protection. Ordinarily, I will be sharing the place with Metro, the Henderson Police, or the Nevada Highway Patrol. ...  ...   In the peak hours, Starbuck's mania lives at this location. When I visit this location in the late afternoon, it is ordinarily full to capacity to the degree that there will be a wait for a table. It is common to see Starbuck's customers waiting with a cup of coffee to get a table. I am one of them. This Starbuck's fills up with an eclectic group of people that include people leaving the Las Vegas Athletic Club, friends meeting up, business people, and people working on their lap tops.  ...  ...   As far as customer service, it has usually been good. At three in the morning I do not expect four star customer service. I am glad that there is a Starbuck's open. Because this location is hyper busy there is less interaction between barista and customer than a slower Starbuck's at Valle Verde at Paseo Verde would have. ...  ...  As long as this is the 24 hour Starbuck's serving the southeast Valley I will return. Especially when I cannot sleep.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (916 chars)
This Starbucks is pretty awesome! It's located right near my gym and is my go to place whenever I need a quick pick me up. ...  ... The biggest benefit that this Starbucks has compared to most others is that it is almost open 24/7. I can't remember correctly if it's either Sunday and Monday, or Monday and Tuesday, but during one of those couple of days every week, during 1am-4am, they are closed to do a deep cleaning of the store. I appreciate that so that it doesn't turn into a complete sh*tshow! ...  ... Another great benefit is that this Starbucks is HUGE! It's not your typical small intimate coffee shop. This place is large... and in charge!! (like Charles - Scott Baio) ((not the Fonz, but still pretty good)) ...  ... Great location, great hours, convenient, clean, the employees seem well trained. Can't really find any faults with this one. Way to go! (But I save the 5-stars for the local spots ;p)


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (897 chars)
I know others have been a little harsh on this location.  I have to say I like it though.  I have to confess that I do not drink coffee but I get hot chocolate and tea here.   ...  ... The biggest cons of this place is the cleanliness.  It is sometimes a little dirty but normally there are not a lot of people on staff and with the shop being open 24 hours a day it is hard to get the place super clean. Also being in the same shopping center with a bunch of other restaurants and Las Vegas Fitness Club it can be a real pain to turn left into the shopping center. ...  ... The upside to this place if the atmosphere.  I like the general chatter and coziness of the place.  I like to come here and work on school work or write reviews for Yelp.  :D  It is pretty easy to get to a plug to keep my computer running and I can get a drink and/or a snack when I am starting to digress  from homework.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (861 chars)
This Starbucks is just really useful for the tired, overworked, and wired. People like us NEED this place! We need a place to sit down, relax, and continue to work. This Starbucks is like my home. I use it to study for exams because it has a big seating area and it's open 24/7. However, even though I need coffee to get through life, I wouldn't say Sbux serves the absolute best coffee. They also have the worst coffee shop food in general! Everything I eat is always stale or odd tasting. But, man, is getting frappes and sweet drinks here addictive!! I just can't get enough of it!!!  ...  ... Some of my favorite drinks include: Java Chip (my everyday drink), Shaken Iced Passion Tea Sweetened (my diet drink haha), and Caramel Apple Spice (my feel good drink on a cold night).  ...  ... Oh, make no mistake, you'll definitely catch me here at finals week!


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (841 chars)
Some mornings, this place is absolutely amazing.  Other mornings, it's really off.  When I go in the afternoons, I receive good, solid service.  So most of the time, it's the bee's knees. ...  ... Protip: If you're going for your morning coffee before work, the earlier the better (as if I really had to tell you that).  I actually work fairly early (7am start) so even when I stop by here around 6:30-6:40, it's pretty unpredictable.  One morning I was in and out very quickly, another it took them almost 15 minutes to get through, oh, 3-4 cars. ...  ... Drink orders are always spot on, so nothing to complain about here.  Drive-Thru PLUS 24 hours PLUS down the street?  Yeah, I'm kind of a sucker for it. ...  ... Just beware the mass of students and hipsters with their laptops!  I usually order to-go so I'm not a stickler on seating.


REVIEW #18:  4 stars  (758 chars)
THE BEST PART OF WAKING UP..... IS HAVING STARBUCKS IN YOUR CUP.... ...  ... This place never fails me. This particular location is located off of eastern and 215 near the LVAC gym. Its 24 hours that's what I love about this Starbucks and it also has free wifi.. I love to go here to chat with freinds and use as a meeting point.. I also love studying here since it's just down the road from my house.. Also I love people watching here when im tryinging to kill time i see some interesting stuff.. for example I witness a internet meet up.. too bad the girl was not interested in the guy... also witnessed a guy trying to pick up a girl at the Starbucks. Haha can you tell I get so bored easily.. Go to this Starbucks you'll see some intersting crap... LOL!


REVIEW #19:  4 stars  (632 chars)
My car thermometer said it was 38 degrees this morning when I was headed to work, and I was in the mood for a quick caffeine pick-me-up. Thank you coffee gods for giving this Starbucks a drive thru!  ...  ... There is usually a line of 2-5 cars when I stop here before work but the people working always seem to get people on their way quickly. I have never gotten the wrong drink and most of the time they don't even charge me for the extra drizzle of caramel I request!  ...  ... I have never stepped foot inside, so no comments on the cleanliness, or lack thereof. All I know is on cold mornings, that drive-thru is a lifesaver!


REVIEW #20:  4 stars  (625 chars)
You know a place is a great place when you go and there is hardly any place to sit other than the floor. You may have to wait a minute or two (don't count and or quote me) to get a table, but it is well worth it. The staff has been exceptionally kind and friendly, always willing to please. That alone should gain your business. The staff is friendly, knowledgeable, helpful and FAST. I usually go around the afternoon to the early evening and there is a bit of people, but I never have to wait long to get a table. I love that it's 24 hours, and the later I've stayed the friendlier the staff seemed to get. A+ in my books!


REVIEW #21:  4 stars  (609 chars)
I needed a caffeine fix and this was right off the freeway.  I had noticed this location once when I was a passenger in a car and could look around and enjoy.  I filed away in my brain the location so I could stop here when I needed to. ...  ... The need arose yesterday.  I had hiked a little under four miles and this was a good place to stop for my daily Starbucks. ...  ... I did not use the drive through.  The line was long.  Instead I parked in front and went inside.  The workers were very friendly and competent. I was in and out in no time at all and right back on the freeway heading to Summerlin.


REVIEW #22:  4 stars  (609 chars)
No doubt one of the better Starbucks in town for a couple reasons. ...  ... 1. its super convenient - located right off the 215. ... 2. drive thru! ... 3. open 24/7 one of the few in Vegas and the only one on the south side. ... 4. newly expanded -  double the size! more space for studying and hanging out ...  ... Keep in mind that this location does get packed. Even with the new expanded area it can still be tough to find a spot camp in during peak hours. The coffee is like any other Starbucks location and the drive-thru is pretty quick. Perfect spot for late night study sessions or just hanging out.


REVIEW #23:  4 stars  (588 chars)
I love how this place has a 24 hr drive through window. I haven't had a problem with the service, in fact the people were so nice that when I brought my dog with me...they offered him a doggie treat!  They're not that fast, but they get the job done.   ...  ... The only bad thing I really dislike is the location.  It's a little far from home, and right off a busy freeway.  The traffic getting into here and out is a hassle.  In fact getting through the drive through is a hassle.  I wish they'd move down near Silverado and Eastern.  Possibly in the Silverado Plaza?Just a suggestion.


REVIEW #24:  4 stars  (324 chars)
Best location! The baristas are great and they really go out of their way to remember my name and my order. They are super fast and for the most part you can be in and out in 5 minutes. They are expanding the store which will be great when it is done but for the next 3 weeks they have a standing room only temporary store.


REVIEW #25:  4 stars  (277 chars)
They have a drive-thru thus...automatic 4 stars. I am not hard to please when it comes to Starbucks, as I only ever order one thing: a treinta black iced coffee. I know that doesn't make me a connoisseur of S'bucks so take my review for what it's worth. Now where's my coffee?


REVIEW #26:  4 stars  (254 chars)
I know I am addicted.. I love the Starbucks.. They are pretty much everywhere now, and it is hard to write a review for just one store. But 24 hours! Heck yes batman, I am a fan! This town is 24 hours, so it is great, good place to people watch as well!


REVIEW #27:  4 stars  (243 chars)
I love starbucks.  I  know it is so corporate and blah blah but the drinks really are great.  I can always count on my drink tasting the same (unless I maybe go to a grocery store one).  Other cofffee shops just don't typically taste as good.


REVIEW #28:  4 stars  (234 chars)
Ordered the coffee which is really good and also ordered the oatmeal with blueberries they ran out of blueberries but they're very busy they're very quick and I would recommend coming here I'm a very good environment nice atmosphere!


REVIEW #29:  4 stars  (87 chars)
Fast drive through. Drink order was right and the associate was friendly and on point.


REVIEW #30:  3 stars  (1896 chars)
I've been to this one Starbucks before (drive-thru) and it was good but I am so annoyed with my service today. I went there around 11:30pm because I was craving an iced caramel macchiato after work and because I wanted to see the activity so I could maybe make it my new "local" Starbucks as it's open 24/7, even though it's a bit farther than 2 other ones. It was packed and with good energy. The one guy at the register looked like he definitely didn't want to be there though. I know you've probably had a rough day but as a customer we don't know, so give everyone your best service and always flash a smile. It's simple, be nice. As I told him my first drink order he started to walk away. As I started saying the rest of my order he looked upset and kept on walking while taking my order. As he was always looking down I decided to keep my order simple. He took forever to type my order and I had to slide my card 4 times like wtf. He then proceeded to make the drinks of the other people that ordered AFTER me! I had just ordered a simple tall hot caramel macchiato and a venti iced caramel macchiato! After I got my drinks I asked for a cup holder because I don't have one in my car. He sighed and basically tossed me the cup holder tray, he wasn't even a foot away! All this time I was nice and calm trying not to say anything so I just rushed out of there to try and control myself as I didn't want to start complaining about service. As I get in my car and taste my iced macchiato, it's very milky. I could not taste any coffee at all. My moms drink was warm, not hot. I like to taste my coffee! If I had wanted a glass of milk, I could have just gone home. I didn't go back to complain because I knew if I did I would just get angry and start a scene which I didn't want to do as I might want to go back, but if that guy is there again, I'm asking someone else to take/make my order.


REVIEW #31:  3 stars  (983 chars)
Ok it's a Starbucks. I happen to actually like Starbucks. I love how its unpopular to say you like bux but they somehow sell more coffee than anybody else. Either more people like bux than will admit it, or people love drinking coffee they hate :-) ...  ... This particular location has lots of pros and a couple cons. ... Pros: 24hrs, drive thru, located right off the freeway and next to lvac. ...  ... Cons: either understaffed or undertrained but place is not always clean. Place is also often crowded.  ...  ... On a final personal note. I am a Starbucks Gold customer. I come here 5 days a week minimum and usually at the same time and order the same thing at the counter. Been doing this for a couple years. You would think with my name printed on the card that one time in two years, somebody would greet me by name when I come up to the register. Not the end of the world but certainly indicative of a stores training and management. Come on guys I'm a big fan, step it up!


REVIEW #32:  3 stars  (835 chars)
I avoid this Starbucks as often as I can. The only reason for the visits to this locations is because they are open 24/7. ...  ... No matter what time of day it is, the place is always packed with people on their computers "working." Some of them may be legitimately working, but a lot of them are just hanging out. It's hard to find a spot to just sit for a minute and enjoy a drink. Only tables that are open would be the ones outside, and that's because it's either freezing or a million degrees. I didn't know this was your own personal office to sit for hours and stare at your computer screen. What happened to studying at home or at the library? Maybe I'm just old school.  ...  ... Anyway, the drinks are always good and the employees are nice and efficient. The drive through does take a while so I suggest just going inside.


REVIEW #33:  3 stars  (722 chars)
I hate that it is located on Eastern. It's such a busy street and always have traffic. I just want to get a frappe without getting frustrated bad drivers.. on top of that, their parking lot is always full.  ... If you happen to go to this and want to get your Starbucks fast, do not go through the drive through. I repeat do not go through the drive through! The line may seem short and more convenient, but honestly it takes twice as long than the line inside (from my experience).  ...  ... I really enjoy that this Starbucks is 24 hours  and that they expanded the building. They have comfortable seating and a very clean environment(probably the cleanest). One thing for sure is no matter the time, this place is busy


REVIEW #34:  3 stars  (709 chars)
This is the only 24-hour Starbucks in the immediate area.  Considering the coffee chain's ubiquitous nature, I'm talking a radius of just a couple of miles.  That said, this place is a bit larger than most strip-mall variety Starbucks you'll find in Vegas and is part of a commercial center that features Las Vegas Athletic Club, some office buildings and a recently added Yogurtland.  Come here any night and you'll find it packed with students with laptops up, books open and headphones on.  There's plenty of tables outside too if you want to feel the warm air in the summertime.  Drink quality is as uniform as you'll get at a Starbucks, which is nothing to write home about.  I usually get a Chai Latte.


REVIEW #35:  3 stars  (243 chars)
It's a 'bucks.  ...  ... We're talking about coffee here, and with S'Bucks for me, it's always over priced for what you get, however once in awhile, you get really good service. That's what I'm commenting on today. The service was impeccable.


REVIEW #36:  2 stars  (699 chars)
I am not a fan of masking the taste of coffees or teas with cream and sugar. Give me my caffeine straight up, hot or cold. The convenience of having a Starbucks on every corner allows for easy accessibility, but I want taste. I like teas that take more effort than to remove from a pre-packed bag and steep. No Japanese tea ceremony needed, but something more than what I can do at home is appreciated. ...  ... The employees are nice and it breaks my heart to bash on businesses with good customer service, but I just don't see anything beyond convenience with Starbucks.  ...  ... The small Pike's Place coffee is a good deal, at two dollars, for someone who just wants something basic and quick.


REVIEW #37:  2 stars  (605 chars)
24 hours. YES.  ...  ... That is my only favorite thing about this place.  ... Oh, and drive-thru of course... ...  ... But, for a chain.... for an INTERNATIONAL chain, I expect consistency on my $4 drinks, which I do not get here.  ...  ... Bookies and students take up this place, and it is hard to find a seat whether you are meeting up with a friend or coming here to study. It is just too crowded.  ...  ... Another thing, the smell of old espresso lingers in this store and sticks to my hair and clothes.. ick. The only thing that keeps me coming back is its convenient hours for my night owl ways.


REVIEW #38:  2 stars  (399 chars)
Two stars for being open 24 hours and conveniently located.  Besides that, I have never been to another starbucks that consistently screws up my drink. How can you screw up an iced coffee with toffee nut syrup? I keep giving them chances and they keep screwing it up every time, I don't get it.  These people need some training in not only making drinks but also listening to what is being ordered!


REVIEW #39:  2 stars  (351 chars)
The Mocha Fraps I get at this location are usually great, but the last Mocha Frap I got tasted like a bitter, slushy, plant soil flavored drink topped with whip cream. Ive Never tasted something so yucky that's suppose to be so sweet and creamy. One good note, on the exchange not only did they make it right they bumped my drink to a larger size. =)


REVIEW #40:  2 stars  (283 chars)
Yeah their drinks are good but the long line I ALWAYS have to wait in makes me not want ever get Starbucks or give them my money. I understand they're busy and often receive large orders but they need more staff to be working because I'm over waiting 15 minutes to get a frappucino.


REVIEW #41:  2 stars  (148 chars)
Possibly the slowest drive-thru I have been to, even when there is no wait. I wish they would work on this since it is the closest one to my house.


REVIEW #42:  1 stars  (2017 chars)
First off, I would like to say that I will NEVER return to this Starbucks location... I don't care if it's the last cup of coffee on this green earth.  ...  ... There was no line so I walked past (while smiling, of course) a girl just leaning on a portion of the counter chatting with the girl running the register. There was a guy behind the counter being fidgety and seemed upset. He was doing what I remember doing when I was 5... slamming things down in an uproar, gritting his teeth and just BRINGING DOWN the entire mood. Naturally, I was instantly put off. The girl running the register greeted me with an annoyed, fake smile... but a smile none the less. I smiled back and asked her how her day was. She looks at me and stops everything she was doing to stare at me in horror and proceeds to make a disgusted face. Now, allow me to explain what she was looking at... I have an oral piercing called a smiley. I know this is considered odd and not a lot of people know how to 'handle' it but I am a person none the less and when I am a patron, I expect to be treated as such. This girl was an adult and there was no reason for her to make such ridiculous faces at me no matter what she thinks... to me, it's the same as being visibly racist while at work... how many people do you know that would let THAT fly?  ...  ... Anyway, she turns to a girl on the same side of the counter as me (what I can only assume was an off duty employee that I'd walked by on my way in) and just blinks twice before sticking her tongue out in a gaging motion. The girl behind me replies with "Yeah, that's what I'm saying". Let me add that I was still standing between them while this conversation was taking place.  ...  ... When I find myself in places like these... I feel like a grumpy old man thinking to myself "What is WRONG with people these days"?  ...  ... If I had a cup of coffee in my hand when I walked in, I probably would have turned it upside-down over her head.  ...  ... ...and I'm normally a happy person. =)


REVIEW #43:  1 stars  (1875 chars)
Rant Alert!! ...  ... Ok I am a huge Starbucks fan and a loyal customer. I love my home store and this is not about them. I am not usually one to complain, however, now I have to. So listen up because today was just ridiculous...... again.  ...  ... Every Saturday is the same nightmare at this Starbucks store. Not just once in a while, but every time I have been in there. My gym, LVAC, is located there and I go on Saturday mornings for Zumba and afterwards I get a Greek yogurt with honey and granola. This store just finished construction making it 2 or 3 times as big as it was. But I ask you WHY? Management is inept and unable to lead or schedule shifts and has never been able to staff this store correctly. There is always a long, looooooong wait. Not necessarily because of a long line either. There are never enough people working EVER at any time that I have been in there over the past 3 or more years. It pisses me off when I see one person behind the counter taking orders and then fulfilling the orders. That means, if the customer at the register orders five sandwiches, heated, with five drinks and a pound of coffee ground finely please, you're screwed for a good 10 minutes. That's absurd! That's money lost! Bar-backs people! There should be two people behind the counter at all times that do nothing but fulfill orders. PERIOD. This location needs to send in secret shoppers to see just how much money this store is losing because of poor staffing and management. Hand over fist I tell you! There is no sense of urgency to sell and this team does not work together. People going on breaks when there are 10 people in line is bad management, bad scheduling and bad for business.  ...  ... Someone needs to get upper management involved toute suite. Or ask me, a dedicated customer, how to streamline your operation to work for ME. You heard me.........


REVIEW #44:  1 stars  (1003 chars)
Deserves no stars today! I went through the drive-thru as usual and ordered a grande hot mocha extra hot and a piece of lemon pound cake. Traffic is really bad due to the time if day, so I was setting in traffic when I tasted the Mocha and literally tried it a couple times hoping I was wrong the first time. The mocha tasted like hot water with milk! No flavor what so ever! I fought traffic to return and went inside. Stood in line for about 10 minutes and told the guy at the register what had happened and he looks at me and said okaaay....like what do you want? I told him I had to fight traffic to return and he just looked at me. He told the barista I said it tasted like water and they made me a new one. I took one taste and the same exact thing! WATER! Are you kidding me! They offered no other alternative, like maybe a drink he actually knew how to make?!?! Now I'm fighting traffic to go to another Starbucks and pay a second time just to get a descent drink! This is totally unacceptable!


REVIEW #45:  1 stars  (730 chars)
During graveyard shift I stopped in for a cup of Joe and a bite to eat. The cashier was absolutely the worst person I've ever encountered at a Starbucks. She just looked at me with death in her eyes until I asked her if I could order something.  She was not delighted that she had to get out of her chair to heat up my sandwich.  She limps over to the toaster puts my food in then proceeds to throw away trash using her bare hands to push it down. Gets better...after handling the trash she doesn't wash her hands and uses them to take my food out of the oven!! Wtf! Then she tosses my food on the counter and says "there ya go". ..um hello did I break your ankle? How about taking the night off so you don't ruin other people's!


REVIEW #46:  1 stars  (595 chars)
The management at this store must REALLY be struggling!  It's all about training, recipe's, and cleanliness folks!   ...  ... This is a very busy location, and in the heart of the morning they only have one cashier...and that individual does not understand how to work with the POS system.  Then the drink was done to taste weak and gross...how difficult is it to make a chai tea latte...its a mix!?  On top of that...they were out of napkins and other essentials, and all the areas to prep coffee or sit down were filthy dirty.  ...  ... I need a new coffee option by my work! Any suggestions?


REVIEW #47:  1 stars  (210 chars)
Ordered a grande white chocolate mocha in the drive through, come home and come to notice that they only filled my cup half way with coffee. Very upset I paid 5$ for a grande but received the amount of a tall.


REVIEW #48:  1 stars  (165 chars)
Boo!!! I LOVE Starbucks! But they were not nice here! I may be spoiled by my awesome Starbucks employees! But still, come on, you work for Starbucks! Smile be nice!


................................................................................
LOCATION #151:  address="9151 W Sahara Ave Ste 110 The Lakes"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89117"  (13 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1128 chars)
Located on the corner of Sahara & Fort Apache, in the Albertson's anchored shopping center, next door to Baskin Robbins, this has become my go-to Starbucks in the morning on my way to work. ...    ... The staff is amazing!  Since I come here almost every morning, they know my drink without hesitation.  I appreciate when they recognize regulars.  They are all really nice too! ...  ... I will say, there are some days when a certain group of barista's are working and its much slower than another group.  Sometimes certain people work better with others or sometimes it may be the delegation of duties.  Either way, I have figured out how to time it so I hopefully don't wait very long. ...  ... The parking lot can get super busy in the morning.  If you drive-by and all the spots right in front are taken- keep driving.  That means they are pretty busy. ...  ... Wish there was a drive-thru, but that doesn't stop me from getting my iced, venti, caramel macchiato with extra caramel.  And sometimes I make it a quad, depending on how tired I am. :) ...  ... Thanks for starting my morning off with a smile and some caffeine!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (189 chars)
I find the service at  nearly every Starbucks to be consistently good, but this one is superb. The staff are super friendly, helpful and accommodating. I always leave this Starbucks happy!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (819 chars)
I would go to this location on a daily basis for a little over a year when my daughter was going to Kinder Care, which is right up the street, and every morning would be a pleasant experience!  ... (Note** NO drive thru)  ... The crew is fabulous and work very well together.  ... One morning, I even asked them to make me over a dozen Frapuccino's for  the ladies at my daughter's preschool and they knocked it out of the park!! They even went as far as helping me to my car with my drink order.  ... With all of the normal perks such as free  Wi-Fi, indoor & outdoor seating, and a great drink/food selection you're also getting great customer service and a pleasant atmosphere here! This Starbucks location in particular is definitely one of my top three. ... Here's to you Starbucks crew @ Sahara & Ft. Apache!! -B


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (689 chars)
Stopped in this starbucks for a quick cup of coffee. As I was getting out of my car ran into an acquaintance. When we were at the register he asked for a cup of pike to which they were out of it. So he said he would take a blonde. The clerk provided it without charge.  ...  ... You never expect local service from large chain companies but I was very impressed with how she immediately recognized she wasn't able to meet the customers original need and didn't hesitate to ensure the customer left satisfied without the customer having to request it. ...  ... I know the gentleman gets his coffee there daily but I will make sure when I'm in the area this will be the starbucks I shop at.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (173 chars)
Customer service was great, with great attitudes. I like this location not only because it's nearby, but it's also a nice place sit, relax, and enjoy your favorite coffee!!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (157 chars)
I've been here a couple of times. I like this location because it's not as busy as some of the others I've been to. ...  ... Clean, fast and friendly staff!


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (146 chars)
Cozy decor, free WiFi friendly people and good drinks make this place a nice gathering spot for my friends and I to meet up and shoot the breeze.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (140 chars)
No drive through:( however, I was in and out with coffee fast! Starbucks quality and fast service, 4 stars! ...  ... Note, no drive thru!!!


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (74 chars)
goodbye pumpkin spice...Great service and amazing staff at this location.


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (25 chars)
Nice Decor and was fast.


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (18 chars)
this place rocks!


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (1005 chars)
This version of the Green Mermaid is in the Albertson strip mall, nestled in the labyrinth of side roads just off West Sahara avenue, high on the hill overlooking Las Vegas.  ...  ... It's a different , presumably newer store design. There are none of those cone-shaped, tortoise shell colored hanging lamps over the barrista bar. ... No oval shaped drink pick-up platform. It has a more straight-forward, rectangular shaped set of store furnishings, like you would find anywhere in a suburban strip mall. Well, I guess that is what this is.   ...  ... Pretty small space, limited parking. A lot of regular customers, greeted with friendly customer service from the staff that recognizes the regulars. ...  ... It is sort of cumbersome getting into and out of this place from West Sahara though. If you don't know where it is, you will easily pass by it a couple of times, even with a GPS in your car.  ...  ... If you are planning to meet someone here, give yourself extra time, unless you're a regular.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (414 chars)
I've been to this location a number of times, but the convenience of getting in and out makes this less than the most desirable location. ...  ... Service has always been very good. ...  ... Yesterday, I had a free drink and I stopped at this Starbucks.  As Ken states, you've been to one you've pretty much been to all Starbucks.  It is small.   ...  ... It certainly isn't my Starbucks of choice, but it's A-OK.


................................................................................
LOCATION #152:  address="9701 W Flamingo Rd Ste 1 Spring Valley"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89147"  (30 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (530 chars)
I love this location because of their great customer service in the morning at the drive thru window. When I get up to the window, I'm always get greeted with a smiling face. Let me tell you.. receiving great customer service with a smile is one of the best ways to start your day. I was once thanked with a complimentary Cake Pop. It was really good! Thank you for always delivering great drinks, food, and customer service! I got my gold star status here last year and I'm going to continue purchasing more drinks here as well!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (415 chars)
I Love Starbucks!!! what can I say, the coffee is amazing and so is their pastries. I love this location because not is only is it close to my house but the staff here is very nice and usually the service is fast at their drive-thru which comes in very handy especially when you're in a rush. Definitely love coming here during Fall and Winter when my ULTIMATE favorite drink comes out, Pumpkin Spice Latte, hmmmm!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (381 chars)
I absolutely LOVE coffee. I know, I know artificial sweeteners are bad for you... But my body craves the caffeine. After hitting up the Wax bar next door, I decided to hit up the drive thru real quick and grab a coffee. The service was very prompt and I had my iced coffee within a minute of ordering it.  ...  ... The drive thru attendant seemed very sweet and happy to be there.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (336 chars)
This Starbucks is one of my favorites. The staff member that took my order was paitent and took the time to assist me with a few coffee related questions, my drink was made correctly and per my order, and the store was clean.  ...  ... Note, this store isnt usually packed full of customers, which is nice when you need to find a seat.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (325 chars)
I've been coming to this Starbucks for over a decade now. It's the same great service I receive every time I come here. Nice chill place to hang out, to do Ur homework, some networking or just to catch up on some reading. Baristas are always happy & friendly. I like the drive thru, it's pretty consistent on the wait times.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (300 chars)
This is not my usual Starbucks but the one closest to my house was close due to a water issue.  I stopped by here for my iced americano and to do a little work for the up coming week.  Temperature of the cafe was pleasant, music was at a good volume, the baristas were nice and my drink was perfect.


REVIEW #7:  5 stars  (262 chars)
Every time we drive through this Stsrbucks, their cheery service brightens our day. The orders are always correct and they make a great effort to go above and beyond for any special request. So happy to have such a nice Starbucks to stop in at so close to work!


REVIEW #8:  5 stars  (208 chars)
I love this location because everyone knows my order, greets me with a smile and my drink is consistently great. The line can get a little long and if it is I usually hit a different location in the morning.


REVIEW #9:  5 stars  (60 chars)
My normal Starbucks when I am on my way the Henderson Area.


REVIEW #10:  5 stars  (32 chars)
Always friendly and happy staff


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (804 chars)
This place is another great Starbucks location. The staff is efficient and very friendly. It also has a drive through and to be honest...I have never been inside. I always use the drive thru at this store. ...  ... The reason I love this location so much is because it is located right next to the Las Vegas Athletic Club  that I go to in the morning. That's why it is the perfect location for me. That is also why I have never been inside. I am usually to lazy to get out of the car after I leave the gym, so I head straight to the drive thru for some Starbucks Blonde Roast or an ice coffee, depending on what I'm in the mood for. ...  ... Like I said, the staff is very quick here. The drive thru line is always moving even when they are very busy. I do not recall ever having to wait very long here.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (794 chars)
This Starbuck's is located at Flamingo Road west of the 215. It is convenient to the 215 motorists and shoppers that patronize Sear's Grand, Target, and the businesses in the vicinity of the 215 at Flamingo Road. ...  ...    This Starbuck's has also been convenient for me. After hiking in Red Rock Canyon and having a dinner somewhere, I have stopped here to get my second wind.  ...  ...   This is a fitting Starbuck's to relax with a warm cup of coffee before the drive back to Henderson. During the Holidays it is a charming spot to sit by a Christmas Tree drinking a coffee with pumpkin spice syrup. ...  ...  The service has improved. On my last visit the baristas were fast and friendly. I appreciate the sufficient parking and that it stays open til 9 pm on Saturday. Yay!  I am a fan.


REVIEW #13:  4 stars  (549 chars)
I love this location for the drive-thru in the morning.   The baristas even know to put the stopper in for me now (which tells you how much I stop by). ...  ... The only problem I have with this location is that the drive-thru is sometimes very slow.   I'm not sure if baristas can't keep up with the orders or what, but it slows to a crawl at times which is unusual since most other drive-thrus I've been around the country don't have this issue. ...  ... And it sucks if you need your latte but are staring at the clock for that upcoming meeting.


REVIEW #14:  4 stars  (540 chars)
This Starbucks is conveniently located right off of the 215, so I use the drive-thru at least once a week on the way to work in Hendertucky after I drop my son off at school.  The staff is always very friendly and I'm never in line for more than ten minutes.  The convenience and speed of service cannot be beat.  Last week I even had the customer in front of me perform an act of kindness and pay for my nonfat latte--that only happens to me at Starbucks' drive-thru's and it's always a nice way to start the day.  Payin' it forward, too.


REVIEW #15:  4 stars  (329 chars)
This is one of my go-to Starbucks.  Right off of Flamingo in the same parking lot as the LVAC.  Very good staff, and never as packed and busy as most of the other Starbucks in the area.   ...  ... Also has a drive-thru for those lazy mornings when that good song is on the radio and you don't feel like parking and going inside.


REVIEW #16:  4 stars  (276 chars)
The Starbucks is easy access right off the 215 and flamingo. Not my favorite as service is way slow at the drive-through if there's one person in line  it doesn't take long for to get backed up. Great if you're the first person in line not so good if you're the third person.


REVIEW #17:  4 stars  (209 chars)
I stopped in here tonight for some buzz to keep me awake after a grueling hike today.  The staff was friendly and I was on my way quickly.  Yet another location crossed off my list of Starbucks left to visit.


REVIEW #18:  4 stars  (125 chars)
Good service, quick and friendly for the most part! 4 starts only because the drive through at this location is never quick.


REVIEW #19:  4 stars  (93 chars)
not to crowded, service is great! WiFi can lag at times but overall an excellent experience!


REVIEW #20:  4 stars  (92 chars)
Something about this Starbucks...I've never had a long wait. Ever. and the service is nice.


REVIEW #21:  4 stars  (35 chars)
Friendly service in the drive thru


REVIEW #22:  3 stars  (865 chars)
This Starbucks probably has the worst customer service in the area, but I go here for convenience. Due to it's mass corporate-ness, all drinks taste the same at every location, so I'm willing to deal with some frowney people to satiate my green tea latte addiction. ...  ... They have a drive thru, but it's definitely a slow one. I always tip at least $2 at the window, and usually they just ignore me when I tell them to keep the change and walk over to their change jar. I don't expect balloons and ribbons or anything, but just an acknowledgement like at other locations would be nice. Most times I don't even know if they hear me. ...  ... I've never had a problem with the drinks here, they're always correct and hot. If you haven't tried their green tea latte.. do it! In the summer it's good iced with no syrup and vanilla subbing in as the sweetener.. mm.


REVIEW #23:  3 stars  (430 chars)
Baristas aren't as friendly as other locations and the outdoor seating is limited to about 3-4 tables and with the weather being as nice as it is now, this place is not ideal location to enjoy your drink outside since you probably won't be able to find a place to sit. ...  ... Parking gets a little cramped, especially when people do not know how to park! ...  ... One good thing about this place is that they have a drive-thru.


REVIEW #24:  3 stars  (139 chars)
Decent customer service, some times slow. Drinks are consistently average. Not great, not horrible. 3 Stars. Average Starbucks experience.


REVIEW #25:  2 stars  (217 chars)
Terribly slow drive thru and they always make my drinks wrong! Great location and a few nice baristas, but they don't make up for a poorly made $5 latte. I'd rather go out of my way to Sbucks on Trop and Fort Apache.


REVIEW #26:  2 stars  (65 chars)
Super slow drive through. Like five to seven minutes a car slow.


REVIEW #27:  1 stars  (608 chars)
This is the worst Starbucks that I have ever been to. I've been here twice in the last couple of days and both times it was just horrible. The girl who takes your order in the drive through is rude and impatient. And has messed up my order both times, yesterday I specifically said extra cream and my coffee came black. Today I ordered and paid for two breakfast sandwiches and she only gave me one. She was rude and unhelpful the whole time. Actually going so far as to roll her eyes. The coffee actually suffered also, not the tasty goodness that it normally is.Needless to say I will never be going back.


REVIEW #28:  1 stars  (411 chars)
obviously I love Starbucks. the food and drink taste good but today the staff was rude, unfriendly and lacked customer service overall. it took 20 minutes to receive my panini (which usually takes 5) other customers were also complaining that their coffee was taking forever. this location is slow, the workers were not doing much and still were not making customers food/drinks. ever heard of a smile, ladies?


REVIEW #29:  1 stars  (279 chars)
WORST Starbucks in Vegas. The drive thru is painfully slow in the mornings. This lady they hired always works the drive thru and is dumb as a sack of bricks. I refuse to visit this location any more! The manager of this store must be blind, or as ignorant as the employees here!


REVIEW #30:  1 stars  (237 chars)
Horrible customer service!  to make a long story short...I will go out of my way to find a different coffee place next time!  The barista was friendly, but the supervisor (i think) with short blond hair has a bit of an attitude problem.


................................................................................
LOCATION #153:  address="Albertsons 7350 S Rainbow Blvd Southwest"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89139"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (231 chars)
Yesterday I checked in at the wrong Starbucks by accident. Anyways, this is truly the correct one. Sometimes the drive thru is lengthy but going inside is always an option. They are extremely friendly and 98% right on every order.


REVIEW #2:  3 stars  (290 chars)
I went to this Starbucks because I had time to kill before meeting a client nearby. I don't like this as much as the other Starbucks because there's no drive thru, so you have to walk into Albertsons and the ones located in a grocery store usually don't use the phone app (not convenient).


REVIEW #3:  2 stars  (533 chars)
I saw little flying bugs in the pastry cabinet! EW EW EW. On the pastry and flying!!! There was only one guy working so I wasn't too upset about how long the wait was. There were three people waiting for their drinks. But it gave me enough time to choose what I wanted. I ended up getting large passion fruit tea and it tasted like water. My stomach was kinda sick afterwards, not too sure if it was just me over thinking the bug thing or what. But this was my first and last time at this Starbucks. I'll stick to the actual stores.


................................................................................
LOCATION #154:  address="Aria 3720 S Las Vegas Blvd The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89158"  (4 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (75 chars)
Can't live without coffee from Starbucks .. Long lines but service is fast


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (49 chars)
Beautiful ambiance & seating. Same great coffee.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (81 chars)
Average Starbucks. Slow drive-thru and needed me to repeat my order three times.


REVIEW #4:  1 stars  (463 chars)
Watch how they ring you up - they rang me up for a black tea lemonade when I ordered just black tea. The clerk claimed it was because I asked for a splash of flavoring (not even a pump of syrup). 2 drinks + small food items was $20. Bad service and rude employee. ...  ... The employee who made my drink did add the flavoring for me which was nice.  ...  ... Aria - these employees need to be trained up to meet your service levels that I have learned to expect.


................................................................................
LOCATION #155:  address="Caesars Palace 3570 S Las Vegas Blvd The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (6 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (131 chars)
Located in Planet Hollywood next to the Sex & The City Slot machine game and across from Spice Market.  ...  ... I love my coffee.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (518 chars)
Conveniently located for me right by the elevators so that I can blunt my hangover from the night before.  ...  ... The staff is fast and efficient. ...  ... Minus half a point for not being able to take my Starbucks card off my phone, and minutes half a point for not being able to refill my card. Why? Well, that's because Harrah's (or their parent conglomerate company) wants to control every freakin' thing, so they're not fully part of the whole Starbucks network. That right there, my friends, is some douchery.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (426 chars)
Perfectly situated right as you exit the guest elevators of Harrah's Casino Hotel, Starbucks is the destination for most guests for a quick breakfast and coffee before hitting the penny slots!  There was usually a line, but it moved quickly.  The only complaint I have is that they didn't put out condiments such as cinnamon and nutmeg, like most other Starbucks do.  The workers were nice and got our orders right each time!


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (1550 chars)
Starbucks is a corporate chameleon. It can change to whatever environment they are in. The Starbucks in Caesar's Palace is a cafe with a hotel lobby feel. ...  ...    While the new Buffet grand opening in Caesar's Palace got all the press, a new Starbucks in the Augustus Tower opened without a word. To this day, Caesar's Palace is keeping their new Starbucks a secret. In a way, it is like finding Secret Pizza in the Cosmopolitan. ...  ...   On Saturday, I was exploring around Caesar's Palace when I noticed the iconic Starbucks logo near the elevator bank. I decided on the spot to try it. ...  ...   This is a busy Starbucks.  Obviously people who stay in the Augustus Tower enjoy Starbucks. What stood out in my mind is that the seating is a large two sided couch. It is interesting seeing strangers sitting on a couch drinking coffee. On both sides of the couch are wall paintings that celebrate Las Vegas. I said that Starbucks is a corporate chameleon. I uploaded a picture of "Welcome to Starbucks" on a copy of the "Welcome to Las Vegas" sign. One side of the couch faces the hallway of the Augustus Tower, which could be interesting people watching. The other side faces the counter. At the counter, the baristas were friendly.  Near the counter was a constant line. ...  ...    Where the Augustus Tower Starbucks is low on seating capacity, it is high on price. This is the Strip after all. ...  ...    As I said Starbucks is a chameleon. I am optimistic that they will change the personality of future stores to fit into other places.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (142 chars)
yep , its a starbucks.  ... actually a dead starbucks. was able to walk right up to the counter. It is a nice place to get a drink and relax.


REVIEW #6:  2 stars  (634 chars)
Starbucks corporate people.... please step up your game! I was pleasantly surprised to see a Starbucks in Caesar's Palace, they are located in the Augustus tower.  I was salivating all morning thinking about a strong cup of Joe and delish pastry, until I visited.  I ordered my usual, an Americano, and when I went to the sugar and creamer counter... there is NO SUGAR IN THE RAW.  Really?  Not only am I getting charged an extra $1 + for all items because its a Starbucks in Vegas, and everything is overpriced, but NO SUGAR IN THE RAW. Get it together, people. If you're going to charge extra, please have our condiments available!


................................................................................
LOCATION #156:  address="Excalibur Hotel and Casino 3850 Las Vegas Blvd S The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (19 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (605 chars)
There's nothing quite like the joy of Starbucks coffee at noon when you wake up in Vegas to discover your room has no coffee maker. ...  ... Located in the food court and on the outskirts of the casino, Starbucks is there to sober you up and keep you awake for the upcoming night. Those responsible people who got to bed at a decent hour will devour all the bagels before you arrive, they currently can't accept gift cards, and you're in Vegas the land of high rollers so the prices are a dollar or so higher than tour hometown Starbucks. ...  ... But I do not care, for I am exhausted and need caffeine!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (379 chars)
What can I say. ..a Starbucks is a Starbucks!  That is why they are so popular.  Their product is consistent.  My only complaint--and this for EVERY Starbucks in Vegas is the astronomical prices.  Their items cost almost double what their items cost any where else.  Every Starbucks I entered was completely packed, I can't imagine the price hike is necessary . . . just greedy.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (332 chars)
The Thai tea is delicious.  The lemon iced pound cake is very moist and just falls apart in your hand and melts in your mouth. The marshmallow bar is very soft and chewy with a slight vanilla flavoring. The staff is very efficient and knowledgeable.  They are are smiling and appear to enjoy their job. Great atmosphere all around.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (1402 chars)
The prices at this Starbucks, located on the floor of the Excalibur casino, are ridiculously inflated, but I expected that considering its location.  It costs $6.25 for a venti latte, and $4 for a slice of lemon loaf or a cinnamon roll, and you don't even get points for being a gold card member.  I only stayed in the Excalibur hotel for one night, but I purchased three or four drinks from this Starbucks during that time (and one from the Starbucks upstairs).  There was only a line once while I was there, but they actually kept us moving pretty quickly through it.  My standard order is a little involved - a grande decaf americano with three inches of steamed breve and 4 pumps of sugar free vanilla syrup but they made them perfectly for my friend and I every time. ...  ... I had a slice of lemon loaf one day and a cinnamon roll the next and both were wonderful.  I have a friend who worked at a different Starbucks who told me that all their pastries come in frozen and they thaw them to sell.  It's a little hard to believe that the cinnamon roll had ever been frozen as it was rather tasty.  There were some small cafe tables to sit at between the Starbucks and the poker tables.  The workers were friendly enough, though not overly perky. ...  ... The location was handy for those wanting something a little stronger than the free drinks the casino hands out, but with an opposite effect.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (403 chars)
This review is for the Starbucks inside the Excalibur Hotel on the casino level.  ...  ... I work in the area so have visited this location many times.  ...  ... Being Las Vegas it goes without saying that they're overpriced. They're also usually under staffed. In the morning you can expect a long wait for your coffee. ...  ... Other than these negatives they do ok for being in a casino environment.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (362 chars)
This location is located inside the mezzanine of The Excalibur Hotel and does not take the Starbucks application feature. ...  ... Bring Cash or Card but do not expect this Starbucks to work on your phone. ...  ... The two fellas we approached when we wanted a late night coffee fix were kinda looking as if they had a better thing to do. ...  ... They were ok.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (283 chars)
"In the land of the blind the one eyed jack is king" ...  ... In a casino with only two coffee shops and no coffee maker in the room, Starbucks is the king in this castle. Employees stay busy and do a good job. Prices are so high I am surprised Robin Hood doesn't raid them nightly.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (176 chars)
I rated it lower because its in the middle of a dirty hotel that smells. but the pastries are yummy and staff are nice. Still overpriced like the other local ones in the area.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (98 chars)
Milkshakes that pass themselves off as coffee. Mmmm... Tasty now leave me alone I'm enjoying this


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (563 chars)
Like other reviews, this place seemed overpriced but that's not the entire reason for the low rating.  The lady at the register was attempting to take our order while talking (in spanish) to her coworkers.  She ended up messing up my order and the wrong drink being made.  So i went up and requested that it made to be as ordered only to get the correct drink but no flavor except milk.  Seems like I may be giving up on this company as they seem to disappoint me as of late and I'd rather invest my money into somewhere else.  Get your act together Starbucks!!!


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (359 chars)
I suppose here is where you learn not all Starbucks are created equal?  I had an overpriced extra bold coffee that cost two dollars more than my regular Starbucks.  Maybe they are not even a real Starbucks, just a Starbucks wannabe like the ones in B&N because they did not take Starbucks gift cards.   The staffs here were also somewhat rude and unfriendly.


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (327 chars)
Only one person working (during the 2-5pm BOGO special)...not good. The service was slow but she was very pleasant...unfortunately the drinks did not taste good and only 1 of the 4 drinks we had were finished. This stand is also ridicuslouly marked up....ventis are in the $6 range, wow. It's worse than other hotels for sure.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (299 chars)
Of course the price is super expensive, but seems like almost all Starbucks on LV strip are more expensive. However, the reason why I gave them two stars is because they can't make good Caramel Macchiato. It wasn't strong enough and was too sweet. Luckily, I don't think we will be back here again.


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (74 chars)
Super sloooooowwwwwwww, but I'm was at the Excalibur and wanted Starbucks


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (2104 chars)
My debit card was charged $200 for a $13 total!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! ...  ... This past weekend my husband and I spent our anniversary in the Excalibur Hotel in Las Vegas. Upon leaving on Sunday morning 6/31/13 at approximately 8am, my husband stopped at the Starbucks inside the Excalibur Hotel and Casino to get us breakfast. The bill was a little over $13.00. He paid with our debit card and left. We checked out, went to the gas station to get gas to make it back home (Corona, CA) and it was declined. We pulled up our account on our phone and saw that we were charged $200.34. Which left us with NOTHING in our account.  ...  ... We went back to the hotel and explained the situation. The woman helping us had no name tag on, so I couldn't tell you her name. She called the manager, Katie ... who was working in the Luxor hotel, and we waited as she made her way over. Katie was very helpful and tried to look into it but was unable to get very far. She gave us the $13 back and her call phone number. Our bank was closed and we were unable to get money to get home. We finally had to be wired money from family to make it back home safely.  ...  ... We are parents of 3 young girls. This was supposed to be an enjoyable weekend with my husband celebrating our marriage, but our trip to Starbucks (and we are VERY loyal customers) made the end of my vacation horrendous. Someone's mistake OR purposeful act caused us to nearly be stranded without a dime to our name. and we did not have a dime to our name for 24 hours. ...  ... I was able to call my bank this morning and get my money back. We bank with Arrowhead Credit Union.  ...  ... They explained to us that this was NOT a bank error, but a Starbucks employee error. As I am understanding that it is human to error, I felt as if there was something more that could have been done for us. We spend money weekly to your company, and I was given $13 and a "sorry, we can't do anything." Unfortunately "I'm sorry" didn't help us return home, in the least.  ...  ...  ... ABSOLUTELY TERRIBLE ending to a vacation. We will not return


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (599 chars)
Not quite sure how this place can call themselves Starbucks, yet they do not accept the Gold Card or gift cards.  ...  ... They are quite slow at making the overpriced drinks, but I guess they don't care, since they are making a killing. The Excalibur does not have coffeemakers in their rooms, so why not have people pay a decent amount for coffee downstairs?! ...  ... If you plan on staying in the Excalibur, do yourself a favor, and bring your own coffeemaker. You'll save a ton of money, and you won't be cranky walking down to this Starbucks in the morning JUST to get a cup of coffee for $5.


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (337 chars)
One star for the nice barista Kenneth. This Starbuck's is super slow & overpriced compared to the others. They charged me an extra dollar to get a venti ice water, they didn't have a toaster for my friend's bagel, and they weren't taking gift cards due to "technical difficulties." I'd recommend finding another Starbuck's on the strip.


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (241 chars)
Bad customer service! Had a small change request after paying... Barista DAISY agreed but only to make snarky comments! And she hasnt even started making our order, so no harm done yet! Unnecessary attitude! Will take this up to management!


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (208 chars)
This Starbuck's is super slow & overpriced compared to the others. They don't take gift cards due to "technical difficulties." I'd recommend finding another Starbuck's on the strip. Worst Starbucks to visit!


................................................................................
LOCATION #157:  address="Inside Target 4100 Blue Diamond Rd Southwest"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89139"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (231 chars)
I try to visit here once every Friday in order to get my mid-afternoon/evening coffee fix. ...  ... I love how nice it is to have a Starbucks inside of Target, let alone have very nice and hard working individuals who are helpful!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (60 chars)
Located in the Target/Kohl's shopping center inside Target.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (383 chars)
For only manning this booth with one employee, the girl behind the counter was doing her best. ...  ... I usually find Starbucks to be too sugary if it is not a Pike's Peak coffee or an Americano. On our visit to Target, my sister and I got the Hibiscus Refresher. It was the right amount of sweetness and was very refreshing. Just don't eat the blackberries. They were not so good.


................................................................................
LOCATION #158:  address="Mandalay Bay Hotel and Casino 3950 Las Vegas Blvd S The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89119"  (14 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (264 chars)
Some of the fastest service considering it is in a very busy hotel, even when there is a long line the service is still pretty fast for the amount of people in line. If you don't like waiting there is 2 locations inside Mandalay bay so just head to the other one.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (379 chars)
What can I say. ..a Starbucks is a Starbucks!  That is why they are so popular.  Their product is consistent.  My only complaint--and this for EVERY Starbucks in Vegas is the astronomical prices.  Their items cost almost double what their items cost any where else.  Every Starbucks I entered was completely packed, I can't imagine the price hike is necessary . . . just greedy.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (241 chars)
Best Starbucks inside Mandalay Bay. Located between the restaurants and Convention center. They are also stocked with plenty of food and goodies, so it's a great stop for morning or afternoon, if you want something with tour coffee and tea!


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (954 chars)
WHY SO EXPENSIVE?!?!  ...  ... I know the reason why is because of the rent, but damn. I used to work at Starbucks so I know the normal prices at a Starbucks that's not located on the strip. The 3 stars is not for the service, but for the prices.  ...  ... The staff here was very friendly. They had a good 10 people working which was a shock to me since my store didn't have that many people working at one time. Everyone was doing something and they made my drink within a couple minutes which was pretty quick.  ...  ... Ordered a simple grande iced coffee, no classic, 2 pumps white mocha.  ...  ... Tasted like how it should have. Great service, but not so friendly prices. When you need coffee though, you need coffee. So the price doesn't really matter when you are tired!  ...  ... **A plus is that it's located in between the casino and the convention center so if you are headed to a meeting/convention you can easily stop by here for a drink.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (417 chars)
like any other Starbucks but you have to wait about 30-40 minutes to get your coffee when is a event going on at the convention, location is great, I give it a 5 out of 5 but the service is slow as it can be, It's not the guys fault, they just need to put more people on the morning shift, trying to help 60+ people in line with 3 employees, it doesn't sound right. but again the staff is friendly and try their best


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (388 chars)
Drinks come out slow.  Well , Im on vacation so i dont mind waiting.  It was totally slammed at 11 am on sat morning.  I waited 20 mins for my drink.  Worth the wait bc i need coffee every morning or i turn into a gremlin if i dont get it before noon.  I did get my coffee on time.  Did not turn into a gremlin.  Were already out of some pastries, but i dont need pastries i need coffee.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (119 chars)
Yup, it's a Starbucks.  Good coffee and very friendly service.  Would give it 31/2 stars for the personable staff. :-)


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (529 chars)
Fast service.... That's the only positive... I came early around 8 pm Saturday morning... Asked if they have the artisan bacon sandwich, didn't, no big deal... So i got a caramel machiatto and a chai tea latte...and a chocolate donut and cheese danish, asked the danish to be heated up.... NOW GET THIS: they said they didn't have a microwave to heat up the pastries... Ok I'm done, overpriced coffee shop that didn't even have a microwave to heat up a danish is ridiculous... And this place is in the Mandalay bay AT the strip!


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (281 chars)
Rude and expensive. I sent my young daughter to buy our drinks (4), as she is trying to earn her gold card. The barista was rude and didn't know the process and gave my daughter incorrect info and it wasn't until my wife saw what was happening that another barista came to assist.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (171 chars)
Very slow -- even without a lot of customers -- and very disorganized. You can't pay with the Starbucks app -- they have to take your phone and key in the number by hand!


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (383 chars)
The employees at this location are RUDE! They are so miserable. They don't even call out your name when your drink is ready. I tried to use my free birthday drink coupon and the girl got bitchy and was like "we aren't a real Starbucks so we don't take those." Well clearly... I would be disturbed if you were a "real" Starbucks. ... Pass this fake-ass place and go to a "real" Sbux.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (198 chars)
Stayed at the Mandalay Bay for the weekend came to Starbucks 3 times and all 3 times they're was some kind of drama.  These ladies don't give a shit.  Prepare to have a coffee with a side of drama.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (135 chars)
Possibly the worst Starbucks i have ever been too..  Manager speaks over costumer and has about zero knowledge of customer service ...


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (8 chars)
Deleted


................................................................................
LOCATION #159:  address="Mandalay Bay Resort and Casino 3950 S Las Vegas Blvd The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (23 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (662 chars)
Oh, this Starbucks isn't all that bad.  It's huge.  Lots of comfy seating.  The staff is nice.  They do charge a little bit more.  It's in a casino.  But they charge more at the airport, too, where you probably need it most.  Life goes on.   ...  ... I'm pleased that they take a Starbucks card.  It pisses me off when casino Starbucks, like the one in the Golden Nugget, won't take the card.  The damn card is the only reason why I go to Starbucks instead of going out of my way for better coffee. ...  ... This location is crazy efficient, too.  A little better in my experience than the one by the convention center. It's a good option while in Mandalay Bay.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (466 chars)
Starbucks just never disappoints me! I am a full on starbucks fan! Tonight, I was actually lucky. There was some sort of glitch with the system so I got a dollar discount on my green tea latte! =) But back to the service and its product- service was golden! Although there was problems with the system, the workers still gave off a friendly attitude and made up the time spent with the register, with their fast customer service and in making the drinks in a flash!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (51 chars)
Caffeine was needed. ...  ... Starbucks was there.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (1344 chars)
A Starbucks shop inside Mandalay Bay go figure only in Vegas. I am a big coffee drinker. Like most people, I love to have that first cup of coffee in the morning to get me going. But I also like to have a cup in the evening sometimes as well. We are not limited to the same old coffee flavors anymore; in recent years there has been a real jump in the numbers and kinds of flavored coffees available. I think that the best selection of flavored coffee can be found at Starbucks, which has become one of the best-known coffee brands in the United States. Of course, their reputation was built on their quaint little coffee shops. Unfortunately, these shops are limited in number, and many of us have to settle for a tiny coffee bar in our local Barnes and Noble store. The company has recognized the value of its' brand, and has branched out by selling their product at major grocery stores and on the Internet. Starbucks online is a nifty place to shop for this unique Seattle product, whether for yourself or for gifts.  ... i really enjoy going to this Starbucks. The barista women there were so friendly and they definitely acted like they actually cared about how my day was going. We had casual chit chat ask where i am from and the service was very quick and above average. The drink mocha frap no whip was prepared exactly like i asked.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (518 chars)
They were understaffed for a Sunday morning. There were 16 people in line and they only had one person at the register. This is the management's fault, though, not the employees' fault. ... The (expensive! at least $1 above regular Starbucks prices) drinks came out fairly quickly after we ordered since there were two people making drinks. The layout and look of the store was nice, but there was trash on the ground and a bunch of crumbs on a few tables..which was not pleasant to see right before leaving Vegas. :(


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (489 chars)
It's Starbucks ... so really a review isn't necessary ... it's average coffee, nothing special.  I only go to Starbucks because I like their Skinny Cinnamon Dulce latte and because I typically have gift cards from clients and loan officers. ...  ... The line here is incredibly long ... and I can tell you know that there is another coffee shop just inside where the doors are to the taxi line at Mandalay Bay and it has a fraction of the line (and probably a fraction of the price, too).


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (449 chars)
Meh, its a Starbucks in a hotel.  Its crowded, the staff isn't friendly (at least the staff at the counter isn't), and everything is overpriced.  Its not bad, but its also not great. Luckily the woman making our drinks was super super nice, which made up for the really angry and unpleasant woman at the counter.  Its certainly better coffee than the terrible coffee at the place right outside the elevators in Mandalay, so I guess it was worth it.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (438 chars)
It's Starbucks and it's Vegas, but still no excuse to overcharge for a cup of coffee. ...  ... Usually a long line in the morning, even if they serve up cups of coffee faster than my local Starbucks. Friendly service too.  ...  ... I soon found out there was a coffee shop in THEHotel lobby, I think it was just called "THE Coffee Shop", that served a good cup of coffee for about a buck cheaper, just as friendly, without the long line.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (357 chars)
This Starbucks gets crowded early. Line can be hugely long. They abide by Starbucks standards so you will get what you order. They do accept the Starbucks card. However, at the time, they did not have the "scanner" thingy to use the iPhone app. But if you're in a hurry, the fastest way to get out of there is to charge your items to your room. If you can.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (287 chars)
This place is always pretty busy which overwhelms the baristas and they forget the SMILE. Seating is plentiful inside of the SB and out. ...  ... Don't forget, it's inside of a Casino/Hotel and they don't take GCs, prices may be slightly higher nor do they have an outdoor seating area.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (283 chars)
The staff is very nice at this Starbucks. It's right in the Mandalay Bay - the lines are super long. They take my Starbucks card - point right there! But they did not have the scanners for the phone app - hopefully soon! ...  ... They move a little slower. But, eh, savor and enjoy.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (273 chars)
It's Starbucks... If they screwed up, they'd just rename it Seattle's Best. ... It's in a resort, so it's expensiver and those patrons are employees and attendees of whatever convention is in town. ...  ... The set up is nice and a bit unique. ...  ... It's a Starbucks...


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (173 chars)
It's your average Strip Starbucks, but totally doomed to a 30 minute wait if you stop there while there's a convention going on.  Only one register meant lines and lines...


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (166 chars)
Open from 5am to 11pm. Not the quickest spot in town but at least it's open late. The last time I was here, a girl made a mistake on my drink, so I got a free one :)


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (131 chars)
Regular starbucks within Mendalay Bay. Super long lines. Service is ok. Prices yanked up $1-2 just because it is in Vegas,(really)


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (760 chars)
Not sure what's wrong with both of the Starbucks locations inside Mandalay Bay.  I know they're not a "true" Starbucks but geez, with the sign out front and the black uniforms, I think they should uphold the Starbucks standards. ...  ... Yeah, you'll have to pay a hefty premium for anything you purchase in there.  A grande coffee at a normal location is what, $1.75, here, it's $3.05 not to mention it's watered down, I can't figure it out, their coffee seems to always be watered down! ...  ... Also, they don't serve your typical Starbucks pastries, such as the pound cakes and such.  They do have bagels, Chocolate Croissant, Cheese Danish and a crapload of those Costco steroid muffins. ...  ... If you're a Starbucks snob, consider yourself forewarned.


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (597 chars)
There is nothing special about this place as matter a fact it is not as nice as a neighborhood Starbucks but what it is, is grossly over priced. Mandalay Bay is charging more than double what the normal price of coffee is. I pay $2.17 for a medium coffee and they charge $4.25!!!. This is beyond ridiculous even though I know it is aimed at fleecing the tourist I still find this shameful. ...  ... Not even in the airport or the toll road system back east do they gouge people like this. My advice to anyone is stay thirsty my friends before you give Mandalay Bay a penny for a Starbucks coffee.


REVIEW #18:  2 stars  (220 chars)
It's a Starbuck, enough said.  The staff was friendly though and they suggested a drip coffee with low acidity which hit the spot.  They would have gotten 3 stars but this location doesn't have a toaster for the bagels.


REVIEW #19:  2 stars  (209 chars)
Probably the most expensive Starbucks I've ever seen, compared to the other resorts on the strip! ...  ... I will give this one additional star since the staff was friendly and they do accept Starbucks Cards.


REVIEW #20:  2 stars  (143 chars)
The line was way too long because there was only one cashier. They were getting mixed up with their orders and thats what made it really long.


REVIEW #21:  2 stars  (126 chars)
OK, I needed coffee so bad so I paid $2.65 or so just to have a grande coffee???  Yes, it is a Starbucks but......had better.


REVIEW #22:  2 stars  (103 chars)
Overpriced in comparison to a regular Starbucks and unfriendly employees to make it even more special.


REVIEW #23:  1 stars  (149 chars)
I HATE IT!!!!!!! ... They charge you twice the amount, than you would normally pay at the neighborhood corner SB's. ... It's the same coffee dammit!


................................................................................
LOCATION #160:  address="McCarran Airport Gate B Southeast"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89119"  (30 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (82 chars)
Always love Starbucks!  However it's more expensive because it is at the airport!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (41 chars)
Good location!  Nice staff.  Crazy busy!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (30 chars)
Good coffee and good service.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (178 chars)
Just another Starbucks. Nothing special. Service was decently quick and they were very accommodating considering i needed the receipt and it was ripped from the cashier machine.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (45 chars)
Line is long but coffee is totally worth it.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (616 chars)
I recently read a book where the author bragged about Starbucks and their excellent service and how they will make her coffee in a customer provided travel mug. I tried that here and was told no. The problem with most airport Starbucks is the employees don't actually work for Starbucks and the stores are part of some large concession management operation. Thats why the airport employees basically suck. I do however blame Starbucks, because they should demand anyone serving their products to do so proffessionally. Retrospectfully, the three star rating is because the lady at least tried to act like she cared.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (466 chars)
There are several starbucks located throughout LAS airport gates.  The line is always LONG in the morning time.  I know people want to get a cup of coffee to wake them up but god, they need to have more staff in the morning hours to fulfill the duties! ...  ... Tip: If you are not buying drinks or you can consume quickly.  Try to buy your drink at the location before you hit the security. Its almost no wait over there and avoid the morning rush hour if you can.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (461 chars)
Just visited today. Have to say they were quick taking our order but 4 people who ordered after us rec'vd their coffee before we did...WTH!!  Coffee was delicious as always but would have appreciated not being forgotten ;-( .... They had several tasty treats which as others have said great for grab and go. Also the staff was friendly.  Did notice they were out of supplies as the employee had to leave the coffee bar area to get forks for salad we purchased.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (361 chars)
We were getting ready to board our plane back home from Vegas and needed a quick drink fix for the flight. It's just like any other starbucks you'd go to, since there are like a million stores out there... I got what I usually get which was the green tea lemonade and my girlfriend got the Pumpkin Spice Latte! Hoorah! Fall season drinks are back at Starbucks!


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (348 chars)
This tiny little Starbucks sees more customers than Southwest Airlines.  They try to keep up with the demand but the lines are always long and many times the staff is pulling their hair out just to keep up with the demand.  My coffee is always hot and tastes like any other Starbucks but don't expect exceptional customer service at this location.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (299 chars)
Solid Starbucks.  Waiting to pick up my kids from their unaccompanied minor flight.  Need some caffeine to keep going.  They took my Starbucks gold card (so I can get my rewards points!).  Drink made quickly even though I made a change.  (Forget to say "iced") ...  ... Overall, I enjoyed my drink.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (178 chars)
Typical airport Starbucks. Small, with not much room for a line. Very fast with the drinks. The staff member who took my order was very friendly. Definitely a grab and go place.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (163 chars)
The McDonalds of coffee.  Standard service.  Standard coffee.  Still surprised it draws in the number of people it does given the amount of cafes here in Madison.


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (136 chars)
Starbucks is cheaper than bottled water at McCarren Airport, if you can believe it. Get an iced coffee here here instead of that Evian.


REVIEW #15:  3 stars  (67 chars)
The only place you can get a drink and snack in McCarran under $9.


REVIEW #16:  3 stars  (31 chars)
typical sbuxx.  nothn wowed me


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (552 chars)
Most Starbucks have improved greatly where you can get quick and correct orders.  ...  ... This airport location is right off the Alaska Airlines flight from Seattle 'gates'. So most folks hit it on the landing or exit to get their caffeine fix.  ...  ... It is run by only two employees (in fairness, it is a small location so don't think more than 2 can fit without being on top of each other).  ...  ... They do their best to move quickly but with just 1 person working while 1 takes orders - it can have long lines depending on what time you land.


REVIEW #18:  2 stars  (452 chars)
Will this be my last review of a Starbucks? Perhaps not, but it will be the last time I visit this one. ...  ... I was not impressed with anything here. The wait, the line, the service the flavor of the coffee - not up to Starbucks standards for sure! ...  ... I may not be a coffee expert, but I know that this place needs some massive changed. Even the staff came in inadequate. Thank goodness for Jamba Juice or I'd be very thirsty at this airport!


REVIEW #19:  2 stars  (398 chars)
The designer of this particular Starbucks was not very bright.  ...  ... Apparently they never anticipated lines at 6 am in the Las Vegas airport. Sheesh. Getting in and out is awful. In addition, there is only one espresso machine... which equals 1 person making your drinks.  ...  ... The only good thing is that I actually had foam in my latte (something other Starbucks have not gotten right).


REVIEW #20:  2 stars  (345 chars)
I visited here yesterday while waiting for my flight at Gate B.  I haven't had anything to eat all morning and ordered a chocolate scone and Tazo tea.  The tea was normal as expected and the chocolate scone tasted decent.  However, an hour after I finished eating, I wasn't feeling very well.  Fortunately, the feeling passed a few hours later.


REVIEW #21:  2 stars  (324 chars)
Came in at the end of the day, 7PM-ish.  The staff were very nice and attentive and got to me right away.  And my drink was made in a timely manner.  I had the coffee frappuccino, which I did not particularly enjoy, it was a just too bland for me.  The prices, on the account that we were in an airport, didn't help either.


REVIEW #22:  2 stars  (170 chars)
The service here is not Starbucks best effort.  Out of 1/2 & 1/2, out of napkins and very dirty.   ...  ... Coffee was great as always, it's really hard to mess that up.


REVIEW #23:  2 stars  (138 chars)
Worst starbucks I've been to :( And I love starbucks.  The girl there was rude, and so slow! Normally the baristas are friendly and fast.


REVIEW #24:  2 stars  (67 chars)
Not the best Starbucks experience I've ever had.   Messy and slow.


REVIEW #25:  2 stars  (27 chars)
Overpriced. Disappointing.


REVIEW #26:  1 stars  (1969 chars)
Starbucks is the place I count on everywhere I go. Within the United States. In other countries. ...  ... This had to be the worst Starbucks experience ever. I didn't mind the slow service and expensive prices. I did, however, very much mind:  ... 1) the cashier who was bad mouthing customers. She did not care that all the customers in line can hear her complain to her coworkers about how customers made their work more difficult. ... 2) the attitude the barista gave me.  ...  ... Side story:  I'm lactose intolerant and Starbucks is the only chain coffee shop I know that still doesn't offer free soy milk. Usually I'll ask for a splash of soy milk to my coffee and most times they'll give it to me free of charge since I just want a little bit. Sometimes they'll charge me the 50 cents, but they give me a lot of soy milk, so that's okay. ...  ... I forgot to add soy milk when I ordered so I asked the barista. All she said to me was "pay 79 cents".  I was already irritated by the cashier. It was also early in the morning with a long line and now attitude. I explained to her that I'm lactose intolerant and basically can't use the "free" milk as creamer. She looked at me and said "then pay 79 cents". Her tone did it for me. I lost my cool and shouted "Are you friggin' serious? I just want a little bit of soy milk" and showed her my cup that was brimming with coffee. "It's company policy. If you want it, pay 79 cents." I walked off before potentially hurling my coffee at her. ...  ... At the sugar table, a lady who overheard the conversation told me that this is the only Starbucks she knows that charges for every little thing. Then she realized that the barista had forgotten the toffee nut syrup in her coffee. She asked the barista and it was dj vu all over again. The lady told the barista several times that she already paid her 79 cents for the toffee nut syrup. I had my flight to catch, so I wished the lady good luck and walked out of there.


REVIEW #27:  1 stars  (427 chars)
Probably the worst Starbucks I've ever experienced. ...  ... These employees were clearly airport employees, not trained in the Starbucks program. They were inefficient, slow, rude, and they didn't make my drink right. Additionally, airport prices are exorbitant - $10 for a latte and a bottle of water.  ...  ... I want my coffee. I don't want to wait 20 minutes in a 3-person line for a drink that isn't even made correctly.


REVIEW #28:  1 stars  (385 chars)
Terminal B Starbucks should be on the list to shut down. Had to wait 5min so they could "Brew" a cup. I darted out to catch my flight, tasted my "brewed" coffee. Taste like hot water. Obviously, this place is a Vegas scam. They know you won't  come back to complain because you need to get on a flight, and you don't want to get back in their scam line. Don't wast you time and money!


REVIEW #29:  1 stars  (205 chars)
The worst starbuck I've ever been to. Store is a mess the employees are unprofessional n with a overwelming attitude. Also they don't even honor their own iPhone mobilecard. I would never want to go back.


REVIEW #30:  1 stars  (71 chars)
Not friendly. Starbucks should take over the management from hms host.


................................................................................
LOCATION #161:  address="McCarran Int'l Airport 5757 Wayne Newton Blvd Southeast"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89119"  (19 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (372 chars)
Like any other Starbucks, service was quick and quality was consistent. I wasn't able to get any coffee all day because we were running around for a scavenger hunt for Race LA. I finally saw this Starbucks in the Union Station and had to take advantage that we were waiting for the train to arrive and it was THERE!!! It was almost like a miracle. Got my coffee fix!! YAY


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (124 chars)
It's Always the same! I mean come on now!  ...  ... Especially now that we are getting a 1% increase on the cost of drinks!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (723 chars)
I live and come from an area where Starbucks are not on every corner and my taste buds always preferred Tim Horton's. However, because of the amount of travel I do - Starbucks has become ingrained in my head and it seems I cannot live without them. ...  ... I stay mostly at Courtyards who now have a Starbucks in them - however - these are NOT the same Starbucks you find outside - trust me! ...  ... Whether it's that special cup you need at the airport or that one you have to have in the morning - I loved having this one right around the corner.  ...  ... This chain does it right too - consistently good and the staff went above and beyond - friendly and fast. Though small (airport) the speed of delivery was great!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (456 chars)
Yes, its true ,Like no a better word is LOVE COFFEE! makes my day as I zip on by...Sorry off subject. ... This Starbucks is very clean, as in bathroom, dining area, the staff are friendly and helpful, when I ordered my drink I usually get the :what: face.. but not here. ... I always get an upside down heavy whip latte... yup, not too complicated ,, girl was like and what size didn't need to explain.  ... .The chocolate filled croissant  was flaky ....


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (400 chars)
This Starbucks gets so freaking crowded!  On my way home, however, I stopped in and it was empty.  I ordered an iced coffee and they were out so the barista asked if I would mind waiting 5 minutes?  For an iced coffee?  Hell na...hook it up sister.  I need my caffeine.   ...  ... It took about 2 minutes.  Both baristas chit chatted with me and were really pleasant.  I personally like nice people.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (272 chars)
They made the two drinks for us quickly and perfectly.  There was no line which was quite surprising.  I was amazed when I saw how easy it was to saunter up, order my drink, and be on my way to my Los Angeles Times. ...  ... I like this outlet in the A gates at McCarran.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (225 chars)
If you're a Starbucks fan, this shop is convenient coming straight off your flight into McCarran. ...  ... Service seemed okay around 11 PM, and my girlfriend was able to get a quick frap fix!  ...  ... No complaints here :)


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (215 chars)
I'm not a Starbucks Coffee fan, but these girls hooked me up with a very well blended Passion Fruit Iced Tea/ Lemonade, just a little bit sweet and just the way I liked it.  Kudos to friendly people at the airport.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (258 chars)
700TH REVIEW! ...  ... Yes its another Starbucks. ...  ... Located inside the airport. Lines are long, but they try to keep it moving. ... It is a fairly small starbucks and gets cramped. ...  ... They didn't mess up my order at 6.30am so that's good thing.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (242 chars)
It's Starbucks. They're everywhere! The one thing I don't like about Starbucks is that they are very inconsistent with their drinks. Some days it taste just how you want it, other days it's too sweet or taste like poop. Work on it Starbucks!


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (64 chars)
Great for the quick coffee right before the return flight home.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (26 chars)
Just like other Starbucks


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (18 chars)
it is  starbucks!


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (297 chars)
Not a big fan of Starbucks but they are all over the strip so I went to Starbucks plenty of times in Vegas to get my coffee fix.  I think their coffee is ok and the lines there are just ridiculously long.  Over rated in my eye.  But it's great to just have a coffee joint to go to while in Vegas.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (164 chars)
The slowest starbucks I've ever been to, so many creepy people where standing around me, couldn't wait to get out of there. ...  ... Speed up on your drink making!


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (123 chars)
One of the slower Starbucks I have ever been to lately.  Are they union employees?  They managed to screw up my order too.


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (104 chars)
it's an okay starbucks. they didn't accept my card so i wasn't able to take advantage of the discounts.


REVIEW #18:  2 stars  (38 chars)
No free refills at this location. :-(


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (786 chars)
Whoa.... this place is slow slow slow. ...  ... I went straight from the plane to this Starbucks while my husband went to get the bags and the bags came long before my mocha did. Did I mention that there was only one customer in front of me in line and that there were three employees? Did I also mention that the girl taking my order was also chatting it up with another airport employee who passed by the Starbucks stand? Annoying.  ...  ... The mocha wasn't even that good. Also, it is Vegas and the airport so drinks are way more than at a normal Starbucks. I was very disappointed. C'mon girls, I was just stopping by to kill some time while I waited for my bags. ...  ... Thank God that I was soon drinking a real drink on the strip which helped ease the pain of this experience.


................................................................................
LOCATION #162:  address="McCarran International Airport - D Concourse, Gate D6 5757 Wayne Newton Blvd Southeast"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89119"  (22 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (262 chars)
Happily, I had a much better experience than other people.  I ordered a doppio con panna and it was made quickly and perfectly.  The barista obviously didn't think he needed to fill the entire cup up with whip cream like at other places....I thank you for that!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (176 chars)
Had great service from barista Margarita-she was patient with the line but also speedy on the register and has a truly lovely personality, making anyone's morning brighter :-)


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (579 chars)
We love Starbucks and readily admit we are Starbucks addicts. Hard to believe but this location is more expensive than the Strip area Starbucks that we visited earlier today.  ...  ... So, why the 4 star rating? Because they pulled the usual airport Starbucks trick of saying that their server was down and couldn't accept our gold card. Really? That is an old trick. So when my hubby said that we couldn't buy anything, the response was, oh no we can try it. Amazing it worked. Those tricky old servers! Just cannot trust a computer.  ...  ... The coffee? Absolutely wonderful.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (302 chars)
Convenient Starbucks for my early morning fix.  Staff was friendly, helpful and even suggested a new variation on my favorite drink. ...  ... I didn't experience any of the issues that others here mentioned.   ...  ... For me, it was like a bright beacon of hope at the end of a long terminal walkway!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (287 chars)
Nice convenient Starbucks - great for my early morning flight across country to Ft. Myers, FL. ...  ... The brews are on point, exactly as expected. The only drawback was they do not have scanners to read the Starbucks card/app on my iPhone. They hand keyed in my code and all was well.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (73 chars)
Great Drive-Thru Starbucks, but does congest traffic a little on Bethel.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (901 chars)
Sometimes life just isn't complete without a cup of joe ... from Starbucks. Or in my case, green tea or some sort of frappuccino. Considering how locals and visitors are out and about during all hours, it's quite true that caffeine fixes are important in LV. Whether it means you're coming to start an epic weekend or leaving your sins behind for another destination, this airport Starbucks is here to serve you. ...  ... All the basic airport location rules apply: higher prices and wicked lines during the afternoon. I would never hold it against the staff for having to deal with unruly and stressed out travelers, but I've had decent results here. My typical experience involves no lines, becoming $5 poorer with a cold vanilla bean frappuccino in hand and on my way out. ...  ... Don't come in expecting any wifi, seating, or Starbucks cafe music. This concourse D joint is more kiosk than cafe.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (676 chars)
Ah, it is always such sad sorrow to leave the adult Disney World known as Las Vegas. Back to humdrum reality. ...  ... Located near the end of the D gate area this kiosk location served it's purpose with a grande iced coffee while waiting for my flight out of Sin City. Baristas working the counter were pleasant, and this small Starbucks has many of the normal coffee, snack, and food offerings to make a quick grab and go to your flight. ...  ... As I boarded my plane with coffee in hand I was serenaded by the clink clinks of the slot machines that line the floor near the gates beckoning me back for another swing through the city that whatever happen there stays there.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (333 chars)
This is just one of the many Starbucks in Las Vegas. Several at LAS alone. I was so fed-up with Starbucks by the time I got to this one that, that, THAT....yeah, I stopped and bought myself another Latte for the way home. Only a few and very minimal differences from your Neighborhood Starbucks. Main difference is computer related.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (132 chars)
Fast airport service; they offer more than what is advertised on the menu, so ask for what you want and typically see at the chain.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (62 chars)
Bummer that I couldn't use my reward here. My latte was good.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (62 chars)
Nice place to pick up some green tea before or after a flight


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (1358 chars)
This Starbucks is located in the D Concourse of McCarran International Airport - all the way at the far end of the Concourse by D Gates 52 through 58. ...  ... On the one hand, I am grateful for the caffeine fix I received as the result of this Starbucks, but I was feeling particularly crabby and impatient this morning (fighting Bronchitis) and the line seemed to take forever to move. It was probably only five minutes - BUT there were only two people in line in front of me. There were four Starbucks employees behind the counter. One was running the register, one making drinks, and two doing "busy work" (stocking, etc.). ...  ... When I finally got to the register, I ordered a Tall coffee - WITH ROOM FOR CREAM! and a bottle of water As I ordered this, I stated it loud and clearly. I immediately opened the coffee - and she had filled it to the brim. I restated politely: "I asked for ROOM FOR CREAM." She then emptied a bit out and told me if I needed still more room to empty it into the trash can. ...  ... I understand that Starbucks is probably not a career choice folks - but please listen to your customers. Exercise some self awareness. And always, ALWAYS, whatever you do in life, choose to excel and do the best possible job one can. ...  ... Here is the direct link for this particular Starbucks: ... http://www.starbucks.com/store/10743


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (659 chars)
I mean what can you say, it's a Starbucks in an airport. I don't know whether to blame the cashier that rang me up or the guy that was making the drinks, but on top of messing up the drink order for the lady before me, he also messed up mine, so it obviously took double the time to get the drinks. Even with him having to remake mine, it was still slightly off. He did kinda have this "I'm just here to work" swagger, not much in the attentive customer service department. ...  ... It is what it is, at least it's the same prices and not more expensive compared to a regular Starbucks location. They do take the Starbucks card for payment, so that's a plus.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (346 chars)
I got to the cashier and she walked off, went to the back without,  saying anything to me or any of the other customer's.  The next server assisted us after 5min, so after placing my order, they tell me that the Starbucks app, or gift cards do not work. This is the 2nd time at the airport and Starbucks gift cards do not work...why is that so..


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (284 chars)
Was not able to use my gift card here.  Only explanation I got was "Sorry, Starbuck's system is down" ...  ... After reading other reviews here, the problem with "Starbuck's System" seems to be consistent at this location. ...  ... Otherwise, it's okay if you like overpriced coffee.


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (374 chars)
Really? ... A ton of flights leaving at 6am, at the E gates, and they don't open till 6am?? ...  ... At 5:30 there is a line of 9 customers already waiting in the area. ...  ... They can't say it's due to no customers, as I went thru TSA at about 5am, and there has been a steady flow walking by, looking to buy coffee. ...  ... This location needs to get with the program.


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (267 chars)
The only SANE reason I would pay $5 for an iced tea is for the discounted refills. Apparently they don't do that here. I freakin hate the inconsistencies between Starbucks locations! I'm learning to stick to the few good locations around Las Vegas & ignore the rest.


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (265 chars)
The only reason why this location receives one star is merely due to the fact that the coffee didn't make me barf. This location is terrible in flavor, freshness, and service.. Every time I order a drink, I have to go back and return it. Do not recommend at all :(


REVIEW #20:  1 stars  (251 chars)
If you need your Starbucks fix before your flight, all airport Starbucks don't accept any member reward promotions or any other promotions that every other Starbucks outside the airport accept. Also, they didn't accept any gift cards or rewards card.


REVIEW #21:  1 stars  (213 chars)
You would think that a Starbucks located in an airport would be more customer focused, extremely disappointed. Drink is terrible and this was after it was remade (which I had to pay for) and I had a rude barista.


REVIEW #22:  1 stars  (153 chars)
Sorry, our starbucks card system is down...  Funny, other credit cards work just fine. Time to get your act together and support your own payment system


................................................................................
LOCATION #163:  address="McCarran International Airport - Gate C16 5757 Wayne Newton Blvd Southeast"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89119"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (712 chars)
Hooray for caffeine!  ...  ... As you can imagine the airport location is always busy.   This crew has their operation flowing smoothly.  The line was a bit longer but I had the time to wait for my morning brew.  They were quick to take orders so the line moved quite fast.   It did however seem to take a little more time for my order to finish though.   I do understand how busy and hectic it can be.  But as always, my order was perfect and very tasty!   ...  ... Since I always have my Starbucks card, it's an easy choice when choosing where to get my coffee.  And they open at 4:30 am for those early morning flights which is always a bonus.   ...  ... Thanks Starbucks for starting my day off with a kick!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (331 chars)
Oh Airport Starbuckses.  So important to life, yet so poorly reviewed. ...  ... I love you Airport Starbuckses. Without you my flight would be so much more disappointing. ...  ... Also, thank you for still making the Salted Carmel Mocha (even though you are all out of the Salt Topping). ...  ... Never Change Airport Starbuckses.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (319 chars)
They were open at 5:49 am.   ...  ... This was a big deal for us!  We were on an early flight home on a Monday morning, so it was nice to have breakfast before we boarded our plane.  A grande Awake Tazo, a bowl of oatmeal, a tall nonfat latte and a danish, as well as a bottle of Fiji water for the plane, cost $16.27.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (145 chars)
Love: skinny Carmel latte~ Carmel java chip frappaccino ~ egg salad sandwich ~ Caprese panini  ... The rewards program also offers decent perks.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (443 chars)
Ok this place just gets 3 stars... Here's the positive: your in a captive environment so thankfully it's here, the staff is always very friendly and work with a sense of urgency, the coffee is always on par.... Here's the not so good: There's no seating at all, there's always a pretty big line, the costs are around 25% higher than your used to paying for the same drink elsewhere and they don't give you any stars if you use your gold card.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (121 chars)
This is your basic airport Starbucks.  Expect long lines, high prices and marginal service and you wont be disappointed.


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (1059 chars)
This Starbucks was a bit difficult to find at first. It is stuck in a place that is small and when the line gets long you have to like fit together to order and to be able to be close enough to hear your name called. I think they were doing construction of some kind that is why the wall was so close to the entrance of this location .  ...  ... The staff was only in a rushing mood. "What do you, how do you want it, pay me now and move on..." So do not expect any real kindness.  ...  ... The line was so long. I mean I had time, only because I am addicted to their green and really wanted some before I got on my flight. So what better way to spend the time then to wait in love for something you love. I got through to the cash register quickly, but waited a lot longer then I would have liked for just some shaken green tea.  ...  ... The prices were not too bad for being an airport, of course they are a bit higher, but I got the green tea and a cinnamon coffee cake for $6 bucks. Not ridiculous I suppose.  ...  ... Its there, that is pretty much it.


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (526 chars)
Due to the airport remodel, Gate C5 is now Gate C16.  Same location, same so-so expectations.    What is new these days is the BLONDE ROAST coffee that is being pushed in all locations, except here.  They sell the beans, the Via, put up banners...  and yet, none brewed.  C'mon!  WTF?   ...  ... This is the difference between corporate-owned and franchise Starbucks stores.  Same beans, different brand of service and higher prices.  Staff is nice and do their best to keep the lines down.  Can't ask for much at an airport.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (208 chars)
This review for the one at Gate C5: ...  ... Thankful they open at 5am... gotta have my caffeine for these early morning trips, but this one seems to short my cup no matter what size.  What's that all about?


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (166 chars)
they do not accept giftcards ...  ... my coconut mocha tasted like chocolate ice ...  ... plus, they took a LONG time especially since I was the only customer there.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (125 chars)
drinks are great just not the employees. Very inconsiderate, chatting with eachother while there's a long line of customers.


................................................................................
LOCATION #164:  address="MGM and Hotel & Casino 3799 Las Vegas Blvd S Eastside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (125 chars)
Great staff and great location.  I stopped here to charge my phone.  Nice to have Starbucks ALL around Vegas with outlets :)


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (442 chars)
Our MGM room didn't have a coffee maker.  Go figure... ...  ... I would have been extremely cranky with the missing component of my liquid diet had this Starbucks had not been conveniently placed next to the food court.  As a bonus, the baristas didn't even crack a smile at the giant penis I wore on my head half the time I was in Vegas.  Thank you, Starbucks, for not letting me down, and for keeping it classy as you brewed my chai latte.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (298 chars)
This is my favorite of two Starbucks at the MGM Grand.  Lines aren't as long and the staff is nicer.  Come to think of it, the two things are probably related!  They are always willing to bring my order to my table when I ask them to. I usually stop here on my way to the Monorail to start my day.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (775 chars)
Since most casinos won't put a coffee machine in the rooms we are stuck heading down to the main floor to get a cup of joe. ...  ... As I was here these past few days attending a convention along with thousands of others the lines always seemed long but they moved pretty quickly. Normal Starbucks menu and the baristas were nice. Some seating to get a good people watching view and observe all the drunken bachelorette parties stumble by at night. As it was also the Country Music Awards weekend here I also got to watch all the country music freakozoids walk by with all their overdone western gear on. Yee-Haw! Look - another cowboy hat!   ...  ... At least this one is open 24 hours for late night or early morning caffeine fix. It's one of three locations in MGM alone!


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (759 chars)
So, we watched/previewed a television show at the CBS Television City place inside the MGM, and we pretty much each got $5 gift certificates to Starbucks. ... We used them today. I got a tall chocolate chip frappuccino for $4.75 +tax. He got his normal grande iced caramel macchiato.  ... We just paid for whatever was over $5 each and tip! ... Unfortunately, there were only two employees working the location. One was behind the register. One was making ALL the drinks... and there were a lot of drinks! It took about ten minutes to get our two drinks.  ... The plus side? The reason I'm giving them three stars? The drinks were made extremely well! We were quite impressed with their taste, and although the service was slow, the employees were very nice.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (581 chars)
You know how Starbucks are very efficient, run like a well oiled machine, etc.?  These were hit and miss.  ...  ... One morning, I went to the one next to the Avenue Cafe.  The staff was made up of old, oriental women that did not seem to understand English, walked extremely slow, and looked like it could be their first day staring at their cash register screens like they didn't know what to do.  They were obviously getting paid by the hour, not transaction.  ...  ... Typical products there, but no egg sandwiches?!?  They did have the toaster, and would warm up bagels, etc.


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (1450 chars)
"my review is subjective" ... 1.5 stars ... My first time to the MGM Grand and well they could get away with murder here( at the Starbucks not the MGM), I am sure they make a bunch of change here just because of the location. It seemed that everyone of the occupants was in line at 7:30 am. The coffee was good as usual but the prices are outrageous. ...  ... My story... I am in line waiting to place my order when a women and here friend( which had been partying the night before or still going I don't know haha) are coming down this ramp from a buffet or restaurant right next to the Starbucks. One women places both of her hands over her mouth... then RALPHS all over the marble floor right next to all of us ordering. She was desperately looking for a toilette or garbage can. Well she didn't make it. Since she decided to cover her mouth, the barf went in every outward direction possible. After her first go-round she then proceeds to enter the area behind the front counter of the Starbucks where everyone is making drinks and finds some type of container to finish her session off. Her friend was not much help to her. After the Ralph session is over they just leave, no words said, just an early morning delivery and they were off. I will say this, the Starbucks employees did not let this become a distraction for them. They kept the orders coming...  ...  ... Please see my attached photo of the spread out chunks the women left behind.


................................................................................
LOCATION #165:  address="MGM Grand - Studio Walk Food Court 3799 Las Vegas Blvd S Eastside"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (8 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (15 chars)
Good location!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (384 chars)
I have been here a few times when staying in Vegas and I always have a good experience. I did find it odd that they didn't have a toaster, though. But the baristas were nice and we got our order quickly. We usually go on weekday mornings and we've never found it to be overly crowded.  ... This is a great place to grab a cold drink and a small pastry before heading out for the day.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (263 chars)
This Starbucks near the monorail entrance was our regular source for breakfast during the trivia championship weekend we attended at the MGM. Each time we went, our orders were filled correctly and promptly, even though it was in a very busy, high--traffic area.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (195 chars)
Staff are always friendly here. It is slightly more pricey than an average Starbucks. ...  ... They do ask $1 for tap water. But I brought my own water bottle so they gave me tap water for free.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (1043 chars)
How come whenever I'm looking for a Starbucks I can never easily find one?  Did you realize there is approximately 1 Starbucks for every 345 square miles in the US.  When I'm looking for one...that number seems about right however when not looking, it seems there is 345 to every square mile. ...  ... Long story short, that was my basic experience during a recent trip to Vegas.  I get very cranky if I do not have my morning coffee and since I am an early riser, I can typically count on Starbucks to be open to allow me my fix. ...  ... Nothing that stands out about this particular Starbucks other than the fact it doesn't offer WiFi. ...  ... The location is busy as it is located within the MGM Grand so I was fully expecting to wait awhile.  Fortunately for me, that wasn't the case as the baristas were quick to greet and equally as quick to serve. ...  ... In summary, it's a Starbucks so you're basically going to get what you expect.....an overpriced drink.  In the mornings, I'm willing to pay almost anything for that black gold.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (445 chars)
Plenty of seating for a sort of express Starbucks at the corner of craps tables, a few nightlife venues and a several show rooms inside of the MGM Grand. Cell phone service is somewhat limited if you are on anything other than Verizon. There is no WiFi either at this location for you to connect on. If you need a quick coffee fix before hitting a blackjack table or you are walking to a game of poker, you find this Starbucks to be convenient.


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (809 chars)
Went here because it was close and I needed to eat something for under $10.  The drinks and food are overpriced but they are consistent with all the other locations in the casinos.  The staff is pretty nice though so that's always a plus. ...  ... I ordered the oatmeal(about $5) for my late night snack (dinner) and when receiving it, the cup was about half-full with about an inch or so of water covering the oatmeal.  I had to dump some of the water out in the trash just so it wouldn't be like I was eating oatmeal soup. ...  ... I didn't order any coffee but I'm sure it would have been fine.  Either way, it kind of bummed me out a little bit but that's how things go.  Overall for coffee I'm sure they are just fine as they probably are for their other foods and pastries just don't order the oatmeal.


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (498 chars)
Please retrain your staff, specifically Ariel.  Words like "pinche" and "chinga" can be easily translated for someone who is very familiar with Spanish.  Also, rolling your eyes doesn't help either.  I know my girlfriend didn't hear these things but I was standing right next to her.  I just sucked it up and told myself to stay cool while on vacation and not let a sour piehole like Ariel ruin the vacation.   ...  ... On another note, drinks came out quick and accurate like all other Starbucks.


................................................................................
LOCATION #166:  address="Monte Carlo Hotel and Casino 3770 Las Vegas Blvd S The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (26 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (164 chars)
I've never had a bad experience here. If anything I have received a free drink when there was a mis-communication in who was going to make my Venti Iced Coffee. :)


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (460 chars)
Pretty much your run of the mill Starbucks but prices are slightly higher than you would expect at a standalone Starbucks. Considering this is one within a casino, you can expect your coffee to come with a small premium but quality-wise this is the same and highly convenient. I say convenient because many casinos on the strip do not have large coffee chains so those who are wary of trying specialized coffee places will not have to worry about Monte Carlo.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (417 chars)
This Starbucks is BUSY! Insanely busy in the morning, expect a huge delay in your morning activities if you have any and leave early if you do. I like that this Starbucks is large and they have most of the items here that most Starbucks elsewhere have. Totally sad that they were sold out of their spinach feta breakfast wrap. They are my fave! Definitely the go to Starbucks for people that stay at the Monte Carlo.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (365 chars)
This is actually one of the nicest Starbucks locations in Vegas.  It looks new and clean, and is situated in a food court along with McDonald's, Manchu Wok, Rubio's, Sbarro's, Subway and Hagen Dazs.  You'll find this on your way in (or out) to the CityCenter Tram Station -- perfect for a value meal or breakfast away from the hotel patrons at ARIA or Monte Carlo.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (280 chars)
Prices were very high - but then again, this is Vegas. ...  ... However, the whole place looked very clean, and the baristas were not that slow. At least they do take Starbucks Cards for purchases only, and it's located right by the entrance to the tram station. ...  ... Cheers!


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (780 chars)
It's nice to know what to expect.   ...  ... In a fantastic city that is known as the entertainment capital of the world, the Monte Carlo Casino was less than impressive.  We had expected something much more spectacular.  If this was, as the other casinos were, a replica of the true-life experience, then Monte Carlo would not be on my Grand Tour itinerary.   ...  ... It was almost a relief to find a little food court in the back of the casino, near the hotel lobby, filled with American concessions.  Starbucks was there.   ...  ... We ordered a grande Tazo shaken tea, a tall nonfat latte, and a raspberry tart for $9.95.  As we enjoyed our snack in a common dining area -- this was a real food court, like you'd find in any mall -- we planned our escape to the next casino.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (568 chars)
I know this is just another Starbucks review but I can't go above a three for this location.   ...  ... Being Vegas I anticipate some long lines at times but between the long lines, slow service, and lackluster personalities behind the counter I was completely underwhelmed.  I want consistency when I come to Bucks anywhere and this one leaves me wanting for me. ...  ... Quick note for those traveling to Vegas from other states - my drink was about $1-$1.50 more expensive here so be prepared.  Not a negative just a little surprising when you see the amount owed.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (390 chars)
I guess there is nothing for me to say about Starbucks.  This location however, needs a personal review from yours truly.  Merchandising is okay and very much appealing.  Long lines and slow service may prompt you to leave the place but hey, you can't blame them because it is beyond their control. ...  ... My only suggestion be cheerful whenever you take orders. ...  ...  ... Cheers !!!


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (339 chars)
Meh. Slow service (even during low periods) and boring baristas. I love my neighborhood Starbucks, but I think great service is too much to ask from Vegas Strip businesses.  ...  ... I do warn you, they do not re-charge your Starbucks card at this location. I tried, and failed. Resorted to re-charging my card online with my credit card.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (1042 chars)
Stayed at the Monte Carlo this past weekend and had a blast. Came down to the Food Court and decided to get a Peppermint Mocha before we started walking the strip on a breezy day. There were a few people ahead of me.  ...  ... SERVICE - Slow. I feel like they could create a more organized task for one another and work as a team rather than individuals. I was a bit annoyed when the 2 people that ordered after me got their drinks before me. Let's just say, the staff was fortunate that I was on a mini-vacation and was not in a rush to get my drink.  ...  ... PEPPERMINT MOCHA - One of my favorites, but I was not digging the way my drink was made here. It was semi-hot and the drink tasted very light and frothy. I'm not sure what went wrong. Perhaps they gave me the "skinny" version? I'm glad I opted for the grande size instead of venti. ...  ... ** Suggestion - HIRE MORE WORKERS. Hire 1 more at the very least. It's Vegas and it's bound to get extremely busy on the weekends especially. Would it hurt to have extra hands helping out?


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (900 chars)
I came here twice. The first time there was a long line which moved fairly quickly. The girl at the register provided neither a greeting nor a smile, and at the end of my experience I discovered the wrong drink topped with whipped cream, which I had requested none of. After she ASKED me and I said no.  ... The second time I came was at 3:00 in the afternoon. No line. I stood at the register for a few minutes while the one girl behind the counter looked at me, then looked back at whatever she was doing (cleaning espresso machine or something) and continued to do it. Then she stopped that and walked toward me... but ha ha, she got me, it wasn't to take my order, it was to walk directly past me to the pastry case and rearrange items. Then after that, did she come to take my order? No, she went to the sink, turning her back to me, and began washing a blender. I turned around and walked out.


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (637 chars)
Starbuckkkksssss! ...  ... My son and I frequent these, and today I was NOT happy at all! I ordered a childs hot cocoa and a venti tea. He asked me if I just wanted a black tea or a lemonade mixed with tea; I opted for the Arnie Palmer. BIG MISTAKE!  ...  ... My tea tasted like it was made of old lemonade and I guess tasted moldy. My sons child cocoa was half full and cold. Not warm, COLD! My friend suggested I go tell them, but I hate to bother... even though I paid 6$ for the 2 drinks.  ...  ... I just sat there and drank my spoiled tea and my son finished off his half full cocoa. LAME! ...  ... Ill stick to the Boca Park one.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (367 chars)
There are 2 Starbucks in the Monte Carlo - one in the food court next to Subway, and one around the corner by the escalators to the tram. The one in the food court is owned by Corporate and will accept your gift cards but not reload them. The one next to the tram is NOT owned by Corporate and will not accept gift cards (and they ran out of my favorite drink. BOO!)


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (261 chars)
The wait was FOREVER and they only had one worker. I mean literally the workers did not even care as the line started to go into the actual Casino. ...  ... Brutal brutal brutal line.  ...  ... Pro-tip: Want coffee? Just go to the food court - line is shorter.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (158 chars)
The other StarBucks inside the FoodCourt has better customer service lol fyi (MGM Resorts employees get 15% off and 25% on Wed just show your employees I.D.)


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (758 chars)
When did sbx stop hiring professional baristas? I'm not sure what happened here, but this is one of very few sbx I'm disgusted with the service. ...  ... The cashier (a young man) who took my order seems spacy, inattentive, and...rude?? He was trying to be funny, but inappropriately so. I just want my order taken down correctly, I don't need a comedian. And of course because of his unprofessional-ism, he took my order wrong. The guy who made my drink offer to redo it, but I just wanted to get out of there. ...  ... The second time around was no different. Same cashier, same unproffessional-ism. Still sloppy, and still rude. ...  ... Monte Carlo, I hope you get a wake up call one day. You are in a partnership with sbx, and sbx staff represents you.


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (731 chars)
Hubby and I always stay at Aria but there's no Starbucks! The two hotels connect by walkways and escalators so it's very convenient.   ... Besides the convenience, this place can never get both of our drinks correct...EVER! Nor do they ever get our short names right even if we spell it out!  Go to the Starbucks in the food court. They are fast, the drinks are perfect along with our names...and as long as a foreigner who doesn't understand much English steals your drink even though they placed their order AFTER you, everything will go smoothly! ... But we gave this place a couple of tries and the last one was a couple of weeks ago when it seemed that everyone who purchased something from here did not get what they wanted.


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (593 chars)
With two baristas, both waiting around for an other to be paid for (instead of making orders ahead of time) and cashiers scattering between fetching drinks and taking payments, no wonder there's a line! ...  ... I've been to enough Starbucks to know that this is not how most are run. Mix that with the most processed looking baked goods I have ever seen at a Starbucks -- are these knockoff Costco pastries -- and you have yourself a pretty sad sight.  ...  ... When you expect something standard from a well-known brand, it feels like an even greater fall from grace when it all goes wrong.


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (326 chars)
Terrible. This place isn't any busier than any other Starbucks I've been to. ...  ... They took almost 20 minutes to make a cup of plain coffee for the lady ahead of me and they made my drink wrong twice before they got close enough for me to not care anymore and just say screw it and take it. ...  ... What a waste of time.


REVIEW #20:  1 stars  (306 chars)
I went here,november 9 around 2ish.This starbucks got the worst costumer service i have ever experience ever!, i think they need to retrain their crew or i think best is to change their crew.the register person and the barista got a terrible attitude towards their costumers(specially the gay guy-barista)


REVIEW #21:  1 stars  (291 chars)
If there was a way to rate negatively I would. Long wait. Asked for less ice and all I got was ice. Workers didn't work fast. Taste of the drink was super watered out. Price was not worth it. Totally took my money for a shitty drink. If you have a choice go else where for coffee. It sucks.


REVIEW #22:  1 stars  (201 chars)
Worst Starbucks ever. Long lines and ineffective staff. Sub par baked goods. I guess they feel they can get away with bad service because the convenience of being located in the hotel. That's a shame.


REVIEW #23:  1 stars  (201 chars)
Slow baristas chatting sullenly.  ... Rude cashier tells me they're not a corporate location.  ... My reward points won't work here.  ... They also cannot reload my gift card.  ... Nuts to this place.


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (123 chars)
The lines were so long and the workers were beyond slow. ...  ... Go next door to Mc Donald's for a cup of coffee instead!


REVIEW #25:  1 stars  (78 chars)
OMG what an awful service and horrible options. NEVER going back to this one!


REVIEW #26:  1 stars  (68 chars)
They hate their job and they make sure you know it. Rude Rude Rude!


................................................................................
LOCATION #167:  address="Monte Carlo Resort Food Court 3770 Las Vegas Blvd South The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (2 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  3 stars  (172 chars)
It's very convenient and who doesn't love Starbucks? But my gift card wasnt working and there's a lot of things they don't have. Really long lines in the mornings too btw!


REVIEW #2:  3 stars  (119 chars)
No CAKE POPS!  No chocolate chai mix!  Won't take my Starbucks card.  But at least it's close to the room elevators...


................................................................................
LOCATION #168:  address="New York New York Hotel 3790 S Las Vegas Blvd The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (8 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (79 chars)
Great location in New York New York!  Perfect if you are staying in the hotel!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (971 chars)
2014 YELP 100 CHALLENGE - 44/100 ...  ... The boyfriend and I aren't big drinkers, so fraps at this Starbucks ended up being our first drinks when we first got to Vegas, LOL. This location is nice and big, well lit, and has TONS of seating. We went close to 10pm and they were still open pretty late (might be 24 hours, but I can't remember).  ...  ... I decided to try their new caramel flan frap, which was really good! Much better than the caramel frap or the creme brulee frap, IMO. The boyfriend got a peppermint mocha frap and his was great as well. ...  ... They only had two people working during the time we went, but they were very friendly asian women who worked with smiles on their faces :) ...  ... The only reason why I won't give this Starbucks 5 stars is because it is really expensive. However, all of the Starbucks in LV are much more expensive than normal Starbucks locations are. We got two tall sized fraps and it was over $11...kind of ridiculous.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (384 chars)
This is one of the two locations inside of NYNY. It's located on the main level by most of the restaurants and after a long vegas night, you will need this in the am! The staff here is always friendly and helpful.  ...  ... Some might think that this place is pricey, but nothing in vegas is cheap like the older days use to be.  ...  ... Get over it, your on vacation! YOLO......LOL


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (371 chars)
Stopped here a few times for a caffeine fix while staying at NY NY. The staff was very helpful and accommodating my weird drink requests. I'm from Ohio and we have something at Starbucks there that this one had never heard of. But they did their best to match it and it turned out great!  ...  ... The ladies that were working at the time were very friendly and helpful.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (292 chars)
Found in the New York New York Hotel in Vegas, they really do everything at New York speed, style, and splurging prices! ...  ... Fast cashier, fast drink making, in and out before you know it. ...  ... Want fruits (bananas and the like)? They're legit New York prices at $1.75 a pop! Yikes.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (435 chars)
Early in the morning, this Starbucks is where you're going to be if you're looking for caffeine in New York, New York.  The line is long and moves slowly, as if they had no idea people were going to show up.  Sure, prices are high and they have silly names for everything, but that's any Starbucks. ...  ... I'll be standing in line but only because they open first.  Three stars because it's not their fault that nobody else is open.


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (475 chars)
The Starbucks is certainly convenient if you're staying at the New York, New York Hotel & Casino, but the lines are often really long... and they don't have a scanner to pay by iPhone. This is just a counter-service only facility, but there is plenty of seating locating in the Hotel Lobby & Casino, just be warned it often smells smoky in there (I wish they would ban smoking in Casinos--- just saying). The staff was nice enough, so at least they have that going for them.


REVIEW #8:  1 stars  (127 chars)
Worst Starbucks I've ever had. I asked for less ice in my coffee so they substitute it with milk. Seriously paid for iced milk


................................................................................
LOCATION #169:  address="Planet Hollywood 3667 S Las Vegas Blvd The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (31 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (738 chars)
This Starbucks is expensive and of course the lines are long, but it's to be expected - it's Vegas! There's a location on the casino floor and also one by check-in. I went to the one on the casino floor when I was in Vegas recently and they made my drink wrong and I had to bring it back - the barista who remade it was so nice about it and remade it quickly and perfectly! He was super tall and I remember his name was Adam. He made my morning, he was so nice and so funny! The reason I remember him specifically is because the other two baristas right there were too busy having a conversation about going out the night before and he was the only one paying attention. Thanks for the attentiveness and the best hazelnut macchiato ever!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (449 chars)
Holy roadside robbery! ...  ... Coffee: more expensive than the Starbucks even at other hotels in the immediate area. ...  ... Water: Even the airport does not go above $6 for a bottle of water. ...  ... Hmmm, I think I got mugged at the Starbucks.  But the good news is, they donate 5 cents...that's right....5 cents from my $6 water purchase.  : )  Do not save the world all at once Starbucks...you may earn more customers if you do it slowly....


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (347 chars)
I totally agree with Jess Y. The guy in front of me got charged $1 for tap water. This starbucks had used drink cups everywhere.  I dont get why people don't clean up after themselves. Needs to be cleaned. This starbucks wasnt cooperate so they didnt take my amazon local 20% off. For some reason the prices are higher for starbucks on the strip!


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (341 chars)
Free wi-fi, quick service, I can get coffee and my morning oatmeal in a flash. It's not rocket science! Prices are higher than your local Starbuck's but that is true of most of the ones located in a casino! Other than that, there is plenty of seating available (even when the line has been out the door) and the keep the place fairly clean.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (299 chars)
This Starbucks gets 4 stars simply because FREE WIFI inside the casino!!!!!! Want wifi in your hotel room? $13. Venture downstairs to the Starbucks? FREE! You don't even have to buy anything @ Starbucks to mooch off their wifi. Open 24 hours!  ...  ... And...they do not accept Starbucks giftcards.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (220 chars)
Great starbucks in Planet Hollywood. It is kind of tuckedaway from the hustle an bustle of the casino, out of view of the dirty pit and concerts. it has a lot of seating and 4 comfy chairs that all have their on outlet.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (18 chars)
Typical Starbucks


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (767 chars)
I hate giving bad reviews. I know is Vagas and some things cost alot. And alot of people trying to get the same thing can take time. And many people there you might be able to clean the place. But, the employees just act like they don't want to be there. The look on their faces when people ordered. Its hard to put it. Its like I had bad vibes from everyone there. I can tell you they weren't the happy smiling Mc Donalds workers.  ... 1. Very slow ... 2. Employees really didn't seem like they wanted to take orders. ... 3. Very dirty. I think people from the casino cleaned it up before the  Star Bucks employees. ... 4. I couldn't see Star Bucks aproving this place being a part of their chain. I would think they should send some one out there to check on them.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (627 chars)
This Starbucks is located inside Planet Hollywood.  We came around 10pm and thankfully the place was still open.  Unfortunately, despite having three employees working that night, I still had to wait a while for my drink to be made. The barista was very slow.  One other person ordered ahead of me but somehow I still had to wait 15 minutes for my coffee to be made (it was not a complicated drink). Another person who had ordered a while before me had his drink taken by someone else and they had to remake his drink.  ...  ... There is a lot of seating in this Starbucks. It was clean and comfortable.  Service is just slow.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (456 chars)
Waited 10 minutes in line to find out a venti iced coffee breve costs $5.68... same price as a venti iced white mocha? Questionable how that turned out to be. Paying for convenience of a Starbucks on Las Vegas Blvd I guess..... But, they do accept the starbucks gift cards to earn those stars whether it be on your phone or a physical card they take it! Even though the line took forever, the drinks came out fast and I was out in a jiffy after I ordered.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (409 chars)
The good: quicker than you'd think.  The line may stretch out into the casino, but you'll likely have your drink in 10 min or less. ...  ... The bad: not Starbucks items in the pastry case, so if you were looking for that lemon bread or salted caramel square, you're out of luck, buddy. ...  ... The ugly: nothing, it was quite nice.  They don't take Starbucks cards for payment, though, that might get ugly.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (356 chars)
Kind of disappointed that we were charged for water.  I thought all customers are supposed to be disclosed of any additional charges.  I have never been charged for water at a Starbucks.  It was dirty, tables with drinks on them left by lazy customers.  Their wi-fi was not working at all.  Just disappointing.  Too many employees behind the back counter.


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (335 chars)
It's pretentious, it's inconsistent, and it's a little grimy. It's Starbucks. This location is pricey due to it's location and it's very crowded but it's the typical impatient customers, indifferent employees, and burnt coffee that you'll find at any other Starbucks. To expect otherwise is an effort in futility so lighten up people!


REVIEW #14:  3 stars  (269 chars)
This place is open 24/7 and staff is fairly friendly and efficient, but this place is pretty over priced compare to other starbucks in the area...also they charged us 50 cents for water -___-" I guess only come here if you're in desperate need to caffeine after hours.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (815 chars)
There's three different ways I've judged the different Starbucks locations over the years. ...  ... 1.  Speed of service ... 2.  Quality of their brewed iced coffee ... 3.  Friendliness of the staff ...  ... This Starbucks was the definition of mediocrity.  The baristas were numerous during the day time, but everyone still had to wait an extended period of time for their drinks. ...  ... Their iced coffee was okay, perfectly acceptable.  ...  ... Their staff, at least the one who rang me up, was not the friendliest.  She dropped a couple of pennies that I gave to her on the floor, and then had the gall to think I short changed her.  Minor transgression, but definitely a little annoying. ...  ... One plus though, is that they have very different pastries, much more upscale than the normal Starbucks fare.


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (713 chars)
I'm really happy there's a Starbuck's downstairs at Planet Hollywood but I'd be much happier if I didn't have to pay a premium for my morning caffeine fix.  For what I paid for a tall drip I could have had two grandes at my local Starbucks.   ...  ... Always crowded in the morning but not so much in the afternoons. There were three baristas at the cash registers at 7 am. While the line moved relatively quickly (I don't consider a ten minute wait too long btw) I was rushed in ordering and forgot to get anything to eat.  Maybe I should be glad as I can only imagine what they charge for scones.   ...  ... They did provide those tray / carriers which made my carrying the coffee back to my room a lot easier.


REVIEW #17:  2 stars  (650 chars)
Stayed at Planet Hollywood for four nights, with no in room coffee pot you have no choice but to buy at one of the 2 Starbucks (or get room service$$$)  This Starbucks is a total rip off!  High prices!  Long lines!  Mediocre service!  Out of Blonde roast within first hour of opening at 6am and barista was not real interested in putting more on to brew.  They ran out of Awake tea.  They advertise hot breakfast sandwiches/rolls but none available during our stay.  We could not use our Starbucks phone app to pay or accumulate points because they were having "technical issues"  Living in WA state the home of Starbucks, we were VERY disappointed!


REVIEW #18:  2 stars  (520 chars)
Who the hell charges a dollar for a cup of water?? If I'm ordering coffee and snacks, why would you charge a dollar for a cup of water... It's not the money factor, but more of the principle behind it all.. The starbucks around my neighborhood offer water without hesitation or charge... I just found it ridicules that they asked to pay for it...  ...   This place seems to always be busy- but what else can you expect from a starbucks in vegas? I'll give them one thing though, they had delicious looking fruit snacks.


REVIEW #19:  2 stars  (456 chars)
Dude i have never heard of a starbucks with a bad rating untill now.  i wanna give it 2.5 stars.  Just because the line was long and it's not there fault.  I sat on a small nice looking sofa seat untill i looked closer.. its dirty and kinda tore up.  The place does not take the starbucks card for some reason. and my latte was kinda burnt.  maybe just a bad day.. well from all the review and the star rating it been a bad forever.  oh i didn't get wifi.


REVIEW #20:  2 stars  (280 chars)
PACKED, cramped and long lines.   ... There is cake and muffin crumbs all over the floor. the tables are piled with dirty empty coffee cups. ... It is crazy how much people will do or attempt to do for a starbucks. Wait in an endless line for a less than sub-par cup of coffee...


REVIEW #21:  2 stars  (168 chars)
LOOOOOOOOONG Wait just to get served.  As the line was way into the casino, I see a Starbucks Employee stocking shelves.  Understaffing leads to poor customer service.


REVIEW #22:  2 stars  (150 chars)
Very understaffed. Long lines. And the pastries and drinks are way overpriced. $3.50 for a small cup of regular Joe. They do take Starbucks card now.


REVIEW #23:  1 stars  (1359 chars)
It was a Saturday morning around 10:30 and the girlfriend and I needed coffee in a serious way.  Unfortunately our search for a cup of joe brought us to the Starbucks inside the Planet Hollywood.  This Starbucks just off of the casino floor is the coffee shop equivalent to your average DMV branch...a long line of customers served inefficiently and ineffectively by an incompetent and/or indifferent staff.  The line of people was approximately 25-30 deep.  After five minutes, the line hadn't budged and not a single customer that I could tell had been served their drinks.  I'm not sure whether this lack of progress was due to insufficient staffing or everyone was ordering some complex drink that required each coffee bean to be hand-picked and roasted on the premises. Needless to say since I only wanted a cup of coffee, no cream or sugar, this wasn't going to work.  We left frustrated in search of another Starbucks or similar place to get a good cup of coffee. ...  ... Of note:  Word has it that this Starbucks doesn't accept the Starbucks card.  I believe it since the Starbucks at Harrah's doesn't accept the card either.  What a crock!   ...  ... Avoid this Starbucks like the plague.  Your chance of getting a cup of coffee in the morning in a reasonable amount of time is less than your chance of hitting the jackpot on the progressive slots!


REVIEW #24:  1 stars  (969 chars)
Order takers are rude and don't listen. Ordered a walnut muffin, and she punched in banana. Asked to have it warmed up but alas, No microwave to heat your muffin. Must be hard getting help in Vegas. However barista made a good Upside down nonfat CM. But the rest of the crew needs to pay attention. Hey, I'm from another country too. This Starbucks is in the Planet Hollywood Hotel. ...  ... OK next day 2/3/2011 gave them a second chance, it is the year of the rabbit afterall,  this time my coffee was completely wrong. Ordered it upside down again and watched her put the shots in wrong. Then she calls out it is upside down, I told her it wasn't but she ignores me and doesn't want to make it again. Lowered my rating further. I visit every Starbucks no matter where I am and this is the worst. Starbucks needs to hire secret shoppers and get rid of those who really don't want to work. If you dont want to pour coffee, go do something else, it is Vegas after all.


REVIEW #25:  1 stars  (668 chars)
To start off: I've worked at a Starbucks for nearly 3 years. So I know how much things should be and I know when my drink is made wrong. ...  ... My drink is a pretty complicated one and I get it, easy to mess up. But the guy ringing me up didn't hear me right and so he wrote down the wrong thing, therefore causing the girl making it to screw it up. And I was charged double what I should've been charged. Maybe because it's Vegas? ...  ... Whatever. I paid too much for a crap drink. Good thing I don't live on Vegas. ...  ... Tourists, stay away! You've been warned. If you need free wifi, go to Earl's Sandwich! The food's awesome and the wifi is free as well :)


REVIEW #26:  1 stars  (588 chars)
Dirty. Expensive. Not owned by Starbucks themselves... they are privately owned which is why they do not accept Starbucks gift cards as payment. ...  ... They did run my Gold Card through however, since it's not really part of the actual Starbucks company, they did not honor my Gold Card benefits.  ...  ... They did have some cute pastries... but those are not your typical Starbucks treats. Save your coffee addictions for a small business/ privately owned coffee shop instead of these wannabe Starbucks. My $5 tall sized Carmel Macchiato did not taste like Carmel Macchiato at all...


REVIEW #27:  1 stars  (554 chars)
Inside Planet Hollywood. i ordered 4 drinks. got 3. after waiting and seeing a few people that was in line behind me get their drinks, i went up to the barista and asked if my ice venti carmel macc on the way. the barista seemed disinterested, lucky i had my reciept this morning, normally i dont ask for a reciept.  but he (Adam?) seemed to not care, he finally made the drink after making some other drinks. i would have at least expected an apology, or for them to rush my drink since they made me wait. horrible.  this happened 5/29/2013 at 9:56 am.


REVIEW #28:  1 stars  (515 chars)
There is a big sign that says "Free Wi-Fi" on the wall.  ... I came here on Monday and the Wi-Fi did not work. I thought that it was just temporary. ... I came here on Tuesday and the Wi-Fi still didn't work.  ... I came here on Wednesday and the Wi-Fi didn't work.  ... Eventually I came to the conclusion that these people were pissing me off.  ...  ... This is a scam set up so you pay $13.99 for Planet Hollywood's wi-fi service.  ...  ... Not to mention that the prices are like double of a regular starbucks.


REVIEW #29:  1 stars  (459 chars)
This is located inside the Planet Hollywood, downstairs, and right in front of the valet and hotel registration area. ...  ... SLOWEST SERVICE EVERRR... ...  ... Valet said it would take 20 minutes to retrieve my car, so i had to kill time somehow. Looked around, saw SB, and there was only 7 people in line. Little did i know that it would take 20 minutes to get my coffee! ...  ... Small fruit cup = $5, OUCH. ...  ... Don't come here if you're in a hurry.


REVIEW #30:  1 stars  (211 chars)
This Starbucks has a huge sign stating it now serves breakfast. After waiting in line for 10 minutes on 2 occasions, I was told "the delivery didn't arrive". They simply advertise something they never have.....


REVIEW #31:  1 stars  (178 chars)
Too expensive!! And that's saying something for Starbucks. And they tried to charge me a $1.50 for a cup of water. A CUP OF WATER!!!!  Overpriced and cheap with their customers/


................................................................................
LOCATION #170:  address="Rainbow Corporate Center 651 N Rainbow Blvd"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89108"  (3 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  3 stars  (698 chars)
If this review was just for the morning crew, it would be a lot higher. They are awesome. However, the afternoon crew is another story. There wasn't any of the Pike roast available when ordered. No worries. Waited a few minutes. And a few minutes more...10 minutes go by, so up to the counter we go. When asked if the coffee was ready, the barista says "oh..yeah." And starts pouting it. He had completely forgotten about it and apparently forgot that it was paid for as he started talking crap as we were leaving. A few other customers got their order incorrect as we were waiting too. Maybe less time chit chatting at the counter and a little bit more time focusing on your customers would help.


REVIEW #2:  1 stars  (2120 chars)
My visit was on 6/12/14: ...  ... I'm appropriately titling this review: "Barista Bull S**t" ...  ... I always wondered why it took this location so long to be accessible on Yelp.com; maybe because they knew what kind of reviews they would get?  usually, I get my drink on the weekends with no hassle or fuss; however, on some occasions I do experience oddities; like this one: ...  ... -My father and I have been coming to this location for well over a year, my dad almost on a daily basis and usually at the same time everyday.  Do you think they would learn his or my name, what drinks we get.....nope!  My wife gets treated totally different by the Manager and staff when she goes in for coffee; why aren't we? ... The manager spends most of the time gossiping among her cronies, all except one of which is a man.   ...  ... This is one example of the nonsense that goes on behind the counter: ...  ... **** A fairly butch-looking staff member argued with me about whether the green tea they offered was pure green tea; she exclaimed Yes, it's pure green tea!  (This was before Starbucks offered China Green Tip Tea)  She was referring to a green tea blend with peppermint and other flavors......in no way shape or form is this PURE GREEN TEA!!!   ... **** She ended up giving me "what she thought was pure green tea"....it wasn't. and I was really pissed at the fact that she argued with me, insisted she knew what she was talking about, and eventually was proven incorrect.  I told her I was recently at a Starbucks in China where they offered pure green tea; she said that's not possible.  I've noticed the staff (ladies) are only friendly to a select few customers; however, I believe it all stems from what the manager allows, and she seems to happily support this behavior.   ...  ... On another note:  The new furniture is very uncomfortable when compared to their previous lounge-type furniture. ...  ... ***By the looks of the previous reviews, I would say they're spot on and that this location has some "personal" improvements to make to improve customer service and consistency regarding their products.


REVIEW #3:  1 stars  (1784 chars)
So I visit this store at least once a day while I am at work, sometimes twice a day, so I thought things could only get better........ I guess I couldn't have been more wrong :-/  ... So I have long since given up on them learning my name (at least at this store) and as for memorizing my drink, I guess that's certainly out of the question, because we all know how hard it is to remember a Grande black coffee!! I rarely order anything else, because when I do they always seem to get it wrong. For some reason this store can't seem to understand what you mean when you order "non-fat" and then when you correct them on it, they get upset that they have to remake your drink.  ... But today was the creme de la creme of crappiness at this location! I went in and ordered my usual Grande black coffee, and the barista told me that they didn't have any brewed, so he started brewing some and then charged me the $2.11. He then proceeded to help the next few people in line and of course he completely forgot about my coffee. So about 10 minutes later I went back up to the counter and asked if my coffee was ready and he said "oh yeah" and he poured my coffee and then instead of giving me my coffee, he proceeded to to walk over to another barista and have a random chat with her while holding my coffee?! When he finally did make his way to the counter, I grabbed my coffee and started to walk out. It was at that point he began talking to the other baristas and the people in line about how I didn't pay for my coffee!!!  Was he actually serious!! I only wished he hadn't wasted my whole entire lunch break waiting for my coffee because I would have tore into him!  ... Dear tall barista at Sbux thanks for being such a jerk today and ruining my lunch break!  ... WORST SBUX EVER!!!


................................................................................
LOCATION #171:  address="Red Rock Resort - Lobby 10973 W Charleston Blvd South Summerlin"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89135"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (524 chars)
I was so tired and just wanted a green tea latte instead of a cocktail, and lo and behold, there was Starbucks, like a green beacon of light with her mermaid tail shimmering in the sea. The workers were both really nice and made my drink perfectly to order and nice and hot. It kept me awake while watching a four hour baseball game in Yard House. Yes, it is a little more expensive here than freestanding Starbucks, but what are you going to do? Located off the casino floor and pretty convenient to the rest of the place.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (422 chars)
So awesome to have two Starbucks in the same casino!! Talk about heaven!! The line can get pretty long so I would go there early.   The workers are polite as in all Starbucks and my tall no foam latte was perfect as always.  One thing is that they have pastries but no breakfast sandwiches so I was bummed about that.  I try to do a high protein breakfast and I got none of that in this Starbucks.  But I still love them!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (232 chars)
I have to give this place five stars coffee is great service is great and there always right on top of everything. Would I recommend it to friends and family of course next time your at the red rock stop by and experience the same.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (85 chars)
Its in a good location for a quick pick me up. But its pricier than other Starbucks.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (812 chars)
A nice little casino lobby Starbucks with never much of a waiting line.  That is a rarity these days...being able to go right up to the counter and place your order.   ...  ... The staff here is always very nice and they always get your order right.  They also offer some pastries and goodies that most of the other Starbucks locations don't usually stock and offer, so that's another plus.  The prices here, along with the food court one, are a tad bit higher than your usual run of the mill location.  But that's what one should pretty much expect when inside a nice casino. ...  ... There's no seating, you just get your coffee and go.  But that's fine with me, I'm usually here after getting a meal or before hitting the casino floor to do a little gambling.  In either case I'm ready to grab my cup and go.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (566 chars)
Every casino food court needs a Starbucks, and this one in Red Rock's food court does not disappoint.  You'll find all your familiar and favorite drinks here, and their pastry section is actually bigger and offers more than most other Starbucks.  The prices are a little more, but it's in a casino so that's just part of the game I suppose. ...  ... Sometimes the line gets pretty long...it's in the heart of the casino and food court so that's pretty much to be expected I suppose.  But the workers are all nice and efficient so they keep the line moving smoothly.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (312 chars)
This is not the most efficient location, as far as getting the drinks out in a timely manor, but it will do. It's located close enough to the sports book that you can load up on caffeine while your watching the game. ...  ... Oh, as usual, you should expect to pay more because this location is inside a casino.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (261 chars)
I'm grateful for this Starbucks location especially if I'm going to the movies after a long day at work, I need the caffeine. The down side is the staff isnt very friendly. The barista gave me the death stare. Umm sorry you're having a bad day mr. Barista man?


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (171 chars)
A lot quicker than the Charleston location, minus a drive-thru. Very nice people working, with each time I've gone. Might stop by more often. It is my nearest location...


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (902 chars)
I don't even want to give this star. I'm a local here and couldn't believe the people they had working here. I went down to have some coffee before hitting the spa this morning. I wanted to refill my gold card but I didn't think they could do that so I asked anyways. Always better to ask, right? Well the lady who helped me had said no and the the lady next to her proceeded to mock me in front of me! I thought to myself oh well I would hate to be up this early and dealing with tourists. But as they were making my coffee it seemed to be every customer was getting very poor service.  ... In the end my coffee was completely wrong. And i do understand it's a "fast" coffee place but being a gold card holder I have been to many Starbucks. Aria Starbucks workers know me by name and order. They are absolutely wonderful! So I am inclined to leave my review because it was pretty horrible. Be warned!


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (544 chars)
I am a Starbucks fan for sure, but this location is certainly not worth your time! ...  ... Eek! I visited this Starbucks and ordered my usual drink...Big mistake! Bad customer service, nasty employees, long line and massively over priced! The employees roll their eyes and sigh, the female employees often run around with their hair sloppily falling out of ponytails or braids. The employees seem annoyed that they should have to take your order. I would suggest purchasing your Starbucks before or after your trip to Red Rock Casino. 1 Star.


................................................................................
LOCATION #172:  address="Silverton Casino 3333 Blue Diamond Road Southwest"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89139"  (6 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (420 chars)
I love Starbucks! Especially when there is one inside of the hotel I'm staying at, even more after $10 all you can drink at the bar! They are quick and friendly, and they don't ask why your wearing sunnies inside the hotel, I think they just figure I am hung over. I love that they have seating inside and items you can buy like normal Starbucks. I will come back for my caffeine fix next time I'm staying at the hotel.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (208 chars)
I wrote a review and couldn't figure out how to post it.  Silverton Casino Starbucks is really nice.  It has great drinks, electric plug in's They didn't hurry you out.  They even gave samples of new drinks.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (189 chars)
It's great! Not only is it a great hotel/casino, but Silverton offers a Starbucks right in the lobby. Get your fix and then enjoy the huge aquarium while you nurse that throbbing headache.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (392 chars)
This Starbucks was just what I needed last night when I went to the Silverton.  I had my quad espresso and was out of the place very quickly.  The service was great! ...  ... I like that they take the Gold Card from Starbucks.  Some casino locations are still way behind the times when it comes to using the card. ...  ... The seating area is large.  This is a little oasis at the Silverton.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (106 chars)
This is the best starbucks we went to in vegas. The staff was quick and friendly and drinks were perfect.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (92 chars)
Good service with a friendly staff.  Right inside the Silverton and they even have seating.


................................................................................
LOCATION #173:  address="The Aria Hotel and Casino 3730 Las Vegas Blvd S The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89158"  (12 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (2717 chars)
Es gibt in Las Vegas die traditionellen Themen-Hotels (u.a. Bellagio, Caesars Palace, The Venetian, Paris, Grand MGM) und neue Hotels, die keinem Thema frnen sondern einzig aus sich heraus wirken. Das sind die top-modernen, in denen an nichts gespart wurde und die dadurch in anderer Weise ebenso imposant sind wie die Traditionshotels. Zu diesen Neuen gehrt das Aria, das sich im neuen City Center am sdlichen Ende des Strips befindet. ... Modernste Architektur, viel Glas bestimmen das Aria. Drauen im Vorfahrbereich beeindruckt eine geschwungene Wand, von der in unterschiedlichen Intervallen und Strken Wasser hinunter strmt. Die lange Rezeption schirmt sich angenehm vom Casino-Bereich ab, bei meinem krzlichen Besuch war der gesamte Deckenbereich des Empfangs mit groen Weihnachtskugeln dekoriert. ... Die Zimmer vom Feinsten. Wir logierten im 39. Stock mit atemberaubenden Blick auf Las Vegas. Grozgig gestaltet, viel Platz, im Bad allerdings wird an der Grozgigkeit ein klein wenig gespart. Aber das ist leise Kritik auf hchstem Niveau. Die Betten ein Traum, im wahrsten Sinne des Wortes. Ich kenne kein Hotel, das vergleichbar gute, exzellente Matratzen hat wie das Aria und die Kopfkissen  hufig ein Schwachpunkt in der Hotellerie  stehen dem in nichts nach. Die sind so gut, dass das Aria diese Matratzenart und die Kissen zum Verkauf anbietet. Fr uns natrlich schwer nach Deutschland zu transportieren und nicht gerade billig. Ein paar Tausend Dollar (je nach Gre) sind pro Matratze hinzublttern! Ansonsten fehlt in den Zimmern nichts, absolut nichts, was den Aufenthalt uerst komfortabel macht. Ich erspare mir das Aufzhlen, es ist alles vorhanden!! ... Ansonsten bietet das Aria alles was das Besucher-Herz erfreut: Ein groe, weite Casino-Anlage, diverse Restaurants, Bars, Shops. Im Auenbereich eine weitlufige Pool-Anlage, die bei unserem Besuch Ende November zum Groteil geschlossen war  off season. Ein Becken war immerhin geffnet, der Bademeister langeweilte sich, das Wasser war angenehm warm, aber die aus den Zimmer mitgebrachten hochwertigen Bademntel erwiesen sich als sehr ntzlich beim Verlassen des Pools. Drei Whirlpools waren ebenso geffnet, eine Erholung bei heiem, sprudelndem Wasser. ... Und wer mit der weiten Welt kommunizieren mchte: Im gesamten Hotelkomplex ist WLan frei. Allerdings muss man sich stndig wieder einloggen, denn nach kurzer Zeit der Inaktivitt ist man raus aus dem Zugang. ... Fazit: Ein Hotel der hchsten Kategorie. Man muss suchen, um etwas zum Bemngeln zu finden und wird kaum fndig werden. Das hat seinen Preis, aber es gibt immer wieder Angebote! Die Lage ist prima zentral. Wohlfhlfaktor garantiert. Fnf Sterne  locker! ... Tipp: Valet-Parking ist kostenfrei.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (182 chars)
The line was a little long but the service was great and they had great selections! I got the asian salad for lunch and a coffee that was nice and fresh...good morning accomplished.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (1019 chars)
Located at CityCenter in the Aria hotel, this is one of a handful of "concept" Starbucks, specially-designed stores that are often very green and artistic.  I was anxious to visit and see for myself.   ...  ... To find this Starbucks, take the escalator up from the casino to the promenade level, where it is near the guest elevators.  ...  ... This is a busy place, and the long line made me hesitate.  But cleverly efficient, they had an employee go down the line, taking your order in advance.  This speeded the line wait dramatically, so it was well under 10 minutes.  Obviously they have taken reviews like Andrew N's to heart. ...  ... I like this location.  Unusual ceiling, nicely tiled columns, attractive tables and chairs, made this a pleasant stopping place.  From a design standpoint, I do prefer the other two CityCenter Starbucks, one in the Crystal Mall and the other near the Mandarin Oriental.  That's not taking anything away from this one, which is obviously a cut above.  Definitely worth a visit.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (632 chars)
I visited this location for the first time today.  It's clearly more popular than any other retail location in the hotel and I suspect there will be another one in the hotel very soon.  This design on this Starbucks is different and seems to incorporate more of the Aria's design elements than you would find in the average Starbucks on the street.  It's a very comfortable space. ...  ... This location get very busy.  When I visited that had 6 people working and we're able to move the line along very quickly and efficiently. ...  ... They got my order right and had it prepared for me quickly.   ...  ... I was not disapointed.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (197 chars)
This is a great Starbucks if you go during off-peak hours. They seem to not be set up to handle a ton of traffic unless you like lines. But, the afternoons are great as this is an empty Starbucks.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (765 chars)
Starbucks has always been pretty consistent with my drinks.  I don't think I have ever had a bad one here.   ...  ... It's basically the customer service I receive is what I review of which I had ok service at this location.   Being on the strip, it is definitely a busier location.  There was somewhat of a line but it moved along fine.  That's probably why it took just a little bit longer to get my drink.  Since they were so busy there wasn't much interaction with the customers.  I've seen busy locations which handled it much better. ...  ... I will say their dining area was very clean.  It has a huge wall of windows which brightened up this area very nicely.  It doesn't hurt that the windows face the main strip so you can people watch here all day long.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (448 chars)
Hate waiting in lines? Can you handle a 3 min walk instead of standing there?  ...  ... Ok - so do yourself a favor - walk past this Starbucks down the 2nd floor hall, past the Aria Buffet, go down the escalator on the left, head right towards the exit towards self parking. Back up the short escalator, bang a right, take the walkway and long escalator down towards Monte Carlo, and at the bottom there will be an empty Starbucks waiting for you.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (321 chars)
They charge higher prices than most Starbucks.  Coffee is the same as other Starbucks, so no issues there.  Food is another matter.  We arrived near opening time one day, and they had no bagels, and one other day they did not have the raisin bagels.  I didn't think that I would have had some a hard time finding bagels.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (370 chars)
Employees are nice, but prices are double any other Starbucks that I've ever been to. The also don't have a Starbucks card scanner. If you're going to charge crazy prices at least have good technology. Last time I get Starbucks at Aria. ...  ... *after coming back the next day it appears they double charged me, but I'll never know since they didn't give me a receipt.


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (702 chars)
Slowest moving Starbucks I have ever encountered in my entire life. ...  ... Avoid this Starbucks on the promenade level. Every morning when I would go to the fitness center I had to pass this Starbucks. There was always a line. ...  ... I decided to wait in the line not thinking it would take long. Oh boy was I wrong. I waited almost a half hour before I reached the cash register. It's not that there are a lot of people waiting on the line, it's the fact that there is only one person taking your order and two people making the coffee. They need more people working behind the counter. ...  ... Prices are much higher here than other Starbucks, but I expect that since it is located in the Aria.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (240 chars)
Coffee good as usual but incredibly long lines and slow service.  Almost seemed like there was something wring with their POS system.  Staff seemed frustrated too and weren't too friendly.  Plenty of other Starbucks nearby, avoid this one.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (167 chars)
Worst service if any Starbucks. Waited in line 35 minutes to place an order, and they still managed to get it wrong. Not worth it. Next time sticking to room service.


................................................................................
LOCATION #174:  address="The Linq 3475 Las Vegas Blvd The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (10 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (346 chars)
This was the first time visiting the new Starbucks at the Linq.   They were one of the few stores that were staffed appropriately for a three day weekend, plus it being Valentine's Day.   The cashier introduced herself, reviewed the order, and was friendly as could be.  Way to go Starbucks for training these employees to delight their clients.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (288 chars)
Newest Starbucks on the Strip! It is located conveniently at the Linq between the Quad and Flamingo. This Starbucks offers plenty of seating as well as charging areas. There's free wifi from the Linq. There's also a restroom. Love the iced caramel macchiato and cranberry oatmeal cookie.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (88 chars)
Can't really go bad here. They know what I want when I walk in the door. Thanks girls !


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (1132 chars)
When I am on the Strip and want to slow down or get away from the adult beverages, Starbuck's is my place. Actually Starbuck's is always my place. ...  ...   The Starbuck's at the Linq is the newest Starbuck's on the Strip. Technically it is in the new Disneyfied street called the Linq that will lead people from the mid-Strip along a walkway that resembles Bourbon Street past bars and entertainment venues to the High Roller Ferris Wheel. It is between the Flamingo, O Shea's and Quad entrances. In other words it is hyper convenient. ...  ...    There are countless Starbuck's on the Strip. This one is different because it looks like you are entering a building off Bourbon Street. It is the anti-casino Starbuck's with the casino pricing. ...  ...   Inside the Starbuck's is modern. There are plenty of seating. The sun does not heat up the cafe. And in the age where the smartphone is practically a body appendage, there are plenty of phone outlets. ...  ...   When I hang out on the Strip, sometimes I just want to relax with a cup of coffee. I enjoyed relaxing in the newest Strip Starbuck's enjoying a non adult beverage.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (654 chars)
Despite how busy this Starbucks gets, and how often it has long lines, service is still fast and friendly here. Long lines usually clear up really quickly.. ...  ... It's almost also like a little quiet familiar safe haven, hidden away from the noise, flashing lights and smoke of the gambling floor, even though it's just steps away. ...  ... Being Las Vegas, iced coffees and frapp's make up the majority of the menu items purchased here, and every iced coffee I've had there was excellent! Just the right amount of ice. I'm pretty used to other Starbucks putting so much ice in their iced coffees, that even with a venti you're done after two slurps.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (554 chars)
In the land where the people are awake at ALL times, and most Starbucks are PACKED, this location is a hidden treasure.  ...  ... A LARGE location, with more than enough sitting space, a staff that knows what they are doing AND has their processes DOWN?!?! YES PLEASE. ...  ... The line has never been out of control, and they keep it flowing at a decent pace. They take your order before you even get near the register so by the time you are done so is your drink. Truly a great location, and makes getting hangover nourishment speedy and less painful.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (925 chars)
This is one of the newest Starbucks located on the strip, but it's not a real one, but a Starbucks in name only.  ...  ... Yes they except the Starbucks gift card, but they also except the total rewards cards which makes it not an official Starbucks. Another giveaway is they jack up the prices! ...  ... I ordered a passionfruit iced tea with a splash of strawberry. Normally my drink would cost me about $2.85. The young lady told me my drink cost almost 6 dollars. I did not question them, I just gave them my Starbucks card and took my drink. ...  ... This place is pretty big, plenty of outlets to plug-in, and plenty of selection of other items including the "you are here" Vegas mugs, juices, sandwiches, etc.  ...  ... I'm giving this place three stars because of the outrageous price increase. I understand it's a business, but doubling the price for a drink that normally cost me less than three dollars is insane.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (544 chars)
HOLY TAMOLE!! Are my eyes deceiving me?  Did I really read these prices right??  In need for a major refresher while walking the hot Vegas strip, we wandered into the Linq and came across Starbucks.  The prices here are crazy expensive!! - I want to say about 3 times more than what a standard Starbucks would charge.  So, I would probably say, unless you are SUPER desperate, I would probably go somewhere else to get your drink.  Unfortunately, I was desperate and had to shell out the cash for my drink!  You are paying for the convenience.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (161 chars)
One of the nicest Starbucks I've been to, as well as the most natural-light one too.  Tall ceilings, with wooden theme design. ...  ... Props for open 24 hours.


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (209 chars)
Rudest Starbucks I've been to. Paid $7.50 for coffee. You'd think you get a 'thank you' at the register right? Nope! Top it off the drink was ready, got place on counter called name and straw thrown. Lol wow!


................................................................................
LOCATION #175:  address="The Mirage Hotel and Casino 3400 Las Vegas Blvd S The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (22 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (631 chars)
This Starbucks and the Staff is absolutely amazing! I went in twice to get Green Tea and wasn't sure if I usually get the China Green Tips or the Zen tea, both times, two different associates suggested the Zen tea and told me that if I didn't like it they would make me the China Green tips, no questions asked.  ...  ... They were friendly, quick, and attentive. All of which were essential to rejuvinating during a long weekend in Vegas. The location is ideal, it is open 24/7, and there was hardly ever a line, but when there was, it moved quickly. They also have a lot of pastires that most locations do not have... extra win!


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (65 chars)
Expensive but the staff is friendly and they move the line fast.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (1042 chars)
If u need to plug in your MacBook or George Foreman grill, you might have to wait because they only have 2 outlets. Other than that, it's a nice place to people watch if you get a seat by the windows. A little noisy cuz its right next to the casino floor. Lines can be long, but they are fast with getting orders out. They do take your Starbucks card. ...  ... To gain better reviews, keep prices on par with the rest of the world, add more plugs, and install an exit door to keep out some noise near the tables. It would be hard to make an entrance door because the line to get a chai latte is sometimes too long. ...  ... Sadly, I expect the prices to be more at the casino. What does that tell you? Mine (and most everyone else's) perception of casinos is not a good one. My perception of Starbucks is also starting to diminish because THEY ALLOW IT. Why does Starbucks allow casinos to jack up prices to greedy levels? For someone not a regular at starbucks, they will leave feeling like Tasha D. Casinos are giving Starbucks a bad name.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (665 chars)
It's winter time and it's FREEZING while walking down the Strip.   It was easy to find this starbucks because it wasn't hidden within the hotel shopping centers, and I thank it for that.  All I got was a hot peppermint Mocha (The Holiday flavors were supposed to be over by this time, but they let me order it.).  It was the absolute perfect hand warmer and treat.   ...  ... Lately most of the starbucks I've been to don't really ask for names anymore to write on cups, which makes me kinda sad.  But this place asked for names.     ...  ... It was funny to see my friend name (Joey) become "Joye."  They didn't misspell my name, which honestly saddened me a bit.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (376 chars)
Of course I had to come to a Starbucks while in Vegas. Duh. It was your average Starbucks - they weren't as friendly as other Starbucks I have been to, but they were not rude. It's pretty small - they have a few places to sit down, but that's about it. A good place to come if you was to get coffee to go. Everything else was the same as every other Starbucks I have been to!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (220 chars)
Great & friendly staff! Store is very well kept especially since its inside the Mirage so they are a high volume store. I recommend going early if your looking for a bread of some sort because they do tend to run out :)


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (168 chars)
Convenient 24 hour Starbucks if you need something to wake yourself up again after a fun night on the Strip.  Conveniently across from Venetian/Palazzo. Quick service.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (150 chars)
I was lucky.. no line!  Stopped here before the Beatles Love show, and was happy they took my Starbuck gold card. Good service, and I can't complain.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (68 chars)
Other than the longer-than-usual line, it's your typical Starbucks.


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (1128 chars)
It pains me to give them three stars because of who they are.  I would much rather frequent a local coffee shop over a corporate chain any day, but this was Vegas.  You won't see me checking into many Starbucks very often.  This particular one was located on the main floor of the Mirage (our hotel).   ...  ... I ran down virtually every morning at the crack of dawn to score us a couple doses of caffeine.  In this particular venue - it was imperative that you go early because after 7-730AM....the lines were ridiculous.  I will say that the line did seem to go fast the one time I had to stand in it. ...  ... That being said - it's Starbucks.  Same sh*t - different venue.  This venue was small, relatively cramped and again had an immense amount of volume in the early AM hours.  That line was solid until well into the late morning hours.  The service and finished product was fine.  I do enjoy sprucing up my latte or whatever toots my horn.  There were a handful of other Starbuck locations nearby as well so if hooked on SB - check out those venues as they might not have the massive lines like the one at the Mirage.


REVIEW #11:  3 stars  (550 chars)
Courteous and fast moving line helps to keep away the angry but sluggish monster lying in wait within me. I am not always hyped up on caffeine, but my breakfast was a huge let down and I was getting cranky.  ...  ... I needed a pick me up and was feeling overwhelmingly warm. What does that call for? An Iced Americano. I cannot complain about their standard version of my preferred drink. It is strong enough to perk me up, but average.  ...  ... The staff are quick to get the drinks out and friendly, so it is a decent option in the Fashion Show.


REVIEW #12:  3 stars  (369 chars)
What can I say... It's Starbucks, they have this place down to a system, guy who takes your food order, guy who takes you coffee order, guy who rings you up. You will probably be in the photos of many German families who are taking photos of this American institution. Just outside the front door of Treasure Island so very convenient for the morning walk of shame ;-)


REVIEW #13:  3 stars  (153 chars)
Nice to have a familiar coffee shop.  The higher prices is expected but not the service.  Very slow service when we were here.  Only one person working!


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (289 chars)
"Way over priced..not usual Starbucks prices nationwide!" ...  ... $10.99 for a sandwich that is $4.99 in most every other Starbucks?? I realize rent in the Mirage las Vegas is probably high..but your volume is huge. Should offset. Coffees were way more expensive as well. Still we paid..


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (239 chars)
This is the most expensive Starbucks I've ever been to!  It was over $10 for: a drip coffee, an apple, a yogurt, and a chocolate bar.  Bleh.  Also super slow service.  But friendly.  I wouldn't complain except for the toxic sticker shock.


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (90 chars)
no restroom , no seating , no WIFI , long line . I have had better but heck it's a casino


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (1275 chars)
This is my second review on yelp and I have to do it. Chris (the cashier is soooo rude) ... I put a bottle of izzue orange soda on the counter while I was taking my card out of my purse. Suddenly the bottle fell on the floor and I was frightened( the bottle is made of glass). One attentive staff asked me whether I got hurt, which luckily I was okay. ... But when I ordered again, Chris charged me for the orange soda which fell on the floor from his counter ( I didn't touch the bottle at all when it was placed on the counter!) I was like WTF! He didn't ask if I was okay but instead charging me without telling me! ( my bf found the total number was wrong and checked it) ...  ... The attentive staff who cleaned the piece of glass told him not to charge for the broken one( 4 dollars) ...  ... I was so annoyed that I just took the cash he returned to me, thought it would be 4 dollars. ...  ... However, on my way back to room, my bf counted the money and found it was only 2 dollars!!! I didn't really care the the 4 dollars but the whole thing was just ridiculous !!! ...  ... Starbucks at Mirage should train the staff!!!! ...  ... Chris, I don't know what's wrong with you, but working in a customer service industry, you should at least respect and do you job!!!!


REVIEW #18:  1 stars  (520 chars)
Terrible Starbucks.  Usually SBUX gets 5 stars from me, but at this location they had a crew of sloppy employees.  My wife and I had to tell them our drink order three times since they were not paying attention the first time and on the second time they made her drink incorrectly.  My coffee was luke-warm.  Last time I ever go to this Starbucks.  The employees were goofing off and laughing about their inside jokes even after they made our drink incorrectly.  One star from me.  Would be 0 stars if it was available.


REVIEW #19:  1 stars  (516 chars)
First off the girl didn't even greet us when we reached the register to order. I paused not knowing if she was still concluding the order before mine, but then realized as she was staring at me that she was waiting for me to order. Alright, you love your job don't u?! Then, after i ask for my bagel to be toasted, she bluntly tells me we dont toast.  What?! This Starbucks doesn't have a toaster... Epic fail Starbucks. All of your stores should be consistent in the services they are able to offer your customers.


REVIEW #20:  1 stars  (343 chars)
The ONLY good thing to say is that they serve fresh coffee... ... Other than that, the staff is rude, the coffee is about $2.00 higher for Venti than a normal Starbucks and they don't give you stars when you buy their over priced coffee! ...  ... The Walgreens across the street is a good alternative, with fresh coffee and and a lower price.


REVIEW #21:  1 stars  (290 chars)
I go to Starbucks ALL the time and I'll never go back to this one. First, they got my order wrong, then gave ME attitude for it. The girl in the front was really nice and that's about it. There are a million other Starbucks in Vegas, first and last time I go to this one. TERRIBLE service.


REVIEW #22:  1 stars  (72 chars)
Overpriced!! Rude and don't have discounted refills on iced tea...WTF??


................................................................................
LOCATION #176:  address="Treasure Island 3300 S Las Vegas Blvd The Strip"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89109"  (13 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (364 chars)
I got a sandwich here that tasted fine. I really just wanted water for the dehydration but they wanted to charge me. I went with their small cup without a lid. That was free. It's quite spacious which earns them the 5stars! I'm sure they get tons of people so the set up of the place looks efficient for crowds. I came here twice in one weekend and I'd come back!


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (586 chars)
I have been craving green tea lattes like everyday now. ...  ... I visited Las Vegas with my friends the past weekend for EDC. We stayed at TI during this trip. With my never ending craving, having a Starbucks inside TI really helped me out a lot! I just had to go downstairs to get my craving fulfilled. Thank goodness I did not have to go outside in the heat. ...  ... The service is a hit or miss. ...  ... I don't think they serve the hot breakfast sandwiches/wraps on the weekend. I did not see it offered the whole weekend, but then saw it being offered the monday I was leaving.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (575 chars)
Guess what whiny babies - chains that are in or connected to a casino generally cost more than the usual. Just like it is at the airport. Sucks, but just don't buy it if you don't like the prices. I wish you luck finding a cheaper latte on the strip.  ...  ... It's a typical starbucks and yes slightly more expensive than the usual, but you're overpaying regardless, so what's a little more right? Employees were funny and friendly, place was clean. And strip locations are usually exempt from cheap deals, but yay for half off frapps during happy hour 3-5pm thru May 10th.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (379 chars)
What can I say. ..a Starbucks is a Starbucks!  That is why they are so popular.  Their product is consistent.  My only complaint--and this for EVERY Starbucks in Vegas is the astronomical prices.  Their items cost almost double what their items cost any where else.  Every Starbucks I entered was completely packed, I can't imagine the price hike is necessary . . . just greedy.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (636 chars)
This Starbucks is hidden in a back corner of TI (Treasure Island). It's huge, but always, always packed. Because this is the Starbucks of the hotel, it is pretty pricey. Their coffee cake is usually $2.75 but here they charge you $3 each! Imagine...a small piece of coffee cake for $3. I'm not even sure how much they hiked their prices for drinks! However, it is noticeably pricier than other ones.  ...  ... There's free wifi, but you have to ask for the password. Lots of places to sit, and internet's fast but seats aren't that comfortable. Will come back when I stay here again for the wifi, but not so much for the pricey drinks!


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (525 chars)
Starbuck's has eliminated the "short" coffee cup at many of its outlets. They have also eliminated the "short" from their cash registers.The barristas complain that this is a company decision. The benefit to the company is obvious: they charge significantly more for the "tall" cups. The damage to the clientele is just as obvious: we pay more for being involuntarily SUPERSIZED and we consume more than we want to, and more than we should. I big fat round of thanks to Starbuck's for contributing to the obesity of America.


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (795 chars)
I hated this Starbucks. They were 24 hours so I was hopeful they'd be good. The prices of Starbucks in Vegas are almost double the price of Starbucks in NY. I was not happy about that. My barista was also very rude during my first visit. I was waiting at the bar for a regular coffee, when they told me she had to pour it and it wasn't up to the baristas making the drinks to pour it I approached her again. She obviously didn't want to pour my coffee, she was very pissed about it and told her fellow barista she was going to stab her, I was hoping she was only kidding. I work in public service too so I get it, we have good days and bad days but you still shouldn't be rude to the clientele or your co-workers. I did not like this starbucks and was regretful that it was the one by my hotel.


REVIEW #8:  2 stars  (548 chars)
Pricey coffee and food... Compared to other Starbucks... Not even open for 24 hours... This store is located inside Treasure Island Hotel.  One of thier staff told me that their store only serve the sandwich wraps during breakfast only.... Then the following morning I called to check if they still have the sandwich wraps for sale as it is nearing noon.  The store staff said they have it all day.  Huh?  So I guess that male staff on night shift was being lazy then...  This store needs to train their night staff to be more customer friendly...


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (327 chars)
This is a typical Starbucks located just outside of Treasure Island, but be warned as of November 2013 this location doesn't carry the La Boulange line of pastries nor do they accept the Starbucks app as payment.  Not a bad place to people watch on the Las Vegas Strip though.  Everything else is pretty typical.  That is all.


REVIEW #10:  1 stars  (1202 chars)
I hated my experience at this Starbucks. This review is for the Starbucks inside of treasure island,  not the outdoors one.  ...  ... Both of the baristas were unfriendly and looked angry to have customers show up. She talked in a monotone voice, greeting me with a "What do you want?" while rolling her eyes. Where I live, the Starbucks baristas are always bubbly and seem extra happy. So it irritated me to be around such a negative aura while on vacation.  To make things worse, she overcharged me for my drink which clearly showed a lower price on the menu. She did not give me a receipt either, so there was no way for me to prove that she had overcharged me. The male barista who made my drink kept saying that she charged me the correct price, and it was only more because of tax. My drink was 5.50 and she charged 5.65, with tax that came out to 6.11. That's a very expensive drink and I have never had to pay that much tax at a Starbucks where I live. I was willing to pay the expensive price but the attitudes of the people working there made my experience a bad one. Luckily I will not ever go back there.  ...  ... My drink did taste good in the end, but the customer service was terrible.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (522 chars)
Worst Starbucks I have been to. Both the barista and the cashier were very rude and not helpful. The store was also not clean, there was garbage on the floor and splatters in the counter. When I asked about rewards and promo codes, I quickly got a dismissive "no we do not do that" they also don't seem to make many drinks being that they told various customers they couldn't make the drink. My experience with this Starbucks pushed me to go to other coffee retailers during my time in Las Vegas. Avoid going if possible.


REVIEW #12:  1 stars  (291 chars)
Cashier was nice, but explained there's no way they can use the gold card rewards??  ... Barista was rude, adamant about charging $.84 to heat up another customers drink. My coffee was watered down, lacked flavor and kept leaking out of the cup.  ...  ... Avoid this branch like the plague.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (124 chars)
Third time in a row, they give me the wrong drink. Employees are rude and it's was more expensive than any other Starbucks.


................................................................................
LOCATION #177:  address="Vista Commons-Albertsons 11720 W Charleston Blvd Summerlin"  city="Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89135"  (4 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  3 stars  (864 chars)
This Starbucks opened back in 2008 when I first lived here. My young one was just a wee babe, so it was easy to cart him anywhere. This Starbucks fulfilled my latte, frappachino, and lovely oatmeal cravings every single day. Then my family moved. I missed my next door Starbucks. We moved back her a few months ago. This Starbucks is still the same, but my smart phone has evolved past them. I am so used to just whipping out my iPhone and paying for anything that will let me. This 'Bucks does not. It is a nice place to hang out waiting for other pressing engagements, and the staff can be pretty nice when they are not just "meh". So yes, there are times when I adore my venti, and other times when I wished I'd gone down to Town Center. At least it is near my house. (Oh yeah- they do not take the phone app, so have your physical SB card or another payment.)


REVIEW #2:  3 stars  (534 chars)
I'm generally here two times a week before/after hikes.  The crew at this outlet are competent and friendly.  Sometimes, the line gets a little long, but it's not a major factor. ...  ... They used to have a really large seating area, but Albertson's recently redid some of their retail space and now that area is gone and is just a small area along the front wall. ...  ... Sitting on the patio is great.  It's always covered and the tables all have umbrellas.  Even in winter it's usually very pleasant to sit out and people watch.


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (302 chars)
This location is fine-- It is in the Albertsons and is very small. They do have seating outside and that is nice because it is usually not busy here.  ...  ... They seem to have a lot of different employees here. Not really sure what that is about. But they do have my Chai Latte so I am a happy girl.


REVIEW #4:  1 stars  (464 chars)
Selling water in a desert problem again.  Buy $5.00 coffees for 15 years but when you sweat your balls off walking from your car to the door and just need a water the charge for tap water is $.30.  Less than a mcDonald's dollar for a cup of water. But now I am thinking people with cups all over their car might not be so crazy here.  Must be a nevada policy.  Never had to pay for tap water in california at mcdonalds or starbucks.  A cup does not cost a dollar.


................................................................................
LOCATION #178:  address="2001 E Lake Mead Blvd Ste 105"  city="North Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89030"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (242 chars)
My weakness Carmel frap.. ... I know like who writes a review of Starbucks everyone knows they are great just thought I would point out, they have excellent customer service.  ...  ... Very clean and friendly location for your coffee needs..


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (112 chars)
I go to a lot of Starbucks all around Vegas...the service here is so welcoming and friendly I keep coming back!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (384 chars)
Driving on Lake Mead Boulevard, I saw this Starbuck's, and decided to give it a try. It seems to be an enjoyable Starbucks to hang out in.  ...   With an L-shape foot print, the cafe is commodius. It is clean. The Motown music coming out of the speakers was enjoyable. ...   The baristas seemed to be extraordinarily personable. I overheard them greet a handful of customers by name.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (224 chars)
I really liked this Starbucks. I only went to study but they also have a drive-thru. Also, they had a couple of tables to study but I feel like they need more. Overall it was pretty cool though. I would definitely go again!


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (200 chars)
starbucks for me is definitely one of the best coffees in America. compared to other coffee, starbucks is a bit expensive but i think its well worth it. it will make ur taste buds feel like heaven!!!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (195 chars)
Normal Starbuck's store.  The barista was efficient, the order was taken promptly, and the wifi for my iPhone was quite convenient after being in a back country area where there was no coverage.


REVIEW #7:  1 stars  (132 chars)
Filthy dirty. Very slow workers. So glad I don't live by this one. There wasn't even a trash can outside, so people used the ground


................................................................................
LOCATION #179:  address="7021 Aliante Pkwy Ste1"  city="North Las Vegas"  state="NV"  zip_code="89084"  (17 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (218 chars)
I am a gold rewards member so always get discounts on coffee..and food..This is my favorite Starbucks in town not only is it close to where I live but the staff are excellent it's also cozy to hang out with friends. .


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (528 chars)
I like this Starbucks because of its convenience off the freeway (215) and the park is across the street walking distance. This Starbucks has outside seating where no smoking is allowed! Yes thank you! ... Not so many chairs to sit down in, also it's sometimes bombarded by kids/young adults-- the library is also down the street which I like- grab my coffee and grab my local latest read for the month!  ... My only miss with this Starbucks is the parking! It's crazy small and always almost full lucky they have a drive thru!


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (451 chars)
Normally we love the coffee at this Starbucks it is always hot and made correctly. Today however after placing my order at the drive through I asked for a venti ice water, the lady responded by telling me I had to drive back around to receive it because there were too many people behind me......Really!!!! After she registered the look I gave her she changed her mind and got the water. She must be new...Still our favorite Starbucks, we'll be back.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (340 chars)
Ive gone to many starbucks and i think ive found one of my favs. I either do the drive through or walk in depending on my time situation. But every time i walk in it seems they always recognize you or know your name. Im new to this neighborhood but its nice to see and know that the staff has the customer service like that. Good job guys.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (298 chars)
Lines might seem long in the drive through during the morning rush, and many older locals are often gathered outside chatting and smoking....but the service is great....  They remember your name if you are a frequent patron and usually start ringing up your order when you walk up to the register.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (122 chars)
Drive through line is super long in the mornings. Other than that, staff is always nice, and coffee has always been good.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (88 chars)
Good coffee, personable staff, and convenient location, but the drive-thru can be slow.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (44 chars)
Typical starbucks. Cool place good service.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (32 chars)
This is a good one... Go there!


REVIEW #10:  3 stars  (1752 chars)
The greatest luxury at this Starbuck's isn't comfortable seats, complimentary Wi-Fi, or premium coffee. The luxury at this Starbuck's it is across Aliante Parkway from the Aliante Nature Discovery Park duck pond. This is the Las Vegas Starbuck's by the duck pond. ...  ...   Everytime I visited this Starbuck's, it was before or after the duck pond. In the cold winter months, it is nice to quaff a warm coffee after the duck pond or to carry it to the duck pond and wake up with the duckies. In the hot months of summer months it is relaxing to quaff a refreshing Frapucinno after the duck pond or at the duck pond.  ...  ...   When I walk toward the Starbuck's, I could see the 215 and Aliante Station Hotel & Casino. As I type this, Aliante Station is in need of a Starbuck's type of establishment. When the Starbuck's craving hits, this is the go-to location for Aliante Station. The 215 is the dividing wall between Aliante Station and a cup of Starbuck's. It is the furthest Starbuck's eastbound on the north segment of the 215 toward Interstate 15. When I pull into this parking lot I maneuver through the infrastructure of a shopping center. Surrounding Starbuck's is a modern shopping center that includes Smith's,  Arby's, Sierra Gold, 7-Eleven, and a gym. In other words it is a convenient Starbuck's.  ...  ...   Inside, the lobby is always clean when I visit. The lobby is on the small side. This isn't a negative because I could turn it into a positive by drinking my beverage across Aliante Parkway by the duckies. The baristas have been friendly. ...  ...  I appreciate places that are upbeat and give me a caffeine boost. When I visit the duckies at Aliante Nature Discovery Park, I will also be visiting the Green Mermaid-Starbuck's.


REVIEW #11:  2 stars  (255 chars)
Love Starbucks, but this particular location serves coffee that tastes burned 90 percent off the time. Even though this location is the closest to my home, I go out of my way to get coffee from other Starbucks that don't consistently serve burned coffee.


REVIEW #12:  2 stars  (243 chars)
Waited 15 minutes in the drive thru lane with only 4 card ahead of us. They we not apologetic, rather they gave us a few excuses as to why they were so slow. Also forgot our receipt. We are regular customers and were disappointed time around.


REVIEW #13:  1 stars  (1278 chars)
I can't believe the experience we had here at this specific Starbucks! We came here on Christmas Eve and received an ugly example of attitude that should NOT be seen from an employee and, according to my friend who is employed by Starbucks, completely unacceptable behavior towards fellow Starbucks employees! Here's what happened: ...  ... We were already psyched to go snowboarding.  That psych just wasn't enough so we decided to get some caffeine to boost our psych to whole other level.  We order our drinks and my friend goes to give her "partner number" to receive her discount off of her drinks.  Another employee, possible manager or supervisor, side busts and asks do you have 2 forms of ID. Realizing she left her wallet in the car back at my gf's house, she says oh I forgot my ID, and she proceeds to show her other Starbucks paraphernalia that ONLY Starbucks partners would have.  Now this "supervisor" was talking to her with her back completely turned away, and says to the cashier ringing her up, "It's up to you if you want to believe her" in the ugliest tone of voice! ...  ... Not only was the person completely rude, she did not apologize at all when my friend presented proof that she is a partner with Starbucks! Complete and utter SUCK from this person!


REVIEW #14:  1 stars  (607 chars)
Slowest Starbucks ever!!! Excuses galore and a snarky window person equals one VERY unhappy customer!!! The window person even told me sarcastically "thank you for your patience" after I has commented on how much time it was taking this morning!!! She rang up the wrong amount, handed me the wrong order and seemed frustrated with ME after I had spent 10 minutes stuck in that line!!! If there had been room for me to skip that line I would have been GONE!! I bit my tongue... Called the manager later and explained that maybe that employee needed extra training regarding her customer service!! Grrrr!!!!!


REVIEW #15:  1 stars  (421 chars)
This is the only Starbucks I've ever been to that refused to blend a cake pop into my frap. The employees are nice, but the manager was clearly stingy and claimed that the entire company changed its policies on the 'secret menu' (which isn't a secret menu, it's just the things Starbucks allows to customize drinks). This is definitely the last Starbucks I would choose to go to despite it being the closest to my house.


REVIEW #16:  1 stars  (368 chars)
Currently still in drive thru line for 30 minutes. No. Joke. Can't exit and blocked in from cars in the front and rear. I'm too tempted to drive over the nice gardening next to the drive thru lane. The only thing keeping me sane is killing time writing this review. As I reach the end if typing this not one car has moved forward. I'm gonna drive thru this gardening.


REVIEW #17:  1 stars  (156 chars)
Long drive thru line. Gingerbread Latte tasted so watery I thought they gave me tea. The Caramel Brulee Latte was so strong, tasted more like black coffee.


................................................................................
LOCATION #180:  address="1 E Main St Capitol"  city="Madison"  state="WI"  zip_code="53703"  (9 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (471 chars)
Wooohooo, first to review. ... It's a Starbucks but with a little extra of what it should be. ... During the protests this place has been hopping.  Long lines out the door (at least 20 people outside in the cold when were were last there).  The staff was great.  Cheerful, well staffed and well stocked.   Everything tasted good.   The bathroom was very busy and still clean!  Great job guys.  We warmed up there a number of times.  Great view of the square from inside.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (682 chars)
I'm on a mission.  ... A mission of love? No.  ... A mission of drinking my way through the Starbucks Secret Menu? Yes. ...  ... And while ordering these highly customized drinks can be quite obnoxious, this particular Starbucks location has always been accommodating to my strange requests.  ...  ... The latest of which was a Twix Frappuccino. I recited that I would like a Caramel Frappuccino with extra caramel and mocha drizzle in the cup, whipped cream blended in, plus one pump of hazelnut, and java chips.  ...  ... Given how calorie dense and wordy these special orders are, I figure I'll have the Secret Menu tackled by the time Starbucks is out of business, whereabouts.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (549 chars)
This is the perfect weekend Starbucks. ...  ... While I normally visit the McKee location on my drive to work, this one is perfect for stopping in to get your weekend coffee. They seem to be the Starbucks that gets the new items first, and definitely have one of the best variety in the area. ...  ... Outside tables in the summer and the big long table in the center with "ONWARD" written on it are more highlights.  ...  ... Stopping during summer farmer's market Saturday is a pretty sure occurrence, so I'll be stopping there again soon enough.


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (192 chars)
Staff do a great job at this location. It is always quite busy but they keep it moving quickly along and staff are always pleasant and customer focused. Poor floor plan for the space overall.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (555 chars)
Average mass produced coffee...served with a reliable smile.  ...  ... Pluses include daily horoscope, clover coffee and reliable baristas who prep your order while you're in line if you stick to a regular drink.  ...  ... Draw backs are limited outlets and less seating since the remodel.  Avoid the sun by sitting at the common table. If you need an outlet, sit along the bar near the restrooms, at the common table near the column or on the round tables in the back corner along the Capitol side windows. ...  ... Outdoor seating when weather permits.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (253 chars)
One thing you have to like about Starbucks is that you get a consistent drink every time. Sometimes though its about how long one needs to wait for this consistence. It's location has been remodeled recently and looks amazing.  ...  ... That is all ...


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (159 chars)
7/11/13 While waiting for my wife I stopped at Starbucks.  I had a gift certificate.  I enjoyed their patio while reading the paper sipping on an iced coffee.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (134 chars)
So slow. So, so slow. The set-up is horrible, too. It is always a great reminder that Madison has numerous other local coffe choices.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (468 chars)
Stopped at Starbucks again.  I'm still using up my gift card.  I tried a coffee brewed with their Clover Brewing System.  I was not impressed and felt compelled to remove a star.  What Starbucks created in Seattle is not being replicated thru their exponential growth.  They  have great branding, locations, and marketing, but that's not enough for me.  I suggest Bradbury's coffee house.  They use Kickapoo Coffee's roasted beans.  I think you'll be pleased you did.


................................................................................
LOCATION #181:  address="3515 University Ave Sunset Village"  city="Madison"  state="WI"  zip_code="53705"  (8 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (188 chars)
I love the convenience of Starbucks! And I love knowing that the quality of my order will be the same each time I go. I also like sitting on their patio that looks onto University Avenue.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (721 chars)
Ok so this is a Starbucks, for the most part, like any other starbucks. Specifically to this location, it is expectedly busier than most because it is right on University (hard to miss). Even so there seems to be plentiful seating and staff is efficient give or take some rare occasions. Now the real kicker. This Starbucks has a drive thru! Which is GREAT except that FOR the drive thru is the worst positioned store I have ever seen. People seem to think it is a free-for-all and whoever is closest gets to go; whether you come in through the back entrance or front  I guess its anyones go. Thats why this store doesn't get a full 5 stars. It seem like a tiny thing to worry about but the parking lot is awful as well.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (313 chars)
I realize there are plenty of local coffee shops in Madison, and I love them too, but this one just happens to be on my way to work AND it has a drive through. Sometimes convenience wins. It also happens to have a super friendly and energetic staff that is always so kind and really brightens my morning commute.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (1804 chars)
Drive Through - YIPEEEEEEEE! - 5 Stars. ...  ... The fact that everyone else does this, and by consequence there is a VERY STRONG possibility that you get STUCK in the drive through when it could have taken you less time to park, get out of your car, and order your triple shot cappuccino - BOOOOOOOOO - 1 star. ...  ... The fact that you CAN enter both through University Avenue AND behind the Mobil Gas Station (thus avoiding the hoopla of trying to turn left on University - HOOORAAAAAAAHHH = 5 stars! ...  ... The fact that there's never a cohesive line since there's two drive through entrances, and well.. it could get ugly if people are craving their javas and are trying to manoover their huge ass SUVs and you have a tiny little car that SHOULD be easier but these people are EVIL and vicious and may not let you in accordingly - BOOOOOOOO 1 star. ...  ... The fact that on REPEATED occasions, the !@#$% baristas did NOT know that a triple shot cap was the same as a cap with an extra shot, and wanted to charge me for a latte with two extra shots, and it is PATHETIC when I, the CUSTOMER, has to tell them "Um.. no... A basic cappuccino has TWO shot of espresso.  That's why if I add another one it's called a triple shot.  Look it up!"  (Oh hushie, I say it in a nice way, which probably accounts for my weak coffee.. ) - BOOOOOO 1 star. ...  ... The fact that many times the coffee has been free because of this (they try to overcharge, and after a discussion, I'm right! -  YAY - 4 stars.. ...  ... The fact that they don't know how to make a cappuccino and this makes me wary of the amounts of times that I asked for a cap, and got a latte with foam, then left, and said "DAMN, this coffee is weak", 2 stars. ...  ... I think that averages to three.  Good math skills have I got, you know!


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (427 chars)
It's Starbucks, not a whole lot else to say. Never had an order messed up there; in fact I got free coffee the other day because my "wait had been too long." Can't go wrong with that! ...  ... You can go wrong if you go here at a busy time, though. The drive-thru has two entrances which can be confusing, and the parking lot is atrocious. It isn't large enough to handle lots of customers parking and going to the drive-thru.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (173 chars)
OK for a Starbucks. It's very busy, which makes it noisy and the staff hurried. The furniture, especially the armchairs, are comfortable and a decent place ti sit and read.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (71 chars)
The service is good, but the drive thru and parking are a bit sketchy.


REVIEW #8:  1 stars  (278 chars)
This Starbucks is by far the most disorganized that I've been to, especially when going through the drive thru. They regularly make my drink orders incorrectly and are always out stock of bakery and sandwiches. I regrettably keep coming back because of the convenient location.


................................................................................
LOCATION #182:  address="4202 E Washington Ave Norman Acres"  city="Madison"  state="WI"  zip_code="53704"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (1476 chars)
If you know anything about me, you know I LOVE Starbucks. When I was living in Arizona my home was on the same street as 5... FIVE of them. I lead presentations on community building and branding and have PP slides dedicated to them. I just finished a book about habit which had an entire chapter devoted to them. I long for the switch over to the holiday cups each season. I can go on... ...  ... I'll never forget the first time I had Starbcuks. I was in NY with my friend Cari and we were getting hot tix (student discounted tix when you show up at the butt crack of dawn) for The Full Monty. She decided if there was any way we were going to bear the cold and the line, we needed some Buck. I had never had a cup of coffee up until then, told her I was afraid of jumping in with both feet, so I got a Frapaccino, coffee's sweeter cousin... in the dead of winter... in NY. ...  ... Truth be told I don't drink Starbucks as much as I used to. Funny thing about having a job that allows me to celebrate the fine local offerings we have. However, in addition to being a remarkable brand (seriously, do some Googling if you're interested) they also have incredible boxes if you're moving and need to pack up shhhhtuff.  ...  ... This location gets 5 stars because it's by far the cleanest I've been in so far, and the staff is warm and friendly but not overly so. Large tables make it easy to gather/work and ample parking is an added bonus that some of the others don't have.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (902 chars)
After a terribly long day, I just needed some coffee. I seriously debated going to this location because it is a maze to get back there.  No regrets.   ...  ... This location is hands down the BEST Starbucks I have ever been to.  The line is always long because they are making your drink the way it should be made.  Whether it is a Frappuccino or just a regular cup of coffee this location stands out above the rest.   ...  ... It was on this day that I ordered my standard Grande, Hot, Skim Milk Caramel Mocha with light whip.  It was superb.  No burnt taste, it was fresh, delicious and that sip saved my day.  Yes, it does sound a little dramatic.  I have been studying for the bar and just needed caffeine.  This place gave me flavor and happiness all in one cup.  I wish I could remember a name or give them all a hug.  This is where you go to get a good cup of coffee AND the staff is friendly!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (250 chars)
I really do enjoy a nice relaxing environment, even thought he coffee was 'to go', I still felt right at home in this Starbucks. I have been is some Starbucks that have been nothing but busy, chaotic, and noisy. This one was far form that ambiacnce.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (42 chars)
Gotta try the strawberry banana smoothies


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (557 chars)
I'm so happy they opened a Starbucks! The only ones around were either in Target or in Barnes and Noble at the east towne mall. I love how they added the drive through, it makes it quick and easy for me to get what i want and get on with the rest of my day. ...  ... The staff is superb and very friendly. The only downfall i had was that sometimes the staff is a little chatty with the customers which can delay how quick they can be. But overall it was an awesome experience and I'm so happy that Starbucks has it's own building that's easily accessible.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (56 chars)
Fast and friendly drive-through! Not much more to tell.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (189 chars)
Typical Starbucks layout, nothing unique.  Very friendly staff.  Seating is cramped during busy times.  Sometimes there are no tables available so then it's on to Cool Beans down the road.


................................................................................
LOCATION #183:  address="434 Gammon Pl"  city="Madison"  state="WI"  zip_code="53719"  (11 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (400 chars)
I typically prefer locally owned, independent coffee shops, but the reason I come back to this particular Starbucks is because of the staff. The baristas have all been incredibly kind, courteous, and patient with customers--including myself--and even though I usually steer clear of corporate cafes, I now make it a point to duck into this location whenever I'm on the west side of Madison for work.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (101 chars)
Cute corner shop across form the mall.  ... Consistent service like you would expect from Starbucks.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (49 chars)
Cafe vanilla frap with a banana in it!!!! Delish


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (657 chars)
I have been coming to this Starbucks quite a bit and for a long period of time. It is a nice quiet and smaller Starbucks on the west side. They always have everything brewed on time and they get your order quickly. It's generally cleanly and have some nice coffee-related products always stocked generously. The only thing I dislike about this particular store is the seating. For some reason people go there and take the bigger tables for just one person or take up one of the "comfy chairs" without purchasing anything just to sit... I know its a free country but come on... anyways, It is still a place I come back to regularly and probably will always.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (309 chars)
Came in this morning and was greeted by a very friendly employee at the counter with a "Happy Wednesday!" A very good greeting for first thing in the morning, especially since I didn't have my coffee yet! ...  ... The store was clean and the employees kept the lines moving. Was impressed all the way around!


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (1268 chars)
I come in to read the paper and get coffee on Sunday mornings.  I have had pretty good service here during my past visits.  The partners are friendly, know the product (a result of the excellent training they get), and are willing to make drinks that had been on the menu but are no longer on the menu with similar ingredients.  Today was different.  The one working at the counter was probably 10 to 15 years older than most of the baristas and she sure was short tempered.  She tried charging me the full $2.50 for the paper, when it's only $2 at Starbucks.  She also didn't manage the line well.  The barista who may have been a supervisor told her to charge me the correct price and was far more pleasant.   ...  ... What bought it down to three stars was an older woman pushing a walker sitting down across from me without even asking me if that was okay.  First, she's old enough to know that it's polite to ask someone if they are fine with you sharing a table with them.  She ignored my body language which indicated it was not okay and plopped her butt down and tried to make conversation.  I wanted to be left alone and she didn't get the hint.  I know there is limited seating but she didn't have to be so rude and oblivious to the fact she wasn't welcome.


REVIEW #7:  3 stars  (297 chars)
I normally don't go to Starbucks because I do feel that it is overpriced, but my wife and I had some time to grab a drink before we had to be somewhere. I got the mocha frappuccino while my wife got the caramel. They were very good, but as other reviews have said, the sitting area is very small.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (168 chars)
I'm not a big coffee drinker, but when I am coerced to go here by coffee drinkers, the Passion Tazo iced tea is so juicy and delicious. Free Wi-Fi also makes me happy.


REVIEW #9:  2 stars  (602 chars)
The staff has been pretty good here for the most part but the seating area is awful and gotten worse.   Recently went there to relax before an appointment.  It was cold outside but I didn't expect it to be cold inside.  I wore my coat the whole time as it was quite chilly and they took out the nice upholstered chairs and put in stools and wooden chairs.   Up front there are just tall barstools.  Not a comfortable coffee shop.   Also the coffee is hit and miss for flavor.   it wouldn't take much for a new coffee shop to move in and take away the business from them.   Any takers?  Please say yes.


REVIEW #10:  2 stars  (541 chars)
It's a typical Starbucks as far as workers and drinks go.  The location is very high traffic so it's tough to find parking and seating sometimes. ... The reason I give it two stars is because the majority of the seating is surrounded all by huge windows. I was there for a business meeting a week ago (and it is winter in Wi, so I'm used to the cold), but the windows were so drafty it was freezing by the seats.  I left my winter jacket on the entire time and was still cold. It's great in the summer, but very uncomfortable in the winter.


REVIEW #11:  1 stars  (1475 chars)
I enjoy and occasional Starbucks Coffee and with the onset of fall, of course the Pumpkin Latte.  Recently I gave this location a couple visits and I'm not impressed.  One visit was around 8:30 a.m. on a weekday and the line was crazy long.  We turned around and left.  Good for them for being busy. ...  ... On a second visit, once again a morning, I powered through the line, waiting more than 15 minutes to order.  When ordering the staff was less than friendly.  I have been testing the new Starbucks Rewards program.  It is a bit confusing.  I have it on my smart phone and I also get offers now that I am enrolled.  I let the person know I had $2 off a sandwich.  She said "do you have a code?"  I said no.  She said "well you have to have a code.  I can't redeem without a code.  Hurry up there's a line."  I said OK I may have deleted the email and I chalked it up to my fault.  I then went to pay with my phone app and the person said "I'm new, I don't know how to use that.  We can't scan that."  Once again rushing me.  Befuttled I paid with cash and waited in line for my coffee to be served.  I do appreciate the staff might be stressed but it does not give a warm fuzzy to me when it's implied that I'm the problem. ...  ... If you are in a rush, this is not the place.  I've been to the Target and Hy-Vee locations which are rarely, busy.  Better yet, local owned places are more friendly. ...  ... Based on multiple experiences I'll remember to go elsewhere.


................................................................................
LOCATION #184:  address="661 State St Capitol"  city="Madison"  state="WI"  zip_code="53703"  (16 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (669 chars)
I'm in this location a few times a week, and I always leave happy - definitely not the case for every Starbucks location I visit. The employees make this particular location great. I love that they take time to ask about your day and how they can make your experience better.  ...  ... The setting is just about as great as the staff - go upstairs and sit on the balcony when it's nice outside. It's like being in a little tree house overlooking State Street. This is especially true on the weekend when State is humming with Farmer's Market and other event activity - there's always something interesting (and occasionally bizarre) to see while you drink your coffee.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (519 chars)
I know people in Madison like their fair trade and independent coffee houses, but I still love Starbucks. Say what you will, but I love how they make my lattes and cappuccinos. ...  ... I really like the people who work at this Starbucks, especially the really nice older lady. (I don't mean any offense by older, it's just that most people at this location are college students.) But anyway, she is so friendly and always recognizes me - which might say something about my coffee habits....  ...  ... Anyway, 5 stars.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (399 chars)
this is my favorite Starbucks on campus. Needless to say how good Starbucks coffees are, the atmosphere in this Starbucks is very soothing, I like reading, telecommuting or even studying for exam at upstairs, where big couches are provided. I spent most of my class intervals here as it is really strategic to be on the state street. ...  ... I even bought an Ipad from a college student here. LOL.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (231 chars)
Have you seen the seating area upstairs?? It is gorgeous, spacious, and full of outlets! It doesn't hurt that you also have a fantastic view of state street from the balcony.  ...  ... I think I've found my home away from home. :)


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (224 chars)
This is, quite literally, the nicest Starbucks I have ever been in.  Balcony seating overlooking State Street, plus extra seating upstairs, and a fireplace, make this place much more comfortable than your typical Starbucks.


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (909 chars)
So I''ve only been in Madison for a short time, but I love coming to this Starbucks. I am not a huge fan of the coffee here, but the atmosphere is wonderful. The staff have always treated me well, and the first time I came here, one of the ladies working treated me as though we were already good friends. A+ to the nicest barista in the world. ...  ... They have both a downstairs and an upstairs sitting area. Downstairs is more like an normal Starbucks, but the upstairs is split into two areas, including a large outside porch area. The inside upstairs has plenty of space with tables and some more comfortable seats (but watch out because it is pretty cold up there) , and the outside has the same. I''ve only experienced this outdoor porch during June, but it is one of my favorite places to go. Also very close to the Union Terrace and the Lakeshore Path if you'd like to walk after grabbing a coffee.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (711 chars)
This location is a very good example for what a Starbucks should be.  Usually, the service is good and timely, even if you go during a rush in the afternoon.  The wifi can be hit or miss depending on how many people are using it. ...  ... The reason for the four star rating is the problem that is common to most State St/Campus open areas - the transient/homeless population.  It's not unusual for one table to be taken up by someone's plastic bags or someone to be sitting out panhandling.  It's not Starbuck's fault - you see that at most coffee shops in the area.  There's really not much they can do to control the problem, short of kicking them out.  That's an issue for the city of Madison to deal with.


REVIEW #8:  4 stars  (651 chars)
I have spent some significant time in-between classes during the school year in the upstairs. Barista's are the best in town, always kind and will give away the occasional free drink with good conversation. The upstairs is great, lots of seating clean bathroom, great outdoor porch for people watching. The big con is that there is awful Wi-Fi. I thought that you couldn't connect a router to a dial up connection, but I guess this location defied science because the connection couldn't be slower. I hate to be commercial supporting a big business like Starbucks, but it's the only place in Madison to get away from hippies, and I love their coffee.


REVIEW #9:  4 stars  (621 chars)
seriously above excellent for a starbucks. ... Now i have to admit, I used to work for s bucks back in chicago and the guy who hired me is now the DM for starbucks in Wisconsin.  His office is upstairs in this fine establishment. ... He was a seriously fine manager who knows how to treat his employees, and kept high high standards.  So I am not surprised that this location just feels different than any other starbucks I have been to. ... Whevever I am passing through, I try to stop and see if he is in. ... He usually isn't, but perhaps I should call first! ... So, Malcolm, if you are reading this:  LOCK AND LOAD!


REVIEW #10:  4 stars  (374 chars)
Best Damn Starbucks in WI ...  ... Starbucks is consistently a 3* coffee house. This rare exception provides a combination of professionalism, efficiency, personality and consistency and is a Capital Square coffee spot that engages in repeat business. It steadily busy, but has never taken longer than 10 minutes to leave with a freshly prepared Venti specialty drink. Yum!


REVIEW #11:  4 stars  (274 chars)
Always friendly workers! Extra seating upstairs, great balcony, and very cozy! The only problems I have found with it are lack of seating, like any other Starbucks, and poor Wi-Fi. Other than that, the service is amazing which is sometimes hard to find at busy coffeeshops.


REVIEW #12:  4 stars  (218 chars)
Okay, how bizarre to review a Starbucks, but the State Street Starbucks employees are seriously amenable to complicated drink requests, as well as consistently efficient and pleasant, and I thoroughly appreciate this.


REVIEW #13:  2 stars  (754 chars)
Usually I'm a big fan of Starbucks locations but this one... it is no where near the top of my Starbucks-love list.  ... The staff is friendly, so they mega-props for that. But since it is located in the heart of State Street, it is ALWAYS crowded. I'm usually able to snag a table, but the pickings are slim.  ... My other major complaint is that the wireless rarely works. It is spotty at best. Maybe it is the large number of students using it at the same time, but it never allows me to fully connect and work online.  ... It's also a pretty loud location. Not in an annoying way, but with the music filtering through the speakers and the amount of students working on group projects, it is not easy to work on something that requires concentration.


REVIEW #14:  2 stars  (614 chars)
This Starbucks is always freezing cold in the summer, uncomfortable. But usually, it's comfortable in winter and has a nice lounge upstairs and a second set of bathrooms, which is wonderful. However, today the lounge was freezing cold, causing everyone there to leave on their coats. There is a fireplace that was not lit, so I asked the barista why it wasn't lit, and he said, "it smells like gas, so we have not lit it this year!" It's very cold, and there are lots of nice coffee shops in the area with better coffee and much better food. Really-you can't call a repairman?  ... And the wifi did not work well.


REVIEW #15:  2 stars  (600 chars)
Well, now I know why coffee snobs (like me) have nicknamed them "Charbucks." Horribly overroasted beans make the coffee taste awful and burnt. ...  ... So, why two stars? Well, for the service! It's awesome...seriously. The employees here are great, even if they have to deal with making coffee from super-crappy, stale beans. ...  ... If I'm in a pinch and have to choose between these guys and the horrendous Espresso Royale across the street? I'm going with Starbucks every time. Nice employees will always make me spend my money over an annoying hipster who can't brew a cup of joe worth a damn.


REVIEW #16:  2 stars  (529 chars)
Great coffee but the service in the afternoon is poor. I was in there today at 12:45 hoping for some coffee before I headed back to the office and there were only 3 people ahead of me. The girl was so ridiculously slow that I had to give up my spot and leave. If this were the first time that this happened to me at this Starbucks I wouldn't care , but it has happened multiple times.  ...  ... I would suggest that if this particular barista is going to run the check out line they might want to consider a back up to help her.


................................................................................
LOCATION #185:  address="6709 Frank Lloyd Wright Ave"  city="Middleton"  state="WI"  zip_code="53562"  (7 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (689 chars)
I know I've talked about the staff here, but I just need to repeat how AWESOME they are. The experience is always what I'm looking for! ...  ... Just recently, I asked to see the nutrition label on the flavor syrups, because it's not listed solely on the website. The barista was nice enough to hand it over--AND helped me figure out portion size, because it's listed as 2 Tbsp, not  X "pumps" which all of us SB addicts know is the barista measurement unit.  I usually get two pumps, so she put two pumps in an empty cup to show me how much it was(approx. 2tsp, in case you're curious). Thanks, Lily--you rock! ...  ... Taking the time to do little things like that is top notch service.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (519 chars)
Awesome staff every morning, very friendly, and expedient.  This group of baristas never fails to greet, smile, and energize the morning with an engaging conversation.  They will compliment, commend, suggest, and encourage you on the smallest detail of your day or coffee. ...  ... I really love the attention to detail.. Especially the board placed on the counter everyday with the weather, horoscope, super quiz, and joke or cartoon. Just to keep you entertained while you wait on your fabulous caffeinated beverage!


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (451 chars)
Like most Starbucks, this one serves up some hot caffeinated beverages as well as some tasty treats. I happened upon this place after a long walk from my hotel during a wonderful blizzard that dumped about 17" of snow and actually caused them to close early. Hey, I thought Wisconsin was used to snow? ha ha ...  ... The workers were friendly and even comped me some pastries that were going to be tossed or go bad because of the early closure. Cool!


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (443 chars)
The food and drinks are the same as any other Starbucks. Not my favorite coffee (hello, Peets!), but decent enough. What makes this particular Starbucks outpost exceptional is the wonderfully friendly and helpful employees. It is so refreshing, not to mention unusual, to go to a coffee shop or restaurant, especially a chain location, and find staff who don't seem to hate what they're doing. Great employees = happy and returning customers.


REVIEW #5:  5 stars  (364 chars)
I totally agree with Paul C. on this one. This group of employees is the best I've ever had the pleasure of being served by, as far as Starbucks is concerned. ...  ... I live right down the road from this fantastic location by Copp's ...but sometimes I need a mid day pick-me-up and have to go to the one closer to work, which is off Gammon Rd. Just not the same.


REVIEW #6:  5 stars  (216 chars)
Agree with all the other folks- really great staff.  Also, a good one too work at: not too loud , just the right amount of background noise.  Starbucks coffee is Starbucks coffee- maybe not the best, but consistent.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (257 chars)
SBUX on our way out of Madison.  Tucked away in a newer shopping square, on the corner by the stoplight where you turn in.  Not bad on-off the highway.  Very friendly folks, parking was available & convienent, and our Venti Mochas were just what we needed.


................................................................................
LOCATION #186:  address="8310 Greenway Blvd"  city="Middleton"  state="WI"  zip_code="53562"  (6 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  4 stars  (1075 chars)
I haven't been to this location as much as I have some of the other locations but I do enjoy this location. Again they are all kind of the same in a sense but its about the interior and the experience. I actually quite like the people who work at this location. I have seen the same people working here for a while now and they always make me feel so welcome. They are usually a couple of early 30's to middle aged women working here that make ya feel like mom is welcoming you home. "What can I get ya hun," "How's your day going sweety," that kind of stuff. And some people may not like that but I enjoy it because it makes you feel way more comfortable to be somewhere. They are always fast and efficient and any extras you may want are stocked plentifully. The one small thing I don't like is that they are tucked away and really have to be looking for it to know where it is and it is sort of a small building. It can get really cramped if there is a line in there and pushed against some of the valuables. Nice place to stop after some shopping if ya know where it is.


REVIEW #2:  4 stars  (142 chars)
it's a starbucks...what can I say other than it's as great as every starbucks I've been to!  Friendly service and a consistant product.  yay!


REVIEW #3:  3 stars  (1243 chars)
I am always iffy about chain locations.  Usually you can not mess up a Starbucks too much.  This location was missing something.  The staff was busy having conversations behind the counter so service was slow.  The customers were not being attended to.   ...  ... I had an event near this place so I went two mornings in a row.  Each morning something catastrophic occurred. Day one, while handing a venti coffee to a patron, the barrista was handing the coffee while securing the lid, which resulted in the coffee tipping over and hitting four people.  While cleaning up, I mentioned that coffee was still under the counter and you would have thought that I told the barrista he was completely inadequate.  I would just hate for someone to lean on the counter and get residual hanging coffee.   ...  ... Day two - They ran out of something.  Not sure what.  But something.  I know this because they were all milling around talking crap about someone who was not doing their job.  The funny part is that no one was attending to the people in front of the counter.  Just saying.  The caramel mocha was completely average.  Nothing special.  Definitely glad my event was over but I am sad to see no other competitors in the area but McDonald's.


REVIEW #4:  3 stars  (548 chars)
Let it be known that I strongly dislike Starbucks coffee. I prefer to taste the actual coffee bean flavor, rather than choke down a super-over-roasted, burned-to-within-an-inch-of-its-life-and-left-as-a-shell-of-what-it-once-was coffee bean. ...  ... So... I don't drink the coffee here (or at any Starbucks). That said, I do enjoy the Tzao tea, and the staff is friendly.  ...  ... Lines move quickly. ...  ... It's extremely pricey, considering what you're getting. ...  ... I wish there were some local coffee shops closer to my primary office.


REVIEW #5:  3 stars  (278 chars)
It did take a while to get our drinks here, but they were super apologetic. It wasn't a big deal as we realized there was someone new that was also training so it took a little longer to get all the drinks ready. Not a big deal. ...  ... Drinks were tasty and I had happy kids.


REVIEW #6:  2 stars  (353 chars)
It is so-so.   I went in on  a Sunday morning so it was pretty slow.   The employees were busy talking so they did not great me when I came in and then I asked for them to clean some tables.....I got a sigh and the guy went and cleaned the tables.   Not a single clean table in the place.   You would think if it was that slow the place would be clean!


................................................................................
LOCATION #187:  address="6512 Monona Dr"  city="Monona"  state="WI"  zip_code="53716"  (9 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (362 chars)
I only drink their teas and they are fine. The nice aspect of this store is the employees. They make the difference between this coffee shop and other places. Case in point, I was in line when a woman handed the barista a card with her order. The barista read the card, rang her up, took payment, smiled and then gave the hand sign for 'thank you'. Super sweet.


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (322 chars)
Yes its Starbucks and I prefer Ancora, but.this Monona location has the best service, friendliest staff you will find. It's often busy at 9 am but it's fast as one could expect. I've been to the others and it's no contest, Monona rules. No drive through, but I find the staff so good I don't mind coming in.Very well run.


REVIEW #3:  5 stars  (195 chars)
If you're comparing this to the other Starbucks in the Madison area, it has been my experience that this one is the best. Clean, friendly, fast, and the drinks are done even more carefully here.


REVIEW #4:  5 stars  (94 chars)
Great service but turn up the lights.  I know that it is sunny in the afternoon but really???


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (1166 chars)
Yes, I am reviewing a Starbucks.  ... The reason for this review was for the exceptional service I received here this past weekend.  ... My wife has been saving the points up on her Starbucks rewards card (a gold card). It turns out that you have to cash in free drinks within 30 days on your card now, and they can not be stored and used when ever you like. ... So instead of have multiple free drinks on her card for us to use, we only had 1 free one. ... The employee at the counter explained this new rule to us, and still hooked us up with a second free drink any size/ any kind of our choice.  ... It was truly awesome customer service! ... So thank you lady employee behind the register this last Easter Sunday around noon. ...  ... Other things I noticed about this Starbucks, it was very clean, a well organized pastry/muffin area. ... There is no drive thru, so that kinda sucks. ... I counted at least 3 people working behind the counter, so staffed properly. ... Our drinks were made quick and tasted great! ...  ... 4 out of 5 only because it is a Starbucks and there are just so many of them (its not original).  ... Again, excellent customer service!


REVIEW #6:  4 stars  (154 chars)
It's a Starbucks, they're friendly, prompt, and consistant. Easy on/off the beltline. No drive through, but the Fitchburg drive through is a joke anyway.


REVIEW #7:  4 stars  (44 chars)
Friendly, Fast, and Clean. Good drinks too.


REVIEW #8:  3 stars  (715 chars)
So this Starbucks is a really nice one as far as comfort goes. It's big, a lot of seats a nice fireplace and the bathrooms have been pretty clean each time I've been there. My problem here is that they don't brew a blonde roast. You have to get a pour over if you want it. Normally that would be fine, but at this location they can not seem to remember they started one. On 3 different occasions I have watched my coffee sit there getting cold. After almost 10 min one time I got an apology... But normally it's about 5 min after it's been done that you get it (after asking). No apology... Just here. It's kinda sad. It would have gotten a 5 star, but they forget you. It would have been 4 star... But no apology.


REVIEW #9:  3 stars  (85 chars)
Local Starbucks, clean, and a friendly staff. The hot spot works well for my IPhone.


................................................................................
LOCATION #188:  address="2804 Prairie Lakes Dr"  city="Sun Prairie"  state="WI"  zip_code="53590"  (9 reviews)

REVIEW #1:  5 stars  (913 chars)
Yes, I rated a chain 5 stars and here is why... ...  ... My coffee maker, a french press, broke the week before SB opened. My backup, a Keurig, died the next day - no warning just died, wouldn't even turn on.  ... SB has a drive through, I have two kids, dragging them in and out of their car seats is worse then glass in your eye. :)  ... Those are the reasons I went to SB, but here are the reasons why I am giving them five stars.  ...  ... My first two trips through the drive through, because of high volume and new equipment malfunctions (the phone scanner wouldn't scan my phone). They didn't charge me for anything!  ... By the third time through the drive through they knew me and my order. My husband had a similar experience. We found the service exceptional. The staff went out of their way to make sure we had a satisfactory experience. Kudos to you Sun Prairie Starbucks. I am glad you are here. :)


REVIEW #2:  5 stars  (103 chars)
There are several Starbucks in the area, this is by far my favorite. Always friendly and professional.


REVIEW #3:  4 stars  (801 chars)
I was so excited when I heard that there would be a Starbucks at this location, as I'd been wondering about this large building on the corner. I thought us crazy kids in Sun Prairie were getting the biggest Starbucks in the WORLD.  ...  ... I was so wrong. Starbucks is just a little bit of this building, the rest is still being finished and I haven't heard anything about what's going in there.  ...  ... At any rate, I wanted to check it out but had already had my caffeine dose for the day so I went with a caramel steamer. The guy at the counter was friendly, the woman over by the coffee machine was super-chatty (but in a fun way and I was in the mood for a little conversation), and my drink was perfect (I don't think steamers are very hard for the average barista but a review is a review).


REVIEW #4:  4 stars  (307 chars)
Service is improving at this location. Staff has always been friendly and courteous. The location of this store is somewhat challenging during busy times. Tight parking lot and narrow entry way makes it difficult to navigate around traffic. Quality of the products are what you would expect from Starbucks.


REVIEW #5:  4 stars  (114 chars)
I no sooner give my order for a double shot espresso & it's delivered.  Eric & the crew are on top of their game.


REVIEW #6:  3 stars  (635 chars)
We were very excited to have Starbucks Coffee near us in Sun Prairie and began visiting regularly. The coffee is great. The staff exceptional, and the layout very comfortable .Unfortunately  it ends there. We found that the temperature is always set at freezing, winter and summer. The music is so loud you can't here yourself think, or hold a conversation, and the genre is pop. we tried sitting outside weather permitting only to find tables and chairs not yet cleaned from the winter. ... We will continue to visit Starbucks because of the friendly staff and great coffee, but will sit outside, after cleaning the chairs and tables


REVIEW #7:  2 stars  (439 chars)
SLOW service. After twice suffering through  the drive-thru - SLOW - I thought it might be faster to park and go in.  Nope. staff seem to be fluttering around without actually producing anything.  Plus much chatting among themselves and ignoring customers. i thought it was startup adjustment but now I think they just cant get it together (or don't really care) . too bad b/c it is a great location to stop between shopping destinations.


REVIEW #8:  1 stars  (792 chars)
We have been to Starbucks' all over the world and have never received such poor and SLOW service. EVER. We were excited to see one put in near our home and close to places we shop frequently. Naturally we have visited about 5 times, giving it the benefit of the doubt, "they are new, they are training new staff, etc". Last night we were in there, the only people in there and no greeting by any of the 4 employees. we waited at the counter for 3 or 4 minutes before someone said they would be right with us. took our order.  waited 10 minutes for them to make our drinks and they still came out wrong. i wasn't going to bother to have them fix it because we didn't have the time to wait another 20 minutes! ...  ... Starbucks needs to take note that this location is giving them a bad name.


REVIEW #9:  1 stars  (666 chars)
I come here way too often for you to be fucking up my coffee the way they do. EASY ICE, it's not that complicated. I finally said something to the girl at the window, after having to scoop out ice, on more than one occasion. She looked at me, dumbfounded, and continued to stare at me without any apology, "we'll try not to fuck it up next time" nothing. Maybe she should work a little harder on her customer service and less on her tacky red lipstick . I'll stick to the east side, for some reason sun prairie cannot handle the drive through AT ALL. get it together, it's coffee, not rocket science, and I'm not ordering some fluffy drink with twelve steps either.



================================================================================
SUMMARY:  188 locations (6586 chars),  2518 reviews (1109015 chars),  3.37 stars avg
================================================================================
